Teekoa Iuta
was the first Kiribati ambassador to Taiwan. At the same time, she was ambassador to Japan.

Alien Project
is the stage name of Israeli psychedelic trance DJ and producer Ari Linker. He has also collaborated with other musicians in the groups Alien vs. The Cat, N.B.K.

Akhil Bharatiya Jatav Mahasabha
was founded in 1917 under the leadership of Rao Sahib Manik Chand Jatav and . It was formed to promote the interests of Chamars for seeking social upliftment into Kshatriya varna. Manik Chand Jatav, Yadavendu Harishchandra and others came in contact with each other in 1910s.

Samir Kalmoni
is an entrepreneur, businessman, chief executive officer and founder of the Papaye Fast Food company, he established the company in 1991 which has now become a brand name in Ghana. Kalmoni returned to Ghana after working in Dubai.

Brandon Aguilera Zamora
is a Costa Rican footballer who currently plays as a midfielder for Alajuelense.

Kim Tal
is a Cambodian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Ordos
railway station is a railway station of the Baoxi railway, and is the planned terminus of the Huzhun Hebei Express Railway.It opened in May 2016. The station is located around 8km from the urban core of the city, and 10km from Ordos Ejin Horo Airport.

Courage Productions
runs the Miss BC pageant, including the Mrs. BC, Miss Teen BC, and Miss Charity BC titles. It was founded in Langley in 2002 by Darren Storsley.

Michael Cooney
is a British screenwriter, playwright, and director. His father is the actor and playwright Ray Cooney.

Takafumi Okubo
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Ayi Silva Kangani
is a Togolese footballer who currently plays as a forward for Bnei Yehuda. Kangani was born in Israel to Richard and Chantal, migrants from Togo.

Go Young-jun
is a Korean footballer currently playing as a midfielder for Pohang Steelers.

Jo Jin-woo
is a South Korea footballer currently playing as a right-back for Daegu.

Czech-Polish
border is the inter-state border between the Czech Republic and the Republic of Poland. The Czech Republic is one of the seven countries currently bordering Poland.

Pyotr Vasilievich Vologodsky
was a Russian statesman and public figure. He was the first chairman of the Council of Ministers of the Russian state and the second and last chairman of the Provisional Siberian government.

Southern European Canadians
are Canadians of Southern European ancestry. Southern European Canadian people can usually trace back full or partial heritage to Italy, Greece, Spain, Portugal, and other nations in, or ethnoculturally connected with, Mediterranean Europe.

Claude Watney
was a member of the Watney brewing family, director of the brewing firm of that name, and motor dealer and enthusiast. In 1903 he had a showroom in London selling Panhard and Mercedes motor cars.

Rhonda M. Stroud
is a materials scientist and planetary scientist at the United States Naval Research Laboratory, where she heads the Nanoscale Materials Section. She is known for her research on nanostructures, including quasicrystals and aerogels, and on the materials that make up comets and cosmic dust.

Mitzie Jessop Taase
is an American Samoan attorney serving as Acting Attorney General of American Samoa. Taase was appointed to the role to succeed Talauega Eleasalo Ale, who resigned to run for Lieutenant Governor of American Samoa in the 2020 American Samoa gubernatorial election.

Wolfgang Koch
is a German operatic bass-baritone. He is best known for his performances in leading roles in the operas of Richard Wagner.

Smith Reservoir
is located in Costilla County, Colorado, south of Blanca in the San Luis Valley. The reservoir is owned by the Trinchera Irrigation Company.

James Munroe Turner
was a Michigan politician. James Munroe Turner was born in Lansing, Michigan on April 23, 1850 to parents James Madison and Marian Munroe Turner.

Thereva
inornata is a Palearctic species of stiletto fly in the family Therevidae.

Frank A. Ehmann
is an American former basketball player know for his All-American college career at Northwestern University. Ehmann joined Northwestern from nearby St. George High School in Evanston, Illinois.

Thereva
plebeja is a Palearctic species of stiletto fly in the family Therevidae.

Julien Bargeton
is a French politician who is a member of the French Senate representing Paris.

Ingolf Huhn
is a German opera manager and theatre director. Born in Magdeburg, after the Abitur Huhn studied opera direction in Berlin, musicology in Leipzig and theology.

Oak Grove Cemetery
is an historic cemetery located in Bath, Maine. Its oldest headstone bears the date January 22, 1777.

Thereva
valida is a Palearctic species of stiletto fly in the family Therevidae.

Herman Frans Anna
baron Van der Wee is a Belgian economic historian. He was a full professor of social and economic history at the KU Leuven from 1969 to 1993.

Vladimir Mikhailovich Besobrasow
was a Russian military leader from the Bezobrazov family, general from the cavalry, adjutant general. In 1915-1916 - commander of the Guard.

Genesis Peak
is a mountain summit located in the North Cascades, in Whatcom County of Washington, United States. It is situated within North Cascades National Park and Stephen Mather Wilderness.

Handala
, also Handhala, Hanzala or Hanthala, is a prominent national symbol and personification of the Palestinian people. The character was created in 1969 by political cartoonist Naji al-Ali, and first took its current form in 1973.

Pandivirilia
melaleuca is a Palearctic species of stiletto fly in the family Therevidae.

Spiriverpa
lunulata is a Palearctic species of stiletto fly in the family Therevidae.

Mohammed Elias Razi
was an Indian politician, belonging to the Workers Party of India. He was elected four times to the West Bengal Legislative Assembly, being elected from the Harishchandrapur constituency in 1957, 1967, 1969 and 1971.

Ministry of Vengeance
is a 1989 American action thriller film directed by Peter Maris and starring John Schneider, Ned Beatty, George Kennedy, Apollonia Kotero, Yaphet Kotto and James Tolkan.

TechnoSphere, Inc.
is an American Information technology solutions and services company founded in 1994 in New York City with office locations in the United States, Canada, India, the Philippines, Brazil, Singapore, Oman, and Australia. TechnoSphere was founded in July 1994 in New York City as an information technology consulting company by Aureo Capiral.

Willard I. Bowerman Jr
. was a Michigan politician.

Enugu West Senatorial District
in Enugu State covers five local governments of Aniniri, Awgu, Ezeagu, Oji River and Udi. Agwu is the collation centre for Enugu West Senatorial District.

Anambra North Senatorial
District in Anambra State covers seven local government areas which include Onitsha North, Onitsha South, Oyi, Ogbaru, Anambra East, Anambra West and Ayamelum. There are 1,392 Polling Units.

Anambra South Senatorial
District in Anambra State comprises seven local government areas which include Ihiala, Nnewi North, Nnewi South, Orumba South, Orumba North, Aguata and Ekwusigo. This senatorial district has 1,675 Polling Units.

Steven Michael Gottlieb
is an American amateur astronomer, researcher, writer and lecturer. Gottlieb grew up in the Los Angeles area, later moving to Northern California.

Vega
flight VV09 was the launch of the Sentinel-2B satellite by the Vega launcher. The only payload of the flight was the Sentinel-2B multispectral Earth observation satellite.

John P. Story
was a career officer in the United States Army who attained the rank of major general. An 1865 graduate of the United States Military Academy, he served from shortly after the end of the American Civil War until retiring in 1905.

Tyler Christian Soderstrom
is an American baseball catcher. He was selected 26th overall by the Oakland Athletics in the 2020 Major League Baseball draft.

Fernando Adolfo Iglesias
is an Argentine journalist, writer, politician, and volleyball player. Currently he is a National Deputy in the Argentine Congress representing the Autonomous City of Buenos Aires.

Acallistus
cuprescens is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Broscinae. It was described by Thomas Gibson Sloane in 1920 and is an endemic species found in Tasmania, Australia.

Bethany Lee Albertson
is an American Political psychologist. She is an Associate professor of political science at the University of Texas at Austin.

Gobshite
Quarterly is a Literary magazine based in Portland, Oregon. The journal was founded in 2002 by R.V. Branham, M.F. McAuliffe, and Richard Johnson.

Gustavo Kuerten
and Fernando Meligeni were the defending champions, but Meligeni did not compete this year. Kuerten teamed up with Jaime Oncins and lost in quarterfinals to tournament runners-up Aleksandar Kitinov and Eric Taino.

Shikha Rajesh Gautam
is an Indian badminton player. A member of the Indian squad at the 2019 Badminton Asia Mixed Team Championships in Hong Kong, Shikha is current national champion and is ranked no.

Laura E. Kennedy
is a retired United States career diplomat, who has served as U. S. Ambassador to Turkmenistan, U.S. Permanent Representative to the Conference on Disarmament in Geneva, and Deputy Assistant Secretary of State.

Alfredo Varela
was an Argentinian writer. A communist, he won the Lenin Peace Prize 1970-1971 and was awarded with the Order of Friendship of Peoples by the Soviet Union.

Judah Eskender Tafari
was a Jamaican vocalist and musician, known for his distinct vocal tone, and spiritual outlook. His records on the Studio One label are regarded as classics.

Acanthicolepis
is a genus of marine annelids in the family Polynoidae. The genus was described in 1990 and includes two short-bodied species with up to 50 segments and which occur in the Mediterranean Sea and North-east Atlantic Ocean.

Joseph Watson
was an American merchant and politician. He was the mayor of Philadelphia from 1824 to 1828.

News
Break or newsbreak.com is an AI-powered news aggregator owned by Particle Media. It has a website as well as Apple and Android apps.

Aracillum
was a fortified Cantabrian city, scene of the third of the great battles of the Cantabrian wars between the Roman Empire and Cantabrian indigenous tribes.

Colette Marie St. Mary
is a professor and associate chair of the biology department at the University of Florida. Her research focuses include behavioral and evolutionary ecology, speciation, sexual selection, and evolutionary aspects of cancer.

Six-Party Talks
was a variety show program aired by KBS2. Originally, the pilot was formed, but the regular formation was canceled.

David Bitsindou
is a French footballer who now plays for US Fontenay in his home country. Bitsindou started his senior career with US Chantilly.

Dieter Annies
and former member of the German Bundestag. For the elections to the Volkskammer on 18 March 1990, he was placed third on the list of the electoral alliance Die Liberalen in his electoral district and moved into the Volkskammer as a member of parliament.

Sebelas Maret University Campus VI Kebumen
.

Matt F. Delmont
is an American historian. He is the Sherman Fairchild Distinguished Professor of History at Dartmouth College and former Professor of History at Arizona State University and Scripps College.

Peter Milne
is an Australian photographer and visual artist, born and living in Melbourne. He is known for his early work documenting the 1970s Melbourne punk scene and the first decade of the Melbourne International Comedy Festival.

Charles Da Costa
was an Australian architect known for his work as a railway architect in Queensland. He specialised in reinforced concrete and structural steel designs.

Sarah Soilihi
is a French athlete, politician, and political spokesperson. A victory at the World Traditional Kickboxing Association in 2015 made her a competitive kick-boxing champion, and the following year she was a French national champion in semi-contact karate.

James H. Birch
was an American slave trader, tried for kidnapping but acquitted in the District of Columbia. Birch was responsible for the kidnapping and selling of Solomon Northup, a free man, in Washington in 1841.

Karl Johann Suske
is a German violinist. In the course of his more than forty-year career as a musician, Suske has been first concertmaster of the Staatskapelle Berlin, the Leipzig Gewandhaus Orchestra as well as the Bayreuth Festival orchestra.

Macseal
is an American rock band from Farmingdale, New York. Macseal began with the release of a self-titled EP in August 2015.

Mount Benzarino
is a mountain summit located in North Cascades National Park, in Chelan County of Washington state. It is situated in the North Cascades, a subset of the Cascade Range.

John Landon
and Betsey Landon.

Mavis Agbandje-McKenna
is a Medical Biophysicist, Structural Virologist and a Professor of Structural Biology as well as the Director of the Center for Structural Biology at the University of Florida in Gainesville, Florida. Agbandje-McKenna has dedicated her career to solving parvovirus structures using X-ray crystallography and cryogenic electron microscopy and has done much of the initial work to elucidate the basic structure and function of adeno-associated viruses.

Joginder Singh Mann
, is an Indian politician and Minister. Joginder Singh Mann was born into Mazhabi Sikh community to Puran Singh at Phagwara, Punjab.

Pady
in Progressovskoye Rural Settlement, Paninsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 224 as of 2010.

Dortmund
retained their title with a comfortable six-point lead over runners-up Bayern Munich.

Georgiyevka
in Rostashevskoye Rural Settlement, Paninsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 117 as of 2010.

Aloye Pole
and the administrative center of Rostashevskoye Rural Settlement, Paninsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 574 as of 2010.

Kukkhato Khuni
is a Bangladeshi Bengali language film released in 2000. The film is directed and produced by Montazur Rahman Akbar.

Kazinovka
in Rostashevskoye Rural Settlement, Paninsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 83 as of 2010.

Mirovka
in Rostashevskoye Rural Settlement, Paninsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 67 as of 2010.

Rostashevka
in Rostashevskoye Rural Settlement, Paninsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 53 as of 2010.

Rettai Roja
is a Tamil language drama airing on Zee Tamil. It premiered on 12th August 2019.

Manna
, was a successful Bangladeshi film actor and producer. In his 24 years career he has acted in more than three hundred films.

Devprayag
is one of the 70 assembly constituencies of Uttarakhand a northern state of India. Devprayag is part of Garhwal Lok Sabha constituency.

Narendranagar
is one of the 70 assembly constituencies of Uttarakhand a northern state of India. Narendranagar is part of Garhwal Lok Sabha constituency.

Chandradimuka Stadium
is a football stadium located in Dukuh, Kebumen, Kebumen Regency, Central Java, Indonesia. It is the home stadium of the Persak Kebumen football club which can hold around 10,000 spectators.

Warren DeBoer
was an American anthropologist specializing in ethnography and archaeology of the Americas. He particularly focused on ethnohistory and ethnoarchaeology of South America.

Etsuko Nakamichi
is a Japanese former long track speed skater, who was active in the 1970s. Nakamichi represented her nation at the World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women in 1978, finishing 30th overall.

Marginellonidae
are a taxonomic family of deep water marine gastropod molluscs in the clade Neogastropoda.

Bethartoli
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India.The elevation of Bethartoli is and its prominence is . It is 108th highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Northern Sorsogon
is a Bisayan language spoken in the central part of Sorsogon, Philippines, in Sorsogon City and the municipalities of Casiguran, and Juban. It is closely related to, but distinct from Southern Sorsogon which is spoken in the southern part of Sorsogon.

Palau Marathon
is an annual marathon race in the Pacific island state of Palau, which has been organized by the Palau Track and Field Association since 2004. The route varies, in 2017 the marathon started in Ngardmau and led over the Koror-Babeldaob Bridge at 20 miles to the finish on the beach of the Palau Pacific Resort on Ngerekebesang Island.

Saint Apostolos
the New.

Valeriy Feliksovych Ivanov
is a Ukrainian journalist, specialist in mass communications, Doctor of Philology, and professor. The President of the Academy of the Ukrainian Press since April 2001.

Daniel Ahmling Chapman Nyaho
was a statesman, a Ghanaian diplomat and academic. He was the first African appointee at the United Nations.

Sofyinka
in Rostashevskoye Rural Settlement, Paninsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 131 as of 2010.

Chernavka
and the administrative center of Chernavskoye Rural Settlement, Paninsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 616 as of 2010.

Ashok Dhawale
.

Shcherbachyovka
in Chernavskoye Rural Settlement, Paninsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 181 as of 2010.

Granulina
isseli is a species of very small sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk or micromollusk in the family Granulinidae.

Bereznyagi
and the administrative center of Bereznyagovskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 773 as of 2010.

Darren Hope
is an English former professional footballer who played in the Football League for Stockport County. Hope was born in Stoke-on-Trent and began his career with Stoke City having joined from local non-league side Newcastle Town.

Jason Charles Percival
is an English former professional footballer who played in the Football League for Exeter City. Percival was born in Nuneaton and began his career with Stoke City.

Saburo Tanamachi
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Daniel Magnus
is an American martial artist, athletic trainer, celebrity bodyguard, fugitive recovery specialist and businessman. He is a two-time world kickboxing champion and is best known for being the only person to ever defend his championship title after open-heart surgery.

Robert Kabushenga
formerly Mukholi in Lugisu is a Ugandan journalist and lawyer. He is currently the CEO of The New Vision Group in Uganda.

Bychok
and the administrative center of Bychkovskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 972 as of 2010.

Zamostye
in Bychkovskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 459 as of 2010.

Krasnosyolovka
and the administrative center of Krasnosyolovskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,502 as of 2010.

Krasnoflotskoye
and the administrative center of Krasnoflotskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,069 as of 2010.

Ogarev
in Krasnoflotskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,069 as of 2010.

Novobogoroditskoye
and the administrative center of Novobogoroditskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 731 as of 2010.

Glubokoye
in Novolimanskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 228 as of 2010.

AS Hammamet
, is a Tunisian basketball club based in Hammamet. Established in 1945, the team plays in the Championnat National A. In 2013, the club was runner-up in the Arab Club Basketball Championship.

Dedovka
in Novolimanskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 342 as of 2010.

Dedovochka
in Novolimanskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 78 as of 2010.

Kotovka
in Novolimanskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 228 as of 2010.

Novy Liman
and the administrative center of Novolimanskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 484 as of 2010.

Progoreloye
in Novolimanskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 135 as of 2010.

Horsley Towers
, East Horsley, Surrey, England is a country house dating from the 19th century. The house was designed by Charles Barry for the banker William Currie.

Novotroitskoye
and the administrative center of Novotroitskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 698 as of 2010.

Fomenkovo
in Novotroitskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 277 as of 2010.

Peski
and the administrative center of Peskovskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,402 as of 2010.

Chervono-Chekhursky
in Petropavlovskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 78 as of 2010.

Posyolok sovkhoza Trud
in Starokriushanskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 74 as of 2010.

Staraya Kriusha
and the administrative center of Starokriushanskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 2,544 as of 2010.

Indychy
in Staromelovatskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 539 as of 2010.

Staraya Melovaya
and the administrative center of Staromelovatskoye Rural Settlement, Petropavlovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 539 as of 2010.

Tadashi Funaoka
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Teruyuki Horie
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Earl Taylor
is a Jamaican sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Preston Candover Long Barrow
is an unchambered long barrow located near to the village of Preston Candover in the south-eastern English county of Hampshire. The archaeologist Ian Kinnes classed the Preston Candover example alongside the Badshot Lea Long Barrow in Surrey as the two known examples located on the North Downs.

Steven Henriques
is a Jamaican sailor. He competed at the 1964 Summer Olympics and the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Prateep Areerob
was a Thai sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Arunee Bhanubandh
is a Thai sailor. She competed in the Dragon event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Chrissie Neil
was a prominent motor rally racing driver from Glasgow, Scotland. Chrissie Neil followed her sister, Andy Neil into motor racing, acting as her as navigator once she had passed her driving test.

Feliciano Juntareal
is a Filipino sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Vasuki Parbat South
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India.The elevation of Vasuki Parbat South is and its prominence is . It is 49th highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Colston
is a hamlet in the community of Puncheston in Pembrokeshire, Wales. The hamlet is the site of a Neolithic chambered tomb, known as The Altar.

William Turnbull
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed at the 1964 Summer Olympics and the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Wadi Hammeh
27 is a Late Epipalaeolithic archaeological site in Pella, Jordan. It consists of the remains of a large settlement dating to the Early Natufian period, about 14,500 to 14,000 years ago.

Paul Cooper
was a Hong Kong sailor. He competed at the 1964 Summer Olympics and the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Juan Frias
was a Mexican sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Lloyd House
is the headquarters of West Midlands Police, the territorial police force responsible for policing the West Midlands region of the United Kingdom. The building also houses the office of the West Midlands Police and Crime Commissioner.

Antoine Adrianus Raymondus de Kom
is a Dutch psychiatrist, writer and poet of Surinamese descent. His grandfather was Anton de Kom, the famous Surinamese resistance fighter and anti-colonialist.

Perry Francis Bartlett
is an Australian neuroscientist. He was awarded the Florey Medal in 2015.

Karimugan
is a 2018 Indian Tamil-language romantic comedy drama film written and directed by Chella Thangaiah. The film stars folk singer Senthil Ganesh and Gayatri Rema in the main lead roles.

Suliko Kakabadze
is a retired Georgian football striker.

Michael Zisser
(born 5 October 1966 is a retired Austrian football defender and later manager.

Claudio Canti
is a retired Sammarinese football defender.

Athanasios Demirtzoglou
is a retired Greek football midfielder.

Kali Bari Mandir
is a Hindu temple situated on Bantony Hill, Shimla. The temple is dedicated to fearsome reincarnation of Goddess Kali, known as Shyamala, after which the Shimla city is named.

Jean-Pierre Renevier
was a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Klaus Hendriksen
is a Brazilian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Yasutoshi Tagami
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Hoskote Lok Sabha
constituency was a former Lok Sabha constituency in Mysore State. This seat came into existence in 1967 and ceased to exist in 1976, before 1977 Lok Sabha Elections.

Ian Winter
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Bernard Zinck
is a French-born violinist and pedagogue who spends most of his performing and teaching career in the United States and France. He plays the Fiebelmann Rogeri, considered one of the finest violins made by Italian luthier Giovanni Battista Rogeri.

Pando Health
is a clinical messaging platform created by Forward Clinical Ltd, based in London. It is named after the Pando.

Nick DeIuliis
is an American business executive, chemical engineer and attorney. He currently serves as President and CEO of CNX Resources Corp.

Eberhard Reschwamm
is a German sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Dietmar Gedde
is a German sailor. He competed at the 1964 Summer Olympics and the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Richard Lennox
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Naik Sugan Singh
, MVC, was a soldier in the Indian Army, who served with the 7 Rajputana Rifles battalion. He was posthumously awarded the Maha Vir Chakra, the second-highest military decoration in India while fighting on the Eastern Front during the Indo-Pakistani War of 1971.

Eremiascincus
antoniorum is a species of skink found in Timor in Indonesia.

Anthony Crossley
is a Rhodesian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Einar Koefoed
is a Norwegian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Hans Mehren
is a Norwegian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Karl Geiger
is an Austrian sailor. He competed at the 1964 Summer Olympics and the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Paolo Buggiani
is an Italian contemporary artist. His work is characterized by using dynamic media superimposed on an existing cityscape, rather than using static media, like figures that are skating, sailing, or running while on fire, spray paint on snow, wearable art or painted plexiglass held before an in situ background.

Aulacaspis
tegalensis, known as sugarcane scale, is a scale insect species in the family Diaspididae. The species is distributed across east Africa and southern Asia, with records from Madagascar, Kenya, Thailand, Tanzania, Taiwan, Reunion, Singapore, Uganda, Seychelles, Papua New Guinea, Mauritius, Indonesia, India, Federated States of Micronesia, Malaysia and the Philippines.

Eremiascincus
butlerorum is a species of skink found in Sumba in Indonesia.

Eremiascincus
emigrans is a species of skink found in Indonesia.

Luigi Rossi
is a former Italian sport shooter twice European Champion at individual senior level.

Seema Kaushik Mehta
is an Indian Karatha expert and designer of jewellery. She received the Nari Shakti Puraskar award for her dancing advocacy in 2019 after working with under-privileged children in Mumbai.

Gothenburg Coastal Artillery Defence
was a unit of the Swedish Coastal Artillery which operated from 1942 to 1980. The staff was located in the Gothenburg Garrison in Gothenburg, Sweden.

Paul E. Turner
is an American evolutionary biologist and virologist, the Rachel Carson Professor of ecology and evolutionary biology at Yale University, and a faculty member in microbiology at the Yale School of Medicine. His research focuses on the evolutionary genetics of viruses, particularly bacteriophages and RNA viruses transmitted by mosquitoes.

Thun Sett
is a Burmese actress and model. She is best known for her leading roles in several Burmese films.

Baychurovo
and the administrative center of Baychurovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,577 as of 2010.

Kamenka
in Baychurovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 397 as of 2010.

Vikhlyayevka
and the administrative center of Vikhlyayevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 530 as of 2010.

Oktyabrsky
and the administrative center of Dobrovolskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 698 as of 2010.

Pranjal Yadav
, is an Indian Administrative Services officer who is the Special Secretary at the National Integration Department, Government of Uttar Pradesh. He completed his B.Tech in mechanical engineering from IIT-Roorkey before getting into IAS in 2006.

Mazurka
and the administrative center of Mazurskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,577 as of 2010.

Glendale Fashion Center
was a regional shopping mall in Glendale, California anchored by department stores, which today is the site of a large power center by the same name. The center opened in 1966 anchored by a J.

Ilmen
in Mazurskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 390 as of 2010.

Hadi
played for the national team between 1985 and 1988.

Kardailovka
in Mazurskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 115 as of 2010.

Oktyabrskoye
and the administrative center of Oktyabrskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 115 as of 2010.

Peski
and the administrative center of Peskovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 6,953 as of 2010.

Rozhdestvenskoye
and the administrative center of Rozhdestvenskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 2,645 as of 2010.

Samodurovka
and the administrative center of Samodurvskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 666 as of 2010.

Mokhovoye
in Samodurvskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 97 as of 2010.

Muskaan Khubchandani
is an Indian model and actress who works in Hindi and Telugu-language films. After she graduated from Delhi University, she pursued her passion of becoming a model.

Christopher James Searle
is an English first-class cricketer. Searle was born at Frimley in December 1998.

Tutul Hossain Badsha
is a Bangladeshi footballer who plays as a centre back. He currently plays for Dhaka Abahani and Bangladesh national football team.

Bixby High School
is a public high school located in Bixby, Oklahoma. It is a part of Bixby Public Schools.

Silvano Canonico
was an Italian sport shooter European Champion at individual senior level. Silvano Canonico died in an accident on 29 September 2009, at the age of 72, in Valtellina, near the city of Lomazzo where he resided.

Reysa Verhaeghe
or Reysa Bernson was a French astronomer. She founded the Association Astronomique du Nord in 1923.

Japhet Killewo
is a Tanzanian doctor and epidemiologist in Kagera, Tanzania. He was the former Chair of Tanzanian Public Health Association and currently an epidemiology professor at Muhimbili University of Health and Allied Sciences.

Badri Pangeni
(; is Nepalese folk singer. He was born in Nawalparasi but raised and done schooling in palpa.

Akinkunmi Ayobami Amoo
is a Nigerian footballer who plays as a winger for Hammarby IF in the Swedish Allsvenskan. Amoo was born in Lagos, the most populous city in Nigeria, and started playing youth football with local club Sidos FC.

Grethe Helene Viksaas
is a Norwegian former long track speed skater, who was active in the 1970s. Viksaas won the bronze medal at the 1979 Norwegian Allround Championships.

St Andrew-in-the-Oxmarket Church
is a former Anglican church in the centre of the cathedral city of Chichester in West Sussex, England. The building has existed since the 13th century and was used as a church from then until the mid 20th century, when wartime damage forced it to close.

Alastair Harold Kurt Smail
is an English judge and former first-class cricketer. Smail was born at Kingston upon Thames in July 1964.

Martin Karapalevski
is a handball player on position Central Back playing for RK Vardar. He was transferred from the B team in to the Senior team last year.

Fujiya Matsumoto
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Fazal Rahim Marwat
, is a renowned educator, writer, researcher, historian and former vice-chancellor of Bacha Khan University, Charsadda. Fazal Rahim Marwat got his Ph.D. in 1992, M. Phil in 1982 and Political Science in 1979 from the University of Peshawar and B.A in 1976 from Gomal University Dera Ismail Khan.

Masao Yoshida
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Gaiety Theatre
or Gaiety Heritage Cultural Complex is a significant tourist hot spot of Shimla. It is located on The Ridge, Shimla.

Takeshi Hagiwara
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Carl Christian Lassen
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Robin Cantegrel
is a French handball player who plays for RK Vardar 1961 and the French national team.

Paul Ramelet
was a Swiss sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Finis Jhung
is an American ballet dancer, dance company founder and dance teacher. Jhung was born on May 27, 1937, in Honolulu, Hawaii.

Roger Rouge
was a Swiss sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Jean Graul
was a Swiss sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1964 Summer Olympics.

Mihajlo Mladenovikj
is a Serbian-born Macedonian handball player who plays for RK Metalurg Skopje and the Macedonian national team.

Dario Kofilovski
is a Macedonian handball player that plays for RK Metalurg Skopje. His position is Left wing and he is considered as the future of the HC Metalurg .

Fair Trade Music
is an independent movement dedicated to building an ethical, sustainable and transparent music ecosystem equitable for everyone in the music value chain. It aims to encourage the emergence of a music streaming economy that fairly remunerates songwriters and composers for their work, and to give consumers and creators the information they need to make ethical choices when producing, distributing, streaming or purchasing music.

Teodor Todeski
is a Macedonian handball player who plays for RK Metalurg Skopje.

Gary Mark Pick
is an English former professional footballer who played in the Football League for Cambridge United and Hereford United. Pick was born in Leicester and began his career with Stoke City having joined from non-league Leicester United.

Thomas Stinton
, D.D. was an Oxford college head in the 18th-century. Stinton was educated at Exeter College, Oxford.

Liz
Seward is Senior Strategist at Space Systems for Airbus. She has worked on several projects during her career including meteorological satellites and landers for missions to Mars and a comet.

Hyena
is a 2020 South Korean television series starring Kim Hye-soo and Ju Ji-hoon. It aired on SBS TV from February 21 to April 11, 2020.

Richmond First
is a civic political organization in Richmond, British Columbia, aiming to be elected into the Richmond City Council. Richmond first currently only has city council candidates and does not have mayoral candidates In the 2011 municipal election, they won 4 seats.

Medhakachhapia National Park
is a IUCN Category IV protected national park in Bangladesh. Established in 2004 the park was officially declared as a national park by the government of Bangladesh on 8 August 2008.

Nesta Obermer OBE
,, was a British philanthropist, playwright and artist. Born in Norfolk, she began writing as a child when illness forced her to be confined for a lengthy period.

Alex Bally
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Paul Breyne
is a Belgian politician who served as Governor of West Flanders between 1997 and 2012. He is a member of Christen-Democratisch en Vlaams.

Manuel Villareal
is a Filipino sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Robert Lucas
is an Indonesian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Carlos Ruiz
is a Salvadoran sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Irma Prego
is a Costa Rican writer. Over her lifetime, she published 35 stories.

Miguel Augustus Francisco Ribeiro
was a Ghanaian diplomat. Ribeiro was born on 2 February 1904 in Cape Coast.

Shuttl
is a mobile app based office commute bus aggregator based out of Gurgaon, India. The company was founded in 2015.

Lauren Pfeiffer
is a former field hockey defender who represented the United States in international competition. Pfeiffer was raised in Mount Laurel, New Jersey and attended Lenape High School.

Paul Reid
is the Director-General of the Health Service Executive. He has been appointed Director-General since 2 April 2019.

Chrysopilus
erythrophthalmus is a Palearctic species of snipe fly in the family Rhagionidae.

Henry Hardwick Dawson FRIBA
was an architect based in Nottingham. He worked in partnership with Alfred John Thraves until that partnership was dissolved in 1927.

Trevor S. Valle
is an American paleontologist and wildlife biologist. In addition to his extensive career in paleontology he has also served as personality on several notable paleontology and wildlife television programs and documentaries.

Daniel Patrick Yee Parcon
is the current serving bishop of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Talibon, Philippines. Parcon was born on 24 November 1962 in Vallehermoso, Negros Oriental.

Chrysopilus
laetus is a Palearctic species of snipe fly in the family Rhagionidae.

Simpson Design
is an American automobile coachbuilder founded in 1978 by owner Jim Simpson. The company is based in Clinton, Whidbey Island, located just outside of Seattle, Washington, and specializes in the production of custom sports cars coachbuilt bodies and interiors, mainly built on the Mazda Miata MX-5 chassis.

Corus International
is a global non-governmental humanitarian organization headquartered in Baltimore, Maryland, and Washington, D.C. Corus International was launched on January 1, 2020, by international NGOs Lutheran World Relief and IMA World Health as a parent organization of a family of for-profit and nonprofit faith-based subsidiaries addressing global health and development. The founding of Corus followed the operational merger of Lutheran World Relief and IMA World Health in January 2019.

Jeremiah Milbank
was an American philanthropist noted for his close friendship with President Herbert Hoover. His grandfather, also named Jeremiah, settled in Greenwich, CT before the Civil War and became a partner in Borden, Inc., making a fortune in the condensed milk industry.

Leslie Antonia Malton
.

Rhagio
strigosus is a Palearctic species of snipe fly in the family Rhagionidae.

Gianpaolo Spagnulo
is an Italian retired footballer who last played for Taranto 1927 in his home country. Spagnulo started his senior career with S.S.D.

Lauki
is a village in Ambegaon taluka of Pune District in the state of Maharashtra, India.The village is administrated by a Sarpanch who is an elected representative of village as per constitution of India and Panchayati raj. According to the 2011 census, the village has a population of 924 people.

Loni
is a village in Ambegaon taluka of Pune District in the state of Maharashtra, India.The village is administrated by a Sarpanch who is an elected representative of village as per constitution of India and Panchayati raj. According to the 2011 census, the village has a population of 2,599 people.

Robert Elliot Fullilove
is an American public health researcher and civil rights activist. He is a Professor of Sociomedical Sciences at the Columbia University Irving Medical Center and Associate Dean of Community and Minority Affairs.

Electrolux
Football Club was a football club based in Luton, England. Founded in 1928, as a works team for Luton-based employees of Swedish company Electrolux, the club competed in local junior leagues during the first 21 years of their existence, before joining the South Midlands League in 1949.

Julia Nicol
.

Angela Onwuachi-Willig
is an American legal scholar. She is dean and professor of law at Boston University School of Law and an expert in critical race theory, employment discrimination, and family law.

Adelaide Underhill
was an American librarian. She was hired to catalog and update the organization of volumes in the Vassar College library.

Kavya Suresh
is an Indian actress who works in Malayalam and Tamil-language films. Kavya was born in Chennai, where she grew up.

OpenVSP
, also known as Open Vehicle Sketch Pad, is an open source parametric aircraft geometry tool developed by NASA. It can be used to create 3D models of airfoils and analyze the aerodynamic characteristics of these airfoils.

Paolaura
cancellata is a species of very small sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk or micromollusk in the family Granulinidae. This marine species occurs off Oman..

GoVoteMiami
is a Miami-Dade based non-partisan 501 registered in 2018. GoVoteMiami promotes active civic participation and democracy as well as providing training, resources, and assistance to all eligible voters.

Priyo Bandhabi
is a 1975 Bengali film directed by Hiren Nag. This film written by Prabodh kumar Sanyal.

Muhammad Toha
is an Indonesian professional footballer who currently plays as a right back for Liga 1 club Persita Tangerang. He was signed for Persita Tangerang to played in Liga 2 on 2017 season.

Kerderi
is a group of abandoned settlements located on the dried seafloor of what was once the Aral Sea, in Kazakhstan. Kerderi is thought to have been inhabited around the fourteenth century, when water levels were low enough to expose dry land.

Kevin Campbell
is a hurler. He plays for Setanta and the Donegal county team.

Steven Lezell Woodrow
is a Colorado politician. Woodrow spent his early life in Michigan.

Tucker McCann
. He played college football at Missouri.

Tamas Terlaky
is a Hungarian-Canadian-American professor of Industrial and Systems Engineering at Lehigh University. He is especially well-known for his work on criss-cross algorithms, interior-point methods, Klee-Minty examples for path following algorithms, and optimization.

Maung Nyein
Thu is a Burmese writer. He has written about 300 novels, over 1,000 articles and more than 30 magazine articles.

Mehdi Amouzadeh
is a retired professional Iranian karateka. He won gold medal at the 1996, and 4 bronze medals at 1994, 2000 and 2002 World Championships, and two silver medals at 1998 and 2002 Asian Games.

Jacqueline Krim
is an American condensed matter physicist specializing in nanotribology, the study of film growth, friction, and wetting of nanoscale surfaces. She is a Distinguished University Professor of Physics at North Carolina State University.

Akorhi Gola
is a village and corresponding community development block in Rohtas district of Bihar, India. Located 13 km north of Dehri on the road to Rajpur, Akorhi Gola is known for its blanket weaving industry.

Siberia
and Him is a Russian-language gay-themed film written, directed, produced by, and starring Viatcheslav Kopturevskiy. It is his feature-length film debut.

George R
. McKay was a Michigan politician.

Nachiyarpuram
is a Tamil language drama airing on Zee Tamil. It premiered on 8th July 2019.

Keefeton
is an unincorporated community in Muskogee County, Oklahoma, United States. The community is on U.S. Highway 64 south of downtown Muskogee.

Canvas Creek
is a stream in Thompson-Nicola Regional District in the Interior region of British Columbia, Canada. It is in the Pacific Ocean drainage basin and is a right tributary of the North Thompson River.

Tom Briggs
was an Australian rugby league footballer from the 1940s. Tom Briggs was a very fine rugby league player from Young, New South Wales.

Morawaka
is a small town in the Matara District, Southern Province of Sri Lanka, a centre of Ceylon tea plantations and rice paddies. Additionally, Morawaka is said to have gem resources.

Zambia
competed in the 2003 All-Africa Games held at the National Stadium in the city of Abuja, Nigeria. The country sent a substantial team which won six medals and came joint twenty-third in the medal table.

Herrick
is a rural locality in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of Scottsdale.

WANC-TV
, known as WISE-TV from 1953 to 1967, was a television station in Asheville, North Carolina, United States. The station operated on channel 62 until 1971 and on channel 21 from 1971 to 1978.

Belogorye
and the administrative center of Beloroyevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 2,171 as of 2010.

Morozovka
in Beloroyevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 107 as of 2010.

Verkhny Karabut
in Beloroyevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 289 as of 2010.

Doug Haines
is an American attorney and politician who served as a member of the Georgia State Senate for the 46th district from 2001 to 2003. A native of Athens, Georgia, Haines is the son of a teacher and businessman.

Saguny
and the administrative center of Beryozovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 246 as of 2010.

Beryozovo
in Beryozovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 369 as of 2010.

Fechtig
is an unincorporated community in Hampton County, South Carolina, United States. The community is on South Carolina Highway 68 southeast of Hampton.

Senthoora Poove
is a Tamil language drama airing on Star Vijay. It premiered on 8 June 2020 which stars Ranjith and Sree Nithi.

Nixville
is an unincorporated community in Hampton County, South Carolina, United States. The community is on South Carolina Highway 3 east of Estill.

Roy Korving
is a Dutch former amateur boxer. He won a bronze medal at the 2017 European Championships as a heavyweight, and competed at two editions of the World Championships.

Krasny Voskhod
in Beryozovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 783 as of 2010.

Sukhaya Rossosh
in Beryozovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 211 as of 2010.

Krasyukovsky
and the administrative center of Bolshedmitrovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 286 as of 2010.

Bolshaya Dmitrovka
in Bolshedmitrovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 98 as of 2010.

Dankovsky
in Bolshedmitrovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 156 as of 2010.

Vitebsk
and the administrative center of Vitebskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 215 as of 2010.

Leon Clifton
is a fictional detective, a protagonist of numerous Czech language detective stories of early 20th century. He is a brilliant American detective, master of disguise, capable to solve any mystery.

Ashok Gasti
is an Indian politician and a lawyer from Raichur, Karnataka. He is a Member of Parliament representing Karnataka in the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Indian Parliament.

Chandrabati Kotha
is a 2019 Bengali biographical drama film directed by N. Rashed Chowdhury. The movie is based on the life of Chandravati, first feminist poet of Bengal.

Creative Multimedia College of Fine Arts
. Located in Hyderabad, the college was found in the year 2009.

Eranna Kadadi
is an Indian politician and a member of parliament representing Karnataka in the Rajya Sabha. He served as the Belagavi district Panchayat president in 2010.

Sharon Springer
is a politician from California. Springer is the mayor of Burbank, California.

Folami Ideraabdullah
is an American geneticist and Assistant Professor in the Department of Genetics and the Department of Nutrition at the Gillings School of Global Public Health at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill. Ideraabdullah explores how maternal nutrition and environmental toxin exposure affect development through exploring epigenetic changes to DNA.

Hamiso Tabuai-Fidow
. Born and raised in Cairns, Tabuai-Fidow is of Torres Strait Islander and Samoan descent.

Kauen
was a Nazi concentration camp located in the former Kovno Ghetto. It operated from 15 September 1943 to 14 July 1944 and had eight satellite camps located around the city of Kaunas, in modern-day Lithuania.

Legerwood
is a rural locality and town in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about south-east of the town of Scottsdale.

Johannes Smith
of Kettenis, known as Johannes Smetius, was a Dutch minister, collector and archaeologist, particularly known for his collection of Roman antiquities and his studies of the Roman past in the city of Nijmegen. Smetius was born in Aachen to Johann Smith of Kettenis, a textile merchant, and Mary Raets of Karken.

Saprino
in Vitebskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 447 as of 2010.

Goncharovka
and the administrative center of Goncharovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 907 as of 2010.

Varvarovka
in Grishevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 125 as of 2010.

Grishevka
in Grishevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 53 as of 2010.

Cristiano Ronaldo
is a Portuguese professional footballer. He scored his first two goals on his senior debut for Sporting CP during a Primeira Liga match against Moreirense.

Kosharnoye
in Grishevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 62 as of 2010.

Serpanki
in Grishevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 105 as of 2010.

Stepanovka
in Grishevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 196 as of 2010.

Allyship
is the practice of emphasizing social justice, inclusion, and human rights by members of an ingroup, to advance the interests of an oppressed or marginalized outgroup. Allyship is part of the anti-oppression or anti-racist conversation, which puts into use social justice theories and ideals.

Felix Ameka
is a linguist working on the intersection of grammar, meaning and culture. His empirical specialisation is on West-African languages..

Deen Dayal Hospital
formerly known as Ripon Hospital is a Zonal hospital in Shimla city. It is located in the city center above Old Bus Stand and below Lower Bazaar.

Morteza Niknejad
was an Iranian Shia Twelver who was a member of Islamic Coalition Party. Niknejad was born in 1942 in the south of Tehran in a religious family; he was a religious person since his period of adolescence, too.

Denby Dale
is a civil parish in the metropolitan borough of Kirklees, West Yorkshire, England. It contains 82 listed buildings that are recorded in the National Heritage List for England.

Juan Ignacio Sirvent
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Fernando Thode
is a Uruguayan sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Virsabi
is a Danish technology company that helps businesses utilise virtual, augmented and mixed reality IT solutions. It is headquartered in Christianshavn in Copenhagen, Denmark.

Michael Maynard
is a British sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Sasoma
is a settlement in Nubra Valley, Ladakh consisting of villages such as the Gya village. A road is being constructed from Sasoma to Saser La by the Border Roads Organisation which will be the world first glaciated motorable road once completed.

Alberto Obarrio
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Wong Mo Ying
of Huizhou, who settled in Wong Mo Ying probably between the 1750s and the 1840s.

James Harington Evans
was ordained as a Church of England clergyman in 1810. During his early years as a curate he suffered a crisis following the death of his first child.

Dhruv Rathee
is an Indian-origin YouTuber and social media activist known for his political commentary. Rathee completed his schooling in Haryana.

Shimizu
is from the city of Takasaki in Gumma Prefecture. He graduated from the Tokyo University of Agriculture Second High School, located in Takasaki.

Sam Gilbert
is a New Zealand rugby union player who plays for the in Super Rugby. His playing position is wing.

Andrzej Zawieja
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Garry Hoyt
is a Puerto Rican sailor. He competed at the 1968 Summer Olympics, the 1972 Summer Olympics and the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Jan Winquist
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Francis Webber
, D.D. was an Oxford college head in the 18th-century. Stinton was educated at Exeter College, Oxford.

James Edgcumbe
, D.D. was an Oxford college head in the 18th-century. Edgcumbe was educated at Exeter College, Oxford and became a Fellow in 1728.

Honey Bafna
is an Indian actor who appears in Bengali television and films. Coming from a non-film background, he started his acting career with non-credited roles.

Taiwan Second Division Football League
is the second-ranked division in the Taiwanese football league run by Chinese Taipei Football Association. This League is directly below the Taiwan Premier League.

Joseph Atwell
, D.D. was an Oxford college head in the 18th-century. Atwell was educated at Exeter College, Oxford and became a Fellow in 1718.

Mathew Hole
, D.D. was an Oxford college head in the 18th-century. Hole was educated at Exeter College, Oxford and was appointed a Fellow in 1663.

Betty Taylor
is an Australian community advocate and domestic violence prevention campaigner. Taylor graduated in sociology from Monash University in 1997.

Marcos Gerard
is a Mexican sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Juan Alonso Aznar
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Lepidonotus
is a genus of marine annelids in the family Polynoidae. The genus occurs globally and includes 80 species, usually found in shallow waters down to about 80 metres.

Hartmann Bogumil
is a German sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Sebastian Knauer
is a German classical pianist. Sebastian Knauer, born July 29, 1971, is from an old-established Hamburg-based business family.

Alex Morales Motorsports
was a racing team active in sprint cars and Indycars for several decades. The sprint car team won multiple championships between the 1950s and 1990s while their Indycar team was active from 1975 to 1989, winning three races.

Kirkpatrick-Reisch
sorting is a fast sorting algorithm for items with limited-size integer keys. It is notable for having an asymptotic time complexity that is better than radix sort.

Planica
1949 was an International ski jumping week with two competitions on a new K80 hill, held on 20 and 26 March 1949 in Planica, PR Slovenia, FPR Yugoslavia. Over 20,000 people has gathered.

David Seton
of Parbroath was a Scottish courtier and administrator. He was the son of Gilbert Seton of Parbroath and Helen Leslie.

Stuart Jardine
is a British sailor. He competed at the 1968 Summer Olympics and the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Edwin Bernet
is a Swiss sailor. He competed at the 1968 Summer Olympics and the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Richard Williamson
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Bawbawgyi Stupa
is a Buddhist stupa and one of the oldest Buddhist structures in the history of ancient edifices in Myanmar, located in the Sri Ksetra Archaeological Zone north of the city of Pyay. The stupa was constructed during the Pyu period in the 5th century and is in excellent structural condition, having miraculously survived a number of major earthquakes over the preceding centuries.

John Bolt Culbertson
was a member of the South Carolina General Assembly, an advocate for the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People.

Joseph Adams
was an American politician from Maine. Born in Wayland, Massachusetts, Adams eventually moved to Maine.

David Martin Quinlan
is a Northern Irish worship leader, singer, songwriter and pastor, naturalized Brazilian. He is a well-known evangelical singer, worship leader of Irish origin.

Bushnellsville Creek
flows into Esopus Creek.

James P. Mays
served as Commissioner of Elections in Orangeburg County, South Carolina and served in the South Carolina House of Representatives during the Reconstruction era in 1868. He also served as coroner, first appointed in 1873.

Bohdan Soroka
was one of the most prominent Ukrainian graphic artists of his generation. He worked in black-and-white, and later in his life added color linocut technique.

James L. Jamison
was an American politician in South Carolina. Jamison sat in the South Carolina Senate representing Orangeburg during the Reconstruction era.

Nurit Buchweitz
is the Dean of the Faculty of Society and Culture at Beit Berl College in Israel, where she has lectured since 1994 in the Department of Hebrew and Comparative Literature, and the English department. Buchweitz earned her BA and MA from Tel Aviv University in Poetics and General Literature.

Maria Stuart


Enfant Terrible
is a 2020 German drama film directed by Oskar Roehler about the German film director Rainer Werner Fassbinder. It was selected to be shown at the 2020 Cannes Film Festival.

Albert Meier
was a Swiss footballer who played for FC Basel at the end of the 1940s. He played as Striker.

Nokulunga Primrose Sonti
is a South African politician from the North West who has been serving as a Member of the National Assembly of South Africa for the Economic Freedom Fighters since May 2014. Sonti was previously a member of the African National Congress.

John Biddulph Martin
was an English banker and statistician. Martin was born on the 10th of June 1841, in Eaton Square, London, the second son of Robert Martin, of Overbury Court, Tewkesbury.

George H. Allan
was an American attorney and politician from Maine. Allan, a Republican from Portland, served five terms in the Maine House of Representatives between 1901 and 1938.

Sarcocornia
perennis, otherwise known as perennial glasswort, is a species of halophytic perennial plant within the family Amaranthaceae. It is native to the coasts of southern Britain and Ireland, where it is classified as nationally scarce.

Cameron Jackson
. He played college basketball for the Wofford Terriers.

Daniel W. Ames
was an American politician from Maine. Ames, a Republican, represented Portland in the Maine House of Representatives from 1883-1886.

Pauline Louise Lopez
is a Filipino taekwondo practitioner. She is a two-time gold medalist at the Southeast Asian Games and a bronze medalist at the Asian Games.

Landon Bussie
is an American basketball coach who is the current head coach of the Alcorn State Basketball team. Bussie played his first two years at Livingstone College before finishing his playing career at Xavier University of Louisiana.

Super Queeroes
is a Canadian multimedia web project, which launched in 2019 on CBC Arts. Created as a Pride Month project to mark the 50th anniversary of the Stonewall Riots, the project featured LGBTQ Canadians creating short video, essay or art projects in tribute to another influential LGBTQ Canadian trailblazer.

De Kade
was a 700-capacity live music venue located in Zaandam, Netherlands. It opened in 1997 and closed in 2013.

Western Arabs
is a 2019 Danish documentary film by Omar Shargawi. The film premiered at the 2019 Berlin Film Festival.

Bangladesh Sangbadpatra Parishad
is a national trade body of newspapers in Bangladesh. Mohammad Noor Ali, owner of Amader Shomoy and Chairman of Unique group is the President of the association.

Bowbazaar
bomb blast was a bomb blast incident which occurred in the central business district of Bowbazar in the Indian metro city of Kolkata on the midnight of 16 March, 1993. The blast claimed the lives of 45 people which later increased to 69 and leaving scores of people injured.

Angus William McPhail
is an English former first-class cricketer and educator. McPhail was born at Ipswich in May 1956.

Samruddha Bharat Foundation
is an Indian social and political organisation that strives to further liberal, secular and republican values. It was established in 2018 as a follow up to the Dr. B.R.

Jing Xiang
victory over Elmar Francisco at the Tianjin Sports Arena in Tianjin, China, capturing the vacant WBO Youth junior-bantamweight title.

Wolfgang Gayer
is a German retired footballer who last played for LASK in Austria. Gayer started his senior career with SC Neckarstadt.

Carlford Division
, Suffolk is an electoral division of Suffolk which returns one county councillor to Suffolk County Council. Robin Vickery, the Conservative County Councillor resigned on 8 June 2020 following over 600 complaints were made concerning racist posts he had shared on Facebook.

Saint Anthony
of Weert was a Franciscan friar and priest who was martyred during the Dutch Revolt. Eighteen other men were martyed alongside him; they are known as the Martyrs of Gorkum.

Eldar Elgrably
was an Israeli dancer and choreographer. Eldar Elgrably was born in Rehovot.

Dulla Vaily
is a 2018 Punjabi-language film directed by Devi Sharma. It stars Gurvar Cheema, Aakanksha Sareen, Yograj Singh, Gaggu Gill and Sarbjit Cheema.

Bothrocophias myersi
, commonly known as the Chocoan toadheaded pitviper, is a species of venomous viper. The snake is endemic to the department of Cauca Department of Colombia.

Enterprise Railroad
was a horse drawn rail business for moving freight and passengers in Charleston, South Carolina. It was established with an African American board of directors.

Kambayanatham Rangaswami Kanakavalli
, known professionally as K. R. Chellam, was an Indian actress who appeared in Tamil language films.

Raymond Kipkoech
is a Kenyan marathon runner who won the 2002 Berlin Marathon. He also won the 2004 Venice Marathon, the 2005 Xiamen International Marathon, and the 2011 Jerusalem Marathon.

Lee Jung-hyuk
is a South Korean actor and model. He is known for his in dramas such as I Can Hear Your Voice, On the Way to the Airport and he is also known for his roles in movies such as Fists of Legend.

Richard Currey
is an American author born in West Virginia. He is known for his writing of the Vietnam era and of West Virginia.

Alexander David Williams
is an American professional baseball shortstop in the Tampa Bay Rays organization. Williams attended Rancho Bernardo High School in San Diego, California, where he played baseball.

Lower Campbell Lake
, also known as Campbell Lake, is a reservoir on Vancouver Island in British Columbia, Canada. The lake is impounded by the Ladore Dam, which was completed in 1958.

Joseph Maynard
, D.D. was an Oxford college head in the 17th-century. Maynard was educated at Exeter College, Oxford and was a Fellow from 1625 to 1653.

Patrick Craig MacLarnon
is an English former first-class cricketer and educator. MacLarnon was born at Nottingham in September 1963.

Mandal
is a tehsil located in the Bhilwara district in the state of Rajasthan in India. It is one of the twelve tehsils in Bhilwara district.

Christos Tzolis
is a Greek professional footballer who plays as a forward for PAOK. On 20 June 2020, in only his second senior appearance, the 18-year-old displaying excellent technique to net a crucial equaliser.

Joseph Maynard
, DCL was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Glasier was educated at Christ Church, Oxford.

Jennifer Lartey
is a Ghanaian diplomat. She is the first female to head the newly established diplomatic relation between Ghana and Norway.

Palmyra
was a Hansa A Type cargo ship which was built as Fangturm in 1944 by Deutsche Werft, Hamburg, Germany for Hansa Line, Bremen, Germany. She was seized as a prize of war in 1945, passing to the Ministry of War Transport and renamed Empire Gallop.

John Neale
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Neale became a Fellow of Exeter College, Oxford in 1556.

Fereydoun Asgharzadeh
was an Iranian football coach who managed the national team at the 1986 Fajr International Tournament.

Jordan Andrew Espinosa
is an American mixed martial artist. A professional competitor since 2012, he is currently competing as a flyweight with the Ultimate Fighting Championship.

Kennedy Island Conservancy
protects all of Kennedy Island in British Columbia, Canada. The island contains many cultural modified trees and other cultural values and is a gathering location for First Nations travelling upon the Skeena River.

Bendix Frantz Ludwig Schow
was the mayor of Aabenraa from 1805 to 1837. A German-speaking member of the nobility of Schleswig-Holstein, he played an important role in a period when the rise of nationalism started to create conflicts between the German-speaking minority ruling classes and the Danish-speaking lower-classes Schleswig.

Alasdair Worsfold Maclay
is an English former first-class cricketer. Maclay was born at Salisbury in October 1973.

Harlis Alexis Murillo Moreno
is a Colombian sex offender, murderer and suspected serial killer. According to the investigating authorities, Murillo Moreno is responsible for four murders and several sexual assaults perpetrated against the female population.

Ancistrocerus
parietinus is a Palearctic species of potter wasp.

Kim Gook-hee
is a South Korean actress and model. She is best known for her roles in dramas such as Hospital Playlist and she is also known for her roles in movies such as Microbabitat, and . She is best known for her role as Eun-ja in movie, Tune in for Love.

DES Action USA
is a national consumer advocacy group, whose mission is to educate and raise awareness about diethylstilbestrol in the public and medical and legal professions, support the DES-exposed population, and advocate for consumer vigilance and rights. DES is a synthetic estrogen, which was, from about 1940, prescribed to women at risk of miscarriage and, later, to promote healthy babies.

Chen Chih-fu
is a Taiwanese sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Norsemen
Football Club is a football club based in Edmonton, England. They are currently members of the Southern Amateur League.

Raja Rizwan
was a former one-star Pakistan Army general. He was convicted of espionage and treason and hanged.

Chang Jen-chih
is a Taiwanese sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Chen Hsiu-hsiung
is a Taiwanese sailor. He competed at the 1968 Summer Olympics and the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Simcha Leiner
is an American singer, composer and entertainer in the Contemporary Jewish religious music industry. Leiner started singing at weddings in 2008.

Frohmund Burger
is a Venezuelan sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Leregogy
is a new conception for adult learning theory, one that arises as an extension of the rich developments in the fields of pedagogy and andragogy. In a leregogical relationship, dualistic distinctions such as teacher-learner and mentor-mentee are replaced by learning as fluid, open-ended, with everyone leading, teaching, and learning together.

Daniel Trujillo
was a Venezuelan sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Karen L. Leach
is an American biochemist with extensive drug discovery experience in large pharmaceutical research laboratories. Her expertise in molecular pharmacology, signal transduction and protein kinases, has been used to establish mechanisms of toxicity for therapeutics such as the novel antibiotic linezolid.

Linda Zhao
is a Chinese-American statistician. She is a Professor of Statistics and at the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania.

Charles Ogilvie
is a Jamaican sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Dirca
decipiens, the Ozark leatherwood, is a deciduous shrub endemic to northwestern Arkansas, southeastern Kansas, and southwestern Missouri. It is distinguished from the more widespread eastern leatherwood by its sessile fruits and finely hairy leaves and stems.

James Chalmers Macadam
is an English first-class cricketer. Macadam was born at Paddington in June 1988.

Roberto Sloane
was a Mexican sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Melanie A. Stansbury
is an American politician, scientist, and policy advisor serving as a member of the New Mexico House of Representatives from the 28th district, which includes Bernalillo County, New Mexico. Stansbury was born and raised in Albuquerque, New Mexico.

James Scrimgeour
Scottish landowner and Constable of Dundee. He was the son of John Scrymgeour and Margaret Campbell.

Lee Brockhurst
, sometimes known locally as just Brockhurst, is a village and former civil parish, now in the parish of Moreton Corbet and Lee Brockhurst in the ceremonial county of Shropshire, England. It is situated around 11 miles north-northeast of the county town of Shrewsbury.

Anastasios Vogiatzis
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Lavitah Mountain
, is a mountain in the Miscinchinka Ranges of the Hart Ranges in the Northern Rocky Mountains. Several recreational projects have been proposed for the mountain, none of which have moved forward past very preliminary studies.

Deborah A. Armstrong
is an American health consultant, businesswoman, and politician serving as a member of the New Mexico House of Representatives from the 17th district, which includes Bernalillo County, New Mexico. Armstrong earned a Bachelor of Science degree in physical therapy from the University of Michigan, followed by a Juris Doctor in health law from the University of New Mexico School of Law.

Robin Judah
is a British sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Paul Laib
was a naturalised British subject who worked as a fine art photographer in his residence at 3 Thistle Grove, Drayton Gardens, South Kensington, London. During the early decades of the twentieth century, the photographer Paul Laib made photographic records of paintings, drawings and sculpture for his artist clients.

David Tucker
is a British sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Uruguay
and the European Union have close historical, cultural, economic and political ties. The EU and Uruguay signed the Framework Cooperation Agreement in 1992 to promote bilateral relations with the aim of increasing cooperation with regard to trade, finance and technology, among other things.

Arlene Buckneberg Ydstie
, where she studied choral conducting with Paul J. Christiansen.

Border Moors and Forests NCA
is an upland plateau region in Northern England between the North East and North West regions, and touching the Anglo-Scottish border. The region, like much of the northern English uplands, is sparsely populated, with scattered farming and hardy shepherding in river valleys.

East Bengal FC
was formed in 1920 and has been one of the most successful football teams in India. Since establishment, it has seen numerous legends of Indian football like Ahmed Khan, Tulsidas Balaram, Sudhir Karmakar, Monoranjan Bhattacharya, Krishanu Dey, Bhaichung Bhutia etc.

Astata
boops is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Nina Crummy
is a British archaeologist and artefact specialist, especially of Roman material culture. Crummy completed an undergraduate degree at Keele University and works as an independent archaeological finds specialist.

Michael Rotondi
.

Super Rugby Aotearoa
being played between the five New Zealand-based teams of Super Rugby.

Dorrance Field
is the on-campus soccer and lacrosse stadium at the University of North Carolina in Chapel Hill, North Carolina. The stadium was constructed to on the site of the old Fetzer Field.

Moorfields
is an area of Bristol, England. It lies in the east of the city, east of Barton Hill, south of Easton and west of Redfield.

Freedom Church
is a global charismatic evangelical Christian church headquartered in Hereford in the United Kingdom with locations in Africa, North America, Asia and Europe. Freedom Church is a member of the Evangelical Alliance Freedom Church was founded as New Life Church by Gary and Heather Snowzell in 1988.

Andrew A. Croft
is an American major general in the United States Air Force. He serves as the commander of the Twelfth Air Force, a position he has held since August 2018.

Crossocerus
cetratus is a Palearctic species of wasp.

Bert Glandon
is an American educator and academic administrator serving as the President of the College of Western Idaho, one of four community colleges in Idaho with main campus locations in Boise and Nampa. Glandon was born and raised in Seattle, Washington.

5th Missouri Volunteer Cavalry Regiment
, also known as the Benton Hussars, was a cavalry unit from Missouri that briefly served in the Union Army during the American Civil War. The regiment was formed on 14 February 1862.

Hill College
, Tadubi, established in 1978, is a general degree college in Tadubi, Senapati District, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Imphal College
, established in 1952, is one of the oldest general degree college in Imphal, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Manipur College
, established in 1958, is one of the oldest degree college in Imphal, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Modern College
, Imphal, established in 1963, is a general degree college in Imphal, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Oriental College
, Imphal, established in 1963, is a general degree college in Imphal, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Betty Kirby-Greene
was an adventurer and pilot with multiple aviation records. Betty Kirby-Greene was born in Thurlestone, Devon in 1906.

Kha-Manipur College
, established in 1966, is a general degree college in Kakching, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science, arts and commerce.

Daniel Kastner
is an Austrian retired footballer who last played for Miesbach in Germany. Kastner started his senior career with Braunau.

Chanambam Ibomcha College
, Bishnupur, established in 1965, is a general degree college in Bishnupur, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Lars H.U.G
. is a Danish musician and painter.

James Waite
is a Welsh footballer who plays for Championship club Cardiff City as a midfielder. Waite progressed through the youth ranks at Cardiff City and in February 2017 was rewarded with his first professional contract alongside teammates Connor Young and Cameron Coxe.

Singapore
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in sailing.

Thoubal College
, established in 1963, is a general degree college in Thoubal, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

John Hart Lake
is a reservoir on Vancouver Island in British Columbia, Canada. The lake was created in 1947 when the John Hart Dam impounded the Campbell River, and is the water source for the city of Campbell River.

Moreh College
, Chandel, established in 1992, is a general degree college in Moreh, Tengnoupal district, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Kankabatir Ghat
is a 1955 Bengali film directed by Chitta Bose and produced by Harendranath Chattopadhyay. This film written by Nripendrakrishna Chatterjee.

Abraham J. Boyarsky
is a Jewish-Canadian award-winning novelist, businessperson, and distinguished professor of mathematics and statistics at Concordia University in Montreal, Quebec. He is also the current Director General and founder of TAV College, a non-profit, private college in Montreal, Quebec.

United College
, Lambung, established in 1980, is a general degree college in Lambung, Chandel district, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

John Bunn
is an African American man wrongfully convicted of a murder committed in 1991, when he was 14. Bunn spent over 16 years in prison and nearly 12 on parole and before he was exonerated in 2018.

Cape Verdeans
in Spain are residents of Spain whose ancestry originated in Cape Verde. In 1995, it was estimated that there were 10,000 people of Cape Verdean descent in Spain.

Tim Cole
is the balloonist who designed and built the Spirit of Freedom balloon capsule. This was the first aircraft of any type to carry a solo pilot around the world.

Churachandpur Government College
, established in 1964, is a general degree college in Churachandpur, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Latvia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in taekwondo.

Gregg Herken
is an American historian and museum curator who is Professor Emeritus of History at University of California, Merced. His scholarship mostly concerns the history of the development of atomic energy and the Cold War.

Pavle Bihali Gavrin
is a Serbian animal rights activist and a far-right ultranationalist politician. He is the leader of the Leviathan Movement.

Pettigrew College
, established in 1965, is a general degree college in Ukhrul, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Croatia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in taekwondo.

Lauren Wesley Wilson
is an American entrepreneur and communicator. She is the founder and President of ColorComm.

Callan Potter
. Potter compiled a professional mixed martial arts record of 17-7 by fighting within the Australian regional MMA circuit for over 7 years winning various regional MMA titles before signing for UFC in January 2019.

Ariela Julie Gross
.

Yangambam Kumar College
, Wangjing, established in 1972, is a general degree college in Wangjing, Thoubal district, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Kenny Dillingham
. He was previously the offensive coordinator and the Auburn University and the University of Memphis.

Standard College
, Kongba, established in 1981, is a general degree college in Kongba, Imphal, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and sciences.

Tammy Townley
is an American politician who has served in the Oklahoma House of Representatives from the 48th district since 2018.

Nambol L. Sanoi College
, established in 1966, is a general degree college in Nambol, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Taman
is a seaport on the Taman Peninsula in area of Cape Zhelezniy Rog, in the village of Volna, near the village of Taman in Temryuksky District of Krasnodar Krai, Russia. Business specialization - transshipment of goods for export.

Nongmeikapam Gopal College
, Imphal, established in 1970, is a general degree college in Imphal, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and sciences.

Moirang College
, established in 1963, is a general degree college in Moirang, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and sciences.

Lilong Haoreibi College
, established in 1976, is a general degree college in Lilong, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts.

Jiri College
, established in 1981, is a general degree college in Jiribam, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and sciences.

Biramongol College
, established in 1973, is a general degree college in Sawombung, Imphal East district, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and sciences.

Pivot Airlines
is a Canadian charter airline founded in 2020 after purchasing the assets of Air Georgian. Its focus is on workforce logistic charters and ACMI contracts.

Musselroe Bay
is a rural locality in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of Scottsdale.

Liberal College
, Imphal, established in 1979, is a general degree college in Imphal, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science, arts and commerce.

Catherine M. Schrand
is an American academic and the Celia Z. Moh Professor of Accounting at the Wharton School at the University of Pennsylvania. Schrand earned her BBA from the University of Michigan in 1985 and PhD from the University of Chicago in 1994.

Bedlam
is a 2019 American feature-length documentary directed, produced, and written by Kenneth Paul Rosenberg. Produced, and written by Peter Miller, co-produced by Joan Churchill and Alan Barker, edited by Jim Cricchi, with additional editing by James Holland, it immerses us in the national crisis surrounding care of people with serious mental illness through intimate stories of patients, families, and medical providers.

Jason Szep
is an American journalist with Reuters who received the Pulitzer Prize in 2014.. Born in Scituate, Massachusetts in 1969, Szep is the son of two-time Pulitzer Prize-winning political cartoonist Paul Szep, formerly of The Boston Globe.

Sonpreet Jawanda
is an Indian actor who has appeared in Punjabi films. He is best known for his movies like , Saak, 2 Bol and The Blood Street.

Ternovoye
in Grishevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 220 as of 2010.

Tina Redshaw
became the first female British Ambassador to Cambodia, succeeding Bill Longhurst. She was Consul-General in Chongqing.

Kolodezhnoye
and the administrative center of Kolodezhanskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 643 as of 2010.

Andreyevka
in Lykovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 291 as of 2010.

Lykovo
and the administrative center of Lykovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 337 as of 2010.

Mount Berge
is a double-summit granitic mountain located in the Glacier Peak Wilderness of the North Cascades, in Chelan County of Washington state. The mountain is situated along the crest of the Cascade Range, on land managed by Okanogan-Wenatchee National Forest.

Pokrovka
in Pervomayskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 54 as of 2010.

Sud-Nikolayevka
and the administrative center of Pervomayskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 719 as of 2010.

Henry Johnson Maxwell
was a lawyer, soldier in the Union Army, state senator, and postmaster in South Carolina. He was born free on Edisto Island to Stephen J. and Thurston Johnson Maxwell.

Okrayushkin
in Perevalenskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 142 as of 2010.

Perevalnoye
in Perevalenskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 384 as of 2010.

Probuzhdeniye
and the administrative center of Perevalenskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 487 as of 2010.

Lugovoy
in Podgorenskoye Urban Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 438 as of 2010.

Podgornoye
in Podgorenskoye Urban Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 3,785 as of 2010.

Saguny
and the administrative center of Sagunovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,161 as of 2010.

Bolshaya Khvoshchevatka
in Sagunovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 316 as of 2010.

Kostyukovka
in Sagunovskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 197 as of 2010.

Blue Star Donuts
is a small chain of donut stores in Portland, Oregon and Los Angeles, California. Blue Star launched a CBD-infused donut in 2019.

Jonathan Brand
is an American legal scholar and academic administrator serving as the 15th President of Cornell College in Mount Vernon, Iowa. Brand previously served as president of Doane University in Crete, Nebraska.

Semeyka
and the administrative center of Semeyskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 325 as of 2010.

Kurennoye
in Semeyskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 138 as of 2010.

Dolzhik
in Sergeyevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 64 as of 2010.

Korenshchina
in Sergeyevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 93 as of 2010.

Kuleshovka
in Sergeyevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 284 as of 2010.

Pobedinshchina
in Sergeyevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 189 as of 2010.

Pogorelovka
in Sergeyevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 62 as of 2010.

Kumanjayi Walker
was a 19 year old indigenous Australian, a Warlpiri man, who died in police custody on the evening of 9 November 2019. Walker allegedly died of injuries following a police shooting at his home in Yuendumu, 300km from Alice Springs Australia, on the evening of his death.

Heart of Asia
is a Filipino free-to-air television channel owned by GMA Network Inc. The channel was on test broadcast from June 12, 2020 until June 28, 2020; and was officially launched on June 29, 2020.

Shmueli Ungar
is an American singer, songwriter and entertainer in the Contemporary Jewish religious music industry. He was originally part of Shira Choir, but eventually left the group to progress his career as a solo artist.

Shamima K Choudhury
is a Bangladeshi physicist, academician, researcher and women-in-science advocate . She retired as a selection grade Professor from the Department of Physics, University of Dhaka on 30 June 2016 after 44 years of teaching and research. She supervised more than 60 Masters and MPhil students in Physics.

Gulnara Shahinian
, an Armenian expert on human trafficking, is a diplomat and author. Shahinian is a member of the Group of Experts on Action Against Trafficking in Human Beings and the former United Nations Special Rapporteur on Contemporary Forms of Slavery from 2006 until 2014.

Santha
is a 2007 Indian Kannada crime film directed by S. Muralimohan who also penned the dialogues and screenplay for a story by Ajay Kumar. The film stars Shivarajkumar, Aarti Chhabria and Sridevika in the lead roles.

Raymond David Vela
is a parks administrator who is the acting director of the United States National Park Service. Vela grew up in Wharton, Texas.

Eastern Cables Limited
is a Bangladesh government owned telecom equipment and wire manufacturing company. Eastern Cables is the largest manufacturer of cables and conductors in Bangladesh.

Elsie
was born in 1939. She was the daughter of David Lacks and Loretta Pleasant.

Maurice Tosh Gayflor
, who goes by the strage name Cralorboi CIC is a Liberian HipCo and KoloPop singer, songwriter, actor and businessman. He is signed to SOG Records Empire and is known for several hit-songs including Big Papa, Jon Buttay, Hello featuring Joey B, Weekend featuring Iyanya and many more.

Alena Douhan
of Belarus is the United Nations Special Rapporteur on the negative impact of the unilateral coercive measures on the enjoyment of human rights, as 25 March 2020. When appointed, she was a professor of International Law at the Belarusian State University and the Director of the Peace Research Center.

Fonbet
is a sports betting company operating in Russia and Kazakhstan. It is considered to be the largest of its kind in Russia by number of users and network outreach.

Stephen E. Nadeau
is an American behavioral neurologist, researcher and academician. He is a Professor of Neurology at the University of Florida College of Medicine.

Himonya Pond
is at the center of the park. It is also the water source of the Tachiai River along with Shimizu Pond in Shimizuike Park in the same ward.

Erasmuskloof
is a suburb in the east of the city of Pretoria, South Africa. It borders on sububurbs Constantia Park, Waterkloof Glen, Moreleta Park, Elardus Park, Erasmus Park, Erasmusrand and Waterkloof Glen.

Ettore Simonetti
was an Italian painter and watercolorist, who specialized in Orientalist works and historical genre scenes. His father, Francesco, was a goldsmith and carver.

Izzy Jayasinghe
is a senior lecturer in the Department of Molecular Biology and Biotechnology at the University of Sheffield and the leader of the Applied Biophotonics Group. Her research focuses on super resolution microscopy, biophysics, cardiac muscle and microscopy instrument development.

P. Daniel Smith
is a longtime United States government administrator who is a former acting director of the United States National Park Service in the Trump administration. Smith was born in Maine.

Gibberula
aldridgei is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk, in the family Cystiscidae. This is a taxon inquerendum.

Scott Portelli
is a scuba diver, underwater photographer and nature photographer from Mosman, New South Wales, Australia. Portelli won numerous national and international nature photography awards between 2015 and 2020 and is best known for his underwater images of whales and dolphins.

Kimberly D. Manning
is an American physician, Board Certified in Internal Medicine and Pediatrics, and serves as an Associate Professor of Medicine as well as the Associate Vice Chair of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion for the Department of Medicine at Emory University School of Medicine in Atlanta, Georgia. Manning has been recognized at the national level for her mentorship and teaching as well as her blogging and public speaking.

Ashraf Brik
in quantities that allow for them to be studied thoroughly.

Yaroslav Oreshkevich
is a Belarusian professional footballer. As of 2020, he plays for Rukh Brest.

Sigfrid Siwertz
, born 24 January 1882 in Stockholm, died 26 November 1970, was a Swedish writer. As a writer Siwertz is associated as a representative of the Swedish realism literature of the 1910s.

Malaysia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in taekwondo.

Alexandru Cotoi
is a Romanian composer, producer and disc jockey signed by Global Records. Over the years, he has worked with several high-profile singers including Delia, Irina Rimes, Inna and Alexandra Stan.

National Democratic Alliance
was an alliance of right wing political parties of Bangladesh. National Democratic Alliance was formed in 1992 by 10 nationalist political parities and was led by Khandaker Moshtaque Ahmed.

Stefan Petrus Dekker
, better known by his stage name Dr. Peacock, is a Dutch frenchcore DJ and record producer. He has performed on the main stages of major festivals like Thunderdome, Defqon.1, Qlimax and Dominator.

Lachie Anderson
is an Australian rugby union player who plays for the in Super Rugby. His original playing position is flanker, but since returning to the 15-a-side game he has converted to utility back.

Clifford John Thornton Stott
is professor of social psychology at Keele University. He is a specialist in the psychology of crowds, group identity, and football hooliganism.

Karolina Hamer
is a Polish Paralympic swimmer who competes in international level events. She is also a disability rights activist.

Webber Ndoro
is the Director general of ICCROM. He is considered the first professional Zimbabwean cultural heritage manager, and amongst the first trained Zimbabwean archaeologists.

Stephen Frederic Dale
, also known as Stephen F. Dale, is a historian and academic, Emeritus Professor at the Ohio State University, known for his studies on eastern Islamic world. Dale studied at Carleton College and graduated from University of California, Berkeley.

Moore Island
is an uninhabited island in the Qikiqtaaluk Region, Nunavut, Canada. It lies in Boat Passage, on the northern side of Rupert Bay, an extension of Hudson Bay.

Moore Island
is an uninhabited island in the Qikiqtaaluk Region, Nunavut, Canada. It is a member of the Queen Elizabeth Islands group.

Moore Island
is an uninhabited island in Qikiqtaaluk Region, Nunavut, Canada. It is a member of the Hopewell Islands group in Hudson Bay.

Moore Island
may refer to one of several islands;

Moogega Cooper Stricker
is an American astronomer who is the Lead of Planetary Protection for the Mars 2020 Mission and is involved with the InSight Mission. Stricker was born in 1985 in Southern New Jersey to her Korean mother and African-American father, who was a World War II veteran.

Bruce Alan Lewandowski
, CSsR is an American priest of the Catholic Church and a member of the Redemptorists. He is the auxiliary bishop-elect of the Archdiocese of Baltimore, having been appointed to the position in 2020.

Magallanodon
is a genus of mammals from the extinct group Gondwanatheria. It contains a single species, Magallanodon baikashkenke.

Patriots
were those colonists of the Thirteen Colonies who rejected British rule during the American Revolution. Most of the individuals listed below served it in multiple capacities.

Chile
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in taekwondo.

Tamenglong College
, is a general degree college in Tamenglong, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and sciences.

Saskia Slegers
is a Dutch DJ and producer who has run the influential music label Djax since 1989. She deejays dance music as Miss Djax.

Don Bosco College
, Maram, established in 2000, is a general degree college in Maram, Senapati district, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in science, arts and commerce.

Asterolasia
rivularis is a small, upright shrub, with narrow leaves and yellow flowers. It has a restricted distribution in New South Wales.

L.M.S
. Law College is a college imparting education in law in Imphal, Manipur.

Thomas Hughan
was a Scottish slave trader, merchant, and MP. Hughan was born circa 1760 in Burns, Kirkmabreck, Kirkcudbright, the first son of Alexander Hughan, a merchant from Creetown.

Shamim Malende
is a Ugandan lawyer and the only woman on Bobs Wine legal team. Malende was born on December 1986 to Ahlaji Jamal Malende and Jane Nassuma in kamoala district of Uganda.

Bart Chabot
is a Dutch writer and poet. Chabot went to the University of Leiden to study Dutch language and literature.

Mayai Lambi College
, established in 1981, is a general degree college in Yumnam Huidrom, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and sciences.

Bharatiya Janata Party
, Gujarat is a state subsidiary of the Bharatiya Janata Party in Gujarat. The headquarters is located in Gandhinagar.

Kamakhya Pemton College
, established in 1973, is a general degree college in Hiyangthang, Imphal, Manipur. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and sciences.

Sergeyevka
and the administrative center of Sergeyevskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,096 as of 2010.

Shui Mei Tsuen
is a village in the Kam Tin area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong.

Bolshoy Skororyb
and the administrative center of Skororybskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 573 as of 2010.

Galsky
in Skororybskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 77 as of 2010.

Malaya Sudyovka
in Skororybskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 58 as of 2010.

Nikolsky
in Skororybskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 84 as of 2010.

Petropavlovka
in Skororybskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 164 as of 2010.

Samoylenko
in Skororybskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 52 as of 2010.

Yudino
and the administrative center of Yudinskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 488 as of 2010.

Kostomarovo
in Yudinskoye Rural Settlement, Povorinsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 263 as of 2010.

Muhammad Fakhri
son of Muhammad Nafi son of Muhammad Saeed al-Tabaqchali son of Muhammad Amin Effendi , the teacher is an Iraqi judge and politician who held various administrative positions such as the position of administrator of Basra and others, and held the position of a member of the Iraqi Court of Cassation. He studied at the Law School in Baghdad.

Aydarovo
and the administrative center of Aydarovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 939 as of 2010.

Gauldwell Castle
was a 13th-century castle, about north west of Dufftown, Moray, Scotland, north of the River Fiddich. Alternative names are Boharm Castle, Cauddwell Castle, Gallvall Castle and Goldwell Castle.

Johan Teunis Barendregt
. Barendregt studied psychology at the University of Amsterdam with Adriaan de Groot, and investigated the effectiveness of psychoanalysis, among other things.

Luigi Efisio Marras
was an Italian general who held the positions of Chief of Staff of the Italian Army and Chief of the Defence Staff. Born and raised in Sardinia, Luigi Efisio Marras began his career in 1906 when he began his training at the Military Academy of Turin.

Valery Ruzhnikov
is a Soviet sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Tanya Moore
is an activist for women in science. Moore obtained a B.S. in Mathematics at Spelman College, MSE in Mathematical Sciences at The Johns Hopkins University and a Ph.D. in Biostatistics at UC Berkeley in 2002.

Luis Schenone
is an Argentine sailor. He competed at the 1968 Summer Olympics and the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Kohima College
, is a general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and commerce and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Pedro Sisti
is an Argentine sailor. He competed at the 1968 Summer Olympics and the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Kohima Law College
is a college imparting legal education in Kohima, Nagaland. It was established in the year 1975.

Huize Ivicke
is a monumental building in Wassenaar, the Netherlands. Constructed in 1913 for A.

Patrice Rankine
is a Professor of Classics at the University of Richmond. He is a leading scholar in the area of classical reception.

Gunnar Broberg
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Lennart Eisner
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Sven Hanson
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Zunhebeto Government College
, is the general degree college in Zunhebeto, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Alexey Sergeevich Falkin
, also known as The EMERCOM Maniac, is a Russian serial killer and rapist responsible for four murders and eight rapes from 2004 to 2017, in Yekaterinburg and Verkhnyaya Pyshma. Following his arrest for the murder of Irina Vakhrusheva, he was connected to previous crimes and sentenced to life imprisonment.

Malik Tillman
is a German professional footballer who plays as a attacking midfielder for 3. Liga side Bayern Munich II.

Baroiyadhala National Park
is IUCN Category II national park and nature reserve in Bangladesh. The park is located at Sitakunda Upazila, Chattogram District in the east site of the Dhaka-Chittagong Highway.

Zisaji Presidency College
, is a general degree college in Kiphire, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Yingli College
, Longleng, is a general degree college in Longleng, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Sobibor
perpetrator album contains sixty-two pictures of Sobibor extermination camp during its operation, taken by the SS Holocaust perpetrators employed there. It belonged to deputy commander Johann Niemann, who was killed in the Sobibor uprising in 1943.

Martina Barber
is a British Paralympic athlete who competes in mainly long jump events at international level events. She has won two gold medals for Great Britain at the INAS World Athletics Championships and European Championships in heptathlon.

Kuakata National Park
is IUCN Category II national park and nature reserve in Bangladesh. The park is located at Kalapara Upazila under Patuakhali District.

Koji Mizoguchi
is a Japanase archaeologist and a professor of social archaeology in the Graduate School of Social and Cultural Studies at Kyushu University. He studies the comparative emergence of societies in Europe and Japan and has a particular interest in the history of archaeology.

Francis S. Mair
is a British chemist and a Senior Lecturer in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. His research is based on synthetic chemistry, inorganic chemistry, catalysis and polymer chemistry.

Phek Government College
, is a general degree college in Phek, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Antje Weithaas
is a German classical violinist. Apart from solo recitals and chamber music performances, she has played with leading orchestras in Europe, Asia and the United States.

Curon
is an Italian supernatural drama television series created by Ezio Abbate, Ivano Fachin, Giovanni Galassi, and Tommaso Matano for Netflix. The series stars Valeria Bilello and Luca Lionello.

Peren Government College
, is a general degree college in Peren, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Adi Lev
was an Israeli actress and voice actress. Born in Romania, Lev emigrated to Israel with her family at 16 years of age.

Wangkhao Government College
, is a general degree college in Mon, Nagaland, India. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Fung Kat Heung
is a village in the Kam Tin area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong.

Alma Mekondjo Nankela
is a Namibian archaeologist, specializing in Namibian rock art and cultural heritage. She is currently leading the Archaeology and Heritage Research Department at the National Heritage Council of Namibia.

Margaret Prescod
is an activist, author, journalist and radio host. She was a founder of The Black Coalition Fighting Back Serial Murders and of Black Women for Wages for Housework.

Mohamed Omar
is a mathematician interested in combinatorics, and algebra. Omar is currently an Associate Professor of Mathematics and the Joseph B. Platt Chair in Effective Teaching at Harvey Mudd College.

Kam Tin Shing Mun San Tsuen
is a village in the Kam Tin area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong. Kam Tin Shing Mun San Tsuen was populated by inhabitants of Shing Mun Valley villages, who were displaced for the construction of the Shing Mun Reservoir.

Ko Po Tsuen
is a village in the Kam Tin area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong.

Charles Okechukwu Esimone
is a Nigerian Professor of Biopharmaceutics and Pharmaceutical Biotechnology who currently serves as the Vice-Chancellor of Nnamdi Azikiwe University, Nigeria. He is the first professor of pharmaceutical microbiology in south-eastern Nigeria.

Acharya
is a upcoming Indian Telugu-language social drama film directed by Koratala Siva and produced by Ram Charan under the Konidela Production Company banner. The film stars Chiranjeevi and Kajal Aggarwal in the lead roles while Ram Charan is set to play in a supporting role.

Sandra Bass
is an American political scientist. Bass is an Associate Dean of Students and Director of the Public Service Center at the University of California, Berkeley, a position she has held since 2015.

Raegan Higgins
is an American mathematician and co-director of the EDGE program for Women. Higgins studies time scales and its application to mathematical biology.

Mama Linda Goss
is an American storyteller and performer in the African diasporic oral tradition. She is a co-founder of the National Association of Black Storytellers, which works to preserve folk traditions.

Andrei Vladimirovich Tropillo
, and rock musician. Tropillo first became involved in the Soviet rock scene in the 1970s.

Goa Song
is currently President of South China University of Technology, China and a professor in Chemistry. Born in Anhui Province in 1964, Gao studied Chemistry at Peking University, China and received his bachelor, master, and Ph.D. degrees in 1985, 1988, and 1991 respectively.

Suryakantham
is a 2019 Indian Telugu-language romantic drama film starring Niharika Konidela, Rahul Vijay, and Perlene Bhesania. The film is produced by American-based Yerramreddy and Yarabolu under the banner of Nirvana Cinemas.

Jack Callahan
is an American experimental musician and audio engineer. He is best known for performing under the moniker die Reihe, taken from the journal of the same name edited by Herbert Eimert and Karlheinz Stockhausen.

Indonesia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in taekwondo.

Arnold Lulls
was a Flemish goldsmith and jeweller in London. He was born in Antwerp, and settled in London before 1585, and became a denizen of England in 1618.

Calamaria
bitorques is a species of snake of the family Colubridae. It is commonly known as the Luzon dwarf snake.

Sao Chang College
, is the general degree college in Tuensang, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Michael J. Sadowsky
is an American microbiologist at the University of Minnesota. He is the director of the BioTechnology Institute and a Professor in the Department of Soil, Water, and Climate.

Michael John Anderson Mathews
is a South African former first-class cricketer. Mathews was born at Durban in January 1964.

Mount Tiyi Government College
, is the general degree college in Wokha, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Mestri
is a 2009 Telugu-language political drama film directed by Suresh Krissna and produced by K. Ramakrishna Prasad. The film stars Dasari Narayana Rao, who also wrote the story and screenplay, alongisde Vijayachander, Pradeep Rawat, Vijayakumar and Srihari.

St. John College
, Dimapur, is the general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Ghetto Gastro
is a New York based collective of chefs and food enthusiasts with deep ties to the Bronx that was formed in 2012. Members have included Jon Gray, Lester Walker, Pierre Serrao and Malcolm Livingston II, the former pastry chef at Noma in Copenhagen.

UniSport
is the national body of university sports in Australia. They are responsible for the Australian team at the International University Sports Federation events.

Lenox Hill
is a documentary web television series that was developed by Ruthie Shatz and Adi Barash which premiered on Netflix on June 10, 2020. The premise mainly revolves around the lives of four medical professionals in the areas of neurosurgery, emergency medicine, and obstetrics and gynecology at the Lenox Hill Hospital.

Tuli College
, is the general degree college in Tuli, Mokokchung, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Northwestern European Americans
are Americans of Northwestern European ancestry. Northwestern European American people can usually trace back full or partial heritage to Britain, Ireland, Northern Germany, Sweden, Denmark, Norway, the Netherlands, Belgium, Northern France, and other nations connected to Northwestern Europe geographically or culturally.

Denise Chaila
is a Zambian-Irish rapper, poet, grime and hip hop artist from Limerick. Chaila began performing on the Limerick music scene in 2012.

Graham Coughtry
, was a Canadian modernist figurative painter. Coughtry was born in Saint-Lambert, Quebec, on June 8, 1931.

Leopoldo A. Pando Zayas
is a physicist and string theorist. He is Professor in the Department of Physics at the University of Michigan, Ann Arbor.

Oriental College
, Kohima, is the general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland, India. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and commerce and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Rosalie A. Reed
is an American veterinarian. In 1973, Reed became the first woman to work as a vet at the Los Angeles Zoo.

Ireland
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in athletics.

Sabina Yashar gizi Aliyeva
. Sabina Aliyeva was born in Baku on 7 may 1980.

Oliver D. Doleski
is a German economist, author and management consultant. Doleski studied economics at the Bundeswehr University Munich.

Alepochori
is a village in the Evros regional unit, East Macedonia and Thrace, Greece. The village is considered very old and its inhabitants are native Greeks.

Orlando Rodrigues
is a Portuguese sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Immanuel College
, Dimapur, is the general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in science and arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Adriano da Silva
is a Portuguese sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Manuel Escobar
was a Salvadoran sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Tan Tjong Sian
is an Indonesian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

John Gunawan
was an Indonesian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Ina Albowitz
and former member of the German Bundestag. From 1990 to 1998 Ina Albowitz was a member of the German Bundestag.

Abbas Abad Historical Complex
, is a garden complex in Behshahr, Iran. This complex is registered as one of the Persian gardens in the World Heritage Site.

Michael Anthony Nunes
is a Jamaican sailor. He competed at the 1968 Summer Olympics and the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Joel K. Abraham
is an American ecologist and professor at California State University Fullerton. His work focuses on how plant traits and competition shape invasion success by non-native plant species in California.

Lance Collins
is an engineer and professor for mechanical and aerospace engineering at Cornell University. He is the Joseph Silbert Dean of Engineering at the Cornell University College of Engineering and will become the inaugural vice president and executive director of the new Virginia Tech Innovation Campus.

Oksana Salamatina
is an art curator and a gallerist. She has MA degrees in International Economics from the Moscow University of Commerce, and Art Gallery Administration from the Fashion Institute of Technology.

Christian Maes
is a Belgian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Ronald Marquez de Santos Jr
., better known by his screen name Kokoy de Santos, is a Filipino actor, singer, and dancer.

Crossocerus
exiguus is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Cornerstone College
, Dimapur, is a general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland, India. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and is affiliated to Nagaland University.

Harvey Sabinson
was an American theatrical press agent and the executive director of the Broadway League. Sabinson graduated from Townsend Harris High School in Queens and went on to Queens College, but entered the Army for World War II before graduating; he received a Purple Heart.

Carlo Massone
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Emanuele Ottonello
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

John Ewart McGrady
is an English chemist and academic who previously played first-class cricket while a student at the University of Oxford. The son of the cricket administrator and minor counties cricketer Albert McGrady, he was born in April 1968 at Ryton, County Durham.

Neil Pryde
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Peter Gamble
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Mount Olive College
, Kohima, is a general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and commerce.

Viktar Babaryka
is a Belarusian banker, philanthropist, and public figure. Babaryka was born on 9 November 1963 in Minsk.

Antun Grego
is a Croatian sailor. He competed at the 1968 Summer Olympics and the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Mount Mary College
, Dimapur, is a general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in science, arts and commerce.

Robert G. Evans OC FRSC
is a Canadian economist. He is currently Emeritus Professor at the Vancouver School of Economics at the University of British Columbia.

David James
is an American sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Stacy Lyall Mader
is an Australian astronomer. He is a Senior Experimental Scientist at CSIRO Astronomy and Space Science, and was the first Aboriginal Australian to obtain a PhD in astronomy.

Alder College
, is a general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Denmark
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in athletics.

KaruppanKaatu Valasu
is a 2020 Indian Tamil-language Romantic Crime thriller film written and directed by Selvendran, starring Neelima Rani, Ebenezer Devaraj, George Vijay and Aaria in the leading roles. The film began production during Mid of July 2019.

Cora LeEthel Christian
was the first native woman of the U.S. Virgin Islands to earn a medical degree, and is a medical administrator in the U.S Virgin Islands. Christian was born on Saint Thomas in the U.S. Virgin Islands, and graduated first in her high school class.

Bangladesh Film and Television Institute
is a Bangladesh government institute for research and training on film making. The current Director of the Institute is Maruf Nawaz.

Christina Eubanks-Turner
is an Associate Professor of Mathematics at Loyola Marymount University, Seaver College of Science and Engineering. Her academic areas of interest include graph theory, commutative algebra, mathematics education, and mathematical sciences diversification.

Peter Kolni
is a Swedish sailor. He competed at the 1968 Summer Olympics, the 1972 Summer Olympics, and the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Ethiopia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in athletics.

Carl Ryves
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Nicholas James Loman
is professor of microbial genomics and bioinformatics at the Institute for Microbiology and Infection at the University of Birmingham.

Linda Celida Meade-Tollin
biochemist. Meade-Tollin was born in West Virginia, studying chemistry at West Virginia State College in 1964.

Slovenia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in athletics.

Sahith Theegala
is an American professional golfer. Theegala was a three-time NCAA All-American at Pepperdine University.

C-Edge College
, is a general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in science, arts and commerce.

Alaa El Din El Baba
, is a Lebanese professional footballer who plays as a striker for club Ansar. Safa Ansar Awards

Unity College
, Dimapur, is a general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and commerce.

Nawabganj National Park
is IUCN Category IV national park and nature reserve in Bangladesh. The park is located about one kilometer northwest of Nawabganj Upazila Sadar under Dinajpur District.

Lena Richard
was a chef, cookbook author, restaurateur, frozen food entrepreneur, and television host from New Orleans, Louisiana. On October 20, 1939, Richard became the first Black woman to host her own television cooking show.

Robert Layton
is an English musicologist and music critic. Between 1949 and 1953 he studied at Worcester College, Oxford under Edmund Rubbra and Egon Wellesz.

Argentina
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one silver medal, in athletics.

Sakus Mission College
, is a general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Modern College
, Kohima, is a general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Anne Schumann
is a German violinist and docent in Baroque music. Schumann was born in Dohna.

Burkina Faso
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one silver medal, in athletics.

Marcello Brunelli
is an Italian neurophysiologist and academic. He had the chair of General Physiology and Neurobiology at the University of Pisa and worked with Giuseppe Moruzzi and Eric Kandel.

Laurie Rousseau-Nepton
is a Canadian astronomer at the Canada-France-Hawaii Telescope and postdoctoral researcher at the University of Hawaii, and is the first indigenous woman in Quebec to obtain a PhD in astrophysics. Rousseau-Nepton received her PhD in 2017 from University of Laval, under the supervision of Prof. Carmelle Robert.

Don Bosco College
, Kohima, is a general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Kim Sang-hee
is a South Korean four-term parliamentarian currently serving as one of Deputy Speakers of National Assembly. Kim is the first woman to join the leadership of the Assembly and become its deputy speaker.

Calamaria
ingeri is a species of snake of the family Colubridae. The snake is endemic to Tioman Island in Malaysia.

Dylan Jones
is a professor of physics and atmospheric scientist at the University of Toronto. Jones received his undergraduate degree from Harvard University in 1990, a Masters in Applied Physics from Harvard in 1994, and a PhD in Earth and Planetary Sciences from Harvard in 1998.

Salesian College of Higher Education
, is a general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Pfutsero Government College
, is a general degree college in Pfutsero, Phek district, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Gilda A. Barabino
is the president of the Olin College of Engineering, where she is also a Professor of Biomedical and Chemical Engineering. Previously, she served as the Dean of The Grove School of Engineering at the City College of New York, and as a professor in the Departments of Biomedical Engineering and Chemical Engineering and the CUNY School of Medicine.

Public College of Commerce
, is a general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in commerce.

Trinidad and Tobago
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one silver medal, in athletics.

Eustache Ngabisha
was a Burundian politician, and the father of Burundian president Pierre Nkurunziza. Ngabisha, who was Hutu and Roman Catholic, was an associate of Louis Rwagasore in the early 1960s, and subsequently became involved in politics, joining UPRONA.

Tsz Tong Tsuen
is a village in the Kam Tin area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong.

Sazolie College
, is a general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Baptist College
, Kohima, is a general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and commerce.

Andrew Otis
is an American author and journalist. Otis is considered an expert on journalism and the early print history of Bengal.

Marlene DeChan
was a Democratic member of the New Hampshire House of Representatives representing Strafford County District 6. First elected in 1994, she was re-elected in 1996, 1998, 2000, and 2006.

Kros College
, Kohima, is a general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and commerce.

Prafulla Kumar Mandal Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Khulna-1 in February 1996.

Hettie Simmons Love
degree from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. Born in Jacksonville, Florida, Hettie Simmons Love attended Fisk University and graduated in 1943.

Hong Kong
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won two bronze medals, both in tennis.

Santuc
is an unincorporated community in Union County, South Carolina. It is a township.

Modupe Enitan Irele
is a Nigerian diplomat and current Nigerian Ambassador to France, becoming the first female to hold the role since the diplomatic mission appointed its first representative in 1966. She was nominated by President Muhammadu Buhari on October 20, 2016, and presented her credentials to President Macron on December 18, 2017.

Yemhi Memorial College
, is a general degree college in Dimapur, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Capital College of Higher Education
, is a general degree college in Kohima, Nagaland. It offers undergraduate courses in arts.

Spain
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one bronze medal, in shooting.

Shithouse
is an upcoming American drama film, written, directed, and produced by Cooper Raiff, in his directorial debut. It stars Raiff, Dylan Gelula, Amy Landecker and Logan Miller.

Orlaya grandiflora
, the white laceflower, is a species of flowering plant in the family Apiaceae, native to Mediterranean Europe. Growing to , this is a multi-branched annual with divided ferny leaves, and flattish panicles of pure white flowers over a long period in summer.

Jarbom Gamlin Government Law College
, established in 2019, is the first government law college in Arunachal Pradesh. This college is affiliated to Rajiv Gandhi University.

Credo BC
11 is of Hungarian minibus production from 1999 to 2001 with a length of 9.5 m and 10.7 m. Buses were equipped with 176 kW Iveco Tector engines.

Aidan Kearney
is a retired Irish rugby union player. He played as a second row and occasionally in the back row representing Leinster and Ulster professionally between 2000 and 2004.

Margaret Cuthbert
was a Canadian-born pioneer radio woman in the United States. After earning a degree in fine art from Cornell University, she worked briefly at the British Embassy in Washington, D. C. and Cornell, before embarking on a radio career in 1924.

Mohammad Hassan Khan
, is a bridge in Babol, Iran. The bridge is a monument Mazandaran.

Indira Gandhi Government College
, Tezu, established in 1986, is a general degree college in Tezu, Arunachal Pradesh. It offers undergraduate courses in science, arts and commerce.

Julius Wilhelm Van Verschoor
was a Dutch navigator. He participated in attacks against Spanish possessions in the New World and explored Nassau Bay in Tierra del Fuego.

Kara Odom Walker
is a family physician and the current Secretary of the Delaware Department of Health and Social Services. She formerly served as the Deputy Chief Science Officer at the Patient-Centered Outcomes Research Institute In 2018, she was elected to the National Academy of Medicine.

Rural Development and Co-operatives Division
is a Bangladesh government division responsible for rural development and regulation of agricultural cooperative organisations. Mohamad Rezaul Ahasan is the Secretary in charge of the Rural Development and Co-operatives Division.

Donyi Polo Government College
, Kamki, established in 1996, is a general degree college in Kamki, West Siang district, Arunachal Pradesh. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and commerce.

Rang Frah Government College
, Changlang, established in 1996, is a general degree college in Changlang, Arunachal Pradesh. It offers undergraduate courses in science, arts and commerce.

Wangcha Rajkumar Government College
, Deomali, established in 1997, is a general degree college in Deomali, Arunachal Pradesh. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and commerce.

Shankar Narayan Bank
is a 1956 Bengali film directed by Niren Lahiri. This is a drama film.

Don Bosco College
, Itanagar, established in 2002, is a general degree college in Itanagar, Arunachal Pradesh. It offers undergraduate courses in arts and commerce.

Fadji Zaouna Maina
is a Nigerien scientist working in the field of hydrogeology at the Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory. She uses computational model using supercomputers to study the effects of climate change on water sustainability and predict future needs.

Pamwal Das Shiv Mandir
at Pawaldass compound at Kakri Ground in Baghdadi area of Lyari Town. According to the Human Rights Commission of Pakistan and The News International Muslim clerics have illegally turned this centuries-old historic temple into a Muslim pir and slaughterhouse for cows with the help of Baghdadi police after making series of attacks on Hindu families living in the area.

Nicholas Anthony Yorke
is an American baseball player who most recently played for Archbishop Mitty High School in San Jose, California. He was selected 17th overall by the Boston Red Sox in the 2020 MLB draft.

Jordan Alexander Walker
is an American professional baseball third baseman in the St. Louis Cardinals organization. Walker was selected 21st overall by the St. Louis Cardinals in the 2020 MLB draft.

Carson Wesley Tucker
is an American professional baseball shortstop for the Cleveland Indians organization. He was selected 23rd overall by the Cleveland Indians in the 2020 Major League Baseball draft.

Nabowla
is a rural locality in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about west of the town of Scottsdale.

Fenestrulina
is a genus within the bryozoan order Cheilostomata. It is the only member of the family Fenestrulinidae.

Osmanganj
is a union territory of Char Fasson Upazila in Bhola District of Bangladesh. The area of Osmanganj Union is 6,122 acres.

Hasta La Muerte
is the second studio album from Pamona, California based band Xibalba. It was released through Southern Lord Records in August 2012.

Justin Craig Lange
is an American professional baseball pitcher for the San Diego Padres organization. He was selected 34th overall by the San Diego Padres in the 2020 Major League Baseball draft.

Drew Romo
is an American professional baseball catcher for the Colorado Rockies organization. He was selected 35th overall by the Colorado Rockies in the 2020 Major League Baseball draft.

Amanpreet Ahluwalia
is an Indian racing driver and a National Go-Karting champion and National Autocross Champion. He was the National Champion two years running in the National Karting Championship in 2002-03.

Pamela Sumiko Ohashi
, PhD, FRSC is a Canadian medical researcher. She is Co-Director of the Campbell Family Institute for Breast Cancer Research, Director of the Cancer Immune Therapy Program at the Princess Margaret Cancer Centre and a Professor at the University of Toronto.

Charles H. Land
was the 51st, 54th, and 56th mayor of Detroit.

Phoe Thaw
is a Burmese mixed martial artist and Lethwei fighter. He is signed to ONE Championship and World Lethwei Championship.

Keisha N. Blain
.

Glencoe High School
is a public secondary school in Glencoe, Oklahoma, United States. It is located at 201 East Lone Chimney Road in Glencoe, Oklahoma and the only high school in Glencoe Public Schools.

James Floyd Troumbly
, was born on June 19, 1928 in Taconite, Minnesota, a town on the western end of the Mesabi Iron Range. Jim Troumbly was the fourth-oldest child among ten children of Gabriel and Ethel Troumbly.

Jonathan B. Tomines
, also known as The Toe Bro, is a Canadian chiropodist. Tomines works at Mississauga Foot Clinic, located in Mississauga, Ontario.

Stacie Hixon
is a judge on the Oklahoma Court of Civil Appeals. Governor Kevin Stitt appointed her on March 10, 2020 to replace Jerry Goodman.

Jigger Cruz
is a Filipino painter. Cruz was born on September 12, 1984 in Malabon City in Metro Manila.

Thomas George Sharpe III
was a Michigan politician. Thomas George Sharpe III was born on April 6, 1917 in Fowlerville, Michigan to parents Thomas George Sharpe Jr. and Laura Sharpe.

Pho Chhu
at the confluence below Punakha Dzong, the winter resident of Dratshang Lhentshog. Upon Dang Chhu joining below Wangdue Dzong, the trio flows as Puna Tsang Chhu and finally empties in the Brahmaputra, upon being joined by several tributaries on its course in the valley of Assam.

Crossley Tatui
is a Niuean politician and member of the Niue Assembly. Tatui is a graduate of the University of the South Pacific, with a degree in Public Administration and Accounting.

Elias Evander Dickson
was a state senator in South Carolina serving during the Reconstruction era. He served as chairman of the committee on agriculture.

Army Bay
is a northern coastal suburb of Auckland, in New Zealand. It is on the Whangaparaoa Peninsula about 47 kilometres north of the city centre.

VNIISS
in Aydarovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 2,286 as of 2010.

Krasnoye
in Aydarovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 467 as of 2010.

Starozhivotinnoye
in Aydarovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 179 as of 2010.

Chertovitsy
in Aydarovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,199 as of 2010.

Jared Shuster
is an American left-handed college baseball pitcher for the Wake Forest Demon Deacons. He was drafted by the Atlanta Braves in the first round of the 2020 Major League Baseball draft, and signed with the team.

Beryozovo
and the administrative center of Beryozovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,542 as of 2010.

Ivnitsy
in Beryozovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 115 as of 2010.

Lopatki
in Beryozovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 358 as of 2010.

Bolshaya Vereyka
and the administrative center of Bolshevereyskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 862 as of 2010.

Bogdanovo
and the administrative center of Gorozhanskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 708 as of 2010.

Kudi
or kudhi is a bladed tool from Banyumas, Indonesia. It is used to chop or cut, just like a parang.

Gorozhanka
in Gorozhanskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 428 as of 2010.

Krivoborye
in Gorozhanskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 710 as of 2010.

Solntse-Dubrava
and the administrative center of Gorozhanskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 64 as of 2010.

Karachun
and the administrative center of Karachunskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 708 as of 2010.

Zenith Classic Rock
is an independent regional radio station in Ireland broadcasting from Waterford. It is owned by Andy Linton and Andy Green of Total Broadcast Consultants, Ltd. and airs a Classic rock format, targeting an adult audience.

Glushitsy
in Karachunskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 187 as of 2010.

Sennoye
in Karachunskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 96 as of 2010.

Pieter van der Kruk Jr
. is a retired Dutch discus thrower.

Komsomolsky
and the administrative center of Komsomolskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 926 as of 2010.

Knyazevo
in Komsomolskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 515 as of 2010.

Petrovskoye
in Komsomolskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 235 as of 2010.

Sergeyevskoye
in Komsomolskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 59 as of 2010.

Eagle Scout Peak
is a mountain on the Great Western Divide of the southern Sierra Nevada. The mountain is located in the backcountry of Sequoia National Park.

Amedeo Simonetti
was an Italian painter; known primarily for his Orientalist scenes. He was sometimes referred to by his childhood nickname, Momo.

Alan Stewart Duthie
was a Scottish linguist and academic who settled and worked in Ghana all his adult life. He was a pioneer in linguistics at the University of Ghana, Legon for 49 years.

Jhon Fredy Serna Gallego
is a self-confessed Colombian hitman and gang leader. According to investigations by the judicial authorities and from his own testimony, he selectively murdered between 34 and 39 people, however, it is believed that he killed many others.

Emily Gabel-Luddy
is an American politician in California. Gabel-Luddy is current member of city council and a former mayor of Burbank, California.

Dui Prithibi
is a 2015 Bangladeshi romantic drama film. The film screenplay and directed by FI Manik and produced and distributed by Shondhani Kotha Chitra.

Shelfield
is a hamlet in the parish of Aston Cantlow, Warwickshire. While a small hamlet today, Shelfield was its own manor throughout the 14th and 15th centuries.

Elaine DiMasi
is an American physicist and a staff scientist at Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory, where she is the project lead of the optical systems for the upgrade of the Advanced Light Source. DiMasi obtained an undergraduate degree from Penn State and pursued a Ph.D in physics at the University of Michigan in Ann Arbor.

Michael T. Reynolds
is a career parks administrator who is a former acting director of the United States National Park Service in the Trump administration. Reynolds is a third-generation National Park Service employee.

Stepan Ryabchenko
is a Ukrainian new media artist. His work spans digital art, conceptual architecture, sculpture, and light installations.

Statutory Orders and Regulations
, abbreviated SOR is a legal terminology and filing system which allows the Government of Canada to function by regulation subsidiary to legislation. The SOR documents are published by the Canada Gazette.

William
Kirk is a British Furniture restorer primarily known for his work on The Repair Shop. Kirk studied Graphic Design and Antique Furniture Restoration and Conservation at the University of the Arts London and London Metropolitan University.

Kai Lukas Stratznig
is an Austrian footballer currently playing as a midfielder for Wolfsberger.

Marcel Schantl
is an Austrian footballer currently playing as a midfielder for TSV Hartberg.

Baaz Rockshelter
is a prehistoric archaeological site in Syria. Located in the foothills of the Anti-Lebanon Mountains about 50 km northeast of Damascus, the site consists of a small rock shelter favourably situated overlooking the nearby plains and springs.

Kapulivka
is a village of historical significance in the Nikopol Raion of Dnipropetrovsk Oblast in Ukraine. The population is 2,053.

Virginie Dreux
is a French Paralympic athlete who competes in international level events. She mainly competes in heptathlon events at INAS competitions and also competed in long jump events at the 2012 IPC Athletics European Championships and 2013 IPC Athletics World Championships.

Li Beiqun
is currently President of Nanjing University of Information Science and Technology, located in Nanjing, China. Li was born in 1969 in Xinyi, Jiangsu province, China.

Antonio Recamier
is a Mexican sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Fleeceware
is a type of malware mobile application that come with hidden, excessive subscription fees. These applications also take advantage of users who do not know how to cancel a subscription to keep charging them long after they have deleted the application.

Christian Hansen
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Dehing Patkai Landscape
, located in the Upper Assam, stretches for over roughly 600 square kilometres and comprises of three large blocks of forests.

Erik Johansen
was a Danish sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Vladimir Aleksandrov
is a Soviet sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Steve Colgate
is an American sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

William Solomons
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Gilbert Kaufman
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the 5.5 Metre event at the 1968 Summer Olympics.

Azeb Amha
is a linguist working on the morphology and syntax of Afroasiatic languages, with a special focus on Omotic languages. A senior researcher at the African Studies Center Leiden, Amha is co-editor of the international Journal of African Languages and Linguistics.

Tang Valley
is one of the four, beautiful valleys of Bumthang District, Bhutan. It is located 11 km away from Jakar, the administrative center of Bumthang District, Bhutan.

Jacob Ng
is an Australian professional boxer who has held the WBO Oriental and IBF International lightweight titles since 2019. Ng was born on 20 November 1994 in Gold Coast, Queensland.

Christopher E. Mason
is an associate professor at Weill Cornell Medicine. He is also one of the founding Directors of the WorldQuant Initiative for Quantitative Prediction with Dr. Oliver Elemento.

John Bere
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Fletcher was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1517 and M.A. in 1520.

John Pekyns
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Pekyns was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1523 and M.A. in 1524.

Tevita Funa
is a professional rugby league footballer who plays as a for the Manly Warringah Sea Eagles in the NRL. Funa played his junior rugby league for the Guildford Owls and Mounties.

John Bery
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Bery was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1523 and M.A. in 1526.

Fisa Igilisi Pihigia
is a Niuean politician and diplomat. Since 2017 he has been High Commissioner of Niue to New Zealand.

Germi Meteorological Station
is a Synoptic Meteorological Station located at Germi County of Ardabil province of Iran. It is one of the main international synoptic stations Which has been established to provide meteorological services,climate risk management and crisis management in the Germi County.This station has a significant role in the production of various bulletins to predict the weather Forecasting in the northern region of Ardabil province.

John Dotyn
was an Oxford college head in the 16th century. Dotyn was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1524 and M.A. in 1529.

John French
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. French was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1530 and M.A. in 1533.

Jennifer Louise Slaughter
is a British chemist and a Senior Lecturer in the Department of Chemistry at the University of Manchester. Her research is based on chemistry education and academic writing, specifically on laboratory chemical education, science communication, teaching and scholarship.

Vania Fitryanti Herlambang
is an TV Presenter, fashion model, who won the title of Puteri Indonesia Lingkungan 2018. She represented Indonesia at the Miss International 2018 pageant in Japan, where she placed as the Top 15 semi-finalist, continuing the ongoing 3rd year placement streaks of Indonesia, consecutively since Felicia Hwang Yi Xin in 2016 and Kevin Lilliana in 2017.

Henry Laurence
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Laurence was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1530 and M.A. in 1532.

Augustine Crosse
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Crosse was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1532 and M.A. in 1535.

Omladinski fudbalski klub Mladost DG
is a football club from the southwestern part of Podgorica, Montenegro. It was founded in 2019, they currently compete in Montenegrin Third League.

Georg Gallus
and former member of the German Bundestag. On September 10, 1970, Gallus entered the Bundestag to replace Ralf Dahrendorf, who had resigned.

Roberto Colliard
is a Mexican sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Tehmasp Rustom Mogul
is an Indian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Norbert Eimer
and former member of the German Bundestag. Eimer entered the German Bundestag in the 1976 federal elections via the FDP state list in Bavaria and was a member of the Bundestag throughout until 1994.

Roberto Haas
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Lomovo
and the administrative center of Lomovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 383 as of 2010.

Kevin McLaverty
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Novozhivotinnoye
and the administrative center of Novozhivotinovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,997 as of 2010.

Richard Griffin
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Medovka
in Novozhivotinnovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 229 as of 2010.

Mokhovatka
in Novozhivotinnovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 167 as of 2010.

Craig Coxhead
is a New Zealand judge who is currently serving as Chief Justice of Niue. Coxhead graduated from the University of Waikato in 1994 with a Bachelor of Laws.

Gerardo Seeliger
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Khvoshchevatka
in Novozhivotinnovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 216 as of 2010.

Olaf Feldmann
and former member of the German Bundestag. On 29 January 1981 Feldmann joined the German Bundestag, where he sat as a member of parliament until 1998.

Sidney Toledano
in Casablanca, Morocco, is a French-Moroccan businessman, the CEO of LMVH Fashion Group since February 2018, and former CEO of Fashion House Dior. Sidney Toledano was born in Casablanca, Morocco, in a Moroccan Sephardic Jewish family.

William R. Hoyt
was a state senator in South Carolina during the Reconstruction era from 1868 until 1870. He represented Colleton County.

Shyamsundarpur
is a village in the Faridpur Durgapur CD block in the Durgapur subdivision of the Paschim Bardhaman district in the Indian state of West Bengal. Shyamsundarpur is located at . The Asansol-Durgapur region is composed of undulating laterite soil.

Gia An 115 Hospital
is a 367 bed private general hospital, owned by Hoa Lam Group, in Ho Chi Minh City. Gia An 115 Hospital is the second hospital in the Hoa Lam-Shangri-La Healthcare Techpark , next to City International Hospital.

Minski Fabris
is a Croatian sailor. He competed at the 1972 Summer Olympics, the 1976 Summer Olympics and the 1980 Summer Olympics.

John Clarke
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Walter Bachmann
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Paul Hiles
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Mauro Pelaschier
is an Italian sailor. He competed at the 1972 Summer Olympics and the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Walter Mai
is a German sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

William Arthur Smeaton
was a British chemist and historian of science, who wrote more than seventy-five articles and several books on the history of chemistry in France in the 18th and 19th centuries. He was deeply engaged with the Society for the History of Alchemy and Chemistry which he chaired from 1986 to 1993.

William J. Brodie
was a legislator in South Carolina during the Reconstruction era. He was identified as a mullato bricklayer who was literate.

Brett de Thier
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

William More
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. More was born in Devon and educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1538 and M.A. in 1541.

Bolshevo
railway station is a railway station in Moscow Oblast, Russia. It is located on the Mytishchi-Fryazino section of the Yaroslavsky suburban railway line, Moscow.

Uganda
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one silver medal and one bronze medal, both in athletics.

Kim Weber
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

William Corindon
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Corindon was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1545, M.A. in 1548, and D.D. in 1556.

Stephen Marks
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Marks was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1552, M.A. in 1554, and D.D. in 1559.

Brian Tufano
is an English cinematographer, best known for his work on the films of Danny Boyle and Menhaj Huda. Tufano has been admitted to the British Society of Cinematographers and won the 2001 BAFTA Award for Outstanding Contribution to Film and Television.

Philip Randell
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Randall was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1545 and M.A. in 1548.

Rita Fromm
and former member of the German Bundestag. Rita Fromm was a member of the German Bundestag from 1980 to 1983.

Robert Newton
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Newton was educated at Exeter College, Oxford, graduating B.A. in 1552, M.A. in 1557 and B.D. in 1575.

Matthias Ginsberg
and former member of the German Bundestag. Ginsberg moved to the German Bundestag on 9 December 1982.

Norway
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one silver medal and one bronze medal.

Herbert Christ
and former member of the German Bundestag. He was a member of the German Bundestag for one legislative period from 13 December 1972.

Rachel Noble
is the Director-General of the Australian Signals Directorate. She was appointed to the position in February 2020 and is the first woman to hold the position.

Sonja L. Lanehart
is a linguist, Brackenridge Endowed Chair in Literature and the Humanities at the University of Texas at San Antonio, and Professor of Linguistics at the University of Arizona. Lanehart received her PhD in English language and linguistics from the University of Michigan in 1995.

Arcade Club
is a chain of amusement arcades located in the United Kingdom. First opened in 2014 the venues contain original arcade machines from five decades of video gaming history.

Oval Mansions
is the collective name for eight separate blocks of tenement housing in Kennington, south London. The blocks stand between the Oval cricket ground and the Oval Gasholders.

Karithi Ruth Wanjiru Nduati
is a Kenyan Pediatrician and Epidemiologist who also teaches at the University of Nairobi College of Health Sciences. She is also currently leading an interdisciplinary program through the University of Nairobi School of Medicine to educate physician-researchers to best implement HIV treatment and prevention methods backed by research.

Reece Kershaw
is the Commissioner of the Australian Federal Police. He was appointed to the role in 2019 after serving as the Commissioner of the Northern Territory police.

Albert Edward Anderson
was an American lawyer and politician from Maine. Anderson, a Republican, represented Portland in the Maine House of Representatives from 19171918.

Gremyachye
and the administrative center of Pavlovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 235 as of 2010.

Lebyazhye
in Pavlovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 207 as of 2010.

Mongolia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one silver medal and one bronze medal.

Alica Megan Schmidt
, more commonly known as Alica Schmidt, is a German athlete and model.

Witherslack
, Meathop and Ulpha is a civil parish in the South Lakeland district of the English county of Cumbria. Historically in Westmorland, it is located north east of Grange over Sands and south west of Kendal, between the confluence of the River Kent estuary and the River Winster.

Georgia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one silver medal and one bronze medal, both in judo.

Devin Davis
is an American professional basketball player who last played for Lavrio of the Greek Basket League. He played college basketball for Indiana, Odessa College and Houston.

Ryann Shane
is an American actress. Shane grew up with a close relationship with her father.

Samuel Jameson Anderson
, was a businessperson, lawyer and politician from Maine. He also was president of the Portland-Ogdensburg Railroad.

Mohammed Tikly
was a South African educator and struggle veteran. A member of the ANC, he spent over thirty years in exile in the UK, Tanzania and Zambia.

Jo Zebedee
, is a Northern Irish science fiction and fantasy writer, based in Carrickfergus near Belfast. She attended Victoria Primary School and Carrickfergus Grammar before completing a degree in English Literature.

John Garrald
was Dean of Cork from 1628 until his death at Bristol in 1641. Garrald was educated at Trinity College, Dublin.

Vidya Dhar Bajpai
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, lower house of the Parliament of India from Amethi, Uttar Pradesh as a member of the Indian National Congress.

John Hopkins
was Lieutenant Governor of South Carolina from December 1806 until 1808. He attended the First South Carolina Provincial Congress from Richland County, South Carolina.

Isaac Gervais
was an Anglican priest in Ireland during the 18th century. Gervais was educated at Trinity College, Dublin.

Espenberg
is a settlement in the U.S. state of Alaska, located northwest of Deering on the Seward Peninsula at the mouth of the Espenberg River by the Chukchi Sea. It lies within the Northwest Arctic Borough, consisting of a site with five or six buildings.

Russkaya Gvozdyovka
and the administrative center of Russko-Gvozdyovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 892 as of 2010.

Gvozdyovka
in Russko-Gvozdyovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 103 as of 2010.

Sklyayevo
and the administrative center of Sklyayevskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 547 as of 2010.

Silapathar College
, established in 1979, is a major and general degree college situated in Silapathar, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Insulasaurus
traanorum is a species of skink found in Palawan in the Philippines.

Crystal Mason
is an African-American woman who became the face of voter suppression during the 2016 United States Presidential election. Mason had previously been released after completing a five-year sentence for tax fraud and cast a provisional ballot after arriving at her polling place to find her name stripped from the sign-in sheets.

James Gibson
was an Irish politician. Gibson was born in County Antrim and educated at Trinity College, Dublin.

Netherlands
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one silver medal and two bronze medals.

Insulasaurus
victoria is a species of skink found in Palawan in the Philippines.

Laimekuri College
, established in 1996, is a major and general degree college situated in Laimekuri, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Harry Tseng Hou-jen
between 1985 and 1989, leaving to pursue advanced degrees in the United States.

Margaret Santiago
was an American museum registrar. Santiago, who worked at the National Museum of Natural History, was the first African-American to work as a registrar for a major scientific museum.

Sadiya College
, established in 1982, is a major and general degree college situated in Sadiya, Tinsukia district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Miss South Africa
2020 will be the 62nd edition of the Miss South Africa pageant. It will be held in August 2020.

Donatus Nwoga
was a poetry critic and professor of African literature at the University of Nigeria, Nsukka. Nwoga was from Mbaise in Imo State.

Brendan Thomas McKerchar
is a Scottish educator and a former first-class cricketer and rugby union player. McKerchar was born at Leith in January 1983.

Korets-Landau
leaflet, was authored by the Soviet physicists Mosey Korets and Lev Landau in 1938 and condemned Joseph Stalin and the NKVD as the response to the Great Purge in the Soviet Union. The Soviet leader Stalin was accused for betrayal of the October Revolution and the sociopolitical work of his regime, especially the secret police NKVD, was compared with the ones organized by German Nazi leader Adolf Hitler and the Italian Fascism leader Benito Mussolini, who at this time made active political struggle against Communism in their countries and were both ideological and political enemies of the Soviet Union.

Sotsgorod
of Sibkombain is a microdistrict in Leninsky District of Novosibirsk, Russia. It was built in the 1930s.

Margaret Lanzetta
is an American artist using abstract, culturally-significant pattern to explore postmodern conditions of fragmentation, migration, and cultural hybridity. Lanzetta engages with a variety of mediums including painting, silkscreen, digital photography, and ceramics.

Herbert Weichert
is a German sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Hans-Joachim Lange
is a German sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Guillermo Calegari Sr.
was an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Polygala
francisci is a species of plant in the family Polygalaceae. It is endemic to forest, savanna, and shrubland in southern Mozambique at elevations of 20 to 60 metres above sea level.

Egypt
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won two silver medals, both in taekwondo.

Khowang College
, established in 1982, is a major and general degree college situated in Khowang, Dibrugarh district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Ken Klein Sr.
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Star event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Peter Jackson
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Star event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Patrick Duarte Flores
is a Filipino curator, critic, and professor. Born in Manila, he received degrees in humanities, art history, and Philippine studies at the University of the Philippines Diliman.

Peter Bjorn
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Trimukhi Parbat
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India.The elevation of Trimukhi Parbat is and its prominence is . It is 99th highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Manfred Stelzl
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Peter Luschan
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Task Force 91
was a United States Navy task force. In 1 May 1945, it consisted of Alaskan Sea Frontier Forces under Rear Admiral R.

Bulgaria
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal, in athletics.

Henry W. Webb
was a political leader in Reconstruction era South Carolina. He was a delegate to the South Carolina Constitutional Convention of 1868 and elected to the South Carolina House of Representatives the same year.

Coleman Patrick Welch
was an American middleweight boxer. Born in Portland, Maine, Welch came from an Irish-American community and was nicked the Fighting Iceman.

Juliano Augusto Fernandes
is a Bissau-Guinean lawyer, university professor, and politician.

Algeria
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal, in athletics.

Hiranyamayee Lama
was a Bhutanese politician. In 1979 she became the first woman elected to the Tshogdu.

Laxman Meesala
is an Indian actor who works in Telugu theatre and films. Laxman is a theatre artist who worked in over fifty plays.

Serena Vitale
is an Italian academic, scholar, writer, and translator. She won the 2001 Bagutta Prize.

Anthony Obiagboso Enukeme
was a Nigerian businessman from Anambra State, south-eastern Nigeria. He was the founder, Chairman and Managing Director of Tonimas Nigeria Limited, a local manufacturing and trading company.

Legislative and Parliamentary Affairs Division
is a Bangladesh government department responsible for drafting and vetting legislation before they are placed in the parliament. The department ensures that all proposed laws are legally sound and meet treaty obligations of the government.

Stratton
is a village and former civil parish about 22 miles from Gloucester, now in the parish of Cirencester, in the Cotswold district, in the county of Gloucestershire, England. In 2018 it had an estimated population of 2584.

Christina
, Duchess of Mecklenburg-Schwerin was a princess of Mecklenburg-Schwerin. Between 1681 and 1693 she served as the Gandersheim.

Tengkhat College
, established in 1967, is a major and general degree college situated in Tengakhat, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Slavoliub Adnagi
is a Romanian politician of Serbian descent. He is a member of the Union of Serbs of Romania and has been serving as a Member of the Chamber of Deputies of Romania since 2016.

Nandalal Borgohain City College
, established in 1992, is a major and general degree college situated in Dibrugarh, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Sweden
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal, in swimming.

Tingkhong College
, established in 1972, is a major and general degree college situated in Tingkhong, Dibrugarh district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Ariel Forman
was an Israeli actor and voice actor. Born and raised in Tel Aviv, Forman began his career in the IDF serving in the Central Command Band along with Oshik Levi and other artists.

Dakha Devi Rasiwasia College
, established in 1971, is a major and general degree college situated in Chauba, Dibrugarh district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Colette Samoya Kirura
is a Burundian former politician and diplomat. In 1982 she became one of the first group of women in the National Assembly.

Cathy Hardin Harrison
is the current County Judge for Miller County, Arkansas. Harrison was elected to the position November 2018 defeating County Judge Roy John McNatt.

Law and Justice Division
is a Bangladesh government division under the Ministry of Law, Justice and Parliamentary Affairs responsible for mananging the judicial apparatus of Bangladesh. Md.

Simon Nicholas Stuart
is the Director of Strategic Conservation at Synchronicity Earth He is particularly known for his work on the IUCN Red List of Threatened Species. Stuart completed his undergraduate education at the University of Cambridge in applied biology.

Cyprus
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal and one bronze medal.

Janata Mahavidyalaya
, is a major and general degree college situated in Tinsukia, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Minnie Lucinda Fisher
was a civic worker and community activist. She was a native-born citizen of the town of Mound Bayou, Mississippi, an all-Black town founded by Isaiah Montgomery in 1887.

Robert Davell
, DCL was an English priest in the 16th century. Davell was educated at the University of Oxford.

Makum College
, established in 1997, is a major and general degree college situated in Makum, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Ectemnius
cavifrons is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Lindenius
albilabris is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Sapekhati College
, established in 1988, is a major and general degree college situated in Sapekhati, Charaideo district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Choelquoit
lake is an endorheic lake in the western Chilcotin District of the Central Interior of British Columbia, Canada, located north of Chilko Lake, west of Tatlayoko Lake, and east of Williams Lake . The lake is the largest high elevation lake in Canada without an outflow, and sits in a picturesque spot on the western edge of the Chilcotin plateau, surrounded by grasslands, pine forest, and views of the snow-capped Niut Mountains. There is a camp site on the east side of the lake with a spectacular view of the Mountains.

Pieve del Grappa
is a comune in the province of Treviso, Veneto region of Italy. It was formed on 30 January 2019 with the merger of the comunes of Crespano del Grappa and Paderno del Grappa.

Silapathar Town College
, established in 1993, is a major and general degree college situated in Silapathar, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Simen Chapari College
, established in 1994, is a major and general degree college situated in Simen Chapari, Dhemaji district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Henry Dove
, D.D. was an English priest in the 16th century. The nephew of Bishop John Pearson, Dove was educated at Westminster School and Trinity College, Cambridge.

Mimumesa
littoralis is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Mimumesa
unicolor is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Vega
flight VV11 was the launch of the Mohammed VI-A satellite by the Vega launcher. The payload, composed of the Mohammed VI-A satellite, its adapter, and its dispenser, was approximately in total mass.

James Christopher Lewis
, Jr. is a former collegiate American football defensive back who played college football at the University of Miami.

Weiss
started coaching at the age of 18 and was named Offensive Coordinator at Florida Atlantic when he was 24. Weiss has worked with coaches such as Nick Saban, Dan Quinn, Lane Kiffin, Kirby Smart, Jeremy Pruitt, Mario Cristobal and Mike Locksley.

Cape York
is the northernmost point of the mainland of Australia. It is within the Shire of Torres in Queensland.

Colceresa
is a comune in the province of Vicenza, Veneto region of Italy. It was formed on 20 February 2019 with the merger of the comunes of Mason Vicentino and Molvena.

Varesh Airlines
is an Iranian airline based in Sari International Airport. It operates scheduled domestic cities of Iran and international services in the Middle East.

Nelson Everhart
is an American composer and music educator. He primarily composes for video games and media.

Lusiana Conco
is a comune in the province of Vicenza, Veneto region of Italy. It was formed on 20 February 2019 with the merger of the comunes of Lusiana and Conca.

Edward Adolphus Spring
was a United States sculptor. He was the son of Marcus and Rebecca Spring.

Valbrenta
is a comune in the province of Vicenza, Veneto region of Italy. It was formed on 30 January 2019 with the merger of the comunes of Campolongo sul Brenta, Cismon del Grappa, San Nazario and Valstagna.

Jeff Grosso
was an American professional skateboarder, skate documentarian, and web series host from Arcadia, California. Grosso started skateboarding at the age of 5.

Qala-e Mafushad
is the easternmost village in Afghanistan, near the Chinese border. It is a Kyrgyz settlement in the Little Pamir, east of Lake Chaqmaqtin, in the Wakhan.

Bahman Tavoosi
is a Canadian writer, producer, filmmaker based in Montreal, he was born in 1988 in Tehran. Tavoosi began his career as a film critic and author at the age of 17 and gradually shifted towards documentary and fiction film making in later years.

Lespinasse
was a fine dining establishment initially run by and primarily associated with executive chef Gray Kunz. It was located in the St. Regis Hotel in the borough of Manhattan in New York City.

Forever Mandalay
is a 2014 Burmese drama television series. It is a story of Mandalay.

Ferdinand Ludwig
is a German architect and the head of the professorship for Green Technologies in Landscape Architecture at the Technical University of Munich. Ludwig is a pioneer of and innovator in the field of Baubotanik, the architectural realm of living plant construction.

Suresh Bobilli
is an Indian music composer who works in Telugu-language films. Suresh worked with the Telugu news channel V6 for albums for various occasions.

South Springfield
is a rural locality in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about south of the town of Scottsdale.

Theodore Brenson
was a Latvian-American abstract artist and educator. Brenson was born in Riga, Latvia in 1903.

Lakhimpur Kendriya Mahavidyalaya
, established in 1992, is a general degree college situated at Lakhimpur, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Brahmaputra Degree College
, established in 1993, is a general degree college situated at Bokulguri, in Lakhimpur district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Swahid Maniram Dewan College
, established in 1964, is a general degree college situated at Charing, in Sivasagar district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Dibrugarh University.

Mahmoud Hassan Hammoud
, is a Lebanese football manager and former player, who last managed club Shabab Sahel. He played as a striker for Nejmeh and the Lebanon national team during the 1980s and 1990s.

William Lawrence Mauldin
was a South Carolina politician and railroad executive. He served as mayor of Greenville, in the South Carolina House of Representatives, South Carolina Senate, and was Lieutenant Governor of South Carolina.

Arlindo Veiga dos Santos
and one of its most important leader.

Alex Toussaint
is a senior fitness instructor at Peloton. Toussaint grew up on Long Island, New York where he was raised by his father, Martial, a machinist mate in the Navy, and his mother, Judith, a doctorate in education.

Ninfa Marra
is a Venezuelan former professional tennis player. While competing on the professional tour during the 1990s, Marra reached a career high singles ranking of 333 and won an ITF tournament in Guayaquil, as well as three ITF doubles titles.

Pedro Augusto Ferreira Soares
is a Portuguese professional footballer who plays as a forward for the club Aves. On 1 August 2019, Soares signed a professoinal contract with Aves.

Cristian Ristea
is a Romanian professional kickboxer, currently competing in the heavyweight division of the Dynamite Fighting Show. A professional competitor since 2009, he has also competed for the SUPERKOMBAT, Enfusion, OSS Fighters and Tatneft Cup.

Rebecca Scroggs
is an English actress from London, England. Scroggs was a drama student at the University of Sussex during 2002, where she obtained a degree in European Drama.

Orange County Historical Society
is a 501 non-profit organization dedicated to the history of Orange County, California. It was incorporated on May 28, 1919.

Uptown Country Girl
is a studio album by American country artist Lynn Anderson. It was released in February 1970 on Chart Records and was produced by Slim Williamson.

Castleford Central
and Glashoughton is an electoral ward of the City of Wakefield district used for elections to Wakefield Metropolitan District Council. The ward is one of 21 in the Wakefield district, and has been held by Labour since the current boundaries were formed for the 2004 Council election.

Iosif Tolchanov
.

Mai Sayavongs
is a Laotian ambassador who has served as ambassador to the United States since August 3, 2015. He has concurrent accreditation to Canada and Mexico.

Seventh College
is the seventh and newest college of the University of California, San Diego. Its primary focus will be on interdisciplinary education.

Talitha Espiritu
is a Filipino author and academic known for her work on cinema during the Marcos dictatorship. Espiritu teaches in the Film and New Media Studies program at Wheaton College in Norton, Massachusetts.

Neferti X
. M. Tadiar is a Filipino scholar and critical theorist.

Warren Ruggiero
is an American football coach who is currently the Offensive Coordinator for Wake Forest. Ruggerio Spent five seasons as the offensive coordinator at Defiance College and three at the OC at Clarion.

Regional Development Councils
are the highest policy-making body governing the administrative regions of the Philippines. They serve as the subnational counterpart of the National Economic and Development Authority.

Fairview Heights
is an Auckland suburb, which is under local governance of Auckland Council. The area is defined by Lonely Track Road on the north, East Coast Road on the east, Oteha Valley Road on the south, and the Auckland Northern Motorway on the west.

Leicester
power stations are a series of electricity generating stations that have provided electric power to the City of Leicester and the wider area from 1894. The first station, located within Aylestone gas works, supplied electricity for street lighting.

Bounty Agro Ventures, Inc
., also known as Bounty is a poultry company based in Pasig, Metro Manila, Philippines.

Uzoamaka Linda Iwobi
is a British-Nigerian solicitor and equalities practitioner. She is the Specialist Policy Adviser on Equalities to the Welsh Government, an Honorary Fellow at the University of Wales Trinity St David and chief executive officer and secretary of Race Council Cymru.

Lukas Birk
is an Austrian photographer, archivist, and publisher. He is known for a visual archive work in Myanmar and research on Box Camera photography in Afghanistan.

Fred Sawyer
is an American former professional basketball player. He played collegiately for the Louisville Cardinals from 1958 to 1961.

Shamsher Singh
is an Indian journalist who has worked with news networks including Aajtak, India TV and Zee Media Network. He was awarded the Ramnath Goenka Award for Excellence in Journalism in 2010.

Talawa
is a rural locality in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about south-east of the town of Scottsdale.

Harikrishnan G.
is an Indian art photographer, who is working as a photo journalist in a leading Malayalam publication, M.M. Publication, Kottayam. Harikrishnan G started his career as a professional photographer during his graduation studies.

Benchball
is a team sport played in schools, used for developing ball skills and as a preparation for learning netball and basketball. There are two teams, each with a bench, and one dodgeball or large soft ball.

Whitehouse Ward
is a ward in the North West Area of Ipswich, Suffolk, England. It returns three councillors to Ipswich Borough Council.

Perdana University
, also known as PU, is an emerging Malaysian private university located in Serdang, Malaysia focusing on health science programmes at foundation, undergraduate and postgraduate levels. Perdana University was officially incorporated in 2011.

Kanchana Silpa-archa
is a Thai politician who is currently serving as the leader of the Chartthaipattana Party. She previously served as Deputy Minister of the Ministry of Education from 1999 to 2001.

Brownea
enricii is a tree in the legume family Fabaceae, native to Colombia. It is named for the Colombian botanist Enrique Forero.

Jagannath Singh College
, Udharbond, established in 1998, is a major and general degree college situated in Udharbond, Cachar district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Assam University.

Whitton Ward
is a ward in the North West Area of Ipswich, Suffolk, England. It returns three councillors to Ipswich Borough Council.

Eastern Karbi Anglong College
, established in 1997, is a major and general degree college situated in Sarihajan, Karbi Anglong district, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Assam University.

Bairavanathar Temple
is a Hindu temple dedicated to the deity Shiva, located at Thagattur in Nagapattinam district in Tamil Nadu, India. It is one of the shrines of the Vaippu Sthalams sung by Tamil Saivite Nayanar Sundarar.

Tarabhusan Pal Junior College
, established in 2003, is a major and general degree college situated in Karimganj, Assam. This college is affiliated with the Assam University.

Morocco
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal, one silver medal and one bronze medal.

Ashley Lane
is an English professional boxer. He held the Commonwealth super-bantamweight title from 2017 to 2019 and challenged for the British super-bantamweight title in 2019.

William Popley
(c. 1490-c.

Marmat
is a tehsil in the Doda district of Jammu and Kashmir. It consists of 18 villages including the village of Marmat with an area of . Marmat is located 45 km south of the district headquarters of Doda.

Paitoon Chulatuppa
is a Thai sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Kenneth Tomlins
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Gilbert Lennox-King
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Mogens Larsen
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Larry Scott
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Ted Hains
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Urs Kohler
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Peter Frey
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Roman Rutkowski
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Tomasz Holc
is a Polish sailor. He competed iat the 1972 Summer Olympics and the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Heinz Laprell
is a German sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Wolf Stadler
is a German sailor. He competed at the 1972 Summer Olympics and the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Sean Whitaker
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Mario Buckup
is a Brazilian sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Artan Jazxhi
is an Albanian professional footballer who currently play as a centre-back for Albanian club Teuta.

Tirulokanathar Temple
is a Hindu temple dedicated to the deity Shiva, located at Thakkalur in Puducherry, India. The temple is one of the shrines of the Vaippu Sthalams, sung by Tamil Saivite Nayanars Appar and Sundarar.

Ngwe Kyi
comics are particularly successful.

Edward Drew
was an Anglican priest in England during the late 17th and early 18th centuries. Drew was born in Devon and educated at Exeter College, Oxford.

Joshua Hadley
was an American pioneer, settler and public official. He participated in the Convention of 1832 and 1835 Consultation.

Marcel Cabiddu
was a French politician. Cabiddu was voted as member of parliament during the 2002 French legislative election in the 11 district of Pas-de-Calais.

John Drewery
, DCL was an English Anglican priest in the late 16th and early 17th centuries. Drewry was born in Pulborough and educated at Lincoln College, Oxford.

Estela Molly
was an Argentine actress.

Iara Lopes Vargas
and state deputy of Guanabara and of Rio de Janeiro.

Lawrence Stubbs
, D.D. was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Stubbs was Vice-Chancellor of the University of Oxford from 1514 to 1516, and Presidents of Magdalen College, Oxford from 1525 to 1527.

Megan Richter
is a British Paralympic swimmer who competes in international level events. She has also competed in paratriathlon.

Lino Esterino Garavaglia
, OFM Cap. was an Italian prelate of the Catholic Church.

Zala
, also called Jhala or Jauvla, is one of the 36 Clans of Rajputs. According to traditional sources, they were aligned with Sooryawanshi lineage of Rajputs.

London Independent Producers
was a British film production company. It was founded in 1951 by Sydney Box and William MacQuitty.

Puget Sound John Brown Gun Club
is a Puget Sound Area gun club, formerly affiliated with Redneck Revolt. During the George Floyd protests in June 2020, the group attended the Capitol Hill Autonomous Zone in Seattle.

Ranabima Baseball Club
is part of Ranabima Royal College, Kandy. Only Ranabima Royal College student can get the membership of Ranabima Baseball Club.

Chhotu Ram Institute of Law
is situated at Rohtak District of Haryana State in India. It is governed by Jat Education Society Rohtak named after Chhotu Ram.

Tigrane Pasha
was an Egyptian-Armenian politician and the ninth Foreign Minister of Egypt. He served as Foreign Minister from 1891-94, under three Prime Ministers.

Lithuania
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal, one silver medal and two bronze medals, all in athletics.

Polygala
westii is a very rare plant species in the family Polygalaceae. It is an annual herb which is tall and it produces green flowers.

Benjamim Vargas
.

Hector Aldana
. Aldana compiled a professional mixed martial arts record of 4-0 by fighting solely within the Mexicali regional MMA circuit before signing for UFC in June 2018.

Kalika Singh
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, lower house of the Parliament of India from Azamgarh, Uttar Pradesh as a member of the Indian National Congress.

Ali Zulfikar Pasha
was twice Foreign Minister of Egypt. He was a major landholder in Egypt.

Ram Harakh Yadav
was an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, the lower house of the Parliament of India as a member of the Indian National Congress.

John Sellick
was an English priest in the 17th century. Sellick was educated at Christ Church, Oxford.

Manuel Zuliani
is an Italian rugby union player. His usual position is as a flanker, and he currently plays for Benetton Rugby.

Melinninae
are a subfamily of the Ampharetidae, belonging to the Terebellida. The Mellinninae are described firstly by Ralph V. Chamberlin in The Annelida Polychaeta, 1919.

Olusegun Oke Library
, Ogbomoso in Oyo State, Nigeria. It was formerly known as LAUTECH Library and was established in July 1990, some months after the inauguration of the university.

Dotzigen
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Dotzigen, in the Swiss canton of Bern. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge of Swiss Federal Railways.

Vesla Mae Weaver
is an American political scientist and author. She is a Bloomberg Distinguished Professor of political science and sociology at Johns Hopkins University.

Ghulam Haidar
, known by his pen name as Haidari Wujodi, was an Afghan poet and scholar who primarily wrote mystical and Sufi poetry in Persian language throughout his life. He wrote numerous books, of which fourteen to fifteen were published.

Passaloecus
insignis is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Ewurabena Braye
popularly known as Rabby Bray is a Ghanaian entertainer, actress, movie producer, philanthropist, and an international real estate property consultant. She has been ranked among the few most prolific film actress and producers in Ghana.

Passaloecus
monilicornis is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Ioannis Giapalakis
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Ioannis Kiousis
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Panagiotis Mikhail
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Wu I-ding
, also romanized Wu Yi-ting is a Taiwanese politician. She was elected to the Legislative Yuan in 2020.

Daniel Kinahan
is an Irish reputed gang boss and boxing promoter from Dublin. He has been named by the High Court of Ireland as a senior figure in organised crime on a global scale.

John Burrowes
is a Jamaican sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Lech Poklewski
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Ronald Benjamin Moppett
is a Canadian painter. He is known primarily for abstract paintings and for works in which he combines paint and collage, along with non-traditional materials.

Burton Benedict
was an American anthropologist. He interrupted his studies at Harvard University to serve in the United States Army Air Forces during World War Two.

Tadeusz Piotrowski
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Christopher McKinney
is a Bahamian sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Antonio Denti
is an Italian rugby union player. His usual position is as a Hooker or Prop and he currently plays for Viadana in Top12.

Debabarta Chatterjee
was a botanist from India, whose primary scholarly focus was the endemic flora of India. Chatterjee was born in Hugli-Chuchura, India on April 2, 1911.

Robin Hennessy
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Harry Byrne
was an Irish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Treen Morris
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Joe McMenamin
was an Irish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Boris Khabarov
is a Soviet sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

William Davis
was an English priest in the 17th century. Davis was educated at the University of Oxford.

Nikolay Gromov
was a Soviet sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Kanepokhari
that gives its name to the Kanepokhari Rural Municipality in Morang District, Province No. 1, Nepal. The pond is about east of Itahari and west of Damak.

Vicenta Arenas
Mayor is a retired Spanish goalball player who competed in international level events.

Mohabbat Tujhe Alvida
is a Pakistani melodrama television series produced by Barkat Siddiqi and Zayed Sheikh. It stars Zahid Ahmed, Sonya Hussain and Mansha Pasha in lead roles.

Born Killers
is a 2005 American crime drama film directed by Morgan J. Freeman and starring Jake Muxworthy, Gabriel Mann, Lauren German, Tom Sizemore and Kelli Garner. Principal photography occurred in Utah.

James Amos
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

David L. Hoffmann
is Distinguished Professor of History Faculty, College of Arts and Sciences, Ohio State University, United States, an expert in Russian, Soviet, and East European history. His other interests include Environment, Health, Technology, and Science, as well as Power, Culture, and the State.

Karl Stangl
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Gunnar Dahlgaard
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Nookala Ramachendra Reddy
is a politician from the Telangana region. A freedom fighter, he took an active part in the Vande Mataram movement in the erstwhile Hyderabad State.

Henry Dethick
was an English priest in the late 16th and early 17th centuries. The son of Gilbert Dethick, Garter Principal King of Arms from 1550 until 1584, he was educated at the University of Oxford.

Fraser Beer
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the Dragon event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Sujan Singh Bundela
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, the lower house of the Parliament of India from Jhansi, Uttar Pradesh as a member of the Indian National Congress.

LeVante Bellamy
. He played college football at Western Michigan.

Pemphredon
lethifer is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Pemphredon
lugubris is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Gilberto Pavan
is an Italian rugby union player. His usual position is as a Centre and he currently plays for Viadana in Top12.

Rosa tomentosa
, otherwise known as the harsh downy-rose, is a species of plant in the family Rosaceae. It is native to the British Isles, where it is commonest in Wales and west and south-east England.

Jodie Anne Laubenberg
is an American politician from Texas. Laubenberg is a former Republican member of the Texas House of Representatives from District 89 in Collin County in suburban Dallas, Texas.

Gazi Abdul Haq
is a Bangladesh Nationalist Party politician and Physician. He was elected a member of parliament from Khulna-5 in February 1996.

Saint Sebastian
Thrown into the Cloaca Maxima is a 1612 oil on canvas painting by Ludovico Carracci, now in the Getty Museum in Los Angeles, which acquired it in 1971. A preparatory drawing survives in the Louvre.

Little Devil Inside
is an upcoming action-adventure role-playing video game developed by Neostream Interactive. The game was announced through a Kickstarter campaign in April 2015 and has gone through various stages of development.

Felicity Campbell
was a British painter and illustrator. Campbell was born and brought up in Sussex in southern England and, after being home-schooled, studied art in Paris, Rome and The Hague.

Ebun Joseph
is a Nigerian lecturer, author, and consultant. She is co-founder and module coordinator of the first Black Studies module in Ireland at University College Dublin.

Mark Donaldson
is a Scottish football, tennis, and baseball commentator and presenter for ESPN and BT Sport. In 1995, Donaldson began his professional career working on the radio station, Scot FM.

Elchin Nazim oglu Mammadli
was a theater and cinema actor of Azerbaijan, Elchin Nazim oghlu Mammadli was born on April 20, 1983, in the Shaki district of Azerbaijan.

LA Originals
is a 2020 documentary film directed by Estevan Oriol, written by Brian Maya and Omar Quiroga and starring Estevan Oriol, Mister Cartoon and Snoop Dogg. The premise revolves around the Los Angeles-based artists Mark Machado and Estevan Oriol with Latinx roots.

Pemphredon
rugifer is a species of solitary wasp in the family Crabronidae. It is found in Europe, northern Asia, and Africa.

Christ
and the Samaritan Woman or The Woman at the Well is a 1593-1594 oil on canvas painting by Annibale Carracci, painted as part of the same scheme as the Palazzo Sampieri frescoes. Several years later he also produced a much smaller autograph copy with variations, now in the Museum of Fine Arts, Budapest.

Saint Roch
Giving Alms is an oil on canvas painting by Annibale Carraci, commissioned between 1587 and 1588 by the Confraternity of San Rocco in Reggio Emilia, a body for whom he produced several works. His largest work on panel or canvas, it is the crowning achievement of his career before his move to Rome.

Simukai Chigudu
is an Associate Professor of African Politics at the University of Oxford. His work considers the social and political mechanisms that give rise to inequality in Africa.

Pasambahan
is a traditional Minangkabau dance that develops in various regions in the province of West Sumatra, Indonesia. This dance was performed in a welcoming ceremony which was intended as a welcome and an expression of respect for the guest of honor who had just arrived.

Vega
flight VV12 was the launch of the ADM-Aeolus satellite by the Vega launcher. The payload, composed of the ADM-Aeolus satellite, its adapter, and its dispenser, was approximately in total mass.

Bryan Leib
is an American conservative political commentator and activist. Leib served as the National Director for Americans Against Antisemitism and the Program Director of the Israeli-American Council.

Psenulus
pallipes is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Alexander Parambithara
was the speaker of Kerala Legislative Assembly from 13 December 1961 to 10 September 1964. He was born on February 1900.

Russians
in Norway are people born in Russia or who both parents where born in Russia who lives in Norway. On the 1 January 2012 there where 16,833 Russians in Norway, of whom 14,953 were first generation immigrants while 1,880 were Norwegian-born descendants.

Juan Vicente Fabbiani
was a Venezuelan painter.

Slovakia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal, one silver medal and two bronze medals, all in shooting.

Arjun Singh Bhadoria
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, the lower house of the Parliament of India from Etawah, Uttar Pradesh.

Elizabeth
of Boston, Massachusetts. She is a Northern Ireland immigrant, physical therapist and the first openly LGBTQ woman elected to Boston City Council.

Vega
flight VV13 was the launch of the Mohammed VI-B satellite by the Vega launcher. The payload, composed of the Mohammed VI-B satellite, its adapter, and its dispenser, was approximately in total mass.

Kyra Edwards
is a British sculler. She holds a degree in statistics from the University of California, Los Angeles.

European Association of Neurosurgical Societies
is the continental, non-governmental, learned society representing the neurosurgeons of European region. It was founded in the year 1971.

Maria Barrados
is a Canadian government official. She is the former president of the Public Service Commission of Canada and chair of Accreditation Canada International.

Achenodon
is an extinct artiodactyl mammal, possibly belonging to the eloiids. It lived in the Mid-To-Upper Eocene and its fossil remains have been found in North America.

Evenwood
railway station served the village of Evenwood, County Durham, England from 1858 to 1962 on the South Durham and Lancashire Union Railway. The station opened on 13 October 1858 by the North Eastern Railway.

Latin American Federation of Neurosurgical Societies
is the continental, non-governmental, learned society representing the neurosurgeons of Latin American region.

Kaestlea
laterimaculata is a species of skink found in India.

Parker Jackson-Cartwright
is an American professional basketball player for the Cheshire Phoenix of the British Basketball League. He played college basketball for the Arizona Wildcats.

Pondy Ravi
is an Indian actor who works predominately in Tamil-language films. He has acted in over sixty films.

Polygala
xanthina is a plant species in the family Polygalaceae. It is an annual herb which has a height of between . The colour of its flowers have been described as greenish purple, bluish, yellowish, or pinkish.

Vega
flight VV14 was the launch of the PRISMA satellite by the Vega launcher. The payload, composed of the PRISMA satellite, its adapter, and its dispenser, was approximately in total mass.

William Marshal
, Lord of Hingham, was an English noble. He was hereditary Earl Marshal of Ireland and was slain during the Battle of Bannockburn, Scotland in 1314.

Mannahouse Church
is a non-denominational Christian megachurch located in Portland, Oregon, U.S. Their five campuses have nine English services, two Spanish services, and one Burmese service. Three of these services take place at their Rocky Butte Campus which serves as their headquarters.

Jaka Malus
is a Slovenian handball player who plays for HC Meshkov Brest and the Slovenian national team.

Vladimir Putrash
is a Belarusian former footballer. Putrash started his senior career with Neman Stolbtsy.

Uttar Megh
is a 1960 Bengali film directed by Jiban Ganguly. This is a drama film.

A. Nafeesath Beevi
was the Deputy Speaker of Kerala Legislative Assembly from 15 March 1960 to 10 September 1964. She was born on 22 March 1924 to Abdul Karim and Hawa Umma.

Ram Singh Shakya
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, the lower house of the Parliament of India from Etawah, Uttar Pradesh.

Louise Sarah Natrajan
is a British chemist and a reader in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. Her research typically is based on actinide chemistry and luminescence spectroscopy, though some of her published research has extended to lanthanide chemistry, transition metal complexes and organic chemistry.

Pakistani Uruguayans
are people born in Pakistan who live in Uruguay, or Uruguayan-born people of Pakistani descent. There are at least 70 Pakistani physicians living and working in Uruguay, who were originally living in Cuba and later emigrated to the Southern Cone.

Adelgunde Vogt
, was a Danish sculptor. She was the first female sculptor in Denmark.

Nuno Alexandre Tavares Mendes
is a Portuguese professional footballer who plays as a leftback for Sporting CP. Mendes joined the youth academy of Sporting CP at the age of 10.

K. P. Ramachandran Nair
was the founder of National Democratic Party and the Minister for Health from 01 September 1983 to 29 May 1985 in Kerala. He was born on 1 January 1922 to Dr. K. P. Panikkar.

Elizabeth Garber
is an American historian of science known for her work on James Clerk Maxwell and the history of physics. She is a professor emerita of history at Stony Brook University.

Tonganah
is a rural locality in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about east of the town of Scottsdale.

Arlette Conzemius
is an ambassador from Luxembourg who is the permanent representative to NATO and Belgium. She has also served as ambassador to the United States from 1998 until 2005.

Romania
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one silver medal and three bronze medals.

Rhys Ernst
is an American film producer and director. A trans man, his work explores transgender identity.

Harold Noel Dellow
is a former New Zealand cricketer who played five matches of first-class cricket for Canterbury between early 1955 and early 1956. Born in Ashburton, Canterbury, Noel Dellow was a medium-pace bowler.

P. K. Velayudhan
was the Minister for Community Development in third K. Karunakaran Ministry in Kerala.

Kamar Uddin Arman
is a Bangladeshi stand-up comedian, actor, presenter and model. In 2016, he participated and second runner-up the Zee Bangla comedy show Mirakkel season 9 jointly with MD Saidur Rahman Pavel.

Lii Tedre
is an Estonian stage, television, and film actress. Tedre began her career with an engagement at the Endla Theatre in 1968, before leaving in 2010 to become a freelance actress.

Weird Earth
is a TV program on The Weather Channel that premiered on June 14, 2020. In this series, cameras around the globe capture unexplainable weather phenomena.

Shana Alyse Kushner Gadarian
is an American political psychologist. She is an Associate professor of Political Science at Syracuse University.

National Dress Reform Association
was an American association in support of the Victorian dress reform, founded in 1856 and dissolved in 1865. It was founded in February 1856 by the hydropathist James Caleb Jackson.

Huestis Pratt Cook
was an American photographer. His father George S. Cook established a studio in Charleston, South Carolina before moving to Richmond in 1880.

V. J. Thankappan
is a communist politician from Kerala. He was born on 20 April 1934 at Aralummoodu to C.

Margaret Chabot
, was an American hotel owner. She was the founder and manager of the famous Rising Sun Hotel on Conti Street in the French Quarter of New Orleans, which became a well known spot for foreign travellers and wealthy guests in the city in the early 19th-century.

Ali Asghar Asiabari
is an Iranian karateka. He won Bronze medal at 2016 World Karate Championships held in Linz, Austria in kumite -75 kg category.

T. Sivadasa Menon
is a communist leader from Kerala. He was the Finance Minister of Kerala in third E.

Museo ABC
is a museum in Madrid, Spain dedicated to drawing and illustration. The museum is housed in a converted brewery.

James Fairfield English Jr
. was an American bank executive and college president.

Gabon
competed in the 2003 All-Africa Games held at the National Stadium in the city of Abuja, Nigeria. The team won a single silver medal, won by Melanie Engaong in the judo tournament.

Joseph Konde-Lule
is a retired Ugandan medical sociologist and epidemiologist who conducted extensive work regarding HIV risk behaviors in rural Uganda. Joseph Konde-Lule holds degrees as a Bachelor of Medicine and Bachelor of Surgery as well as a Master of Public Health.

Angelo Biancini
was an Italian sculptor. Room 10 of the Collection of Modern Religious Art, Vatican Museums is dedicated to Biancini.

Evicel
is a packaged combination of human fibrinogen and human thrombin used as a sealant and a vial of human thrombin.

Hamoun Derafshipour
(; born in Kermanshah, is an Iranian karateka. He won Bronze medal at 2018 World Karate Championships held in Madrid, Spain in -67 kg.

Forness Stadium
was a stadium in Olean, New York. It opened in 1946 and was home to the St. Bonaventure University football team from 1946 to 1951.

Albrecht von Massow
is a German musicologist. Since 2000 he has held the chair for 20th century music and systematic musicology at the joint Institute for Musicology Weimar-Jena.

Wlson Cooke
was a member of the South Carolina House of Representatives during the Reconstruction era. He served from 1868 until 1870.

Micahel Charles Spafford
is an American artist known for his archetypal, figurative oil paintings drawn from Classical mythology. Spafford taught painting at the University of Washington, Seattle until his retirement in 1994.

Satiu Simativa Perese
is Chief Justice of Samoa. Perese was born in Maagiagi, Samoa and educated at Maagiagi Primary School.

Christiane Papon
is an Austrian-born French politician. Papon was born on 3 September 1924 in Vienna, Austria.

Comedy Central
is a French pay television channel operated by ViacomCBS France. Comedy Central was launched in France on 4 October 2018, along with the launch of a French digital content division for social medias, Viacom Digital Studios France.

Warrentinna
is a rural locality in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of Scottsdale.

Christopher James Baggoley
is an Australian doctor and the Chief Medical Officer of Australia between 2011 and 2016. Baggoley is the Chief Medical Advisor for Calvary Care.

Paranjothi Easwarar Temple
is a Hindu temple dedicated to the deity Shiva, located at Thanjakkoor in Sivagangai district, India. It is one of the shrines of the Vaippu Sthalams sung by Tamil Saivite Nayanar Sundarar.

Soul Mechanic
is a 2020 South Korean television series starring Shin Ha-kyun, Jung So-min, Tae In-ho and Park Ye-jin. It aired on KBS2 from May 6 to June 25, 2020.

Anton Banko
was a Slovenian inventor and engineer who is best known for designing the first phacoemulsifier. Banko established Surgical Design Corporation in New York in 1968 which produced a variety of successful phacoemulsification machines that are used worldwide.

James Frank Bishop
is an Australian doctor and the Chief Medical Officer of Australia between 2009 and 2011. Bishop graduated from University of Melbourne with a Bachelor of Medicine, Bachelor of Surgery in 1972.

Gustavo Simoni
was an Italian painter, watercolorist and art teacher. He is best known his Orientalist scenes.

Bandit Peak
is a double-summit granitic mountain located in the Glacier Peak Wilderness of the North Cascades, in Chelan County of Washington state. The mountain is situated east of the crest of the Cascade Range, on land managed by Okanogan-Wenatchee National Forest.

John Stephen Horvath
is an Australian medical doctor and the Chief Medical Officer of Australia between 2003 and 2009. Horvath is Deputy Chairman of Crown Resorts Limited.

Macaranga
trichocarpa is a species of Asian small trees in the family Euphorbiaceae and tribe Acalypheae, found especially in secondary tropical forests. No subspecies are listed in the Catalogue of Life and the recorded distribution includes Indo-China and western Malesia, including Borneo.

Waterhouse
is a rural locality in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of Scottsdale.

Vaovasamanaia Reginald Filipo
was a Samoan politician, Cabinet Minister, and Judge. He was the first Samoan appointed Chief Justice of Samoa.

Anita White
, known professionally as Lady A, is an American activist and vocalist in blues, soul, funk, and gospel music of more than 20 years. Born and raised in Seattle, Washington, she began singing at age 5 with her musical family, and her performance career began in the 1980s as a backup vocalist in a Motown revue band.

John de Clavering
, Lord of Clavering, was an English noble. John was the eldest son of Robert fitzRoger and Margaret de la Zouch.

Keisha Amiya McGuire
is an attorney and since April 2016, the Grenadian Permanent Representative to the United Nations. In 2020, she was re-elected to chair the Special Committee on Decolonisation.

Saanjo
is a writing script created by Ejaz Mahmood - ever first all out creation for Punjabi. Although there are some writing systems for Punjabi but they are work-out forms of other language scripts and compromise primary phonic of Punjabi language and adjustment lack strength.

West Scottsdale
is a rural locality in the local government area of Dorset in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about south-west of the town of Scottsdale.

Thalikkulanathar Temple
is a Hindu temple dedicated to the deity Shiva, located at Thanjavur in Thanjavur district, India. It is one of the shrines of the Vaippu Sthalams sung by Tamil Saivite Nayanar Appar.

Porphyrios Dikaios FSA
.

Nilandhoo Sports Club
, is a Maldivian football club in Nilandhoo, that competes in the Dhivehi Premier League, the highest tier of Maldivian football. Nilandhoo was promoted to Dhivehi Premier League as 2018 Minivan Championship semi finalists.

New York City
is home to the second-largest Taiwanese American population, after Los Angeles, California, enumerating an estimated 40,000 to 50,000 individuals as of 2020. The Flushing neighborhood of the borough of Queens in New York City, is one of the largest and fastest growing Taiwanese enclaves outside Asia.

Amy Joy Houtrow
is an American pediatrician and physical medicine and rehabilitation physician. She is the Endowed Professor in the Department of Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation at the University of Pittsburgh School of Medicine.

Cantharis
rustica is a species of soldier beetle found in Europe east to central Russia. In central Europe, the adult beetles appears between May and July.

Sur Piyasi Music Academy
is a music school in the district of Murshidabad in West Bengal was established by Pandit Soumendu Lahiri in 1994. This Academy, under the guidance of Pandit Somendu Lahiri offers training only in stringed instruments.

Danial Scott Crichton
is a Singaporean-Canadian footballer currently playing as a defender for Young Lions.

Vijaynagar Advanced Landing Ground
is an Indian Air Force airstrip located at Vijaynagar in Changlang district of Arunachal Pradesh, India. The airstrip was opened during 1962 Indo-China War and was in operation untill 2016 and then the runway was declared unfit and was takenup for resurfacing.

Veerateswarar Temple
is a Hindu temple located at Keelaparasalur in Mayiladuthurai district of Tamil Nadu, India. The historical name of the place is Tirupparialur.

Walong Advanced Landing Ground
is an Indian Air Force airstrip located at Walong in Anjaw District of Arunachal Pradesh, India. The airstrip was in operation during 1962 Indo-China War and was later abandoned.

Nath Valley
School is a co-educational high school located off Paithan Road in Aurangabad, Maharashtra. It is primarily a day school also has limited boarding facility for boys and girls in their campus.

Rohingya
refugees came to Nepal for asylum from Rakhine state of Myanmar. The Rohingyas entered Nepal in the 1990s and mainly in 2012.

Mohammed Tahir Monguno
is a Nigerian lawyer and member of the Federal House of Representatives, representing Marte-Monguno-Nganzai Federal Constituency of Borno State, Nigeria. He is currently the majority chief Whip of the 9th House of Representatives.

Lucullus
is a 1969 Australian television play. It aired 5 April 1969 in Melbourne and 7 April in Sydney and was produced in Sydney for Easter.

Robert Gallegos
is a Texas politician that currently represents District I on the Houston City Council. He is the first openly gay Latino city councilor in Texas history.

Josifovo
is a village in the municipality of Valandovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 1730 inhabitants.

Anastasios Vatistas
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Chit Ya Par Thaw Nway
is a 2019 Burmese drama television series. It is a story of Mandalay University.

Pirava
is a village in the municipality of Valandovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 1844 inhabitants.

Sikta Irrigation Project
is one of the National Pride Projects of Nepal. The intake is in the Rapti river in western Nepal.

Johannes Menke
is a German music theorist, University lecturer and composer. Born in Nuremberg, Menke studied oboe, school music and German language and literature in Freiburg im Breisgau, then music theory with Eckehard Kiem and musical composition with Mathias Spahlinger.

Balinci
is a village in the municipality of Valandovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 328 inhabitants.

Brajkovci
is a village in the municipality of Valandovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 437 inhabitants.

National Pride Projects
are a set of infrastructure projects by the government of Nepal based on the proposal by the National Planning Commission.

Srinagar
an upcoming Hindi film written and directed by Sanoj Mishra. The film is based on the Kashmiri Pandit and Article 370.

Chadrel Rinpoche
, is a Gelug lama of Tibetan Buddhism. In 1954, he joined the Tashilhunpo Monastery at the age of 15.

Richard Alan Smallwood
is an Australian doctor and Chief Medical Officer of Australia between 1999 and 2003. Smallwood graduated from University of Melbourne with a Bachelor of Medicine, Bachelor of Surgery in 1960 and Doctor of Medicine in 1964.

Dedeli
is a village in the municipality of Valandovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 220 inhabitants.

John Engaine
, Lord of Laxton, was an English noble. John was a son of John Engaine and Joan Greinville.

Indira Maira Alfonzo Izaguirre
by the TSJ, to organize 2020 Venezuelan parliamentary election.

Rabrovo
is a village in the municipality of Valandovo, North Macedonia. It is located just east of Valandovo town.

Sobri
is a village in the municipality of Valandovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 225 inhabitants.

Prsten
is a village in the municipality of Valandovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 68 inhabitants.

Kazandol
is a village in the municipality of Valandovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 147 inhabitants.

Gibberula ros
is a species of very small sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk or micromollusk in the family Cystiscidae.

Saint Joseph Catholic Academy
was a private Catholic elementary school, located in Brookfield, Connecticut, and served Pre-K through Eighth Grade. Opened in 1958, it closed in June of 2020 due to a steady decline in enrollment.

Qasr Usaykhim
, also known as Akkham, which is the intensity of blackness, is a fortress built by the Nabateans to monitor the route of their commercial caravans from the southern Arabian Peninsula to the Levant. It was inherited and used by the Romans, and it is on the top of a high hill northeast of the town of Azraq, about 18 km, overlooking the valleys where the water runs in the rainy seasons and the planting grows.

Abok Ayuba
is a Nigerian politician who was elected speaker of the 9th Plateau State House of Assembly in 2019. Ayuba was a first-time member of the Assembly elected from Jos East Constituency on the platform of All Progressives Congress in 2019.

Nizhnyaya Vereyka
in Sklyayevskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 108 as of 2010.

Bukhwamba
is a village in Funyula sub county bordering Uganda.

Olkhovatka
in Sklyayevskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 91 as of 2010.

Somovo
and the administrative center of Somovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 547 as of 2010.

Aslampur
is a union territory of Char Fasson Upazila in Bhola district in Bangladesh. It is the second largest union in Char Fasson.

Bolshaya Treshchevka
in Somovskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 66 as of 2010.

Stupino
and the administrative center of Stupinskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 605 as of 2010.

Nelzha
in Stupinskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 284 as of 2010.

Abdullahi Bawa Wuse
to represent Tafa constituency.

Fabio Turchi
is an Italian professional boxer who held the WBC International cruiserweight title in 2019. As an amateur he won a gold medal at the 2013 Mediterranean Games, silver at the 2010 Youth Olympics and 2014 World Military Championships, and bronze at the 2010 Youth World Championships.

Pchelniki
in Stupinskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 56 as of 2010.

Salim Touahri
. Touahri amassed a professional mixed martial arts record of 10-1 by fighting mainly within the Polish regional MMA circuit as well as once within Russia before signing for the UFC in October 2017.

Chistaya Polyana
and the administrative center of Chistopolyanskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 499 as of 2010.

Ahmed Mohammed Marafa
is a Nigerian politician who was elected spearker of the 8 Niger State House of Assembly in 2015. Marafa was elected to the state assembly from Chanchaga on the platform of All Progressives Congress.

Treshchevka
in Chistopolyanskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 77 as of 2010.

Yamnoye
and the administrative center of Yamenskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 2,309 as of 2010.

Sretenovo
is a village in the municipality of Dojran, North Macedonia. It is located on the south shores of Doiran Lake, near the Greek border.

Novopodkletnoye
in Yamenskoye Rural Settlement, Ramonsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 493 as of 2010.

Butyrki
and the administrative center of Butyrskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,103 as of 2010.

Harshani Mahadoo
, is a Mauritian radio jockey based in Mauritius. She is best known as the host of Wazaa FM.

Korneyevka
in Butyrskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 67 as of 2010.

Krestyansky
in Butyrskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 54 as of 2010.

Serdyuki
in Butyrskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 79 as of 2010.

Kolbino
and the administrative center of Kolbinskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 635 as of 2010.

Kurtamzali
is a village in the municipality of Dojran, North Macedonia. It is located close to the Greek border.

BigRentz
is an equipment rental company based in the California, United States. The company operates as an online marketplace for heavy equipment rentals.

Prilepy
in Kolbinskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 381 as of 2010.

Sasovka
1-ya in Kolbinskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 61 as of 2010.

Sasovka
2-ya in Kolbinskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 64 as of 2010.

Krasnolipye
and the administrative center of Krasnolipyevskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 1,539 as of 2010.

Novosoldatka
and the administrative center of Novosoldatskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 849 as of 2010.

Priluzhny
in Osadchevskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 195 as of 2010.

Platava
and the administrative center of Platavskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 972 as of 2010.

Drakino
in Repyovskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 131 as of 2010.

Rossosh
and the administrative center of Rossoshanskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 858 as of 2010.

Odintsovka
in Rossoshanskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 340 as of 2010.

Rossoshki
and the administrative center of Rossoshkinskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 540 as of 2010.

Antonios Bonas
is a Greek sailor. He competed at the 1972 Summer Olympics and the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Khristos Bonas
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Ust-Muravlyanka
and the administrative center of Skoritskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 858 as of 2010.

Skoritskoye
in Skoritskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 125 as of 2010.

Ahmed Abdul Basith
is an Indian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Fabritskoye
in Skoritskoye Rural Settlement, Repyovsky District, Voronezh Oblast, Russia. The population was 222 as of 2010.

L. W. Peck House
is a residence in Eagleville, Ohio, Ashtabula County. It is listed on the National Register of Historic Places.

David Farfan
was a Trinidad and Tobago sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Gigi Marga
was a Romanian singer. In the 1980s she emigrated to the United States.

Bill Steele
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Isabelle F. Picco
is a Monegasque diplomat, peace activist and lawyer. Since September 2009, she has been the permanent representative of Monaco at the United Nations.

Maria Sanda Zukogi
is a Nigerian judge who was the fifth Chief Judge of Niger State and the second female to hold the office since its creation in 1976. Her appointment as substantive chief Judge of Niger State by Governor Abubakar Sani Bello was confirmed by the Niger State House of Assembly in August 2016 after holding the office in acting capacity for three months.

Yogendra M. Gupta
is an Indian-American physicist. He is a Regents Professor in the Department of Physics and Astronomy at Washington State University.

Jan-Luca Rumpf
is a German footballer who plays as a centre-back for SC Paderborn. Rumpf made his professional debut for SC Paderborn in the Bundesliga on 13 June 2020, starting in the home match against Werder Bremen.

Scott Allan
is an American sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Tim Stearn
is an American sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Krzysztof Szymczak
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Super Rugby AU
is a rugby union competition organised by Rugby Australia. The competition will supplant the 2020 Super Rugby season, which had been suspended in March due to the COVID-19 pandemic.

Zbigniew Kania
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Sacred Heart Church
is an historic church building in Portland, Maine owned by the Roman Catholic Diocese of Portland. Built between 18961915, it was designed in the Renaissance Revival style by architects Francis H. Fassett and Edward F. Fassett.

Jean Degaudenzi
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Luc Argand
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Akira Yamamura
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Takashi Yamamura
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Kurt Seidl
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Ernst Seidl
is an Austrian sailor. He competed at the 1972 Summer Olympics and the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Al-Mudawara Castle
, or Jagiman Castle, is a desert castle located near the Jordanian village of Al-Mudawara, opposite the Saudi border. Away from Amman about 350 km and from the Jordanian-Saudi border about 15 km.

Don Andrews
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Sara B. Hill
was an American bookplate designer, and a charter member of the American Society of Bookplate Designers and Collectors. Hill was born in Connecticut.

Umm Al-Sarab
is a residential area located in the Northwestern Badia District, Mafraq Governorate, Jordan. The region belongs to the northwestern Badia district, which includes 15 districts.

Ulf Nilsson
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1972 Summer Olympics.

Jock Bilger
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed at the 1972 Summer Olympics and the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Valery Zubanov
is a Soviet sailor. He competed at the 1972 Summer Olympics, the 1976 Summer Olympics, and the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Rajavardan
is a South Indian film Actor, who predominantly works in Kannada Film industry. He was an active theater artist before venturing into the Kannada film industry.

Jack Samuel Bateson
is an English professional boxer. As an amateur he won a gold medal at the 2011 Commonwealth Youth Games and bronze at the 2013 European Championships.

Walter Beling
who became a resistance activist during the Hitler years. He was released from prison, possibly due to an administrative error, in 1936 and fled the country.

Landon Montel Turner
is an American former basketball player. He played college basketball for the Indiana Hoosiers and won an NCAA championship as a junior in 1981.

Henry L. Shrewsbury
was an American teacher and Reconstruction era state legislator in South Carolina. He was described as a free mullato, and represented Chesterfield County in the South Carolina House of Representatives from 1868 until 1870.

Ann-Mari Tollefsen-Amundsen
is a Norwegian former long track speed skater, who was active in the 1970s and 1980s. Tollefsen represented her nation at the World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women in 1979, finishing 25th overall and in 1981, finishing 20th overall.

Lee Sung-yoon
is a Korean footballer currently playing as a midfielder for Jeonbuk Hyundai Motors.

Hannah J. Joyce
is an Australian scientist and engineer, and a lecturer at the Department of Engineering at the University of Cambridge. Her research specialises in the development of new nanomaterials for applications in optoelectronics and energy harvesting.

Mary Galentine Fenner
was an American poet and litterateur. Mary Galentine was born in Rush, New York, May 17, 1839.

Ilemba Island
is an island in Lake Victoria. Administratively it belongs to Kenya.

Mageta Island
is an island in Kenya on Lake Victoria. It is located in the administrative area of Siaya County in the western part of the country, 300 km west of the capital Nairobi.

Ali Naghi oglu Naghiyev
.

Seemanpillai Mudaliar Anantham
was a Ceylon Tamil proctor, politician and member of the State Council of Ceylon. Anantham was an unofficial magistrate.

Polygala
irregularis is a plant species in the family Polygalaceae. It is a perennial herb with a height up to , though the average ranges from . It produces lilac to reddish-brown flowers.

Ratnasabapathy Sri Pathmanathan
was a Ceylon Tamil barrister-at-law, politician and member of the State Council of Ceylon. Sri Pathmanathan was the nephew of P.

Kiringiti Island
is the name given to an island in Lake Victoria. Administratively, it belongs to Kenya.

Barbara Fedida
is the Senior Vice President for Talent and Business of ABC News. She is currently on administrative leave from the position pending a conduct investigation by ABC News.

Abubakarpur
is a union territory of Char Fasson Upazila in Bhola district in Bangladesh. The area of Abubakarpur Union is 10,108 acres.

Sumba Island
is an island in Kenya in Lake Victoria. It is located in the administrative area of Busia County in the western part of the country, 400 km west of the capital Nairobi.

Stockholm Municipality
is one of the 29 multi-member constituencies of the Riksdag, the national legislature of Sweden. The constituency was established in 1970 when the Riksdag changed from a bicameral legislature to an unicameral legislature.

Hmway Thet
is a Burmese model and beauty pageant title holder who was the first runner-up of the Miss Universe Myanmar 2019.She was crowned Miss Grand Myanmar 2019 and represented Myanmar at the Miss Grand International 2019. Hmway Thet was born on 9 August 1994 in Myeik, Tanintharyi Region , Myanmar.

Juan Firpo
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Abdullahpur
is a union territory of Char Fasson Upazila in Bhola district in Bangladesh. The area of Abdullahpur Union is 7,865 acres.

Michael Russell
is a Bahamian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Myerscough
is a hamlet and former civil parish on the River Brock, from Lancaster, now in the parish of Myerscough and Bilsborrow, in the Wyre district, in the county of Lancashire, England. In 2001 it has a population of 1111.

Einstein
and Einstein, who struggles with her parents after her dog runs away.

Ryszard Blaszka
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Chaolin Temple
is a temple located in Silin Village, Chaozhou Township, Pingtung County, Taiwan. Chaolin Temple traces its history to the 1850s, when a farmer surnamed Chen sought to donate his land and construct a temple to Nezha.

Oscar Enrique Paris Mancilla
is a Chilean physician and politician currently serving as Minister of Health.

Jorkanden
is a 6,473-metre Himalayan peak in the Indian state of Himachal Pradesh. It is the highest peak in the Kinner Kailash range of the Greater Himalayas.

David Howlett
is a British sailor. He competed at the 1976 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Giovinella Gonthier
was a teacher, concierge, diplomat, author, and consultant. Gonthier was born in Dar es Salaam, Tanganyika to parents originally from the Seychelles.

Polygala
filicaulis is a species of plant in the family Polygalaceae. It is endemic to costal swamps with altitudes below in Madagascar.

Ganesh Parbat
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India.The elevation of Ganesh Parbat is and its prominence is . It is 80th joint highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Katherine Towle Knox
. Knox joined LAW in 1893 at a time when few women were members.

Lockdown Island
is the first Mauritian TV reality show. Around 18 participants, which en globes influencers, sportsmen, singers among other popular personalities will be locked up, showing the lifestyle of the housemates during their stay in a villa for around twenty days.

Sunday Journal
is a Burmese entertainment newspaper, based in Yangon, Myanmar that was launched in February, 2012 as a print media. The Journal is one of the five most popular entertainment journals in Myanmar.

K. P. A. Majeed
is an Indian politican and social worker who served as the Member of the Kerala state Legislative Assembly from Mankada between 1980 and 2001. He is the current Kerala state General Secretary of Indian Union Muslim League.

Rhopalum
coarctatum is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Spirasi
is the Irish national independent centre for the rehabilitation of victims of torture. Spirasi, the Spiritan Asylum Services Initiative, was founded in 1999 as an English language centre by the Congregation of the Holy Spirit.

Spilomena
troglodytes is a Palearctic species of solitary wasp.

Valley Plaza
was a shopping center in North Hollywood, Los Angeles, one of the first in the San Fernando Valley, opened in 1951. In the mid-1950s it claimed to be the largest shopping center on the West Coast of the United States and the third-largest in the country.

Julia Mejia
is an At-Large City Councilor in Boston, Massachusetts. Elected in 2019, Mejia is the first Latina elected to the Council..

Gorno Konjari
is a village in the municipality of Petrovec, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 237 inhabitants.

Amatlain Elizabeth Kabua
is an Ambassador, teacher and politician. She is the Permanent Representative of the Marshall Islands to the United Nations.

Stephanie Neuman
was an American political scientist specializing in international relations, comparative foreign policy, the international arms trade and Third World security. She was born on October 30, 1931 in New York City and died on April 15, 2020 in New York City.

Friedrich E. Wagner
of magnetic confinement in fusion plasmas while working at the ASDEX tokamak in 1982.

Marcia Lynn Gumpertz
is an American statistician known for her research on agricultural statistics, spatial analysis, the design of experiments, and plant disease epidemiology. She has also studied employment issues for women and members of underrepresented minorities in science and technology.

Seth Everman
is a Swedish YouTuber, social media personality, and musician, best known for making comedic piano videos and parodies, often maintaining a straight face in a deadpan manner. He has a vast following accross multiple social media platforms including Twitter, Tumblr and Instagram, and is one of the most subscribed YouTubers in Sweden.

Oliver Cooper
is an English Conservative politician. He is the Leader of the party on Camden London Borough Council representing Hampstead Town.

Indonesia
competed at the World Games 2017 in Wroclaw, Poland, from 20 July 2017 to 30 July 2017. Indonesia has qualified at the 2017 World Games 1 athlete.

Chalton Street
is a street in the Somers Town neighbourhood of London, England. Chalton Street is over a kilometre long and stretches from Euston Road to almost Camden Town, before taking a hard right turn and terminating at St Pancras Hospital.

Nathaniel Robert Hinton
is an American basketball player. He played college basketball for the Houston Cougars.

Anuoluwapo Juwon Opeyori
is a Nigerian badminton player. He won the African Championships and African Games in singles event in 2019.

Michigan RFC
is an American rugby team based in Ann Arbor, Michigan. The team plays in the Midwest Conference of the USA Rugby Division III.

Olajide Williams
is an American neurologist and the founder of Hip-Hop Public Health. He is Chief of Staff and Associate Professor of Neurology at Columbia University.

Shamim Tariq
is an Indian scholar and columnist. He is the Director of the Karimi Library at Anjuman-i-Islam.

Steven Bakken
is an American politician and radio host. He serves as the mayor of Bismarck, North Dakota.

James Goldston
is a British American journalist, media executive, and current President of ABC News. Goldston grew up in Heston, a suburb in Hounslow, West London.

Sombrero Lighthouse
is a lighthouse that marks the Anegada Passage, which is the route from Europe into the Caribbean. The lighthouse is located near the centre of Sombrero island, and reaches a height of almost above sea level.

Manekia
is a genus of flowering plants in the family Piperaceae. It is distributed across disjunct areas in the southern Atlantics Forests of Brazil, the Guiana shield in Venezuela, the Andean regions of Colombia, Ecuador and Peru, the Caribbean coast of Nicaragua, Costa Rica and Panama, and the Greater and Lesser Antilles.

Rhodes
is a village about 8 miles from Manchester, in the unparished area of Middleton, in the Rochdale district, in the county of Greater Manchester, England. In 2018 it had an estimated population of 2917.

Shantir Rani Church
is a pro cathedral church situated in Mariam Nagar, Agartala, India. Church serves as a parish church for the Shantir Rani parish in the Roman Catholic diocese of Agartala.

Alwaeira Fort
is the remains of a Crusader fort located in Wadi Musa in Jordan, 1 km north of the main entrance to Petra. It is about 34 km south of Al-Shoubak.

Daniel M. Grissom
was an American journalist of the 19th Century. Grissom, who was born in Daviess County, Kentucky, was the son of Alfred Grissom, a tailor, and Abrilla or Adaline Pittman.

Felipe Colares
. Colares compiled an undefeated MMA record of 8-0 fighting within the Brazilian regional MMA circuit culminating with his win of the Jungle Fight featherweight title before signing for UFC in January 2019.

Turnera
panamensis is a species of flowering plant in the passionflower family. It is native to Central America and Northwestern Colombia.

Antioch Colony
is an unincorporated community in Hays County, Texas on Old Black Colony Road between Farm roads 967 and 1626, northwest of Buda, TX. Antioch Colony was founded by former slaves in 1870.

Vatasha
is a village in the municipality of Kavadarci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 3502 inhabitants.

Mack van den Eerenbeemt
is a Aruban sailor. He placed 14th in the techno event at the 2014 Summer Youth Olympics in Nanjing, China.

Halley H. Prosser
was a Michigan politician. Halley H. Prosser was born on March 13, 1870 in Lansing, Michigan.

The Dream
is the second studio album by American country musician Hailey Whitters. It was released on February 28, 2020 under her own label, Pigasus Records.

Mariska Halinda
is an Indonesian taekwondo practitioner. She is a two-time gold medalist at the Southeast Asian Games.

Simpsonotus
is an extinct genus of notoungulate mammals in the family Henricosborniidae from the Middle to Late Paleocene of South America. Fossils of the genus have been found in the Mealla Formation, a fluvial and lacustrine sedimentary unit of the Salta Basin in northwestern Argentina.

Ekincan Arslan
, better known by his stage name Sansar Salvo is a Turkish rapper and songwriter.

Artex Film
is an Italian film production and distribution company founded in 2017. The company catalogue counts over 100 movies between short and feature films.

Jean Peck Krisch
is an American theoretical cosmologist and astrophysicist whose research concerns the theory of general relativity and the behavior of relativistic stars. She is Arthur F. Thurnau Professor Emerita of Physics at the University of Michigan.

Frontier Justice
is a 1935 black-and-white Western film directed by Robert F. McGowan starring Hoot Gibson based on the novel by Colonel George Brydges Rodney.

Reagan Charleston
is an American jewelry designer, lawyer and reality television personality known for appearing on Southern Charm New Orleans. Reagan Charleston was born and raised in Mandeville, Louisiana, and is of Louisiana Creole descent.

Char Madraj
is a union territory of Char Fasson Upazila in Bhola district in Bangladesh. The area of Char Madraj Union is 11,144 acres.

Nile
is a rural locality in the local government area of Northern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south-west of the town of Longford.

Susan Davis Allen
is an American engineering professor and academic administrator. She is currently Associate Dean of Research for the College of Engineering and Distinguished Professor of Mechanical Engineering at Embry-Riddle Aeronautical University.

Jean-Pierre Le Ridant
is a French politician and administrative framework. He is member of the Union for a Popular Movement party.

Diego Coletti
is an Italian prelate of the Catholic Church who was rector of the Pontifical Lombard Seminary from 1989 to 2000, Bishop of Livorno from 2001 to 2006, and Bishop of Como from 2007 to 2016. Diego Coletti was born on 25 September 1941 in Milan.

Oteha
is an Auckland suburb, which is under local governance of Auckland Council. The area is defined by Oteha Valley Road on the north, East Coast Road on the east, Spencer Road on the south, and the Auckland Northern Motorway on the west.

Aminabad
is a union territory of Char Fasson Upazila in Bhola district in Bangladesh. The area of Aminabad Union is 6,145 acres.

Change of Heart
is a 1993 Canadian-British family road movie directed and co-produced by Donald Shebib, based on a story by himself and Terence Heffernan. The film stars newcomer Sarah Campbell Jeremy Ratchford, and veteran Canadian actors Barbara Hamilton and Heath Lamberts.

Frederick Gerhard Becker
was an American printmaker and educator. Becker was born on August 5, 1913 in Oakland, California.

Utah
state elections in 2020 will be held on Tuesday, November 3, 2020. Aside from its presidential primaries held on March 3, its primary elections will be held on June 30, 2020.

Adolf Georg Heinrich Klemens Vinzenz Baeumker
was a German officer. From the 1920s to the 1950s, he was an official of various military and civil aviation research institutions.

Gaius Valerius Paullinus
was a Roman senator, who was active during the reign of Trajan. He is best known as a friend of Pliny the Younger, having received a number of letters from Pliny.

Seton Falls Park
is a wooded area in the Edenwald area of The Bronx, New York City. The park is named after the Seton family, who owned the land in the 19th century.

Ayub bin Jamil
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Johor State Executive Councillor.

Zowey
also known as Dzowey, Adarkwa is a Ghanaian snack which is cooked by a proportionate mixture of peanut paste, sugar, salt,water,ginger and powdered maize flour. In preparing zowey you need to firstly mix your ingredient such as sugar, salt, powdered pepper and ginger using a mixer, after that you mix the ingredient with the powdered maize flour, then you add it to the peanut paste and mix with your hand thoroughly.

Anne Lyon Haight
was an American author, essayist, and collector of rare books and artifacts. She was born Anne Pardee Lyon in St. Paul, Minnesota, on May 11, 1891, and was educated at the Masters School in Dobbs Ferry, New York.

Klidson Abreu
. Abreu compiled a professional mixed martial arts record of 14-2 fighting within the Brazilian regional MMA circuit as well as in Paraguay, United Arab Emirates and Russia for over 7 years winning various regional MMA titles before signing for UFC in January 2019.

Pyotr Valerievich Dubrov
is a Russian engineer and cosmonaut selected by Roscosmos in 2012. Dubrov was born on 30 January 1978 in Khabarovsk, Russia.

Polygala
nyikensis is a plant species in the family Polygalaceae. It is endemic to grasslands at altitudes between in Malawi, Tanzania, and Zambia.

Madame Herbault
. Madame Herbault was an established fashion designer during the First Empire, when she was the most fashionable milliner in Paris, and she continued to enjoy a fashionable career during the Bourbon Restoration and the July Monarchy.

Tekaotiki Matapo
is a former Cook Islands politician, Cabinet Minister, and diplomat. He is currently president of the Cook Islands Party.

Zaiton binti Ismail
is a Malaysian politicianhe is the current Member of the Johor State Legislative Assembly for Sungai Balang since 2013 and currently also serves as Johor State Executive Councillor. Zaiton is a member of the United Malays National Organisation coalition.

Merete Balling-Stockmann
is a Danish former professional tennis player. Balling-Stockmann is the daughter of tennis player Pia Balling, who was a five-time Danish national singles champion in the 1960s.

Yevgeny Savvich Ptukhin
was a Soviet Air Force officer who held a variety of commands during the Russian Civil War, the Spanish Civil War, and the Winter War before his downfall shortly after the German invasion of the Soviet Union. Arrested along with many other veterans of the Spanish Civil War on fabricated charges of being in an anti-Soviet conspiracy, he was eventually declared guilty of treason and shot without trial on orders of Lavrenty Beria in February 1942.

Peter Barrow
, the youngest son of Sir John Barrow, 1st Baronet, was an early settler in the colony of Western Australia, becoming a magistrate and Guardian of Aborigines, Anglican priest and school teacher in York. He left the colony after only 2 years and became a British Consul.

Curio
articulatus, syn. Senecio articulatus, which is also known as candle plant, pickle plant and hot dog cactus, is a deciduous succulent plant that is native to South Africa.

Schnapper Rock
is an Auckland suburb, which is under local governance of Auckland Council. North Shore Memorial Park was developed in 1973.

El Jannah
is an Australian family owned fast food restaurant chain that specialises in Lebanese food. El Jannah is particularly well known for their main menu item of charcoal grilled Lebanese style chicken and their accompanying garlic sauce or toum.

Curio
herreanus, syn. Senecio herreanus, which is also known as string of watermelons, string of beads, gooseberry plant and string of raindrops, is a flowering succulent plant in the daisy family Asteraceae that is native to South Africa.

Born Again
is a 2020 South Korean television series starring Jang Ki-yong, Jin Se-yeon and Lee Soo-hyuk. It tells the story of two men and one woman who become involved in the 1980s and again in the present day through reincarnation and fate.

Go-Kan-Ryu Karate
is a style of karate that was founded in Australia by Robert Sullivan in 1984 GKR host their own annual world wide championship

Curio
talinoides, syn. Senecio mandraliscae, also known as blue straws, blue chalksticks, dassieharpuis, or narrow-leaf chalk sticks, is a succulent plant of the sunflower family that is native to South Africa.

Eva Lena Daun
is a Swedish former professional tennis player who competed under her maiden name, Eva Lena Olsson. Olsson twice made WTA Tour main draw appearances as a doubles player, at the 1988 Swedish Open and 1990 Estoril Open.

Long Beach Towne Center
is a large power center in northeastern Long Beach, California at Carson St. and the I-605, with of retail space on a site. It is the largest shopping center in Long Beach.

Matunga
is a suburb of Mumbai, next to Dadar.

Jackson Park
is a municipal park in Alameda, California that is located one block off of the Park Street business district. The park was established in 1895.

Diana Glen Horvath
is an Australian medical doctor, researcher and administrator and the first female chair of the National Health and Medical Research Council. Horvath graduated from the University of Sydney with a Bachelor of Medicine, Bachelor of Surgery in 1968.

Samsolbari bin Jamali
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Johor State Executive Councillor.

Hilal Elver
is a member of the Academic Council of the UN Least Developed Countries and has been the United Nations Special Rapporteur on the Right to Food since 2014. She is also a research professor at UC Santa Barbara and Global Distinguished Fellow at the Resnick Food Law and Policy Center UCLA Law School.

Sabina Jeyasingham
, known professionally as Sabby Jey, is a New Zealand born, Sri Lankan Tamil actress and model. She is a professional Model and an actress in New Zealand and Tamil Nadu, India In addition to modeling and acting, Sabby Jey also known as a entrepreneur, She is prominent for her work in Tamil Cinema and for her Tamil Film debut Karthikeyanum Kaanamal Pona Kadhileyum in 2018 alongside star Pandi and Jangiri Madhumitha.

Robyn Anne Owens
is an Australian applied mathematician and computer scientist known for her research in computer vision and face recognition, and on the non-invasive imaging of lactation. Formerly a professor at the University of Western Australia and the deputy vice-chancellor for research at UWA, she retired in 2019, and remains affiliated with UWA as a professorial fellow.

Maya Awards
, is an annual entertainment award presented by Maya Channel Magazine in Thailand. The awards honor people in the Thai entertainment industry and their achievements in the music, film, television and drama.

Yang Kyung-sook
is a South Korean politician currently serving as a Democratic member of National Assembly. In 2020 general election, she was placed as the number 17 on the proportional representation list for Platform Party, a sister party of Democratic Party.

Stephen Peak
is a mountain summit located within Olympic National Park in Jefferson County of Washington state. Stephen Peak is the fifth-highest peak in the Bailey Range, which is a subrange of the Olympic Mountains.

Thomas Monheim
is a career intelligence officer who is the acting inspector general of the United States intelligence community in the Trump administration. He previously served as general counsel of the National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency.

Lyra
is an Irish singer, songwriter and multi-instrumentalist. Lyra grew up in Bandon, Cork.

Mariya Agapova
.

Wolf-Dieter Hauschild
, is a German conductor, choirmaster, artistic director, composer, harpsichordist and university lecturer. After working for the Berliner Rundfunk from 1971, he was principal conductor of the MDR Leipzig Radio Symphony Orchestra and the Rundfunkchor Leipzig from 1978 to 1985.

Onn Hafiz bin Ghazi
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Johor State Executive Councillor.

Powranna
is a rural locality in the local government area of Northern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south-east of the town of Longford.

Belagavi Rural Vidhan Sabha Seat
is one of 224 assembly constituencies in Karnataka state, in India. It is one of the 8 constituencies which make up Belagavi.

Veerateeswarar Temple
is a Hindu temple located at Korukkai in Mayiladuthurai district of Tamil Nadu, India. The presiding deity is Shiva in the form of Veerateswarar and his consort is known as Gnanambigai.

Ayigbe Biscuit
is a Ghanaian snack created by Yonunawo Kwami Edze from Agbozume in the Volta Region. The biscuit was discovered or manufactured by Yonkunawo Kwai Edze from Agbozome in the Volta Region.

Yoo Jung-ju
and previously led the Korea Animation Industry Association.

Chong Fat Full
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Johor State Executive Councillor.

Curio
citriformis, syn. Senecio citriformisis, also known as string of tears, is a trailing succulent plant in the sunflower family native to South Africa that grows in rocky outcrops in clay soils.

Kube Cake
, also known as Kube Toffee, is a Ghanaian locally made candy. Ingredients used in preparation include Coconut, Sugar, Water and Lemon Juice.

Dimitrios Gerontaris
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Gerry Kirkconnell
is a Caymanian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Anja Reinke
is a former politician from California. Reinke is a lawyer, businesswoman, and former mayor of Burbank, California.

Peter Milburn
is a Caymanian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Moon Jeong-bog
twice from 2012 to 2017.

Juan Maegli
is a Guatemalan sailor. He competed at the 1976 Summer Olympics, the 1980 Summer Olympics, and the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Miguel Casellas
is a Puerto Rican sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Damrong Sirisakorn
is a Thai sailor. He started sailing when he joined the Navy around age 21, and first competed at the 1975 SEAP Games, where he won a gold medal.

Santi Thamasucharit
is a Thai sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Robert Dix
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Andras de Lisocky
is a Colombian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Beatriz de Lisocky
is a Colombian sailor. She competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Vincenza Procacci
is an American former professional tennis player. Raised in Lake George, New York, Procacci won five ITF doubles titles on the professional tour and featured in the doubles main draw of the 1989 Lipton International Players Championships, a WTA Tour tournament in Key Biscayne.

Norman Buttigieg
is a Maltese former footballer who played as a sweeper. At the club level he played primarily with Hibernians in the 1970s and 1980s, winning three league titles at the club.

Linda Palle
is a Swedish former long track speed skater, who was active in the 1970s and 1980s. Palle represented her nation three timeas at the World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women.

Wu Jie Ming Kiat Goh
is a Singaporean singer-songwriter and a classically trained vocalist. Kiat was born in Singapore on 5 Septmber 1979.

Joaquim Ramada
is a Portuguese sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Lars Johansson
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Carl Winters
is a Belgian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Peter Winters
is a Belgian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Mikko Brummer
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Rudi Biaudet
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Larry Lindo
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Jay Cross
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Clypeolampadidae
is a family of sea urchins belonging to the order Clypeasteroida. This family is known in Cretaceous the fossil record of France, Oman, Spain and Turkey.

Hans Petter Jensen
is a Norwegian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Clypeolampas
is a genus of sea urchins belonging to the order Clypeasteroida. This family is known in Cretaceous the fossil record of Spain and Turkey.

Morten Jensen
is a Norwegian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Anton Anno
was a German theatre actor, theatre director, and playwright. Anton Anno was the son of a theatre attendant.

Manilla Shire
was a local government area in the New England region of New South Wales, Australia. Manilla Shire was proclaimed on 1 January 1960, created from the amalgamation of Mandowa Shire and the Municipality of Manilla.

Veerateeswarar Temple
is a Hindu temple located at Vazhuvur in Mayiladuthurai district of Tamil Nadu, India. The presiding deity is Shiva in the form of Veerateswarar and his consort is known as Bala Gujambigai.

Indonesian
noodles are a significant aspect of Indonesian cuisine which is very diverse. Indonesian cuisine recognised many types of noodles, with each regions often developed their distinct recipes.

Kirsten Dreyer
is an American former professional tennis player. Raised in Connecticut, Dreyer was the national 16 and under indoor champion in 1983 and started out on the professional tour the following year as a 15 year old.

Vozarci
is a village in the municipality of Kavadarci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 910 inhabitants.

Arisaema
speciosum is a species of flowering plant in the family Araceae, native to Nepal, , Assam, Tibet and south-central China.

Drenovo
is a village in the municipality of Kavadarci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 648 inhabitants.

Marena
is a village in the municipality of Kavadarci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 997 inhabitants.

Sopot
is a village in the municipality of Kavadarci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 804 inhabitants.

Zynn
is a Chinese video-sharing social networking service owned by Kuaishou, a Beijing-based internet technology company established in 2011 by Su Hua and Cheng Yixiao. It is used to create and share short videos, and it pays its users for using the app and referring others.

Anthony Bianchi
is a Japanese politician, who was a United States citizen with Italian descent and naturalized in Japan in 2002. He is a city councillor of Inuyama, Aichi, and the chairman of Inuyama City Council from 2017 to 2019.

Aarti Tikoo Singh
is an Indian journalist, who was born in Jammu and Kashmir and is known for being vocal on the Kashmir conflict. She is an alumnus of University of Jammu and did Masters in International Affairs fromColumbia University in New York City.

Siblyback Lake
is a reservoir on the edge of Bodmin Moor in Cornwall, England, UK. It is one of 12 areas in Cornwall designated as an Area of Outstanding Natural Beauty. and is managed by the South-West Lakes Trust.

Peter Martin Budd
is a British chemist and a Professor in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. His research in general is based on polymer chemistry, energy and industrial separations, specifically on the areas of Polymers of intrinsic microporosity, energy storage, polyelectrolytes and separation membranes.

Gibasis
geniculata, also known as Tahitian bridal veil, is a trailing plant in the family Commelinaceae that is native to the West Indies, southwest Texas, Argentina and Mexico. A creeping plant growing to 20cm or 50cm, it features thin stems and narrow green leaves that have a purple underside.

Rita Maria Pichardo
is a Cuban former professional tennis player. Pichardo, a five-time national champion, represented the Cuba Federation Cup team in 1991 and 1992.

Sam Wallace
is a British sports journalist. Since 2015 he has been the Chief Football Writer at the Daily and Sunday Telegraph.

A. H. Besterwitch
was an Indian politician and trade unionist. He belonged to the Revolutionary Socialist Party.

Veerateeswarar Temple
is a Hindu temple located at Thiruvirkudi in Mayiladuthurai district of Tamil Nadu, India. The presiding deity is Shiva in the form of Veerateswarar and his consort is known as Elavar Kuzhali.

Ivankovci
is a village in the municipality of Veles, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 857 inhabitants.

Mohammad Izhar bin Ahmad
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Johor State Executive Councillor.

Dolno Kalaslari
is a village in the municipality of Veles, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 446 inhabitants.

Han Jeong-ae
or Jeoung Ae Han is a South Korean politician and a three-term parliamentarian currently representing Gangseo District at the National Assembly and chairing its Health and Welfare Committee. After graduating from Pusan National University, she worked at Korea Occupational Safety and Health Agency.

Eyal Chowers
is a political theorist and publicist specializing in the study of modern and Israeli political thought. He is a senior faculty member in the Department of Political Science at Tel Aviv University.

Yoannis Montesino
is a Cuban former professional tennis player. Montesino appeared in 38 Federation Cup ties for Cuba, from 1992 to 2000, winning 21 singles and 22 doubles rubbers.

Llewella Gideon
is a British actress, comedian and writer. She has appeared in a number of comedy series, including The Real McCoy, The Crouches, and The Delivery Man, and provided the voices of several characters in Bob the Builder.

Am Kupfergraben
is the name of an almost 500 metre long street in the Berlin district Mitte of the district of the same name. It is located in the historic Dorotheenstadt district.

Otovica
is a village in the municipality of Veles, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 274 inhabitants.

Behaidohor
is a village in Bangladesh, located in Nij Bahadurpur Union, Barlekha Upazila, Maulvibazar District. The Behaidohor Hafijia Madrasha is a notable educational institution here.

Hylaeus
brevicornis is a Palearctic species of solitary bee.

Yang Yiwonyoung
or Yang Yi Wonyoung is a South Korean environmentalist currently serving as a Democratic member of National Assembly. Before entering politics, Yang has dedicated her career in civil societies - specifically environment movements.

Portugal
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won two silver medals and two bronze medals.

Mohd Solihan bin Badri
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Johor State Executive Councillor.

Hylaeus
communis is a Palearctic species of solitary bee.

Dalkhan Abdulazizovich Khozhaev
was a Chechen historian, field commander, brigadier general and author with numerous works on the centuries old confrontation between Chechnya and Russia, as well as the First Chechen War. He commanded a special brigade and was loyal to Ruslan Gelayev.

Cameron McGriff
. McGriff grew up mainly playing flag football.

Hylaeus
confusus is a Palearctic species of solitary bee.

Larutia
kecil is a species of skink found in Malaysia.

Tosrin bin Jarvanthi
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Johor State Executive Councillor.

Agino Selo
is a village in the municipality of Kumanovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 965 inhabitants.

Luiz Aydos
is a Brazilian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Marco Paradeda
is a Brazilian sailor. He competed at the 1976 Summer Olympics and the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Mitsushi Kuroda
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Nathalie Evans
was a co-founder of Twycross Zoo, Leicestershire and a conservationist with a particular interest in primates. She began her career as a dog breeder and pet shop owner before merging her business with that of rival Molly Badham.

Kodumbu Subramaniya Swamy Temple
is one of the oldest Murugan temple in Kerala region. It is located in the village of Kodumba in Palakkad district, southeast of Palakkad and southwest of Coimbatore in the valley of the Soka Nasini river, Kerala, India.

Larutia
larutensis, known as the black larut skink or Larut Hills larut skink, is a species of skink found in Malaysia.

Tom Whitehurst
is an American sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Robert Whitehurst
is an American sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Lee Soo-jin
is a South Korean labour activist-turned politician currently serving as a Democratic member of National Assembly. Before entering politics in 2012, Lee was a nurse and trade unionist.

Laurent Quellet
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Marjory Eva May Edwards
was a British V.A.D. nurse who served in the British Red Cross Society during the First World War. Edwards served for three and a half years in Britain and France and died of measles in England on 4 January 1918.

Jean-Claude Vuithier Sr.
is a Swiss sailor. He competed at the 1976 Summer Olympics and the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Joseph Isaac Gnanamuttu
was a Ceylon Tamil politician and member of the State Council of Ceylon. Gnanamuttu contested the 1943 State Council by-election as a candidate in Mannar-Mullaitivu and was elected to the State Council of Ceylon.

Larutia
miodactyla, the single finger larut skink or Titiwanga larut skink, is a species of skink found in Malaysia.

Bazle Ahmad
was an Indian politician and trade unionist, belonging to the Socialist Unity Centre of India. By the mid-1960, he served as president of the UTUC-affiliated Sahebganj Loop Rail Sramik Union.

Derek Clark
is a British sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Philip Crebbin
is a British sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Jaganathan Tyagaraja
was a Ceylon Tamil barrister, politician and member of the State Council of Ceylon. Tyagaraja was born on 18 October 1895.

Brett Bennett
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Mark Paterson
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Biljanovce
is a village in the municipality of Kumanovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 1231 inhabitants.

Larutia
nubisilvicola is a species of skink found in Thailand.

Thiagarajah
or Thiyagarajah is a Tamil male given name. Due to the Tamil tradition of using patronymic surnames it may also be a surname for males and females.

Can Bozdogan
is a German footballer who plays as a midfielder for Schalke 04. Bozdogan made his debut for Schalke 04 in the Bundesliga on 14 June 2020, starting in the home match against Bayer Leverkusen.

Andrena
angustior is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Vance Dixon
and band leader of Chicago jazz, who was considered a novelty musician. Vance Rayman Dixon was born on 6 August 1901 in Parkersburg, West Virginia, the son of Harrison and Belle Dixon.

Proevce
is a village in the municipality of Kumanovo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 2311 inhabitants.

Larutia
penangensis, known as the Penang Island larut skink, is a species of skink found in Malaysia.

Ruth S. Granniss
Granniss.

Rebecca Johnson
is a British peace activist and expert on nuclear disarmament. She is the director and founder of Acronym Institute for Disarmament Diplomacy as well as a co-founding strategist and organiser of the International Campaign to Abolish Nuclear Weapons.

Golam Mohiuddin
was an Indian politician. He represented the Nalhati constituency in the West Bengal Legislative Assembly 1967-1977, contesting elections on an independent ticket.

Prometheus School
is a co-educational school located in Noida, Uttar Pradesh. The school is following authorization as an IB World School.

Flore
was a 32-gun frigate of the French Navy, designed by Groignard. She is notable for her scientific voyage in 1771 and 1772, where she tested Marine chronometers made by Berthoud, an important step in the History of longitude.

North Korea
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal and one bronze medal.

Muharem Huskovic
is an Austrian footballer currently playing as a midfielder for Young Violets.

Andrena apicata
is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Martin Krizic
is an Austrian footballer currently playing as a midfielder for Dornbirn.

Taylor Anthony Booth
is an American soccer player who plays as a midfielder for Bayern Munich II. Booth joined the Bayern Munich youth team from the Real Salt Lake youth academy in January 2019.

Juan Villareal
is a Filipino sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Dan Morrison
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Jahurul Haque Sardar
is a politician from the Khulna District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Khulna-6. Sardar was elected to parliament from Khulna-6 as a independent candidate in 1988 Bangladeshi general election.

AU Ahmed Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Bagerhat-3 in February 1996.

Carl Auteried Jr
. is an Austrian sailor.

Ajnad Foundation for Media Production Foundation
of the Islamic State, established in January 2014. The foundation specializes in acoustics production from anasheed, quranic recitation.

Derek Jago
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

James Byrne
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Rissoella
verruculosa is a species of red algae, the only accepted species in the genus Risoella and the family Rissoellaceae. This species is endemic to the Mediterranean Sea.

Oliver Bundgaard Kristensen
is a Danish footballer currently playing as a midfielder for Randers.

Durg Gramin Vidhan Sabha
constituency is one of the 90 Vidhan Sabha constituencies of Chhattisgarh state in central India. It is part of Durg district.

Lorne Leibel
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Bethartoli South
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India.The elevation of Bethartoli South is and its prominence is . It is 117th highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Andrena
coitana is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Claes Thunbo Christensen
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Ittigen bei Bern
railway station, also known as Ittigen railway station, is a railway station in the municipality of Ittigen, in the Swiss canton of Bern. It is an intermediate stop on the gauge of Regionalverkehr Bern-Solothurn.

Finn Thunbo Christensen
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Tempest event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Larutia
puehensis, known as the Berumput two-toed skink, is a species of skink found in Malaysia.

Bolligen
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Bolligen, in the Swiss canton of Bern. It is an intermediate stop on the gauge of Regionalverkehr Bern-Solothurn.

New Zealand
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal and one bronze medal, both in athletics.

Sylvain Berrios
is a French politician. Berrios was born on 6 May 1968 in Maisons-Alfort.

MA Bari
is a politician from the Bagerhat District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Khulna-6. Bari was elected to parliament from Khulna-6 as a Awami League candidate in 1973 Bangladeshi general election.

Larutia
seribuatensis, known as the two-lined two-toed skink or Seribuat larut skink, is a species of skink found in Malaysia.

Deisswil
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Stettlen, in the Swiss canton of Bern. It is an intermediate stop on the gauge of Regionalverkehr Bern-Solothurn.

Larutia
sumatrensis is a species of skink found in Sumatra.

Stettlen
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Stettlen, in the Swiss canton of Bern. It is an intermediate stop on the gauge of Regionalverkehr Bern-Solothurn.

Staples Municipal Airport
is a city-owned public-use airport located two nautical miles above mean sea level.

Larutia trifasciata
, known as the three-banded larut skink, is a species of skink found in Malaysia.

Boll-Utzigen
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Vechigen, in the Swiss canton of Bern. It is an intermediate stop on the gauge of Regionalverkehr Bern-Solothurn.

Burnley Football Club
is an English professional association football club based in Burnley, Lancashire. Founded on 18 May 1882, the club was one of the first to become professional, putting pressure on The Football Association to allow professionalism.

Vechigen
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Vechigen, in the Swiss canton of Bern. It is an intermediate stop on the gauge of Regionalverkehr Bern-Solothurn.

Cameron Partridge
is an American Episcopal priest, chaplain, and a transgender activist. He was the first transgender priest to preach at the National Cathedral in Washington, D.C. Cameron Partridge was born in Berkeley, California, in 1973.

Worbboden
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Worb, in the Swiss canton of Bern. It is an intermediate stop on the gauge of Regionalverkehr Bern-Solothurn.

Worb Dorf
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Worb, in the Swiss canton of Bern. It is the eastern terminus of the gauge of Regionalverkehr Bern-Solothurn.

Gazi Wires Limited
is a Bangladesh government owned company that manufactures wiring, for example copper wires. It is a subsidiary of Bangladesh Steel and Engineering Corporation.

Loch Benachally
is a large shallow freshwater reservoir that is located close to the Forest of Clunie in Perth and Kinross, Scotland. The reservoir is operated by Scottish Water.

Edward Thomas
, Jr. is an American plasma physicist. The Charles W. Barkley Endowed Professor at Auburn University, he was elected a Fellow of the American Physical Society in 2015.

Legislative Assembly
elections were held in the Indian state of West Bengal on March 11, 1972. The election was the 4th assembly election in West Bengal within six years.

Robert Alan Goldberg
is an American historian. He teaches at the University of Utah and has written several books as well as articles and papers.

Elena Clare Johnson
is a badminton player from Guernsey who competed in the Island Games since 2001 and the Commonwealth Games five times. In 2010, Johnson attempted to find a doubles partner for the 2011 Island Games in Gayle Lloyd.

Charles Hatch Taylor
was a Michigan politician. Charles H. Taylor was born on November 20, 1813 in Cooperstown, New York to parents Elisha and Aurelia Taylor.

Carlson
grew up in East London, the son of Ken Carlson, who refereed the Durban test between the Springboks and Lions in 1962. After school he played provincial rugby for , , , and . In 1972 Carlson toured with the Gazelles, a South African under-24 team, to Argentina.

Avraham S. Rinat-Reiner
is a Dutch-Israeli theoretical physicist who worked as professor at the Weizmann Institute of Science. Rinat was born in Amsterdam.

Asbolus
is a genus of darkling beetle in the family Tenebrionidae.

Tyson Gregory Carter
is an American professional basketball player for Lavrio of the Greek Basket League. Carter played basketball for Starkville High School in Starkville, Mississippi, where his father served as the head coach.

Hillevi
is a Scandinavian version of the German name Helvig, originally Heilwig. The oldest record of a Swedish woman by the name Hillevi is from 1482.

British Chinese
cuisine refers to a style of Chinese cuisine developed by British Chinese in the United Kingdom, typically adapted to British tastes but increasingly inspired by authentic Cantonese dishes. It is considered a major part of British cuisine.

Andrena
nigroaenea is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Cindy R. Jebb
is a United States Army brigadier general who currently serves as the 14th Dean of the United States Military Academy. Jebb earned a MA in Political Science from Duke University in 1992.

Andrena
ovatula is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Mikhail Leonidovich Timonov
is a Russian politician. Deputy of the Moscow City Duma.

Andrena fucata
is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Saajher Pradip
is a 1955 Bengali film directed by Sudhangshu Mukherjee. This film written by Prabhabati Devi Saraswati.

Rodney Bryant
is an American law enforcement officer serving as Acting Chief of Police of Atlanta since June 13, 2020. Bryant earned a Bachelor of Science degree in criminal justice from Georgia State University and a Master of Science in administration from Central Michigan University.

Pure Grass
Films is a British independent production company that specialises in digital entertainment series, feature films and television series. Pure Grass Films was co-founded by Managing Director Ben Grass and Creative Director Tom Grass in May 2005.

Granby Hales Calcraft
. Calcraft was educated in Christ Church of Oxford University.

Andrena
haemorrhoa is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Alnnazir Gate
, the door of the council, the door of confinement, or the door of Michael, one of the doors of the Al-Aqsa Mosque, inside the walls of the Old City of Jerusalem. It is located in the Islamic Quarter in the western porch of Al-Aqsa Mosque.

Leonidas Stone School
is a school building which is part of the Colon Community Schools system in Northeastern St. Joseph County. The Leonidas Stone School is a work of art an embodiment of government work project during the Great Depression and a working school for over 8 decades.

Alqatanin Gate
is one of the doors of the Al-Aqsa Mosque, which is located on the western side of the Al-Aqsa Mosque Square. It is one of the important and beautiful main doors leading to the mosque.

Niall Reid-Stephen
is a Bajan international footballer.

Tracy Daszkiewicz
is a Deputy Director of Population Health and Wellbeing at Public Health England. She was formerly the Director of Public Health and Safety for the county of Wiltshire, England, where in 2018 she played a leading role in the response to the Novichok poisoning of Sergei and Yulia Skripal in Salisbury.

Jesse Draxler
is an American visual artist, illustrator and art director. Jesse Draxler grew up in a rural town in Wisconsin.

James Paul Bouley
is an American politician. He serves as the mayor of Concord, New Hampshire.

Ackeel Applewhaite
is a Bajan international footballer.

Red Sister
is a 2017 fantasy novel by Mark Lawrence. Nona Grey is a young girl who trains at a convent for future assassins.

Mount Fitzhenry
is a mountain summit located within Olympic National Park in Clallam County of Washington state. Mt. Fitzhenry is in the Bailey Range which is a subrange of the Olympic Mountains.

Vince Morales
. Morales made his MMA debut at featherweight against Joseph Cleveland on May 15, 2015 at FSF - Front Street Fights 5.

Jagtar Singh Jagga Hissowal
is a member of the Punjab Legislative Assembly from Raikot constituency. He won the 2017 legislative election on the Aam Aadmi Party ticket by defeating Congress candidate Dr. Amar Singh.

Munronia
is a genus of flowering plants in the family Meliaceae. Its native distribution is tropical and subtropical Asia.

Polygala
youngii is a plant species in the milkwort family. It is native to boggy highlands and grasslands above sea level in Angola and western Zambia.

Phebalium
appressum is a species of shrub that is endemic to the southwest of Western Australia. It is more or less covered with silvery scales and has egg-shaped to heart-shaped leaves pressed against the stems, and flowers with rust-coloured scales on the pedicel.

Maribor Oblast
was one of the oblasts of the Kingdom of Serbs, Croats and Slovenes from 1922 to 1929. Its capital was Maribor.

Armenia
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal and one bronze medal.

Changchien
is a Chinese-language surname. It originated near Kaohsiung as a combination of the surnames Zhang and Jian from a uxorilocal, matrilocal residence marriage custom in Fujian, China, and now exists in Taiwan and diaspora communities.

Kothaga Maa Prayanam
is a 2019 Indian Telugu language romantic drama film directed by Ramana Mogili, written by Rajendra Bharadwaj, and featuring Priyanth and Yamini Bhaskar in their debuts. It was produced by Nischay Productions.

Marilyn Jess
is a French former erotic and pornographic actress. For almost ten years, from 1977 to 1986, she was one of the best-known actresses in the French porn film industry, along with Brigitte Lahaie.

Quirindi Shire
was a local government area in the New England region of New South Wales, Australia. Quirindi Shire was proclaimed on 1 January 1980, created from the amalgamation of Tamarang Shire and the Municipality of Quirindi as a result of the Local Government Areas Amalgamation Act 1980.

Michele Bruno
was a South African drag queen and hairdresser. Bruno lived in Johannesburg and became to perform drag in the 1960s.

Watson-Schwartz
test is a screening test for diagnosing intermittent porphyria, although it might also become positive in porphyria cutanea tarda. In this method, porphobilinogen is detected by a color reaction with Ehrlich reagent and confirming that the color is not removed by chloroform.

Mount Fairchild
, also known as Mount William Fairchild, is a glaciated mountain summit located within Olympic National Park in Clallam County of Washington state. Mt. Fairchild is the second-highest peak in the Bailey Range which is a subrange of the Olympic Mountains.

Ahmadreza Rofougaran
, also known as Reza Rofougaran is an Iranian-American Electrical engineer, inventor and entrepreneur. Rofougaran was born in Isfahan, Iran, and moved to the US in the 1980s after the closure of Iranian universities after the 1979 Iranian Revolution to study Engineering at the University of California.

Colly Blue
is a locality in the North West Slopes region of New South Wales, Australia. The locality is in the Liverpool Plains Shire, north west of the state capital, Sydney and west of Quirindi.

Rattlesnake Creek
is an underground waterway in the northeast Bronx, New York City. It flowed above ground level until the mid-20th century, with a waterfall and a pond over its course.

Alfredo Flores
is an American director, videographer and photographer known for directing music videos and documentaries. He frequently collaborates with artists such as Justin Bieber, Ariana Grande, Rihanna and Selena Gomez.

Kevin Makely
is an American actor and producer. Makely was a 1992 graduate of Roy C. Ketcham High School in Poughkeepsie in Dutchess County, New York State.

Fayette County Schools
is a public school district in Fayette County, West Virginia. Its offices are located in the county seat of Fayetteville.

Datin Malai Hajah Halimah Malai Haji Yusoff
, the Ambassador Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary of Brunei Darussalam to France, presented her credentials as Permanent Delegate to the United Nations Education, Scientific and Cultural Organization on 28 September 2017. She became Ambassador of Brunei Darussalam in the Philippines in 2008 and Monaco in 2018.

Janet Mitchell
was a Canadian modernist painter from Alberta, known for her fantasies of Calgary in watercolours and oils. Mitchell was born in Medicine Hat, Alberta, in 1912 and as a young child, adopted by a Calgary couple.

Graciema Junqueira da Luz
was the second wife of the 19th President of Brazil, Carlos Luz, having served as the 20th First Lady of Brazil, from November 8, 1955 until November 11, 1955, being the shorter period in the brazilian history.

Laura Woods
is an English presenter working for Sky Sports and Talksport. Woods was born in Dagenham, Essex to Michelle and Steve Woods.

William Elroy Parker
, better known as Kid Parker, was an American professional boxer, physical culturist and promoter of vegetarianism. Parker was born on January 20, 1877 in Boston.

Onnam Loka Mahayudham
is a 2015 Indian Malayalam-language thriller film directed by Sree Varun. The film stars Aparna Gopinath and Tovino Thomas with Chemban Vinod Jose and Joju George in pivotal roles.

Larri Merritt
, better known as Larray, is an American social media personality. He is best-known for appealing to young teenagers with his comedic, video content and being apart of the collaborative TikTok house known as the Hype House.

Valerie A. Fitzhugh
is an American clinical pathologist and Associate Professor of Pathology, Immunology, and Laboratory Medicine at Rutgers New Jersey Medical School as well as an Associate Professor of Pathology and Laboratory Medicine at Rutgers Robert Wood Johnson Medical School. She is the Interim Chair of the Department of Pathology, Immunology, and Laboratory Medicine at Rutgers and the Interim Chair at Rutgers Robert Wood Johnson Medical School as well.

Phyllis Fong
is an American attorney serving as the Inspector General of the United States Department of Agriculture. Fong was nominated to the position in 2002 by President George W. Bush.

Western Junction
is a semi-rural locality and town in the local government area of Northern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of Longford.

Nona Balakian
was a literary critic and an editor at the New York Times Sunday Book Review. She served on the Pulitzer Prize committee and was a board member of the Authors Guild and the Pen Club as well as a founder of the National Book Critics Circle, whose Nona Balakian Citation for Excellence in Reviewing is named for her.

John Barsa
is an American businessman and government official and political candidate serving as the Acting Administrator of the United States Agency for International Development. Barsa was nominated to the role in April 2020 after the resignation of Mark Andrew Green.

Barju Taal
also known as Chimadu Taal is a wetland with a natural lake in Barju rural municipality in Sunsari District in eastern Nepal. The lake is about 12 km from Biratnagar.

Florian Krebs
is a German soccer player who plays as a midfielder for Chemnitzer FC. Krebs played for BFC Alemannia 90 in his hometown Berlin and was subsequently admitted to the youth team of Bundesliga club Hertha BSC.

Arshaduzzaman Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Bagerhat-4 in February 1996.

Altaf Hossain
Bangladesh Nationalist Party politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Bagerhat-4 in 1986.

Fairfield
was launched in Aberdeen in 1825 and sailed to Australia and the West Indies. She was last listed in 1839.

Mia Abbas Uddin
Bangladesh Nationalist Party politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Bagerhat-4 in 1988.

Patricio Moreno Ruiz
, commonly known as Patri, is a Spanish retired footballer who played as a midfielder, and is the current assistant manager of Getafe CF. Born in Don Benito, Badajoz, Extremadura, Patri started his career with hometown side CD Don Benito.

Maung Maung Theik
was an Burmese painter, illustrator and cartoonist . His works have a broad popular in the Myanmar and oversea. He drew the flag of the National League for Democracy party, formed after the 8888 uprising.

Goharua
is a village in Jodda Union in Nangalkot Upazila, Comilla District, Bangladesh. Goharua Hospital, a 20 bed hospital, was built in the early 2000s and but has not started operating as of 2020.

Oli Wilson
is a New Zealand ethnomusicologist and a member of The Chills. Wilson was raised in Palmerston North, the son of deer researcher Peter Wilson, who retired as Professor Emeritus at Massey University.

LST
1590-4 is a character encoding used to write the Lithuanian language. It is a modification of Windows-1257 to support additional accented letters and phonetic notation.

Jim Rutledge
is a Master distiller who worked at Four Roses for over 50 years, more than 20 of those as master distiller, retiring in 2015. He is a 2001 inductee into the Kentucky Bourbon Hall of Fame.

Elmer Tandy Lee
was a master distiller at Buffalo Trace Distillery, and master distiller emeritus after his retirement in 1985. Lee died July 16, 2013 at 93.

Pool Bunny
is the 12th short in the animated web series Looney Tunes Cartoons and the 5th short produced for the series. The short starts with Bugs visiting the desert in a middle of a heatwave, sweating.

BM Nazrul Islam Bangladesh Awami League
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Satkhira-1 in 1999 by-election.

Ann Buchanan
, MBE is a British researcher, author and academic. She is Senior Research Associate in the Department of Social Policy and Intervention and Professor Emeritus of Social Work at Oxford University.

Miruwa
is the name of Ward Number 2 in Pokhara Metropolitan City in Nepal. The famous Bindhyabasini temple is located in this ward.

Leslie Morgan Smith
is an American applied mathematician, mechanical engineer, and engineering physicist whose research focuses on fluid dynamics and turbulence. She is a professor of mathematics and of engineering physics at the University of Wisconsin.

Mount Ferry
is a mountain summit located within Olympic National Park in Jefferson County of Washington state. Mount Ferry is the eighth-highest peak in the Bailey Range, which is a subrange of the Olympic Mountains.

Nuria Niemes
is an Ecuadorian former professional tennis player. From 1992 to 2001 she featured in a record total of 31 Fed Cup ties for Ecuador.

Wentworth Chambers
is a chamber of barristers in Sydney, Australia. The chambers was established in 1957 and now comprises 13 sets of autonomous barristers chambers, the NSW Bar Association and two Supreme Court of New South Wales courts.

Vincent Darrell Groves
was an American serial killer who, between March 1979 and July 1988, murdered at least seven girls and women in Denver, Colorado. His guilt was conclusively proven in four murders with the help of DNA profiling in 2012, 16 years after his death, as a result of which his total victim count remains unknown.

Khoirunnisa
, songs with Islamic nuances or prophet salawat.

Weda Hamine
is a 1990 Sri Lankan ayurvedic teledrama which broadcast on Sri Lanka Rupavahini Corporation. This teledrama is directed by Jayantha Chandrasiri as his first television serial.

John Rose Murray
was a Ceylonese accountant and politician in Colonial Ceylon. A chartered accountant of the Institute of Chartered Accountants of Scotland, he was appointed as a member of House of Representatives of Ceylon on 6 June 1952, serving until his resignation in March 1958.

Cecil Godby
was an Australian racehorse jockey and trainer who was inducted into the Australian Racing Hall of Fame in 2016. He was born into a racing family and became a jockey, racing as of 1898, and winning the VRC Maribyrnong Plate on the horse Ibex in 1900.

Albert Schiess
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Walter Steiner
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Chris Stater
is a Puerto Rican sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Richard Darmanin
is a Puerto Rican sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Juha Siira
is a Finnish sailor. He competed at the 1976 Summer Olympics and the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Julia Sinelnikova
, born December 30, 1989 in Jerusalem, Israel is a Brooklyn based visual artist, model, performance artist, and event producer. Before moving to New York, Sinelnikova grew up in Russia until age 5, and then lived in Austin and Houston, Texas until she was 18.

Pekka Narko
is a Finnish sailor. He competed at the 1976 Summer Olympics, the 1980 Summer Olympics, and the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Vyacheslav Tineyev
is a Soviet sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Dimitar Mantov
was a Bulgarian historical novelist. He was born on October 13, 1930 in the village of Bosilkovtsi, Ruse region in a family of teachers.

Bernhard Prack
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Noor Pur
122 JB was a village on Millat Road, Faisalabad. Now it part of the city of Faisalabad.

Hans Prack
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Bruno de Cazenove
is a French sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Chris de Cazenove
is a French sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Cesare Biagi
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Franco Pivoli
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Gibberula
falsijaponica is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk, in the family Cystiscidae.

Michael de la Roche
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Sven-Bertil Johansson
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Brian Lewis
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Warren Rock
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Ben Grass
is a British Film producer and entrepreneur. He is the founder of film and television production company, Pure Grass Films.

Titus Uba
is Nigerian politician who is currently serving as speaker of the Benue State House of Assembly since August 2018. Uba represents Kyan constituency in the state assembly.

Planica
1951 was an International ski jumping week with international competition on Srednja Bloudkova K80 hill, held on 11 March 1949 in Planica, PR Slovenia, FPR Yugoslavia. On 6 March 1951, training on Planica week opening day on K80 normal hill with 13 ski jumpers was on schedule.

Mars
is a village in Ukraine, in Semenivka Raion, Chernihiv Oblast. The population is 5 persons; in the early 2000s 30 persons lived in the village.

Lobelia feayana
, the bay lobelia, is a species of bellflower endemic to Florida. A perennial dicot in the Campanulaceae family, it grows in moist areas such as ditches and is often spotted along roadsides.

Shivshankar Painkra
is a politician from Chhattisgarh. He was elected to the Chhattisgarh Legislative Assembly in 2013 from Pathalgaon, Jashpur as candidate of Bhartiya Janata Party.

Han Min-yong
is a South Korean journalist. She is currently the anchor for the weekend edition of JTBC Newsroom.

Erlend Hustad
is a Norwegian football player who plays as a striker for Brann in the Norwegian Premier League.

Kailasanathar Temple
is a Hindu temple dedicated to the deity Shiva, located at Thanjavur in Thanjavur district, India. In Thandankorai Mummoorti Vinayaka temple, samadhi of Satsit Anandha Siddha, Ur Idaicchiamman Temple, Kailasanathar Temple and Kothandaramar Temple are found.

Nina Mirembe
is a Ugandan fashionista and beauty pageant who contested for Miss Uganda 2012. Mirembe was born in Kampala.

Wanna Kyaw Htin Thet Tun
was a Burmese Ambassador, Writer and Historian. He was born in Yangon, Myanmar on 6 August 1926.

Deepak Khandekar
is a IAS Officer of Madhya Pradesh Cadre. He is the current Secretary, Ministry of Tribal Affairs, with additional charge of the post of Secretary, Ministry of Women and Child Development.

Jingshen Seafood Market
is a marketplace in the Fengtai district of Beijing. As with other marketplaces in China, wholesale and retail trade are both seen here, as well as restaurants.

David Hesmondhalgh
is a British sociologist. He is currently Professor of Media, Music and Culture at the University of Leeds.

John de Montfort
, was an English noble. He was slain during the Battle of Bannockburn, Scotland in 1314.

Aurelieus Golphin
better known by his stage name Aurelieus6 is an American rapper, singer and musical artist. Aurelieus6 was born in Georgia, US.

Pinacyanol
is a cyanine dye. It is an organic cation, typically isolated as the chloride or iodide salts.

Wadi Camacho
is a Spanish-born British former professional boxer who competed from 2012 to 2019. He held the Commonwealth cruiserweight title from 2018 to 2019 and challenged for the British cruiserweight title in 2019.

Dorothy Kisaka
, is a Ugandan lawyer and corporate executive who was appointed as the Executive Director of Kampala Capital City Authority, on 12 June 2020. She replaces Jennifer Musisi, the founding executive director of KCCA, who resigned on 15 December 2018, and Engineer Andrew Mubiru Kitaka, who has been acting as Executive Director from December 2018 until June 2020.

Soe Lin Oo
is a Burmese Lethwei fighter currently competing in the Welterweight division of the World Lethwei Championship. He is the former Lethwei Golden Belt 60 kg Champion.

Seo Bok-hyun
is a is a South Korean journalist. He is currently a co-anchor for the weekday edition of JTBC Newsroom.

Hermann Schubert
in Paris . Since 2011 he holds a professorship in economics and since 2016 at the International School of Management in Stuttgart.

Muhsin Baqir al-Musawi al-Qazwini
is an Iraqi author, politician, essayist, college professor, and founder of the Ahl al-Bayt University in Karbala. al-Qazwini was born in Karbala, hailing from the prominent religious al-Qazwini family.

Julia
is an upcoming American documentary film, directed and produced by Julie Cohen and Betsy West. The documentary follows the life of Julia Child.

Terkimbi Ikyange
is a Nigerian politician who was elected speaker of the 8th session of the Benue State House of Assembly in 2015 on the platform of All Progressives Congress, APC. He was impeached in 2018.

Rebuilding Paradise
is an 2020 American documentary film directed and produced by Ron Howard. The film follows the rebuild of Paradise, California, following the 2018 California wildfires.

Zakomar
vault. False zakomar, which is not repeating the inner shapes of the vault, is called the kokoshnik.

Loreen Ruth Bannis-Roberts
is a politician, businesswoman and diplomat from the Commonwealth of Dominica. Since August 2016, she has been the Permanent Representative of Dominica to the United Nations, the first woman to hold the post.

Yusuf Ibrahim Zailani
is a Nigerian politician who is currently serving as Speaker of Kaduna State House of Assembly. Zailani, a member of the ruling All Progressives Congress representing Igabi State Constituency in the Kaduna State assembly was elected speaker on 25 February 2020.

Kimberley Ashton
, also known as Kim Ashton, is a cyclist and former badminton player from Jersey. She represented her nation in badminton at the 2010 Commonwealth Games and cycling at the 2018 Commonwealth Games.

Oasis Christian Academy
is a private Christian school located in southwest Winter Haven, Florida. The academy currently offers classes for students in pre-kindergarten three through twelfth grade on three campuses in the greater Winter Haven area.

Lasioglossum
albipes is a Palearctic species of sweat bee.

Stefan Edlis
(b. 1925 in Vienna, Austria - d.

Ahn Na-kyung
is a South Korean anchor. She is the current co-anchor for JTBC flagship newscast JTBC Newsroom.

Boreotrophon
is a genus of sea snails, marine gastropod mollusks in the subfamily Pagodulinae of the family Muricidae, the murex snails or rock snails.

Horace Tate
, was an American educator, activist, scholar, and politician who spent most of his life and career working toward educational equity for Black Americans, particularly in the south. Born in 1922, Tate learned the value of education early on from his mother, not just as a means of personal growth, but as a way to combat oppression.

Edward S. Anthoine
in the Maine Senate representing Cumberland County.

Tai Wong Temple
.

Mufti Sadruddin Khan Azurda Dehlawi
was an Islamic scholar, leader of the Indian Rebellion of 1857 and poet during British era. He was Grand Mufti Delhi, an influential seat of power among the Muslims and worked for the rebellion against British government.

Elijah Jovan McClain
, a 23-year-old African-American massage therapist in Aurora, Colorado, was killed after an encounter with police while walking home on the evening of August 24, 2019. An Aurora citizen reported to police that McClain was acting suspiciously wearing a ski mask, although the caller also indicated that he did not believe anyone was in danger, and that he believed McClain was unarmed.

Livia De Clercq
is a Belgian Paralympic athlete who competes in long jump and occasionally sprinting events at international level events. De Clercq had her left leg amputated above the knee after she was diagnosed with a tumour in left knee aged fourteen.

Edward W. Atwood
was an American lawyer and politician from Maine. Atwood, a Republican, represented Portland in the Maine House of Representatives for two terms from 19231926.

Georg Wollmann
was a German trade union leader. Wollmann became a ceramic worker and joined the Union of Porcelain and Related Workers of Germany.

Dom Hardman
is an English rugby union player who plays for the in Global Rapid Rugby and the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is prop.

Tom Sheminant
is an Australian rugby union player who plays for the in Global Rapid Rugby and the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is prop.

Ben Grant
is an Australian rugby union player who plays for the in Global Rapid Rugby and the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is lock.

Ross Mason
is the founder of the High Impact Network of Responsible Innovation, an accelerator for non-profits based in Atlanta, Georgia. He was formerly the Chairman of the Georgia Department of Community Health Board.

Javier Prieto
is a Mexican sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Javier Ruiz
is a Mexican sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Fergus Lee-Warner
is an Australian rugby union player who plays for the in Global Rapid Rugby and the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is lock or flanker.

Tevin Ferris
is an New Zealand born, Australian rugby union player who plays for the in Global Rapid Rugby and the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is flanker.

Takumi Horiuchi
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Max Sutter
was a Swiss footballer who played for FC Basel. He played as defender.

Johann Eisl
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Jake Abel
is an Australian rugby union player who plays for the in Global Rapid Rugby and the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is scrum-half.

Anderson Creek Club
is a residential golf course community in the United States, located in the unincorporated community of Anderson Creek, North Carolina. Anderson Creek Club features a par 72 course.

Abraham Wales
was a Scottish professional footballer who played as an inside left. Born in Bridgeton, Wales played for Motherwell, Third Lanark, Morton, Fulham and Luton Town.

Jake Strachan
is an Australian rugby union player who plays for the in Global Rapid Rugby and the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is fly-half or fullback.

Grason Makara
is an Australian rugby union player who plays for the in Global Rapid Rugby and the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is centre.

Byron Ralston
is an Australian rugby union player who plays for the in Global Rapid Rugby and the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is wing.

Edward William Toner Jr
. is a former American football fullback who played in the National Football League.

Sultan Uddin Bhuiyan
is a politician from the Narayanganj District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Narayanganj-1. Sultan Uddin Bhuiyan was born in 1953 in Narayanganj District.

Julia R. Hall
was an American physician. Graduating from medical school in 1892, Hall was the first woman to work as a resident in the Howard University gynaecology clinic.

KVWC-FM
is a Country and Farm formatted broadcast radio station. The station is licensed to Vernon, Texas and serves Vernon and Chillicothe in Texas and Davidson in Oklahoma.

James Clarke Satterthwaite
was a British politician who sat in the House of Commons during the late 18th and early 19th centuries. Satterthwaite was a placeman for James Lowther, 1st Earl of Lonsdale.

David Collison
is a British chemist and a Professor in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. His research in general is based on inorganic chemistry and magnetochemistry, specifically on coordination chemistry, EPR spectroscopy and f-block chemistry.

Winfried Scharlau
is a German mathematician. Scharlau received his doctorate in 1967 from the University of Bonn.

John Baynes Garforth
was a British Tory politician for a Cumberland constituency. He was M.P. for Cockermouth from 1780 to 1784; and from 1790 and 1800.

Rowland Stephenson
was a British Tory politician for a Cumberland constituency. He was M.P. for Carlisle from 1787 to 1790.

Lasioglossum
smeathmanellum is a Palearctic species of sweat bee.

Borzhava
narrow-gauge railway is one of the functioning narrow gauge railways in Ukraine, within the Vynohradiv, Berehiv and Irshava districts of the Zakarpattia Oblast. The total length of the railway is 123 km, the track width is 750 mm.

Queens
is a Canadian comedy-mystery web series, which premiered June 19, 2020 on CBC Gem. The series centres on a group of drag queens in Toronto, Ontario who are planning to compete in the Miss Church Street pageant, who each have their preparations mysteriously sabotaged.

Souad
is a 2020 Egyptian drama film directed by Ayten Amin. It was selected to be shown at the 2020 Cannes Film Festival.

Takifugu
obscurus is a species of freshwater pufferfish first described by T. Abe in 1949. It has been categorized by the IUCN as a least-concern species globally since 2014; in South Korea, it is however classified as an endangered species due to overfishing of its endemic populations.

John Mathias
is an American sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.

Rosa Kornfeld-Matte
was the first United Nations Independent Expert on the enjoyment of all human rights by older persons, from May 2014 until May 2020. Previously, she served as the National Director of the Chilean National Service of Ageing and was the founder of the program for older persons at the Pontifical Catholic University of Chile.

Hello Koun
is a Bhojpuri song sung by Ritesh Pandey featuring himself and Sneh Upadhyay. It is written and composed by Ashish Verma and directed by Rajeev Pandey.

Mount Pulitzer
, also known as Snagtooth, is a mountain summit located within Olympic National Park in Jefferson County of Washington state. Mount Pulitzer is the sixth-highest peak in the Bailey Range, which is a subrange of the Olympic Mountains.

Teta
is a 2016 American short documentary film written, directed, and produced by Alexandra Hidalgo. The film premiered as part of a Cultural Rhetorics conference at Michigan State University in 2016.

Harry Augustus Bigelow
was an American lawyer. A Harvard graduate, he worked in private practice in Hawaii before being chosen as one of the first faculty members of the University of Chicago Law School in 1904.

Nomada
flavoguttata is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Mia Sosa
is a bestselling American romance novelist. Sosa is half Puero Rican and half Brazilian.

Nomada
goodeniana is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Aviel Zargari
is an Israeli footballer who currently plays as a midfielder for Beitar Jerusalem.

Edward Knubley
was a British Tory politician for a Cumberland constituency. He was M.P. for Carlisle in 1790.

Saint Jawarjius Church
and Monastery is an oriental Orthodox church located in the city of Acre in northern Palestine. It dates back to the Crusaders period and is built on the ruins of a Byzantine church.

Jakob Breum Martinsen
is a Danish footballer currently playing as a forward for Odense Boldklub.

Joe Sherburne
is an American professional basketball player for Ehingen Urspring of the ProA. He played college basketball for UMBC.

Nomada sheppardana
is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Jacob Ondrejka
is a Swedish footballer currently playing as a forward for Elfsborg.

Marlyon Rithe
was an English politician in the 16th Century. Rythe was born in Twickenham.

Paulos Abraham
is a Swedish footballer currently playing as a forward for AIK.

Destiny Rogers
is an American singer from Lodi, California. Rogers grew up in the small town of Lodi with her family.

Ha Nam
is a Korean footballer currently playing as a forward for FC Anyang.

Paul Luchtenberg
was a German cultural scientist, educator and politician for the Free Democratic Party, as well as Culture Minister for North Rhine-Westphalia. Paul Luchtenberg attended school in Gummersbach.

Southern European Australians
are Australians of Southern European ancestry. Southern European Australian people can usually trace back full or partial heritage to Greece, Spain, Italy, Portugal, and other countries within Mediterranean Europe, or otherwise ethnoculturally related to the area.

Tai Kei Leng
is a village in Shap Pat Heung, Yuen Long District, Hong Kong.

Thompson Michael Dietz
is an American lawyer from New Jersey who is a nominee to be a Judge of the United States Court of Federal Claims. Dietz earned his Bachelor of Arts from Clemson University, and his Juris Doctor from Tulane University Law School.

Nga Yiu Tau
.

Chowchilla Union High
School District is a school district headquartered in Chowchilla, California. It operates Chowchilla Union High School and the continuation school Gateway.

Ruth Peak
is a glaciated mountain summit located within Olympic National Park in Clallam County of Washington state. Ruth Peak is the third-highest peak in the Bailey Range, which is a subrange of the Olympic Mountains.

Alview-Dairyland Union
School District is a school district headquartered in the campus of Dairyland Elementary School, located in Dairyland, an unincorporated community in Madera County, California, near Chowchilla. In addition to Dairyland Elementary, the district operates Alview Elementary School in the Alview community, also in unincorporated Madera County.

Phebalium
brevifolium is a species of small shrub that is endemic to Western Australia. It has warty branchlets, sessile, wedge-shaped leaves and up to three white flowers arranged in umbels.

Royal Air Force Swingate
Down or more simply RAF Swingate Down is a former Royal Air Force Chain Home Low radar station operational during the Second World War located north of Dover, Kent, England. The site was situated on alongside RAF Dover, another Radar section together on the removed First World War landing ground of RAF Dover.

Sheena Rose
is a contemporary Caribbean artist who lives and works in Barbados. She is a Fulbright Scholar and holds a BFA Honors degree from Barbados Community College, 2008, as well as an MFA from the University of North Carolina, Greensboro, 2016.

Istanbul Photo Awards
is an international news photography contest organized by Anadolu Agency, celebrates 100th year as a global news agency. The awards reward endeavors of courageous and talented photojournalists from around the world on merit.

Mehtap Oezaslan
is a full professor for technical electrocatalysis at TU Braunschweig. Oezaslan studied Chemistry at TU Berlin and finished her diploma in the group of . From January 2008 to February 2012, she did her PhD in the group of at TU Berlin.

Albert de Coxie
, baron of Moorseele, lord of Bouseval, la Tour, etc., was a jurist who became president of the Brussels Privy Council. Coxie was born in Mechelen, where he was baptised on 8 May 1637.

Marianna Tax Choldin
is Mortenson Distinguished Professor Emerita, University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. She was on the faculty during 1969-2002.

Josy Van Leberghe
was a Belgian figure skater. She competed in the mixed pairs event at the 1928 Winter Olympics.

Emil Paul Ernst Gaste
was a German figure skater. He competed in the mixed pairs event at the 1928 Winter Olympics.

Colbey Ross
. Ross played four years of varsity basketball for Eaglecrest High School in Centennial, Colorado.

Ilse Gaste
, was a German figure skater. She competed in the mixed pairs event at the 1928 Winter Olympics.

Gilbert-Luc Devinaz
is a French politician. He is member of the Socialist Party party.

Luke Watkins
victory over David Vicena at the Wembley Arena in London.

Gilberto Duarte
is a Portuguese handball player for Montpellier Handball and the Portuguese national team.

John Hall
.

Selenia
aurea, the golden selenia, is a flowering plant in the mustard family. It is endemic to the southern United States where it grows in sunny prairies, barrens, and glades of Arkansas, Kansas, Missouri, and Oklahoma.

Poloo
is a Ghanaian snack which is referred to as fried coconut dough or fried biscuit. Ingredients used in preparation.

Hope Loves Company
is an American 501 non-profit organization founded in 2007 that focuses upon providing resources and emotional support to the children and grandchildren of ALS patients. It is the sole non-profit in the United States with the purpose of providing support and resources to families affected by amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.

Renata Elisabeth Wielgosz
was the Canadian ambassador to Greece and Cyprus. She presented her credentials to Demetris Christofias of Cyprus on October 20, 2009.

Franz Kunz
was a Swiss skier. He competed in the military patrol at the 1928 Summer Olympics.

Interlaken
is a rural locality in the local government areas of Northern Midlands, Central Highlands, and Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of Hamilton.

Margate Art Museum
is an art museum in Margate in the KwaZulu-Natal province of South Africa. It is the largest art museum in KwaZulu-Natal.

George Serhan
is an Australian professional golfer. Serhan was a full-time pro on the PGA Tour of Australasia from the mid-1970s through the mid-1990s.

Camp Ronald McDonald
for Good Times is a California-based camp for children with cancer. Established in 1983 as an expansion of a 1977 effort to build temporary housing for seriously ill children and their families during treatment, the charity drew financial and organizational support from numerous celebrities, with Dustin Hoffman and Michael Jackson playing prominent roles in its early growth.

Polygala
multiflora is a plant species in the milkwort family. It is native to Western Africa.

John Craig
of Glasgow was elected in 1818 to the Fellowship of the Royal Society of Edinburgh, from which he resigned about 1840. Otherwise, very little is known about his life.

Svetlana Kuznetsova
was the defending champion, but chose not to participate in 2003. Elena Dementieva won the title.

Muhammad Bobby Afif Nasution
is an Indonesian businessman and politician who is the son-in-law of President Joko Widodo. Nasution was born on 5 July 1991 in Medan, North Sumatra, as the last of three siblings in a Batak family.

Curio
hallianus, syn. Senecio hallianus, is a creeping succulent plant in the daisy family Asteraceae that is native to South Africa.

Lanxangia
is an Asian genus of plants in the ginger family. Species have been recorded from southern China to Indo-China.

Joachim Draheim
is a German musicologist, music teacher and classical pianist. Born in Berlin, Draheim studied classical philology, history and musicology in Heidelberg.

Curio
muirii is a succulent plant in the daisy family that is native to South Africa. A small subshrub growing in shale cliffs, it features hairless leaves that are pale green with blueish tones.

Kalyan Vidhan Sabha Seat
no longer exists, after the redrawing of assembly constituency borders in 2008. It was one of the 288 assembly seats in Maharashtra state in India.

Billy Luk Wing-Kuen
, is a Hong Kong rapper, actor, television presenter, and comedian. Luk Wing and C Kwan are members of the hip hop duo FAMA.

Miki Mizokuchi
is a Japanese former professional tennis player. Born in Tokyo, Mizokuchi began competing professionally in 1985 and reached her career best singles ranking of 221 in the world in 1988.

Rahmad bin Mariman
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as a member of the Malacca State Executive Council. He is chairman of the health and anti-drug committee.

Mullen Technologies, Inc.
is a privately held American electric car company headquartered in Brea, California founded in 2014. Mullen owns other businesses including Mullen Auto Sales, consisting of a chain of car dealerships in California and Arizona, the company CarHub, and Smart 8 Energy.

Latifah binti Omar
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Malacca State Executive Councillor.

Olsztyn
was a Hansa A Type cargo ship which was built as Imkenturm in 1944 by Werf de Npord, Alblasserdam, Netherlands for Deutsche Dampfschifffarts-Gesellschaft Hansa, Bremen, Germany. She was seized as a prize of war in 1945, passing to the Ministry of War Transport and renamed Empire Gantry.

Leeswood Hall
is a country house in Leeswood, Flintshire, Wales. Dating from 1742, it was built for George Wynne, the design being attributed to Francis Smith.

Sanjhauli
, also spelled Sajhauli, is a village and corresponding community development block in Rohtas district of Bihar, India. As of 2011, the village of Sanjhauli had a population of 7,608, in 1,269 households, while the entire block had a population of 62,621.

Southern Boone High School
is a public secondary school in Ashland, Missouri. It is operated by the Southern Boone County R-1 School District and serves much of southern Boone County, Missouri.

Tibet Policy Institute
, founded in 2012, is a Tibetan think tank and research-oriented intellectual institute of the Central Tibetan Administration. TPI is based in Dharamshala, Himachal Pradesh, India.

Leimapokpam Nandakumar Singh
is an indian football manager and currently work as the head coach I League club TRAU FC. He started his professional career with Royal Wahingdoh as an assistant in 2014 he achieve promotion to i league with club as a manager.

Pruthviraj
is a 1992 Indian Kannada action film co-written and directed by Renuka Sharma. The film was financed by M. S. Suresh babu under Swathi Cine Arts and had music scored and composed by Sax Raja.

Cynthia Kierscht
is an official at the United States Department of State who has been nominated to be the next United States Ambassador to Mauritania. Kierscht is a 1983 graduate of Fargo North High School.

Roslan bin Ahamd
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Malacca State Executive Councillor.

Luis Geovanny Segovia Vega
is an Ecuadorean footballer who plays in central defence for C.S.D. Independiente del Valle in the Ecuadorian Serie A. Segovia made his debut for C.D.

Tabula Banasitana
is an inscribed bronze tablet produced in the second century AD. Found in 1957 near the village of Banasa in Morocco, it documents how a notable of the Berber tribe of Zegrenses successfully petitioned to receive Roman citizenship for him and his family.

Stovekraft
is an Indian company that manufactures cooking appliances under Pigeon and Gilma brands. The company was founded in 1999 and is headquartered in Bangalore, Karnataka.

Atsuko
was born in Taiwan and grew up as a child in Japan. Later, she moved to the United States with her mother and grandmother from Japan and lived undocumented for seven years.

Gary Bric
is a former restaurant owner and former politician in California. Bric is a former mayor of Burbank, California.

Miles Kirkpatrick
was an American lawyer, who served as the chairman of the Federal Trade Commission from September 15, 1970 to February 20, 1973. Kirkpatrick is credited with the re-organisation and dramatic improvements in the functioning of FTC.

Sandra M. Garraway
is an American Neuroscientist and Assistant Professor of Physiology in the Department of Physiology at Emory University School of Medicine in Atlanta, Georgia. Garraway is the Director of the Emory Multiplex Immunoassay Core where she assists researchers from both academia and industry to perform, analyze, and interpret their multiplexed immunoassays.

Mona Iversen
or Mona Falk-Larssen is a Norwegian former long track speed skater, who was active in the 1970s and 1980s. Iversen represented her nation at the World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women in 1981, finishing 21st overall.

Ismail bin Othman
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Malacca State Executive Councillor.

Anne Girard
.

Henriette Kaiser
is a German writer, film director and journalist. Born in Munich, Kaiser grew up as the daughter of Susanne and Joachim Kaiser.

Jordan Luke
is an Australian rugby union player who plays for the in the Super Rugby AU competition. His original playing position is wing.

Nimbehuli
is a 2014 Kannada language comedy film written and directed by Hemanth Hegde and produced by veteran director Subhash Ghai. latters marked a maiden Kannada venture.

Abdul Ghafar bin Atan
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Malacca State Executive Councillor.

John B. Wright
was a tailor and legislator in South Carolina during the Reconstruction era. He served in the South Carolina House of Representatives from 1868 until 1872 representing Charleston.

Joyce Lefevre
is a Belgian Paralympic athlete who competes in international level events.

Mathias Nilsson
is a Norwegian chemist and a Professor in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. His research in general is based on physical chemistry and analytical chemistry, specifically on development and application of novel methods in Liquids NMR Spectroscopy Nilsson completed his Bachelor of Science degree in Food Chemistry in 1993 at Linnaeus University.

Luk Kin Ming
is a Hong Kong professional footballer who plays as a defender for Hong Kong Premier League club Kitchee.

Connelly Lemuelu
. Born and raised in Auckland, Lemuelu played rugby union for Papatoetoe before moving to Australia as a 15-year old to attend Keebra Park State High School.

Michael Maaser
is a German historian, archivist of the Goethe University Frankfurt. Born in in Hanau, Maaser graduated from the gymnasium.

Ha Yau Tin Tsuen
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Sheung Yau Tin Tsuen
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Village Defence Committees
were first setup in the mid-1990s in the Chenab Valley area of Jammu and Kashmir for the self-defence of Hindus in remote hilly villages against militancy. They comprise of villagers as well as police officers.

Shui Tsiu Lo Wai
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Tony Danker
is a British businessman, and will be director-general of the Confederation of British Industry from November 2020. Danker was born in Belfast.

Eostangeria
is a genus of fossil foliage belonging to the Cycadales. It was first erected based on material from the Eocene of the Geisel valley , but other species have been later retrieved from the Paleocene of Wyoming and Eocene of Oregon and the Miocene of Bulgaria.

Nam Hang Tsuen
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Adama Fofana
is a Ivorian footballer who plays as a defender for Varberg.

Hung Tso Tin Tsuen
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Mohd
. Rafiq bin Naizamohideen is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Malacca State Executive Councillor.

Palmerston Rovers
are a soccer club based in Palmerston, Northern Territories, Australia. They were formed in 2018 after the merging of Palmerston FC and Darwin Rovers.

Kong Tau Tsuen
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Tong Tau Po Tsuen
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Brackagh
is a townland in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located in the civil parish of Carrick The townland stands between he N52 motorway and Lough Ennell.

Shan Pui Chung Hau Tsuen
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Noor Effandi bin Ahmad
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Malacca State Executive Councillor.

Robinstown
is a townland in Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is named for the Tyrrell baronets.

Shung Ching San Tsuen
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Lung Tin Tsuen
is a village in the Shap Pat Heung area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong

Muhammad Jailani bin Khamis
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Malacca State Executive Councillor.

Julius Marvin Page
is an American former professional basketball player. An athletic combo guard whose vertical leap was reported to be , he played high school basketball at Turner-Carroll High School in Buffalo, New York.

Bernhard Schneyer
is a German composer, conductor and music educator. Schneyer was born in Wernigerode.

Mojiz Hasan
is a Pakistani theatre and film actor. He has appeared in several notable theatre plays and feature films.

Switzerland
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won two gold medals, one silver medal and one bronze medal, all in athletics.

Haim Tukachinsky
was an Israeli Jewish Orthodox pianist, composer, conductor and musical director. Haim Tukachinsky was born in Haifa and grew up in Kiryat Motzkin.

Panikos Rimis
is a Cypriot sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Nikolay Vasilev
is a Bulgarian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Norhizam bin Hassan Baktee
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Malacca State Executive Councillor. He has been married with Norlishah Ibrahim and has two children.

Prodyot Kumar Mahanti
was an Indian politician. Mahanti was elected to the West Bengal Legislative Assembly from the Dantan constituency in the 1972 West Bengal Legislative Assembly election, then a 32-year old lawyer and Congress candidate.

Nichollsemys
is a genus of extinct sea turtles. The only known species is Nichollsemys baieri.

Peter Wilson
is a Zimbabwean sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Mihai Butucaru
is a Romanian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Friedrich Harth
was a German glider pioneer. Between 1908 and 1923, Harth built twelve different types of gliders and laid the foundations for the development of gliding.

Trishuli Hydropower Station
is a peaking run-of-river hydropower station located at Trishuli bazaar of Nuwakot district in Nepal. The intake of the plant lies in Rasuwa district.

Naum Rogozhin
.

Ivor Ganahl
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Vladimir Uralsky
was a Soviet actor. Vladimir has played in more than 100 films.

Devighat Hydropower Station
is a 14.1 MW cascade project of Trishuli Hydropower Station. The station is located at Bidur Municipality in Nuwakot, Nepal.

Calligraphy Greenway
is a linear park located in West District, Taichung, Taiwan. The name is most commonly used for the section known as the Jingguo Greenway, which connects the National Museum of Natural Science and the National Taiwan Museum of Fine Arts, though earlier plans included the Art Garden, which extends southward from the Museum of Fine Arts to the Liu River.

Twyford Brook
is a small English river in the county of Berkshire. It drains a rural area to the east of Twyford, starting at the foot of the M4 motorway embankment, and is a tributary of the River Loddon.

Raju Kannampuzha
is a Kochi-based Indian businessman. He is the founder and managing director of Executive Events, an certified Event Management Company in Kerala.

MeidasTouch
is an American political action committee formed in March 2020. The purpose of the committee is to stop the reelection of Donald Trump in the 2020 presidential election.

Luka Romero Bezzana
is a professional footballer who plays as an attacking midfielder for RCD Mallorca. Born in Mexico, he represents Argentina at youth international level.

Sik Kong Tsuen
is a village Ha Tsuen, Yuen Long District, Hong Kong.

Shubhangi Swaroop
is the first female pilot of the Indian Navy. She is a pilot of Maritime reconnaissance aircraft in Indian Navy.

African Americans
played a prominent role in the Vietnam War. The Vietnam War was the first American war in which Black and White troops were not formally segregated, though de facto segregation still occurred.

Gajendra Gurung
was an Indian politician. He was born in Kalimpong on January 3, 1937.

Notker Hammerstein
is a German historian. His research interests are mainly in the field of and history of science as well as the history of the Holy Roman Empire of the German Nation.

John Millerta
was born on September 15, 1873 in New York, USA. He was an American actor, known for main character in the movie The Night Flyer.

Suranaree University of Technology Hospital
was approved by cabinet in 1995.

Daniele Bernardes Milan Da Silva
is a former Brazilian Paralympic judoka who competed in international level events.

Eloise Head
, Known professionally as the founder of Fitwaffle. She is known as a British social media personality and for her content on social media platforms, Instagram and TikTok.

Surin Hospital
is the main hospital of Surin Province, Thailand. It is classified under the Ministry of Public Health as a regional hospital.

Sekou Sidibe
is a footballer currently playing as a forward for Jong PSV. Born in the Ivory Coast, Sidibe represents Belgium at youth international level.

Robert J
. Gamgort is the Chairman and CEO of Keurig Dr Pepper, the seventh largest food and beverage company in the United States.

Victorian Fury
is an Australian netball team that represents Netball Victoria in the Australian Netball League. In 2008 they were both founder members and the inaugural champions of the league.

Ha Tsuen Shi
is a village Ha Tsuen, Yuen Long District, Hong Kong.

Sable Elyse Smith
is an interdisciplinary artist and writer. Smith works in photography, neon, text, appropriated imagery, sculpture, and video installation connecting language, violence, and pop culture with autobiographical subject matter.

Uttaradit Hospital
is the main hospital of Uttaradit Province, Thailand. It is classified under the Ministry of Public Health as a regional hospital.

Arthur Eaton
.

Fan Tin Tsuen
is a village in the San Tin area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong.

Vinicius Moreira
. Moreira began his MMA career by compiling an MMA record of 8-1 by competing mainly within the Brazilian regional MMA circuit as well as in India for Super Fight League.

Billy Meeske
was an Australian professional wrestler who was three-time Australian Heavyweight Champion and one time Pacific Coast Light Heavyweight Champion. He was an active professional wrestler from 1922 to 1938, and he was credited as being a major influence in re-establishing professional wrestling in Australia following the First World War.

Phinehas Barnes
was an American lawyer, newspaper editor, and politician from Maine. Barnes was born in Orland, Maine before attending Bowdoin College.

Laura Alves
was a Portuguese actor on stage, film and radio. Laura Alves Magno was born in Lisbon, Portugal on 8 September 1921, the daughter of Mariana Alves and Celestino Magno.

Tsz Tong Tsuen
in Lung Yeuk Tau.

Ghiasuddin Ahmad
was an Indian politician. He was born in Kalinagar on January 1, 1927.

Abu Yasir
is the vocalist and fighter in the ranks of the Islamic State, Abu Yasir is the singer of the famous Salil al-sawarim. Abu Yasser has many jihadi chants, whether with the Ajnad Foundation or with other institutions in the past.

Dimitrios Dimitriou
is a Cypriot sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Henderson Event Center
is the tentative name of a planned multi-purpose 6,000-seat indoor arena to be built in Henderson, Nevada. It would be constructed on the site of the former Henderson Pavilion and to be owned by the city of Henderson with Vegas Golden Knights as the arena operator.

Panagiotis Nikolaou
is a Cypriot sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

David Sims
is a New Zealand film director. He commenced his career at the National Film Unit, making his first film in 1968.

Thakurdas Mahata
was an Indian politician, belonging to the Communist Party of India. He was born in Khayerdanga on December 31, 1930.

Simen Bolkan Nordli
is a Norwegian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Eliteserien club Aalesund. He played youth football for Ottestad before joining larger neighbours HamKam, while also representing Norway as a youth and U21 international.

Vicente de la Guardia
is a Cuban sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Abdul-Hassan
made 5 appearances for the national team in 2001.

Ryan T. Anderson
is an American political philosopher who is best known for his opposition to LGBT rights. He is currently the William E. Simon Senior Research Fellow at The Heritage Foundation.

Peri Spiele
was an Austrian board game, card game and playing card manufacturer based in Scharnstein in Upper Austria. The firm was founded in 1959 by Erich Perner.

Vladimir Ignatenko
is a Soviet sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Madan Mohan Mahato
was an Indian politician, belonging to the Indian National Congress. He was born on January 2, 1927 in Agardih village.

Rob Wynne
is an American visual artist best known for his use of glass to produce abstract and text wall installations. He lives and works in New York City.

Jean-Luc Dreyer
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Lars Bengtsson
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Alfredo Rigau
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Chaturangi
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India.The elevation of Chaturangi is . It is 102nd highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Gustavo Doreste
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Nomada
leucophthalma is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Auriga
was a Hansa A Type cargo ship which was built as Adamsturm in 1944 by Deutsche Werft, Hamburg, Germany for Deutsche Dampfschifffarts-Gesellschaft Hansa, Bremen Germamy. She was seized as a prize of war in 1945, passing to the Ministry of War Transport and renamed Empire Gantry.

Tomasz Stocki
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Durgadas Bauri
was an Indian politician, belonging to the Indian National Congress. He was born on January 15, 1942 in Raghunathpur.

Salih Hudayar
is a Uyghur-American politician known for advocating for the independence of East Turkestan. Born in the city of Atush in East Turkistan, Hudayar fled to the United States as a political refugee with his family in June 2000.

Harold Clyde Bingham
was an American psychologist and primatologist. He spent his early career as a psychology professor, interrupting this to join the United States Army during World War I. He joined the faculty of Yale University in 1925 and studied under the supervision of Robert Yerkes.

Alan K. Brisdon
is a British chemist and a Senior Lecturer in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. His research in general is based on fluorine chemistry, including on HCFCs, fluorine-containing organometallic systems, fluorophosphines and fluorine-containing materials, such as ionic liquids and fluorographenes.

Nomada
fabriciana is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Ghulam Osman Yaghma
is Canadian-Uyghur politician, independence leader, writer, and poet. Yaghma was born on August 16, 1956 in Atush, East Turkistan.

Kevin Fianko Ofori
is a US-based Ghanaian entrepreneur and musician signed to AMG Records popularly known as Kevin Fianko AMG. He was born in Tema Ghana, and schooled at New Church School in Tema and Olams Senior High before moving to America to fulfill his dreams.

Nomada
ruficornis is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Nomada
rufipes is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Du Plessis
studied at the University of Pretoria and Stellenbosch University and became a Professor of Business Management. He played provincial rugby for and . Du Plessis played one test for the Springboks, the 1972 test match against the touring England team at Ellis Park in Johannesburg.

Oleksandr Zabara
is a Ukrainian retired footballer who last played for Dynamo Brest in Belarus. Zabara started his senior career with Chornomorets Odesa.

Manchester
and Salford Universities Air Squadron, abbreviated MASUAS, forms part of the Royal Air Force Volunteer Reserve. MASUAS is one of fifteen University Air Squadrons that are spread out across Great Britain and it recruits from the universities in Manchester and Salford University.

Nomada striata
is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

3rd Street Flats
is a mixed-use development project located in downtown Reno, Nevada. It includes 94 apartment units, retail space, and a restaurant.

Niraj Shojan
is an Indian photographer and a music video director based out of Mumbai. He started his journey as a freelancer photographer.

Robert Kent Trench
is an American Biologist who was a Professor at the University of California, Santa Barbara. His research considered corals and symbiotic algae, with a focus on the adaption of zooxanthellae.

Shui Zi
, courtesy name Chu Qin, native of Lanzhou, Gansu,was educator and politician during the Republic of China. He participated with the Tongmenghui during the Xinhai Revolution.

Wazed Ali biswas
Bangladesh Nationalist Party politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Satkhira-4 in February 1996.

Nkatie Cake
also known as Peanut Cake is a Ghanaian snack. Nkatie cake is a candy bar made locally with groundnuts or peanuts with melted sugar.

Varma
is a crater on Mercury. Its name was adopted by the International Astronomical Union on June 18, 2013.

KDZA-TV
was a television station broadcasting on channel 3 in Pueblo, Colorado, which broadcast from March 16, 1953, to May 7, 1954. It was the first television station established in Pueblo.

Van Gogh
is a crater on Mercury. Its name was adopted by the International Astronomical Union in 1976.

Dame Julie Bethridge Topp
, known as Jools Topp, is one half of the Topp Twins, a music comedy duo from New Zealand; the other member is her twin sister Lynda Topp. Jools Topp has been singing and entertaining with her sister for decades, touring live music and comedy performances as well as performing in TV and film.

Snorri
is a crater on Mercury. Its name was adopted by the International Astronomical Union in 1976.

Rilke
is a crater on Mercury. Its name was adopted by the International Astronomical Union in 1976.

Ludwig von Liebenzell
, was a knight of the Teutonic Order in the 13th century. He was a Komtur of Ragnit in Prussia from 1294 to 1300.

Riemenschneider
is a crater on Mercury. Its name was adopted by the International Astronomical Union in 1979.

Remarque
is a crater on Mercury. Its name was adopted by the International Astronomical Union on December 16, 2013.

Devan Shimoyama
is a contemporary painter who lives and works in Pittsburgh, PA. He is an Assistant Professor of Art at Carnegie Mellon University.

Jacob Karlsen
is a Norwegian artistic gymnast. In 2018, he won the bronze medal in the vault event at the 2018 Summer Youth Olympics held in Buenos Aires, Argentina.

Elizabeth E. Hood
is a plant geneticist and the Lipscomb Distinguished Professor of Agriculture at Arkansas State University. In 2018 she was elected a fellow of the American Association for the Advancement of Science.

Bart Bonikowski
is an American sociologist. Prior to joining the faculty at New York University, Bonikowski was an Associate professor of Sociology at Harvard University.

Mondaire Jones
is an American attorney and politician from the state of New York. He is a Democratic candidate in the 2020 elections seeking to represent in the United States House of Representatives.

Lemont
is a rural locality in the local government areas of Northern Midlands and Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about east of the town of Oatlands.

Rimini
is an unincorporated community in Clarendon County, South Carolina, United States. The community is located west southwest of Summerton, and west of Manning.

Katayoun Khosrowyar
is an Iranian - American football coach and head coach of the Iran U-19 National Women Football team since 2018. She moved to Iran in 2005 during her first visit when she was only 17, and became a professional football player and then member of Iran National Team.

Rolando Del Maestro
is the William Feindel Professor Emeritus in Neuro-Oncology and the Director of the Neurosurgical Simulation Research Center at the Montreal Neurological Institute at McGill University. Del Maestro possesses one of the largest private collections of materials related to Leonardo da Vinci.

Pascal Blanc
is a French politician and engineer. He is member of the Union of Democrats and Independents party, and served as mayors of Bourges since 2014.

Marcus Love Naazii Anafu
is a Ghanaian philanthropist and volunteer who the founded the Love Foundation Club. He completed Navrongo Senior High School in the Uper East Region of Ghana.

Muhammad Asif Jalali
was an Afghan comedian TV presenter. Asif Jalali was born in 1966 in Kapisa province, but grew up in Logar province, Afghanistan.

Iman Farzin
is an Iranian sports executive and administrator, freelance photographer, Interpreter and former team official of Iran National Beach Soccer Team and former member of Football Federation Islamic Republic of Iran. He also is FIBA TV Operations and Venue Manager in Iran since 2017, after he left working for the AFC as a local Broadcast Operations Manager.

Kkondae Intern
is a 2020 South Korea television series starring Park Hae-jin and Kim Eung-soo. The workplace comedy-drama series is about what happens when a man finally gets a chance to lord over a previous boss, who made his life miserable during his rookie days with the his old school ways.

Caipora
is an extinct genus of large New World monkey that lived during the Pleistocene. It contains a single species, Caipora bambuiorum.

Frith Lake
is lake in the Unorganized Part of Thunder Bay District in northwestern Ontario, Canada. The lake is on Kelvin Island, a large island in Lake Nipigon, and is thus in the Great Lakes Basin.

Telfar Clemens
is a Liberian-American fashion designer and the founder of Telfar, a fashion label based in Bushwick, Brooklyn. Clemens was born to Liberian parents in Lefrak City, Queens.

Erika Franklin Fowler
is an American political scientist. She is an Associate professor of Government at Wesleyan University, having previously served as a Robert Wood Johnson Scholar in Health Policy Research at the University of Michigan School of Public Health.

Karin Oberleitner
is an Austrian former professional tennis player. Oberleitner represented Austria in a 1985 Federation Cup tie against the USSR in Nagoya, where she featured in a dead rubber doubles match with Barbara Pollet, losing to Svetlana Cherneva and Larisa Savchenko.

Abdullahi Dan Kananeji
, known as Abdullahi Burja, was the sixteenth ruler of Kano. Through forging of powerful alliances and the creation of trade routes, Burja shifted the identity of the Kano Sultanate towards trade and commerce, what Kano and the Kanoan people are known for today.

Witan Sulaeman
is an Indonesian professional footballer who currently plays as winger or attacking midfielder for Serbian SuperLiga club Radnik Surdulica and the Indonesia under-19 team. On 17 August 2019, Witan signed a contract with Liga 2 side PSIM Yogyakarta.

Barandamasu Tsamiya Dan Shekarau
, known as Tsamiya, was the King of Kano from 1307 until his death at the hand of his half brother Usman Zamnagawa in 1343. He ascended to the throne after the death of his father.

Kananeji Dan Yaji
, Known as Kananeji was the 13th ruler of Kano and for a period, the ruler Zazzau. He reigned from 1390 - 1410.

Thodraa
is a 2018 Tamil-language drama film directed by debutante Madhuraj and stars Prithvi Rajan and newcomer Veena Nandakumar. The film is directed by Madhuraj, a former assistant of Bhagyaraj.

Hawaiian Gardens
is a 2001 German-American film directed by Percy Adlon and featuring Richard Bradford, Tzi Ma, Richard Roundtree and Florian David Fitz.

Muhammad Kanta Kotal
, also known as Kanta Kotal, was a Hausa Warrior and Military General who became the first King of Kebbi, now a state in Northern Nigeria. Kanta was the chief in charge of the Province of Kebbi, then under the Songhai Empire.

Gabrielle Villiger
is a Swiss former professional tennis player. She played college tennis for Anderson College in South Carolina.

Santubong River
where it empties into the South China Sea.

Barbushe
was a hunter and pagan chief priest who was the most prominent leader of the indigenous animists of Dala, a place which would become the most important site in the history of the foundation of Kano, now a state in Northern Nigeria. Barbushe was the son of Buzame, who was the son of Garageje, who was one of the four sons of Dala.

Muhammad Bugaya Dan Tsamiya
, known as Bugaya, was a King of Kano who reigned from 1385 - 1390. Muhammad was the son of and Maganarku.

ATK Mohun Bagan
is an Indian professional football club based in Kolkata, West Bengal founded on 1 June 2020. In March 2014, it was announced that the All India Football Federation, the national federation for football in India, and IMG-Reliance would be accepting bids for ownership of eight of nine selected cities for the upcoming Indian Super League, an eight-team franchise league modeled along the lines of the Indian Premier League cricket tournament.

Frith Lake
is lake in geographic Churchill Township the Unorganized North Part of Sudbury District in northeastern Ontario, Canada. The lake is in the Saint Lawrence River drainage basin.

Trevon Moehrig-Woodard
is an American football Safety for the TCU Horned Frogs. Moehrig attended Smithson Valley High School in Spring Branch, Texas, just north of San Antonio, where he played cornerback for the Rangers in addition to running track.

Bangorville
is an unincorporated community in southwestern Jefferson Township, Richland County, Ohio. Settlers from Penobscot County, Maine, formed the community in the 1840s, and named it after Bangor, Maine.

Mount Worthington
is a elevation double-summit mountain located in the eastern Olympic Mountains in Jefferson County of Washington state. It is set within Buckhorn Wilderness, on land managed by the Olympic National Forest.

Syed Ahmed Reza Hossain Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Dinajpur-1 in February 1996.

Abdul Halim Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Dinajpur-4 in February 1996.

AZM Rezwanul Haque Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Dinajpur-5 in February 1996.

Mansur Ali Sarkar Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Undivided Dinajpur-10 in 1979.

Emita
is a rural locality on Flinders Island in the local government area of Flinders in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about north-west of the town of Whitemark.

Lorenzo Thurston Durand
was an American lawyer and politician. Lorenzo T. Durand was born in Morehouseville, New York on December 9, 1849 to parents George H. Durand and Margret McMillan.

Australaugeneria
is a genus of marine annelids in the family Polynoidae. The genus includes 4 species which are commensal on octocorals.

Fusispermum
is a genus of flowering plants in the violet and pansy family Violaceae, native to Costa Rica, Panama, Columbia, Ecuador and Peru. It is basal to the other genera in Violaceae.

Mujibur Rahman Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Dinajpur-2 in February 1996.

Gaurav Taneja
is an Indian Aircraft Pilot, Fitness expert and a YouTube personality from Delhi. He is well known for his two YouTube channels Flying Beast and FitMuscle TV.

Gabala
is a genus of moths in the family Nolidae. The genus was erected by Francis Walker in 1866.

Alex S. Vitale
is an author and professor of sociology at Brooklyn College. He is also the coordinator of the Policing and Social Justice Project at Brooklyn College.

A. F. M. Rezaul Haque Chowdhury Bangladeshi
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Dinajpur-2 in 1988.

Edward Irvine Halliday
was born on 7 October 1902 at Garston, Liverpool to parents James Halliday and Violet Irvine. He first attended Liverpool College of Art.

Zhong Ni
is a Chinese former professional tennis player who competed during the 1980s. Zhong was a member of the China Federation Cup team between 1984 and 1987, appearing in a total of 11 ties.

Phil Monsour
is an Australian-Lebanese singer and songwriter. He has been active since the 1990s as a lead guitarist-vocalist for the band Popproperly and his solo material.

Dame Lynda Bethridge Topp
, is one half of the Topp Twins, a music comedy duo of New Zealand, the other member being her twin sister Jools Topp. Lynda Topp has been singing and entertaining with her sister for decades, touring live music and comedy performances as well as TV and film.

Gossia
pubiflora is a species of plant in the Myrtaceae family that is endemic to coastal central east Queensland. It is a shrub or small tree that grows to a height of tall.

Lackrana
is a rural locality on Flinders Island in the local government area of Flinders in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about east of the town of Whitemark.

Karim Strohmeier-Merino
is a Peruvian former professional tennis player. A right-handed player, Strohmeier featured in three Federation Cup ties for Peru in 1987, against Brazil, Malta and Norway.

Chowdhary Mohmmad Hussain
was an Indian Politician and was a Bureaucrat. He was part of 4th, 6th, 8th and 9th Jammu and Kashmir state Legislative assembly.

Shin Jin-seo
is a South Korean professional Go player currently ranked first in professional ratings with an ELO of 3756. He is the first person to reach an ELO of 3700.

Ivan Arkadin
was a Soviet actor. Honored Artist of the RSFSR.

Gerrit Walther
is a German historian. Born Kiel, Walther studied literature, history and philosophy at the Goethe University Frankfurt from 1980 to 1986 and completed an editorial training course at a daily newspaper.

Jasmine R. Marcelin
is a Caribbean-American infectious disease physician and an Assistant Professor in the Department of Internal Medicine at the University of Nebraska Medical Center. Marcelin is also the Associate Medical Director of the Antimicrobial Stewardship Program and as well as the Co-Director of Digital Innovation and Social Media Strategy at UNMC.

Lual Mayen
is a South Sudanese Video Game Developer and entrepreneur based in Washington, D.C., US . He was born in 1993 at the Aswa refugee camp in Sudan. In 2004, his family relocated to a refugee camp in Uganda.

Heinz Maurer
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Zbigniew Malicki
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Mathias Tallberg
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Sabon Wuse
is the headquarters of Tafa local government area of Niger State of the Federal Republic of Nigeria.

Wolf-Eberhard Richter
is a German sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Jens Christensen
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Morten Nielsen
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Kodikurichi
is a village in Tenkasi, Tamil Nadu, India. It is on National Highway 744, and in the foothills of the Western Ghats, near Coutrallam Falls.

Susan McCormack
is a New Zealand lawyer and the chancellor of the University of Canterbury, Christchurch, New Zealand. In 1994, McCormack and Fiona Wakefield founded the first female law firm in Christchurch.

Anthony Teuma
is a Maltese priest of the Catholic Church who has been appointed Bishop of Gozo. Anton Teuma was born in Xaghra, Gozo, Malta, on 11 January 1964.

Anne-Julie Beaulieu
is a Canadian badminton player who competes in international level events.

David Baldwin
is an English football executive who serves as CEO of the English Football League. He was appointed to the role of CEO of the English Football League in December 2019, replacing Shaun Harvey, and officially began on 17 June 2020.

Igor Guerrero Larrosa
is a Spanish chemist and a Professor in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. His research in general is based on organic chemistry and inorganic chemistry, specifically on the areas of inorganic catalysis and organic synthesis including the application to C-H and decarboxylative activation.

Kam Shan
.

Phebalium
distans, commonly known as the Mt. Berryman phebalium, is a species of small tree that is endemic to south-east Queensland. It is more or less covered with silvery to rust-coloured scales and has warty branchlets, linear leaves and creamy yellow flowers in umbels on the ends of branchlets.

TG Omori
, also known as Boy Director is a Nigerian music video director and cinematographer. TG Omori has directed music videos for recording artists across various genres of new generation, includes Olamide, Wizkid, Burna Boy, Tekno, Kiss Daniel, Fireboy DML, Falz, Timaya, Naira Marley, and many others.

Winston Cowie
is the Manager of Marine Policy at the Environment Agency Abu Dhabi, United Arab Emirates. He is a film director, New Zealand author of discovery history and the New Zealand Land Wars, has represented the United Arab Emirates at international rugby, is a Master Diver with a regular column in the Dive Pacific and New Zealand Magazine, and is a Fellow of the Royal Geographical Society.

Amish Devgan
is an Indian journalist and television news anchor, who is the managing editor of News18 India. Before News18 India, Devgan was the editor and a news anchor of Zee Business from 2014 to 2015.

Mmabatho Olive Mokause
is a South African politician serving as a Delegate of the National Council of Provinces, representing the Northern Cape. She is a member of the Economic Freedom Fighters.

Joanne Robin Morris
is a former New Zealand lawyer and law lecturer. She served as a member of the Waitangi Tribunal for 24 years, from 1989 to 2013.

Miss Collins
is a 1924 portrait painting by Australian artist William Beckwith McInnes. The painting depicts Miss Gladys Neville Collins, the daughter of J.T.

Miss Polo International
2021 will be the 3rd edition of Miss Polo International pageant, to be held on September 2021 at Bali, Indonesia. As of , 16 contestants have been selected.

Charles Raphael de Almeida
, commonly known as Charles, is a Brazilian footballer. He currently plays for Remo.

Agni Webbed
is a digital rock venture founded by Bharat Swamy in 2020, and is seen as a promising online platform. He released the original song The Monster Within in May 2020 and was awarded the highest ratings for the first half of 2020 by the music communication portal Music Plus.

Capital XTRA
Reloaded, is a Global-owned radio station that broadcasts from London, nationally on DAB Digital Radio, on the Global Player App, on Smart Speaker and Online. Its output is mainly Old Skool classics from the 1990s and 2000s.

Judith Vizuete Recuenco
is a Spanish female handballer who plays a centre back for Universitatea Cluj-Napoca.

Shwetvarna
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India.The elevation of Shwetvarna is and its prominence is . It is 111th joint highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Epigrammata Bobiensia
is a collection of texts including epigrams and poems. The original manuscript was found in the library of Bobbio Abbey in 1493, but was lost.

Vitters Shipyard
is a shipyard specialized in building large sailing yachts. It is located in the town of Zwartsluis in the Netherlands.

Lewis A.Engman
was an American lawyer, who served as the Chairman of the Federal Trade Commission from 21 February, 1973 to 31 December,1975. He is also credited with being instrumental in passing legislation keeping in consistency with the interests of both Research-based and generic drug companies.

Peter Meijer
is an American politician of the Republican Party and belongs to the Meijer family, the owners of the Meijer supermarkets. Meijer was born in Grand Rapids, Michigan.

Susan Sandvig-Shobe
is an American former long track speed skater, who was active in the early 1980s. She is currently a ISU referee.

Julian Weigel
is a German footballer who currently plays as a midfielder for 1. FC Magdeburg.

Henrietta Elizabeth Thompson
, widely known as Liz Thompson, is a Barbadian lawyer, politician and diplomat who has made significant contributions to sustainable energy policy. While an elected Member of Parliament representing the Barbados Labour Party for the St. James South constituency from 1994 to 2008, she served for shorter periods as Minister of Health, Minister of Housing, Minister of Physical Development, and finally Minister of Energy and Environment.

Madeline Harrison Caviness
, FMAoA, FSA, is a scholar of European medieval art, and an expert on glass painting and medieval women as viewers of art. She is a Professor Emeritus at Tufts University in Somerville, Massachusetts.

Renapur Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the 288 seats in Maharashtra assembly in India until 2009. The redrawing of political map in 2008 made the seat defunct.

Dorie Boyce
is an American former short track and long track speed skater, who was active in the 1980s. As a short track speed skater Boyce was part of the U.S. Short Track Teams in 1978 and 1979.

Ghost Town Blues Band
is an American blues and blues rock band. Formed in 2009 in Memphis, Tennessee, United States, they have released five albums since 2010.

Kopeysk Machine-Building
plant is a largest heavy equipment manufacturer in Kopeysk, Russia. Its headquarters are in Kopeysk, Chelyabinsk, Russia.

Bouchetmella
is a genus of small sea snails, marine gastropod mollusks in the family Pyramidellidae, the pyrams and their allies.

Andrei Chiliman
is a Romanian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Krasimir Krastev
was a Bulgarian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Tsvetan Penchev
is a Bulgarian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Bogdan Kramer
is a Polish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Beatrice Gelber
is an American psychologist best known for her work on associative learning in protozoa, suggesting that synaptic plasticity is not an essential neurochemical mechanism for learning and memory. Gelber earned a doctorate in psychology from Indiana University.

Rose-Marie Karlsson
is a Swedish former long track speed skater in the 1970s and 1980s. Karlsson represented her nation twice at the World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women in 1981, finishing 26th overall and in 1983, finishing 29th overall.

Hermann Kupfner
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Hubert Porkert
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Kerala Blasters
is an Indian professional football club based in Kochi, Kerala. The club participates in the Indian Super League, the top tier of Indian football .The club was established on 24 May 2014 and began their first professional season a few months later in October 2014.They play their home matches at the Jawaharlal Nehru Stadium and its one of the most supported football clubs in India.

Change Research
is a left-leaning polling firm based in the San Francisco Bay Area. It was first incorporated as a public benefit corporation in July 2017 by Mike Greenfield, a former data scientist at PayPal and LinkedIn, and Pat Reilly, a former Democratic Party campaign operative.

Boysidia
is a genus of air-breathing land snails, terrestrial pulmonate gastropod mollusks in the family Gastrocoptidae.

Sondre Auklend
is a Norwegian footballer currently playing as a midfielder for Viking.

Dion Drena Beljo
is a Croatian footballer currently playing as a forward for Osijek.

Leo the Lion
is a 2005 animated film directed by Mario Cambi, written by Mario Cambi and Pierstefano Marangoni and starring Daniel Amerman, John Cygan and Matthew Mercer.

Ardivaghan
is a townland in Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located to the north-west of the town, and is bordered by Irishtown to the north, Grange North to the south, Sarsanstown to the east and Walshestown South to the west.

Nana Kwame Bediako
popularly known as Freedom Jacob Caesar is a Ghanaian businessman, real-estate entrepreneur and philanthropist. Nana Kwame Bediako was born in Ghana and spend couple of years in the United Kingdom before returning to Ghana at age 33.

Lampak
II is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand, India.The elevation of Lampak II is and its prominence is . It is 142nd joint highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Troy Marc Williams
. Williams began his collegiate career at Washington and redshirted his true freshman season.

Zeppelin LZ
95 was a U-class zeppelin of the Imperial German Military. One successful reconnaissance mission.

Nomada
obtusifrons is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Blue Sky
is an upcoming South Korean television series based on the early days of South Korean boy band BTS. The story, which mixes reality and fiction, begins when the group members were students and follows them to their debut days.

Stefan Atanasovski
is a Macedonian handball player who plays for RK Vardar 1961.

David Gashoski
is a player for the major Macedonian handball team RK Vardar 1961, otherwise HC Vardar, in pivot position. He spent the years of his youth in the Vardar Juniors team, the B team of RK Vardar that competes in the VIP Super League regular season.This year, 2020, he was promoted to RK Vardar as one of the most talented future players.

Filio
was a Hansa A Type cargo ship which was built as Njong in 1944 by Stettiner Vulkan Werft AG, Stettin, Germany for Deutsche Afrika-Linien, Hamburg Germany. She was seized as a prize of war in 1945, passing to the Ministry of War Transport and renamed Empire Garland.

Dimitrios Karapatakis
is a Cypriot sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Naomi Chayen
is a biochemist and structural biologist. She is a professor of Biomedical Sciences at Imperial College London, where she leads the Crystallization Group in Computational and Systems Medicine.

Nomada argentata
is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Marios Karapatakis
is a Cypriot sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Dimitar Georgiev
is a Bulgarian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Mitko Kabakov
is a Bulgarian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Adrian Arendt
is a Romanian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Nomada
panzeri is a Palearctic species of nomad bee.

Mircea Carp
is a Romanian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Ivan Brandejs
is a Czech sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Ashin Thittila
or Thittilabivamsa. He is said to be the first religious worker among the Burmese monks left for a foreign country to do Buddhist missionary work by living there for long years, to be exact, 14 consecutive years in England..

Marco Savelli
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Roberto Gazzei
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Manfred Kaufmann
is a Brazilian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Wolfgang Haase
is a German sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Wolfgang Wenzel
is a German sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1980 Summer Olympics.

Marie-Louise Mwange
is a Congolese politician and writer. Mwange was the Minister of Gender, Child and Family of DR Congo from December 2016 to May 2017.

Edwina Maud Whitney
from 1900 to 1934. She was also Assistant Professor of German from 1926 to 1934.

Guy Grossmith
is a Zimbabwean sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Nasser Karam
is an Egyptian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Derek Hudson
is a Botswana sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Lord North
is an Irish-bred, British-trained Thoroughbred racehorse. After winning his only race as a juvenile in 2018 he won again on his three-year-old debut but ran poorly on his next start and was subsequently gelded.

Susan E. Celniker
is an American biologist, a staff scientist at Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory and an adjunct professor Comparative Biochemistry department at UC Berkeley. She is the co-director of the Berkeley Drosophila Genome Project.

Carolyn Marino Malone
is an American medievalist and academic. She is Professor of Art History and History at USC Dornsife College, Los Angeles, California, with a PhD in Art History and Medieval Studies from the University of California, Berkeley.

Tu Guangming
is a Chinese sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Arshad Choudhry
is a Pakistani sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

El-Mahdi Holly
is an American politician from the state of Georgia. A member of the Democratic Party, Holly has served in the Georgia House of Representatives for the 111th district.

Philippe Willems
is a Belgian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Jacopo Trulla
is an Italian rugby union player. His usual position is as a wing, and he currently plays for Calvisano as a permit player and for Zebre.

Headingley Hill Congregational Church
is a redundant Unitarian church located at the corner of Headingley Lane and Cumberland Road, in the Headingley area of Leeds, West Yorkshire, England. The church, which is a Grade II listed building, was designed in the Gothic Revival style by Cuthbert Brodrick and completed in 1866.

Amnon Wolf
is an Israeli actor and voice actor. Born in Haifa, Wolf began studying at the Hebrew Reali School before moving on to study at the Nissan Nativ Acting Studio.

Ralph Norman
of the Parliament of England for Leicester in 1294 and 1306.

Obinna Ogba
is a Nigerian senator. In June 2019 he was elected chair of the Ebonyi Football Association.

Lasioglossum
lativentre is a Palearctic species of sweat bee.

Milad Karimi
is a Kazakhstani artistic gymnast. In 2017, he won the bronze medal in the horizontal bar event at the 2017 Asian Artistic Gymnastics Championships held in Bangkok, Thailand.

Henry de Carleton
of the Parliament of England for Leicester in 1306.

William le Palmer
, was an English Member of Parliament. He was a Member of the Parliament of England for Leicester in 1307 and 1314.

Arthur H. Charles
was an American politician from Maine. Charles, a Republican from Portland, three terms in the Maine Legislature between 19551960.

Justine Kerfoot
was an author and outdoors-woman who moved to the Boundary Waters in 1928 and helped establish the Gunflint Lodge. Justine Kerfoot was born in 1906 in Barrington, Illinois to George W and Mae Spunner.

Margaret Rose Kelsick
was a Montserratian politician. In 1961 she became the first woman to be elected to the Legislative Council.

Richard Foxton
, was an English Member of Parliament. He was a Member of the Parliament of England for Leicester in 1334.

Williams
played his senior provincial rugby in South Africa for . He made his test debut for the Springboks in 1971 against the touring French team on 12 June 1971 at the Free State Stadium in Bloemfontein. He also played test matches against Australia in 1971, England in 1972, the British Lions in 1974 and the 1976 All Blacks.

Richard Clerk
, was an English Member of Parliament. He was a Member of the Parliament of England for Leicester in 1334.

Lorenzo Colombo
is an Italian professional footballer who plays as a forward for Serie A club Milan. Colombo is an exponent from Milan youth academy.

Andrea Papetti
is an Italian professional footballer who plays as a centre back for Serie A club Brescia Calcio. Papetti is an exponent from Brescia Calcio youth academy.

Brooke Pinto
is an American lawyer. In June 2020, she won the special election to succeed Jack Evans on the Council of the District of Columbia, representing Ward 2.

Watlington Park
is an English country house with its surrounding grounds of approximately , located atop an escarpment in the Chiltern Hills, approximately southwest of Christmas Common and southeast of Watlington, Oxfordshire. The estate formed part of a royal park until 1632, when Charles I sold the land to William Stonor of the nearby Stonor Park in order to raise funds for his government.

East Contra Costa Fire Protection District
is an agency that is responsible for providing fire protection in the most eastern section of Contra Costa. The district currently has three fire stations with three fire fighters each.

Bonallack
is an estate and former barton in the civil parish of Constantine, Cornwall. The estate is named after the Banethlek family and is on the northern bank of the Helford River.

Sturgeon High School
is a public secondary school in Sturgeon, Missouri. It is operated by the Sturgeon R-V School District and serves a small part of north central Boone County, Missouri.

Bregenz Hafen
railway station is a railway station in the town of Bregenz, the capital of the district of Bregenz in the Austrian state of Vorarlberg. It is adjacent to the Bregenz ferry terminal, which offers connections to various points on Lake Constance.

Lady Wood
is the second studio album by Swedish singer Tove Lo. It was released on 28 October 2016 by Island Records.

Liam Cameron
is an English former professional boxer who competed from 2009 to 2018. He held the Commonwealth middleweight title from 2017 to 2018 and challenged twice for the super-middleweight version between 2015 and 2016.

Abdullah Al-Salem
began writing Nabati poetry from the age of 9 by reciting poems about his father, as he says about himself. He created a blog in 2005 spreading his literary creativity.

Nariman Kurbanov
is a Kazakhstani artistic gymnast. He competed at the World Artistic Gymnastics Championships in 2017, 2018 and 2019.

Robert J. Schmitz
is plant biologist and epigenomicist at the University of Georgia where he studies the generation and phenotypic consequences of plant epialleles as well as developing new techniques to identify and study cis-regulatory sequences. He is an associate professor in the department of genetics and the UGA Foundation Endowed Pant Sciences Professor.

Anisul Haque Chowdhury
is a politician from the Dinajpur District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Dinajpur-1. Chowdhury was elected to parliament from Dinajpur-1 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Clodia Laeta
, was a Roman vestal virgin. Clodia Laeta belonged to a prominent family.

Pseudosenegalia
is a small genus of flowering plants in the legume family, Fabaceae. It belongs to the subfamily Mimosoideae.

Angleton Times
was a newspaper headquartered in Angleton, Texas. The newspaper, initially based in Velasco, Texas, was established in 1892.

Boulevard Selatan Station
is a light rail station of the Jakarta LRT Line A. The station is located at East Kelapa Gading, Kelapa Gading, North Jakarta. The station is one of the six stations of the first phase of Jakarta LRT Line A which opened on 1 December 2019.

St Gerards Catholic Church
is the first Redemptorist church to be constructed in Zimbabwe. It was in 1959 when Fr Gerald Hughes, C.Ss.R, who was the Provincial Superior of the Redemptorists in London, got a request from Archbishop Framcis Markall SJ to come and work in the Archdiocese of Harare.

Deborah Evetts
is a fine bookbinder and book conservator. Evetts was born and trained in England.

Stillwater Canyon
is a long winding canyon along the Green River in Canyonlands National Park on the border line between Wayne and San Juan counties in southeastern Utah, United States. The canyon begins at Bonita Bend in the central part of the National Park.

Eric John Logan McInnes
is a British chemist and a Professor in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. His research in general is based on inorganic chemistry and magnetochemistry, specifically on molecular magnetism, EPR spectroscopy and coordination chemistry.

Legacy Russell
is an American curator and writer. She is associate curator of exhibitions at the Studio Museum in Harlem.

Fred Lonidier
is an American photographer. Lonidier has been active since the early 1970s.

Seager
, also known as Tom Page, is a radio producer and radio presenter from Bristol, known for producing and presenting on RISE Up Breakfast show. Worked in radio since 2015.

Phebalium
drummondii is a species of small shrub that is endemic to Western Australia. It has smooth branchlets covered with silvery scales, broadly elliptic to egg-shaped leaves with silvery scales on the lower side and bright yellow flowers arranged in umbers on the ends of branchlets.

Paradox Lake
is a 2002 Polish-American drama film directed by Przemyslaw Reut and starring Matt Wolf and Jessica Fuchs. At the 18th Independent Spirit Awards, Reut won the Someone to Watch Award.

Parasenegalia
is a small genus of flowering plants in the legume family, Fabaceae. It belongs to the subfamily Mimosoideae.

John James McCullough
is a Canadian political commentator, columnist, political cartoonist and YouTuber. He is known for his political commentary videos and his videos on Canadian Culture, Politics, and Social studies.

Martin Peak
is a mountain summit in the Olympic Mountains and is located in Jefferson County of Washington state. It is located within Olympic National Park.

Nicolas Sansu
is a French politician and engineer. He is member of the French Communist Party and served as mayors of Vierzon since 2008.

Charles Abani
is a Nigerian-British Diplomat, International Development Professional and the United Nations Resident Coordinator in Ghana. Previously, he was Director for West, Central Africa and Haiti at Chemonics International and has previously served as Chief of Party for USAID Civil Society Project in Nigeria . Charles Abani was born in Afikpo, Nigeria to an Igbo Father and English mother.

Triluorosulfate
is an ion with the formula SOF. This term is ambiguous with three fluorosulfate ions.

Dhola Post
was a border post set up by the Indian Army in June 1962, in the Namka Chu river valley located north of the McMahon Line. On 20 September, the post was attacked by Chinese forces from the Thagla Ridge to the north, and sporadic fighting continued till 20 October when an all-out attack was launched by China leading to the Sino-Indian War.

Anastasia Myskina
was the defending champion, but lost in round two. Maria Sharapova won the title, defeating Alicia Molik in the final.

Pedro del Hierro
also known as Del Hierro is a Spanish fabrics and clothing company specialising in high-end, luxury cashmere and wool products, stablished in 1974 by Spanish designer Pedro del Hierro.

Pedro del Hierro
was a Spanish fashion designer.

Phebalium
elegans is a species of spreading shrub that is endemic to Western Australia. It has warty branchlets, wedge-shaped leaves and two to five white flowers arranged in umbels on the ends of branchlets.

Viscount Melbourne
was launched in Shields in 1835. She was the largest merchant vessel built in Shields to that time.

Beth L. Chance
is an American statistics educator. She is a professor of statistics at the California Polytechnic State University.

Hasinur Rahman
is a former Bangladesh Army and Rapid Action Battalion officer. He had the rank of Lieutenant Colonel when he was sacked from the Army.

LZ
74 was an R Class super-zeppelin belonging to the Imperial German Navy. The airship took part in three attacks on England dropping of bombs.

Julia Parker Wightman
and Purl Parker.

Bayfair Center
is a regional shopping mall and power center in San Leandro, California. It was among the first malls in the East Bay of the San Francisco Bay Area.

Andrea F. Young
is an American experimental physicist and assistant professor at the University of California, Santa Barbara. In 2018, he was awarded the New Horizons in Physics Prize for his work on van der Waals heterostructures and quantum Hall phases.

Caroline Colijn
is a Canadian mathematician and epidemiologist. She holds a Canada 150 Research Chair in Mathematics for Evolution, Infection and Public Health at Simon Fraser University.

Memana
is a rural locality on Flinders Island in the local government area of Flinders in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about north of the town of Whitemark.

Talaititama Talaiti
is a Niuean politician and member of the Niue Assembly. Talaiti is a long-serving member of the Assembly, and has represented the village of Vaiea since being elected unopposed in 1992.

Cariye
or Cariyes was a title and term used for category of enslaved women concubines in the Islamic world of the Middle East. They are particularly known in history from the era of the Ottoman Empire, where they legally existed until the mid 19th-century.

Veivosa Taka
is a Tongan politician and Member of the Legislative Assembly of Tonga. He is a member of the Democratic Party of the Friendly Islands.

KSPR-TV
was a television station broadcasting on channel 6 at Casper, Wyoming, United States, between 1957 and 1959. It was owned by radio station KSPR.

Sameer Maskey
is a computer scientist, educator and entrepreneur. He is currently the Founder and CEO at Fusemachines Inc and an Adjunct Associate Professor at Columbia University.

Barbara W. Snow
is a practicing therapist based out of Salt Lake City, Utah. Snow was a central figure in the Satanic ritual abuse moral panic in Utah in the late 1980s and early 1990s.

Suraya binti Yaacob
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kedah State Executive Councillor.

Haitham Kassem
is a Yemeni commander associated with the Southern Movement and loyal to the Marxist Southern Transitional Council. On December 15th, 2017, he and his men were trapped by Houthis and many were killed.

Bruce Bradley
was an American radio personality of the 20th century. Bradley was born and raised in Rochester, New York.

Richard Whitten
is a painter and sculptor of mixed Asian and American ancestry working in Rhode Island. Whitten is known for his painted games and toy-like sculptures.

Bartoszcze
is a Polish-language surname. It is a patronymic surname derived from the given name Bartosz.

Azman bin Nasruddin
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kedah State Executive Councillor.

JD.ID
is e-commerce company service based in Jakarta, Indonesia. JD.ID started operating in Indonesia since October 2015.

Sato
is considered by many to be the best female pitcher, and by some the best female baseball player, in the world. She can throw close to 80 miles an hour.

Castro Carazo
was a Costa Rican-born composer. He graduated from the Royal Conservatory of Music in Barcelona.

Palana
is a rural locality on Flinders Island in the local government area of Flinders in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about north of the town of Whitemark.

Didier Ben Loulou
, is a Franco-Israeli photographer. Didier Ben Loulou was born on 29 May 1958 in Paris, France.

Szymonowicz
or Szymonowic is a Polish-language surname. It is a patronymic surname derived from the given name Szymon.

Paul Tavernier
was a French painter who specialized in hunting scenes and animals. He was a student of Alexandre Cabanel, Adolphe Yvon and Gustave Guillaumet, who advised him to visit North Africa as a means of lightening his palette.

Laxman Ganesh Thatte
, also known as Kartar Singh Thatte, was a maverick Hindu right wing activist. He contested several elections, either as a hobby or to make political points on a wider stage, but he always lost.

Ranga
is a rural locality on Flinders Island in the local government area of Flinders in the North-east region of Tasmania. It is located about south-east of the town of Whitemark.

Josh Alfred Chibuike
, known as Josh2funny, is a Nigerian stand-up comedian and Instagram personality recognized for creating original skits with more than ten characters. Born in Umudioka, Anambra State, Nigeria, into a family of six, he is the second child.

Allan Sutton
, was an English Member of Parliament. He was a Member of the Parliament of England for Leicester in 1347.

Michael Radanovics
and composer. Born in Steyr, Radanovics passed his school-leaving examination in 1976.

Michael Rainey Jr
. is an American actor.

Sandman Animation Studio
is a Chinese animation studio based in Suzhou, Jiangsu, China. Headed by Kieron Seamons, Sandman is a full animation production studio, covering every area of animation including 2D, 3D, FLASH and DIP.

Zak Hill
is an American football coach who is currently the offensive coordinator and quarterbacks coach at Arizona State University. He was previously the offensive coordinator at Boise State University.

William Humberstone
was an English Member of Parliament. He was a Member of the Parliament of England for Leicester in 1377.

Chikballapur
is one of the 224 constituencies in the Karnataka Legislative Assembly of Karnataka a south state of India. It is a part of Chikballapur Lok Sabha constituency.

Jack Rabbit
was a wooden roller coaster located at Clementon Park in Clementon, New Jersey. Opening in 1919, built by Philadelphia Toboggan Coasters and designed by John A. Miller, the coaster was open for 81 years before closing to the public in 2002.

Robert Ling Kui Ee
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kedah State Executive Councillor.

Mohamed Faki Mwinyihaji
is a Kenyan politician. He is the current senator of Mombasa County

Guram Odisharia
is a Georgian poet and writer, who previously served as the Minister of Culture and monument Protection in Georgia from 25 October 2012 to 21 July 2014. Guram was born in Sukhumi, Georgia.

Curio
avasimontanus is a succulent plant in the daisy family of the Curio genus that is native to Southern Africa, eastern Africa and Saudi Arabia. The plant has long, narrow stems that are pencil-like with a purple-green hue, and soft spines on their sides, in addition to orange coloured hawkweed-like flowers.

Neville Lancelot Goddard
was an American mystic author who was famous for his writing on metaphysical subjects. He interpreted Bible from a psychological perspective, i.e. treating it not as a record of historical events, but a collection of parables on how the human mind works.

Curio
sulcicalyx is a small succulent plant in the daisy family that is native to South Africa and Namibia. It is only 4 inches tall and has tuberous roots, with dark green leaves that would have short white hairs.

Stewart Madzayo
is a Kenyan politician. He is the current senator representing Kilifi County.

Siganus
canaliculatus is a species of ray-finned fish in the family Siganidae. It is native to the western Pacific Ocean and Indian Ocean where it occurs on reefs and in lagoons.

Jean-Marc Holder
is a Trinidad and Tobago sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Manfred Weiss
.

Luc Choley
is a French sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Golich Juma Wario
is a Kenyan politician. He is the current senator representing Tana River County.

Armanto Ortolano
is a Greek sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics, the 1988 Summer Olympics, and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Paolo Semeraro
is an Italian sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Ingvar Bengtsson
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Chris Pratt
is an Australian sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Wolfgang Gerz
is a German sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Lo Wai
is a village in Tsuen Wan District. Hong Kong.

MSME-Champions
is a technology-driven centralized control room, grievance management, and information platform launched by the Ministry of Micro, Small and Medium Enterprises under Government of India. The Prime Minister of India, Narendra Modi launched the portal on 9 May 2020.

Hassan Vidhan Sabha
seat is one of the 224 seats in Karnataka state assembly in India. It is part of Hassan Lok Sabha seat.

Rulan Yeh
is an American badminton player who competes in international level events. She is a two-time bronze medalist at the Pan Am Badminton Championships.

Cold Hanworth
medieval settlement is a deserted medieval village in Lincolnshire, England, next to the village of Cold Hanworth and about north of Lincoln. It is a Scheduled Monument.

Cleophas Malala
is a Kenyan politician. He is the current senator of Kakamega County.

Palazzo Erizzo Nani Mocenigo
is a palace in Venice located in the San Marco district and overlooking the Grand Canal between Palazzo Da Lezze and Palazzo Contarini delle Figure. It was built by the Erizzo family in 1480 in the Venetian Gothic style and then passed to the Nani family in 1537.

Balappa Bhimappa Chimmanakatti
is a politician from the state of Karnataka. He is a leader of Indian National Congress.

Christopher Malala
is a Kenyan politician who is the current senator for Bomet County.

Rulien Yeh
is a former American badminton player who competed in international level events. She is a two-time bronze medalists at the Pan Am Badminton Championships, her doubles partner is her twin sister Rulan Yeh.

Andrej Csemez
is a Slovak amateur boxer who fights out of KO Box Club Galanta. He won a bronze medal at the 2019 European Games and a gold at the 2018 European Union Championships, both at middleweight.

John Nderitu
is a Kenyan politician. He is the current senator for Laikipia County.

Ku Abdul Rahman bin Ku Ismail
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kedah State Executive Councillor.

Samson Cherarkey
is a Kenyan politician who is the current senator representing Nandi County.

William Campion
was an English politician in the 16th Century. Rythe was born in London.

Tini Howard
is an American comic book writer. She is best known for her work on X.

John Richard Kilbee
is an English former first-class cricketer. The son of Lieutenant Laurence Kilbee, he was born at Victoria in British Hong Kong during his fathers military service there.

Okwilague Shamac Ibrahim
is a Nigerian Film producer, and businessperson. Okwilague Shamac Ibrahim, popularly known as Greatiby, was born on September 23, 1987, and is from Jattu-Uzairue, Etsako-west Local Government Area, Edo State.

Anuar Loitiptip
is a Kenyan politician who is the current senator for Lamu County.

Aaron Cheruiyot
is a Kenyan politician. He is the current senator representing Kericho County.

Queen Bess Island Wildlife Refuge
is located on Queen Bess Island in the southern portion of Barataria Bay, Jefferson Parish, Louisiana. The entire island was designated a refuge in 2019 and a restoration project completed in February 2020.

Kaithal
railway station is located in Kaithal district in the Indian state of Haryana and serves Kaithal. Kaithal railway station is located at an altitude of above mean sea level.

Gulbarga Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the seats in Karnataka state assembly in India, until 2008, when it was made defunct. It was part of Gulbarga Lok Sabha seat.

Hillary Mutyambai
is the current Inspector-General of police in Kenya. He is married to Susan Nzioki and they have two children David and Lucy.

Marc Erzberger
is a Swiss windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Pigment Orange
13 is an organic compound and an azo compound. It is a commercial orange pigment.

Thomas Nisbet
is a Bahamian windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Antonio Esteban
is a Dominican windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Babacar Wade
is a Senegalese windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Jo Jin-seop
is a South Korean windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Bromley Little Theatre
is a community theatre in Bromley in the London Borough of Bromley, England and is a member of the Little Theatre Guild of Great Britain and its president is the actor Michael York. The theatre was established in 1938 on its present site which was converted from an old Victorian bakery.

Alisha
- Madonna of India is a 1992 Hindi-language pop album by Indipop star Alisha Chinai. It was highest grossing certified platimum pop album of the year in India.

Ken Choi
is a Hong Kong windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Halimaton Shaadiah binti Saad
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kedah State Executive Councillor.

Gert Hendrik Muller
is a former South African rugby union player. Muller represented the Schools team at the 1965 annual Craven Week tournament and after finishing school, he furthered his studies at Stellenbosch University.

William Morgan
was an English politician in the 16th Century. Rythe was born in Chilworth, Surrey.

Flavio Pelliccioni
is a Sammarinese windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Policarpio Ortega
is a Filipino windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Hugh Watlington
is a Bermudian windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Tang Qingcai
is a Chinese windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Saard Panyawan
is a Thai windsurfer. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

David Hackford
is a British windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Manuel Dalmau
is a Puerto Rican windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Eric Graveline
is a Canadian windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Mauricio Toscano
is a Mexican windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

The Park
at OWA is an amusement park in Foley, Alabama, United States. Opened on June 21, 2017, the park is a part of a shopping center.

Lockheart Indigo
is 2020 detective indie video game created by Harmless Games. The player controls Beatris Summers, a private detective has arrived to the grand and wealthy mansion with hundreds of rooms who deceives the rich family into revealing their dark secrets, interrogate one of them who is the real killer.

Ken Klein Jr
. is a windsurfer who represented the United States Virgin Islands.

Eduardo Bellini
is a Spanish windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Margaret Milne McConnachie Farquharson
was a Scottish suffragette, MP candidate and leader of the National Political League campaigning for Palestine. Farquharson was born in 1884 and in 1908 she graduated with a Masters degree from the University of Glasgow.

Peter Bonello
is a Maltese windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Dirk Meyer
is a German windsurfer. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Greg Hyde
is an Australian windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Gildas Guillerot
is a French windsurfer. He competed in the Windglider event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Ken C. Winters
is an American psychologist known for his research on addictive behaviors such as problem gambling. He is a senior scientist at the Oregon Research Institute, an adjunct faculty member in the Department of Psychology at the University of Minnesota, and a consultant to the Office of Research and Economic Development at Florida International University.

Sindgi Vidhan Sabha
seat is one of the seats in Karnataka state assembly in India. It is part of Bijapur Lok Sabha seat.

Angrabari
or Amreshwar Dham located near Khunti, Jharkhand, is a Hindu temple complex dedicated to the Hindu deity Shiva. The temple is built and maintained by Amreshvar Dham Prabandh Samiti.

John Edward Weston Kirby
is an English former first-class cricketer. Kirby was born in February 1936 at Low Fell, County Durham.

Lerista
hobsoni is a species of skink found in Queensland in Australia.

Senecio
candicans, commonly known as angel wings and sea cabbage, is a succulent flowering plant in the Senecio genus that is native to India and is grown as an ornamental plant elsewhere. Growing up to 1 metre tall, it is a clump-forming plant with broad, serrated and ovate leaves that are silvery-white in colour.

Bezuidenhout
played senior provincial rugby in South Africa for . In 1972, he toured with the South African Gazelles, a South African under-24 team, to Argentina. Bezuidenhout made his test debut in 1972 at Ellis Park against the touring English side captained by John Pullin.

Bangalore South Vidhan Sabha
seat is one of the seats in Karnataka state assembly in India. It is part of Bangalore Rural Lok Sabha seat.

Nicholas John Turner
is a British chemist and a Professor in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. His research in general is based on biochemistry and organic chemistry, specifically on biotechnology, cell biology, biocatalysis and organic synthesis.

Guo Yuhua
is a Chinese liberal intellectual and professor of sociology at Tsinghua University, noted for her criticism of the Chinese government. Guo was born in 1956 to parents who worked as military officers for the central government in Beijing.

Molly Mitchell Spearman
is a teacher and politician serving as the South Carolina Superintendent of Education. She took office in 2015 and her current term is scheduled to end in 2023.

Kisenge
is a small town in the Democratic Republic of the Congo. The city is located in the south of the country, very close to the border with Angola.

Lole Courtois
is a French badminton player who competes in international level events. She is a two-time bronze medalist at the European Junior Team Badminton Championships and has also competed in the 2014 Youth Olympics.

Dean Kino
is an Australian former cricket administrator and first-class cricketer. Kino was born in April 1971 at Melbourne.

Purity Ngina
is a Kenyan Academician and a lecturer at Strathmore University in Nairobi. At age 28, she became Kenyan youngest Doctor of Philosophy graduate in Biomathematics from the same University She was born in present day Nyeri County in rural Kenya in 1990.

Baldwin
v. New York was a decision of the U.S. Supreme Court in which the Court ruled that defendants have a Sixth Amendment right to a jury trial for offenses requiring imprisonment of more than six months.

Asbury Coward
in 1854.

Amy Jack
is an American singer. A native of Oklahoma, Jack was raised by a family of music teachers.

Veronica Paeper
is a South African choreographer and dancer. Paeper was born on 9 April 1944 in Port Shepstone but trained with Dulcie Howes at the University of Cape Town Ballet School after her family moved to Cape Town.

Grant Kraemer
. Kraemer was born in Northridge, California and attended Notre Dame High School in Sherman Oaks, California where his father, Jeff, was an assistant football coach.

Tiphia
minuta is a Palearctic species of tiphiid wasp.

Tehran
is an Israeli espionage thriller television series created by Moshe Zonder for the Israeli public channel Kan 11. The series is written by Zonder and Omri Shenhar and directed by Daniel Syrkin.

Zheng Kaiping
is a Chinese sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

James Clator Arrants
was a politician from South Carolina. He served in the South Carolina House of Representatives, the U.S. Navy, returned to the state house, served in the South Carolina Senate, and was appointed a family court judge.

Xu Xianyuan
is a Chinese sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Navarasan
is an Indian Kannada film director, actor, producer and screenwriter. He most predominantly known for the 2019 film Damayanthi.

John Bodden
is a Caymanian sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Carson Ebanks
is a Caymanian sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Ranil Dias
is a Sri Lankan sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Eric Zucker
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Trace Tervo
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Ockert Antonie Roux
is a former South African rugby union player. Roux represented schools in 1964 and played his senior provincial rugby in South Africa for Northern Transvaal.

Lasioceros
is a genus of moths in the family Erebidae. The genus was erected by George Thomas Bethune-Baker in 1904.

Duke Ragan
is an American amateur boxer who won silver medals at the 2017 World Championships and the 2019 Pan American Games, both in the bantamweight division.

William Kinnerk
was an Irish Gaelic footballer and local politician. At club level he played with the John Mitchels club and was an All-Ireland Championship medallist with the Kerry senior football team.

Chris Tillett
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Richard Lumb
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Alejandro Terrones
is a Mexican sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Hermann Megenthaler
is a Mexican sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Edwin Katamba
better known by his stage name MC Kats is a Ugandan Journalist and events Mc.Fille Mutoni is his former partner and the pair have a child together. MC Kats attended Namilyango Primary School, Busoga College Mwiri for Secondary School, Kitante Hill School for Uganda Certificate of Education and Makerere High School for Uganda Advanced Certificate of Education . He joined UMCAT School for Diploma in Journalism and Mass-Communication.

Lim Kui-aon
is a Taiwanese sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Iowa Department of Cultural Affairs
is an agency of the Iowa state government, headquartered in Des Moines. Agencies of the department include the Iowa Arts Council, Produce Iowa, the State Historical Society of Iowa, the Iowa City and Des Moines research centers, and the Iowa State Society, Museum, and Preservation agency.

Lim Yal-aon
is a Taiwanese sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Juan Barahona
is a Chilean sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Dhruv Bhandari
is an Indian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Peter Hans
is the ninth and current president of the North Carolina Community College System, serving since 2018. On June 19, 2020, the University of North Carolina Board of Governors elected him to serve as the president of the university system, effective August 1, 2020.

Territory Storm
, also referred to as Northern Territory Storm or NT Storm, is an Australian netball team that represents Netball Northern Territory in the Australian Netball League. Territory Storm have played in the ANL since 2008, missing only the 2016 season.

Farokh Tarapore
is an Indian sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics, the 1988 Summer Olympics, and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Martin Tenhove
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Megan Blanche Murray
is an American epidemiologist and an infectious disease physician. She is the Ronda Stryker and William Johnston Professor of Global Health in the Department of Epidemiology at the Harvard T.H.

Myrmosa
atra is a Palearctic species of velvet ant .

Sean Reeves
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Rolf Nehn
is a Brazilian sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Peter Hugh Raspin
is an English former first-class cricketer. Raspin was born in November 1951 at Farnworth, Lancashire.

Luc DuBois
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Goniophora
is an extinct genus of clams. It lived during the Ordovician to Permian periods.

Satoru Yamamoto
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Yutaka Takagi
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

John Haselrigge
was an English politician in the 16th Century. Hare was born in Noseley and was the brother in law of the English jurist, politician and diplomat Bartholomew Clerke.

Gonzalo Heredia
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Lampak
I is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand, India.The elevation of Lampak I is and its prominence is . It is 114th highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Carlos Irigoyen
is an Argentine sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Jeremias Carlos David
is a Dutch footballer who now plays for NWC Asten in his home country. Carlos David started his senior career with Helmond Sport in the Dutch Eerste Divisie, where he made sixteen appearances and scored zero goals.

Peter Newlands
is a British sailor. He competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Cathy Foster
is a British sailor. She competed in the 470 event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Peter von Koskull
is a Finnish sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Johan von Koskull
is a Finnish sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Wolfgang Hunger
is a German sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics, the 1988 Summer Olympics, and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Ardivaghan
is a townland in Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located to the south-east of the town, a section of the N52 road passes through the area, and the Royal Canal passes to the southeast of the townland.

Ardivaghan
is a townland in Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located to the north of the town, to the south of Lough Owel.

Joelson Fernandes
, or more simply Joelson, is a professional football player who plays for Sporting CP. Born in Guinea Bissau, Joelson represents Portugal internationally.

Rebecca Rhynhart
is an American politician from Pennsylvania. A member of the Democratic Party, she serves as the City Controller of Philadelphia.

Schizodus
is an extinct genus of shallow marine clams. It lived from the Silurian to Early Jurassic periods.

Chrysis
mediata is a Palearctic species of cuckoo wasp.

Louw
played for in the South African provincial competitions and was a member of the Transvaal side that shared the Currie Cup with in 1971. Louw played two test matches for the Springboks, both during the 1971 tour of Australia.

Chrysis
rutiliventris is a Palearctic species of cuckoo wasp.

Yann Dedet
is a French film editor and actor. Dedet has been working in film editing since the early 1970s.

Bixley Division
, Suffolk is an electoral division of Suffolk which returns one county councillor to Suffolk County Council. It is located in the North East Area of Ipswich and equates to Bixley Ward of Ipswich Borough Council.

Floriana Tuna
is a Romanian chemist and a Senior Research Fellow in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. Her research in general is based on inorganic chemistry and magnetochemistry, specifically on molecular magnetism, EPR spectroscopy and quantum computing.

North Shore Medical Center
is a teaching hospital and a comprehensive stroke center in Miami, Florida. It is owned by Dallas-based Tenet Healthcare and started operations in 1953.

Seyed Milad Torabi
known as Milad JT ( was born in 19 August 1991 know as Milad JT is an Iranian musician Milad JT was borned in August 1991 in Rafsanjan He spent years traveling the world and attended festivals where he majorly worked behind the scenes of the events. His ability to perform some exceptional music was combined with his business skill through which he set a bar for other musicians.

Walter Rhodes
was an American blues musician, who recorded briefly in the late 1920s and was unusual in being a blues accordionist and singer from Mississippi. It was reported that Rhodes may have been the oldest Delta musician recorded.

Podalonia
affinis is a Palearctic species of thread-waisted wasp.

Harry Garcia
is an American politician and businessman serving as a member of the New Mexico House of Representatives from the 69th district. Garcia served as a member of the United States Marine Corps in the Vietnam War.

William James Affleck Shepherd
was an English illustrator and cartoonist, primarily known for his anthropomorphic animal drawings. He rarely used his first forename and consequently most of his works are simply signed J.A.S.

Aila Tartia
is a Finnish former long track speed skater, who was active in the 1970s and 1980s. Tartia represented her nation six times at the World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women.

Ensar Arslan
is a German footballer who plays as a winger for Darmstadt 98. Arslan made his professional debut for Darmstadt 98 in the 2.

Turid Lillehagen-Welo
.

Peter J. Delfyett Jr
is an American engineer and Professor of Optics and Photonics at the University of Central Florida College of Optics and Photonics. He was awarded the 1996 Presidential Early Career Award for Scientists and Engineers.

Juan Fischer
is a Colombian director, actor, producer, writer and acting coach best known for his 1999 film, Buscando a Miguel. After working in various jobs and participating in acting classes, Fischer switched to filmography in the late 1990s.

Dudpukuria-Dhopachari Wildlife Sanctuary
is a wildlife sanctuary located near Rangunia in Chittagong District of Bangladesh. The area of the sanctuary is , and is located at the Khurosia and Dhopchari range of Chittagong South Forest.

Laoise Kelly
is a traditional Irish music composer and harpist. She won the 2020 Musician of the Year Award.

Troy Isley
is an American amateur boxer who won bronze medals at the 2017 World Championships and the 2019 Pan American Games, both in the middleweight division.

Vladimir Fedorovich Anikeyev
is the former ringleader of the anonymous group Shaltai Boltai. He was detained in Russia in November 2016, and was later sentenced to two years in prison for unlawful access to computer information.

Tengragiri Wildlife Sanctuary
is a wildlife sanctuary located near Taltali in Barguna District of Bangladesh. The sanctuary is locally known as Fatrarban.

Cheryl D. Miller
is an American graphic designer, known for her contributions to racial and gender equality in the graphic design field. Miller was raised in a multiracial and multicultural family.

Fraunhofera
is a genus of flowering plants in the family Celastraceae. It has only one species, Fraunhofera multiflora, called pau branco, which is a Brazilian endemic.

Willy Verginer
is an Italian contemporary artist and sculptor who lives and works in Ortisei, Italy.

Jay Davis
is a former professional baseball player. He played seven seasons as an outfielder with the Hanwha Eagles of the Korea Baseball Organization.

Nicholas J. Weise
is a British chemist and a Lecturer in the Department of Chemistry at The University of Manchester. His research in general is based on organic chemistry and molecular biology, specifically on enzymology, biocatalysis and industrial biotechnology.

Cheryl Lynne Selby
is an American politician. She serves as the mayor of Olympia, Washington.

Matsuri Kazamaki
, an whose job it is to exorcise evil , and Suzu Kanade are childhood friends entering high school. Unbeknownst to her, Suzu is an Ayakashi Medium and Kazamaki has been secretly exorcising the dangerous ayakashi she attracts.

Sydney F. Wise
is a Canadian historian who became the official historian of the Canadian military in 1966. He joined the Royal Canadian Air Force in 1942 and became a pilot.

Rob Twizz
born Robert Nikic, is an American Rapper, musician from Yonkers, New York. He is best known for his content published on WorldStarHipHop with music videos and comedy ciphers generating over 15 million YouTube views.

Bin Badal Barsaat
is a 1975 Pakistani film starring Zeba and Mohammad Ali. Zarina struggle unsuccessfully to have a child.

Mohd Firdaus bin Ahmad
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kedah State Executive Councillor.

Emile-Roger Lombertie
is a French politician and physician. He is current member of the Union for a Popular Movement Party and served as mayors of Limoges since 2014.He was elected mayor of Limoges by the municipal council on April 4, 2014.

Alenka Luzar
was a Slovenian-American physical chemist known for her research on the dynamics of hydrogen bonds in water. Luzar is originally from Ljubljana, and as a teenager was a member of the Slovenian junior national ski team at the Junior Olympic games associated with the 1968 Winter Olympics in Grenoble.

Tunnel Vision
is the 11th short in the animated web series Looney Tunes Cartoons. Wile E. Coyote, on his usual hunting rounds, spies Road Runner having a drink from a water fountain during his morning sprint.

Military Courts of the Republic of Kazakhstan
are the specialized courts of the Armed Forces of Kazakhstan that deal with criminal cases concerning military personnel and the civilian personnel of the Ministry of Defence. The military courts are part of the judiciary of Kazakhstan.

Roy Shaw
OBE was a Labour Party politician in London, England. He was the Leader of Camden London Borough Council from 1975 to 1982.

Rocket Arena
is an upcoming third-person shooter online video game developed by Final Strike Games and published by Electronic Arts. It is set to be released for Windows, PlayStation 4 and Xbox One in July 2020.

Jamaal Bowman
is an American educator and politician. He is the presumptive Democratic Party candidate in the 2020 elections seeking to represent in the United States House of Representatives.

Florentino Mendes Pereira
is a Bissau-Guinean politician.

Little Earth
is a residential housing area in Minneapolis, Minnesota, United States that is home to nearly 1,500 people, many of whom are American Indian. The residential housing association at Little Earth considers itself a united people of 39 different American Indian tribes, but the area is not an urban reservation, a common mischaracterization.

Zanthoxylum
ovalifolium is a species of flowering plant in the family Rutaceae. Common names include thorny yellowwood, oval-leaf yellow wood and little yellowwood.

Apsley
is a rural locality in the local government areas of Central Highlands and Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south-west of the town of Oatlands.

Kyaw Win
is a Burmese writer, politician, and journalist. He won the Myanmar National Literature Award two times.

Govindgarh Palace
, also known as Govindgarh Fort, is a palace located in Govindgarh, Madhya Pradesh, India. Built in the 19th century by the ruler of Rewa, the fort served as a royal residence on the shores of Lake Govindgarh.

Althea
T. L. Simmons was a civil rights activist and attorney with the NAACP for over 35 years.

Melissa Middleton
is an American former professional tennis player. Middleton, a right-handed player, was born and raised in Houston, Texas.

Rajamagal
is a Tamil language drama airing on Zee Tamil. It premiered on 28th October 2019.

Caroline
was launched at Philadelphia in 1800, possibly under another name. She appeared in British records from 1814.

Morgan K. Deare
is an American actor who works in film, television and theatre and is based in London. Deare was born in New Iberia, Louisiana on November 19, 1945.

Jane M. Booker
is an American statistician, formerly a research in the Statistical Sciences Group of the Los Alamos National Laboratory. She is known for her work on expert elicitation and on using probability theory to formalize reasoning from fuzzy logic.

Sayyid Muhammad-Husayn Muhammad-Ali Nasrallah
is an Iraqi judge, prosecutor, and served as the president of Court of Appeal for four different Iraqi provinces. He retired in May 2014.

Michael F. Sheahan
is formerly served as Sheriff of Cook County, Illinois and as a Chicago alderman. Sheahan was born in 1944 or 1945.

Tea Party New Zealand
is an unregistered political party in New Zealand. The party claims to be anti-racist, socially democratic, and fiscally conservative.

Najmi bin Ahmad
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kedah State Executive Councillor.

Mady Sissoko
is a Malian basketball player. He is committed to play college basketball for Michigan State.

Wan Romani bin Wan Salim
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kedah State Executive Councillor.

Nyadol Nyuon
is an Australian lawyer and human rights advocate, who was born in a refugee camp in Ethiopia. She works as a commercial litigator in Melbourne and is a regular media commentator.

James Mulvey
is an illicit drug smuggler originally from Solihull. The gang smuggled illicit drugs inside hollow industrial rollers on truck from Belgium, through England to the Republic of Ireland.

Cathedral Rock
is a rock formation located north of Colorado Springs, Colorado on the U.S. Air Force Academy. The formation was part of the namesake Cathedral Rock Ranch, owned by Lawrence Lehman.

Robert Morrison
is an American scholar of Islam. He is the George Lincoln Skolfield, Jr.

Ingalls Peak
is a triple-summit mountain located in the Alpine Lakes Wilderness, along the common border of Kittitas County and Chelan County, in Washington state. Ingalls Peak is the highest point in the Teanaway area of the Wenatchee Mountains.

San Francesco di Paola Bridge
, also known as Calatrava Bridge is a road bridge in Cosenza, Italy inaugurated on 25 January 2018 ad designed by Spanish architect Santiago Calatrava.

Malashivtsi
of western Ukraine.

Elderslie
is a rural locality in the local government areas of Central Highlands and Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south-east of the town of Hamilton.

Sanjay Kalra
in Endocrinology and Metabolism at All India Institute of Medical Science, New Delhi.

Siti Aishah binti Ghazali
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kedah State Executive Councillor.

Bharat Swamy
led the first commercially successful rock band in India. He is one of the pioneers of rock music in India, and was the original composer, songwriter and vocalist for the band Agni.He is an engineer by profession, but always wanted to be one of the pioneers of rock music in India with his own compositions.

Thomas Bailly
was a Member of Parliament for Leicester in September 1397.

Bagnall Road Wood
is a local nature reserve near Milton, on the eastern fringe of Stoke-on-Trent, England. The site was a tree nursery in the 19th century.

Konstantinos Peletidis
is a Greek cardiologist and politician. A member of the communist KKE party, he has served as Mayor of Patras since 1 September 2014.

Julieanna Goddard
, known professionally as Yesjulz, is an American social-media personality, talent manager and entrepreneur. Julieanna Goddard, born on March 3rd 1990 in Miami, Florida USA.

Wen Chean Lim
is a Malaysian rhythmic gymnast. She competed at the 2006 Commonwealth Games where she won a silver medal in the team event and bronze medals in the ball and ribbon events.

Stupava Synagogue
, built in 1803, is located in Stupava, Malacky District, in Slovakia. The rectangular building is made of massive walls with simple Baroque windows and has a saddleback roof.

Brownea
rosa-de-monte is a tree in the legume family Fabaceae, native to Central America and Colombia. Its flowers may bloom for a duration of just one night.

Wessex Bristol
is an private equity investments group based in Somerset UK. owned by Ayiaz Ahmed.

Gabriela Knaul
is a Brazilian lawyer. She is a judge who was the UN Special Rapporteur on the Independence of Judges and Lawyers from 2009 until 2015.

Visaka Dharmadasa
is a Sri Lankan peace activist. She is the founder and chair of Association of War Affected Women and Parents of Servicemen Missing in Action.

TeenNick Vietnam
is a 1-hour weekday teenage block on HTV3 DreamsTV proramming Nickelodeon live-action series. Current Nickelodeon Originals Former Nickelodeon Originals

Saar Badishi
is an Israeli singer, actor, voice actor and musician. Born in Rehovot, Badishi started out in a musical organisation within the Northern Command.

Amiya Kumar Kisku
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, lower house of the Parliament of India from Jhargram constituency in West Bengal.

Phebalium
laevigatum is a species of erect, slender shrub that is endemic to Western Australia. It has glandular-warty branchlets, linear to narrow oblong leaves and white or yellow flowers arranged in umbels of about seven on the ends of branchlets.

Ernesto Olivero
. Olivero is the youngest of nine brothers.

Bulbbul
is a 2020 Indian Hindi-language supernatural drama film written and directed by Anvita Dutt. Produced by Anushka Sharma and Karnesh Sharma, the film stars Tripti Dimri, Avinash Tiwary, Paoli Dam, Rahul Bose and Parambrata Chattopadhyay.

Michel Joseph Mulloy
is an American priest of the Catholic Church. He is the bishop-elect of the Diocese of Duluth, having been appointed to the position in 2020.

Daniel Jamatia
is an Indian politician and member of the Communist Party of India. Jamatia was served as a member of the Tripura Legislative Assemblyin the year 2008 to 2018 from the Ampinagar constituency in South Tripura district.

Raja
of Papannapet or Papannaet Samsthanam was vassal of Nizam of Hyderabad. It was part of unidivided Medak district of Telangana state.The rulers of this Samsthanam had marital relations with famous Gadwal Samsthanam.

George Douglas
of Longniddry was a Scottish landowner and courtier. He was the son of Francis Douglas of Borg and Elizabeth Fairlie.

The Corner
is a 2014 Iranian drama film directed by Abed Abest. It was screened in Cairo International Film Festival.

Sagar Vidhan Sabha
seat is one of the seats in Karnataka Legislative Assembly in India. It is part of Shimoga Lok Sabha seat.

Asmaiza binti Ahmad
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perlis State Executive Councillor.

Mark Lamb
is an American sheriff. He was elected Sheriff of Pinal County, Arizona in 2017.

Carlos Rossi
is a Chilean sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Pierre G. Deslonde
was an American sugar planter who served as Secretary of State of Louisiana during the Reconstruction era. He was a wealthy freeman.

Tasha Cerda
is the mayor of Gardena, California. She was elected in 2017 and will serve until 2022.

Alexander Kelso Davis
was an American politician. He was Lieutenant Governor of Mississippi.

James Hill
was a politician and public office holder in Mississippi. He served in the Mississippi House of Representatives, including as sergeant at arms and as speaker, and was Secretary of State of Mississippi during the Reconstruction era.

Muhammed Khuda Bukhsh
was an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, lower house of the Parliament of India from Murshidabad in West Bengal.

California Watersports
is a 2001 surfing sports game for the PlayStation console released exclusively in Europe. It was developed by Theyer GFX and published by Midas Interactive.

Bruce Bayley
is a Barbadian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Sathanur Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the seats in Karnataka Legislative Assembly in India. It was part of Kanakapura Lok Sabha seat.

Howard Palmer
is a Barbadian sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Christian Flebbe
is a Venezuelan sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Josef Steinmayer
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Reto Heilig
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Witold Gesing
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Richard Coxon
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Iain Woolward
is a British sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

John Maddocks
is a British sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Leonidas Pelekanakis
is a Greek sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics, the 2000 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

JioSwitch
is an Indian File Sharing App developed by the Indian-based mobile Internet company Jio, which is in turn owned by Reliance Industries Limited.. JioSwitch is easy to use data transfer application.

Craig Winston LeCroy
is a Communitas Professor of Social Work, School of Social Work at Arizona State University. LeCroy holds a B.S.W. awarded in 1978 from San Jose State University.

Sayyid Aref Muhammad Nasrallah
is an Iraqi Shia social activist, and philanthropist. He was one of the preeminent leaders of the Islamic Action Organisation.

Mount Olive Cemetery
is a historic burial ground for African Americans in Jackson, Mississippi. It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 2017.

Istanbul Commerce University Eminonu
campus is the central campus of Istanbul Ticaret University. The campus is located at the intersection of Galata Bridge, Bosphorus, Suleymaniye Mosque, Grand Bazaar and Spice Bazaar.

Nurulhisham bin Yaakob
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perlis State Executive Councillor.

Neeraj Dangi
is an Indian politician from Rajasthan. He was elected to the Rajya Sabha, upper house of the Parliament of India from Rajasthan in the June 2020 Rajyasabha elections as an Indian National Congress candidate.

Eliel Peretz
is an Israeli footballer who currently plays as a midfielder for Wolfsberger. On 19 June 2020, Peretz signed a two-year contract with Austrian club, Wolfsberger.

Baleshwar
or Balesar Yadav was a famous Bhojpuri folk singer. His singing Birha became very popular.

Azizan bin Sulaiman
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perlis State Executive Councillor.

Gijs de Jong
is a Dutch football administrator. Gijs de Jong studied Public Administration at the University of Leiden from 1991 till 1996.

J. P. Campbell College


Geoff Blackwell
is a publisher, photographer and film-maker from New Zealand. He has conceived and developed numerous books and creative projects specialising on subjects of humanity, equality and the environment.

Hamizan bin Hassan
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perlis State Executive Councillor.

Tavares Bolden
. Bolden was born and grew up in Cleveland, Ohio and attended Glenville High School.

Netuno
is a software development platform and environment for web applications, API REST, backoffices, data integration and other kinds of projects. Netuno was created and published in 2002.

Robert Nagy
is a French windsurfer. He competed in the Division II event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Cyprus
competed at the World Games 2017 in Wroclaw, Poland, from 20 July 2017 to 30 July 2017. Cyprus has qualified one athlete to the games.

Muhammad Iqbal Memon
is a Pakistani civil servant who serves in BPS-21 Grade as the Additional Chief Secretary Services to Government of Sindh, in office since April 2020. Memon belongs to the supreme Pakistan Administrative Service and was promoted to the elite rank of BPS-21 Grade in 2020.

Alexander Olegovich Glazastikov
is a Russian co-founder of the anonymous group Shaltai Boltai. In 2017, he applied for political asylum in Estonia.

Bitvise
is a proprietary secure remote access software developed for Windows and available as a client and server. The software is based on the Secure Shell protocol, which provides a secure channel over an insecure network in a client-server architecture.

Ibn Haldun University
is a private university situated in Istanbul, Turkey. The university has several schools of education, communication, humanities and social sciences, law and political studies, and institutes of social sciences and educational sciences..

Tom Robitaille
is an American former basketball player. He played collegiately for the Rice Owls from 1955 to 1959, where he led the team in scoring during his junior and senior seasons.

Yaqoob Ijaz Butt
is a footballer who plays as a defender for Danish club . Born in Denmark, he represents Pakistan at the international level. His brother, Yousuf Butt, is also a footballer and has played alongside him for Pakistan.

Maria Bartusz
is a Polish para badminton player who competes in international level events.

Dudhmukhi Wildlife Sanctuary
is a wildlife sanctuary located near Sarankhola in Bagerhat District of Bangladesh. The area of the sanctuary is . It was officially declared as a wildlife sanctuary by the government of Bangladesh on 29 January 2012.

Chadpai Wildlife Sanctuary
is a wildlife sanctuary located near Mongla in Bagerhat District of Bangladesh. The area of the sanctuary is . It was officially declared as a wildlife sanctuary by the government of Bangladesh on 29 January 2012.

Iris Evelina Margery Brooke
later Iris Giffard, was a British artist, author and book illustrator. Brooke was born at Ryde on the Isle of Wight in January 1905 and attended Bruntsfield High School on the island.

Abdelaziz Baraka Sakin
is a Sudanese writer of fiction, whose literary work has been banned in Sudan since 2012. Since then, he has lived in exile in Austria.

Moddie Taylor
was an African American chemist who worked on the Manhattan Project from 1943 to 1945. He received a Certificate of Merit for his contributions to the project.

Ablattaria arenaria
, the snail hunter, is a beetle in the carrion beetle family Silphidae which preys on snails.. It is native to the eastern Mediterranean.

Paul Kavanagh
was an Irish criminal and a debt collector for the criminal gang run by Christy Kinahan. He was a father of two and also a brother of Gerard Kavanagh and uncle of Jamie Kavanagh.

Dhangmari Wildlife Sanctuary
is a wildlife sanctuary located at Bagerhat District of Bangladesh. The area of the sanctuary is . It was officially declared as a wildlife sanctuary by the government of Bangladesh on 29 January 2012.

IGNANT
is an online magazine based in Berlin, Germany. It covers topics related to art, design, photography, fashion and architecture and was founded in 2007 by Clemens Poloczek.

Linear Gale
opened to the public in 1998. It replaced the Ultra Twister, which closed in 1997.

Oliwia Szmigiel
is a Polish para badminton player who competes in international level events.

Devil
Within is a Japanese melodic death metal band formed in Tokyo in 2019. The band formed in March 2019 in Japanese capital Tokyo.

Khetwadi Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the seats in Maharashtra Legislative Assembly in India. It was made defunct after constituency map of India was redrawn in 2008.

Dequan Townsend
. Townsend compiled a professional mixed martial arts record of 21-8 by fighting mainly within the Midwestern United States regional MMA circuit winning various regional MMA titles before signing for UFC in June 2019.

Colin B Burgess
was an archaeologist specializing in the Bronze Age, especially in the north east of England and the Mediterranean. Originally from London, Burgess studied at Cardiff University, where he wrote an undergraduate dissertation on bronze-age metalwork from the Thames.

Los Llanos Formation
is a geological formation in the in La Rioja Province, northwestern Argentina whose strata date back to the Campanian stage of the Late Cretaceous. Los Llanos Formation over the years has been controversially described as ranging from Late Cretaceous to Miocene, but the Miocene succession was assigned to Las Mulitas Formation in 2019.

Tawanna Dillahunt
is an American computer scientist and information scientist based at the School of Information at the University of Michigan. She runs the Social Innovations Group, a research group that designs, builds, and enhances technologies to solve real-world problems.

Wycliffe Wafula Wangamati
is a Kenyan actuary and politician currently serving as the 2nd Governor of Bungoma on a Ford Kenya ticket. Wangamati came to power after defeating Kenneth Lusaka in the 2017 election.

David Goldflies
is a bassist and former member of The Allman Brothers Band. He performed with Dickey Betts and Great Southern in the mid-1970s and joined the Brothers when they reformed in 1978.

Sonarchar Wildlife Sanctuary
is a wildlife sanctuary located near Rangabali Upazila at Patuakhali District of Bangladesh. The area of the sanctuary is . It was officially declared as a wildlife sanctuary by the government of Bangladesh on 24 December 2011.

Shukrawar Peth Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the seats in Maharashtra Legislative Assembly in India, from 1962 to 1977. It was a segment of Pune.

Bruce Hewett
is a Fijian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Isaac D. Shadd
was a newspaper publisher and politician. He served as the Speaker of the House in the Mississippi House of Representatives during the Reconstruction era.

Ian Ray
is a British former marathon runner who won the 1981 Berlin Marathon. Ray is from Salisbury, England.

Maximus Mighty-Dog Mueller
II is the 2nd and current Mayor of Idyllwild.The town is known for being the first to elect a dog for mayor.

Mariam Adhbi Al Jalahma
is a Bahraini physician, civil servant and politician. In 2000 she was appointed to the Consultative Council, becoming one of its first female members.

Alamdar Hussain
is a British born actor and model. He has been featured in various photoshoots, TV commercials for international and local brands and ramp the walk for several designers.

Mehbooba
is a 2018 Telugu-language romantic drama film directided by Puri Jagannadh and starring his son, Akash Puri, and Neha Shetty. The music is composed by Sandeep Chowta.

Juan Torruella Jr
. is a Puerto Rican sailor.

Juha Valtanen
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Coelioxys elongata
is a Palearctic species of sharp-tailed bee.

Sergio Sinistri
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1984 Summer Olympics, finishing in 15th place.

Barbronia
weberi is a species of predatory freshwater leech in the family Salifidae. It is native to southeastern Asia but has spread to other parts of the world, including Australia, South America, southern Europe and the United States.

Rolf Zwicky
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Eckart Kaphengst
is a German sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Rodney E. Hood
is the eleventh Chairman of the National Credit Union Administration. He was nominated to the position and to the NCUA Board on January 19, 2019, by President Donald J. Trump.

Coelioxys
inermis is a Palearctic species of thread-waisted wasp.

Walter Schlagbauer
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Norbert Petschel
is an Austrian sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Ian Strachan
is a retired minister from Aberdeen, Scotland in the United Kingdom. He served with the Church of Scotland.

Kris George
is an Australian former professional boxer who competed from 2012 to 2018. He held the WBA Oceania super-lightweight title from 2014 to 2015 and the Commonwealth welterweight title from 2016 to 2018.

Nathan Tella
is an English professional footballer who plays as a forward for Southampton. Nathan Tella grew up in Stevenage, Hertfordshire and was educated at Edwinstree middle school and then Freman College, both in the town of Buntingford.

Brian Sweeney
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

David Sweeney
is a Canadian sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics, the 1988 Summer Olympics, and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Bernard Pichery
is a French sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Miss Disco
was an American Thoroughbred racemare that won important sprint events against colts during her racing career but who secured her place in history when, as a broodmare at Claiborne Farm, she was bred to Nasrullah and produced the very influential National Champion and Hall of Fame sire Bold Ruler. A foal of 1944, Miss Disco was bred by Alfred Vanderbilt Jr. at his Sagamore Farm in Reisterstown, Maryland.

David Campbell-James
is a British sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Robert White
is a British sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Josh Martin
is an English professional footballer who plays as a forward for Norwich City.

Old City Museum Center
or Icherisheher Museum Center is a museum in Azerbaijan. The Museum Center is a part of the State Department of the Historical and Architectural Reserve of Old City.

Bridge Division
, Suffolk is an electoral division of Suffolk which returns one county councillor to Suffolk County Council. It is located in the South West Area of Ipswich and consists of all of Bridge Ward and part of Alexandra Ward of Ipswich Borough Council.

Vadim Dmitriyevich Milyutin
is a Russian football player. He plays for PFC Sochi.

Carlotta Stewart Lai
was an educator and administrator in the Hawaiian public schools for four decades. She was the first African American school principal in Honolulu.

Chantry Division
, Suffolk is an electoral division of Suffolk which returns two county councillors to Suffolk County Council. It is located in the South West Area of Ipswich and consists of Gipping Ward, Sprites Ward and Stoke Park Ward of Ipswich Borough Council.

Andrei Dmitriyevich Bokovoy
is a Russian football player. He plays for PFC Sochi.

Sua
folkmusic is a dance song of Gond women of Chhattisgarh state. It is a song sung by women on the festival of Deepawali.

Sauermann
played for in the South African provincial competitions and was a member of the Transvaal side that defeated to win the 1972 Currie Cup. The previous year he scored the equalizing try, enabling Transvaal to share the 1971 title with . Sauermann played five test matches and six tour matches for the Springboks.

Lasioglossum
rufitarse is a Palearctic species of sweat bee.

Mohammed Sakhawat Rahman
is a politician from the Dinajpur District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Dinajpur-4. Sakhawat was elected to parliament from Dinajpur-4 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Denis Vladimirovich Popov
is a Russian footballer who plays as a goalkeeper for FC Rostov. He made his debut in the Russian Premier League for FC Rostov on 19 June 2020 in a game against PFC Sochi.

Timofey Vladimirovich Kalistratov
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Kroya Station
is a railway station located in Bajing, Kroya, Cilacap Regency, Central Java, Indonesia. The station has nine railway tracks.

Island House
is a Grade II listed building on the Barbican in Plymouth. Built between the 1570s and 1600s, it is known for being the last place of accommodation for the Pilgrim Fathers on English soil, prior to them setting sail on the Mayflower on 6 September 1620.

Mohammad Shoaib
is a politician from the Dinajpur District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Dinajpur-5. Shoaib was elected to parliament from Dinajpur-5 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Nikita Olegovich Kolotievskiy
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Andrena helvola
is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Alicia D
. H. Monroe is an American physician and the Provost of the Baylor College of Medicine.

Jarred Tuf Borland
is an American football linebacker for Ohio State. He played high school football at Bolingbrook High School in Bolingbrook, Illinois.

Kirill Ivanovich Girnyk
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Pavel Vartanovich Gorelov
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Judd Strom
is an American politician who has served in the Oklahoma House of Representatives from the 10th district since 2018.

Rena Haze
is a high school student in Tokyo who is able to see spirits and has a line of about 100 following her around everywhere she goes. One day, she runs into Joh Mitama, an agent of , a government-recognized organization whose job it is to exorcise spirits using psychic energy.

Andrena lapponica
is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Roman Yevgenyevich Romanov
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Nikita Yevgenyevich Kupriyanov
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Paul Petersen
is a former public official in Arizona who was accused of smuggling pregnant women from the Marshall Islands to at least three different states, in an adoption scheme. He pled guilty to charges of human smuggling, communication fraud, fraud and other charges in June 2020.

Huda TV
is a Satellite TV and internet television channel free-to-air, English language, Islamic-focused, offers the message of Islam in English.

Paul D
. McNicholas is an Irish-Canadian statistician.

Melamchi Water Supply Project
is a project to supply drinking water to Kathmandu by diverting 170 million liters of water per day. The project started in 1998 and still is under construction as of 2020.

Yacoub Shaheen
, born 27 february 1994 in Bethlehem, is a Palestinian Christian singer resided in the West Bank. Shaheen won the TV program Arab Idol, a program with approximately 120 million viewers in the Arab World.

William Kakhaberovich Rogava
is a Russian football player of Georgian descent. He plays for FC Rostov.

Vilnius Square
is a public square in the Georgian capital of Tbilisi. It honours the city of Vilnius, which is the capital of the Republic of Lithuania.

Danil Dmitriyevich Khromov
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Tamaz Arkadyevich Topuria
is a Russian football player of Georgian descent. He plays for FC Rostov.

Balgarrett
is a townland in the civil parish of Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located to the west of Mullingar town, and the Royal Canal flows to the east of the townland.

Vladimir Aleksandrovich Abramov
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Abhimanyu
was a student activist stabbed to death in Maharajas College, Ernakulam on July 2, 2018. He was a student of BSc Chemistry.

Sergey Levonovich Kochkanyan
is a Russian footballer who plays as a defender for Russian club FC Rostov. He made his debut in the Russian Premier League for FC Rostov on 19 June 2020 in a game against PFC Sochi.

Albert Regge
was a German trade union leader. Born in Pillkallen in East Prussia, Regge worked in the fur trade from 1881.

Robin Haydon Darwall-Smith FRHistS
is a British archivist, based in Oxford and associated with several Oxford University College archives. Robin Darwall-Smith studied classics at the University of Oxford as an undergraduate and postgraduate.

Podbrege
is a village in the municipality of Jegunovce, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 179 inhabitants.

Nikita Sergeyevich Kashtan
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

KRSD-TV
and KDSJ-TV were television stations broadcasting on channel 7 at Rapid City, South Dakota, and channel 5 at Lead, South Dakota, United States. Owned by Heart of the Black Hills Stations, the two stations went on air in 1958 and 1960, respectively, and ceased broadcasting in 1976.

Maksim Pavlovich Stavtsev
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Ratae
is a village in the municipality of Jegunovce, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 411 inhabitants.

Ivan Sergeyevich Komarov
is a Russian football player. He plays for FC Rostov.

Tudence
is a village in the municipality of Jegunovce, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 431 inhabitants.

Ruzaini bin Rais
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perlis State Executive Councillor.

Staro Selo
is a village in the municipality of Jegunovce, North Macedonia. It used to be part of the former municipality of Vratnica.

Wim Neeleman
is a Dutch curler and curling coach.

Aleksey Alekseyevich Kornienko
is a Russian footballer who plays as a midfielder for Russian club FC Rostov. He made his debut in the Russian Premier League for FC Rostov on 19 June 2020 in a game against PFC Sochi.

Kimberly Sherrille Weems
is an American statistician, active in mentoring women and members of underrepresented minority groups in statistics and encouraging them to pursue advanced studies in statistics. She is an associate professor of statistics at North Carolina Central University.

David Wilson
was a Scottish footballer who played as an inside left. Born in Fife, he originally played for local teams including Cowdenbeath and East Fife, as well as a spell in England with Gainsborough Trinity, before joining Heart of Midlothian in 1904, following the path taken by his younger brother George who had signed for the Edinburgh club a year earlier.

Rozieana binti Ahmad
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perlis State Executive Councillor.

Tooning Out the News
is an animated political satire television series executive produced by comedian and The Late Show with Stephen Colbert host Stephen Colbert. The series airs on CBS All Access.

Kapit-Bisig Canada
is a Canadian mutual aid network, initiated by BAYAN Canada member organizations such as Migrante Canada and Anakbayan Canada. It is a cooperative among over one hundred emergency response agencies in Vancouver, Calgary, Edmonton, Fort McMurray, Winnipeg, Toronto, Kitchener, Ottawa and Montreal.

Ham Enterprises
incorporated as Ham Enterprises Ltd is a Real Estate subsidiary of Ham Group, a Ugandan conglomerate owned by businessman Hamis Kiggundu. It was established in 2010 as a private company by owned Hamis Kiggundu also having Majority of the Shares.

Vladimir Georgievich Serov
was a Soviet fighter pilot and deputy squadron commander in the 159th Fighter Aviation Regiment during World War II who was credited with 39 solo and six shared aerial victories.

Lodgepole Pines
, Lyell Fork of the Merced River, Yosemite National Park is a black and white photograph taken by Ansel Adams in 1921. Its one of the photographs that he took at the beginning of his career, when he was following pictorialism, a style inspired by painting, that he soon would abandon for a more realistic approach to photography.

Florentine
is a rural locality in the local government areas of Central Highlands and Derwent Valley in the Central and South-east regions of Tasmania. It is located about north-west of the town of New Norfolk.

Siti Berenee binti Yahaya
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perlis State Executive Councillor.

Francesco Wirz
is an Italian windsurfer. He competed in the Division II event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Penisimani Fifita
is a Tongan politician and Member of the Legislative Assembly of Tonga. He is a member of the Democratic Party of the Friendly Islands.

Richard Gorman
was a Canadian painter and print-maker. He was known for his magnetic prints which he created using ink covered ball-bearings manipulated with a magnet held behind the drawing board and for his large paintings with their broad handling of colour.

Abdul Sawer Chowdhury
is a politician from the Dinajpur District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Dinajpur-6. Chowdhury was elected to parliament from Dinajpur-6 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Christiana Mary Demain Hammond
was an English painter and illustrator. She was a member of the Cranford School of illustration, and illustrated reissues of classic English texts from the 19th century.

Piney Orchard Nature Preserve
is a 45-acre protected wetland forest with several miles of improved trails located in southern Odenton, Maryland. The Preserve is surrounded by 1,500 acres of river woodland between the residential communities of Piney Orchard, Two Rivers, Woodwardville, and Amberfield.

Charles Murray
was a British trade unionist and socialist activist. Murray worked as a boot closer.

Ndidi Ekubia MBE
,, graduating in 1995.

Sapna Cheryan
is an American social psychologist. She is a Full professor of social psychology in the Department of Psychology at the University of Washington.

Carlos Iniesta Mira
is a Spanish windsurfer. He competed in the Division II event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Zora Martin-Felton
is an American museum director and curator. She established the education department at the Anacostia Community Museum, which is a museum in the Smithsonian Institution, and worked as the Education Director there.

Jan Bonga
is a Swiss windsurfer. He competed in the Division II event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Christopher Lawrence
is an Australian windsurfer. He competed in the Division II event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Big White Duel
2 is a Hong Kong television medical drama produced by TVB. It stars Roger Kwok, Moses Chan, Kenneth Ma, Nancy Wu and Natalie Tong.

Australonoe willani
is a species of marine annelids in the family Polynoidae, and the sole member of the genus Australonoe, known only from the south-east Indian Ocean at Rottnest Island, Western Australia. The body is short, with 39 segments bearing 16 pairs of elytra.

Black Lives Matter
refers to the organized global movement, Black Lives Matter, dedicated to non-violent civil disobedience in protest to alleged incidents of police brutality on Afro-American individuals since 2013.

Thomas Wallner
is an Austrian windsurfer. He competed in the Division II event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Golden Eighties
, also known as Window Shopping, is a 1986 Belgian musical film directed by Chantal Akerman. The film explores themes such as consumerism, feminism, and Jewish identity through the lens of a shopping mall.

Guy Tripp
was an American business executive and an officer in the United States Army. A longtime executive manager and executive for several companies, he served as chairman of the of the Westinghouse Electric Corporation board of directors from 1912 until his death.

Adela del Rosario Cabezas de Allwood
is a Salvadoran physician, who is considered the second woman to graduate from the doctorate in medicine at the University of El Salvador. Furthermore, Adela de Allwood has published several books throughout her medical career.

Tomala
is a Polish-language surname. It is a patronymic surname derived from the given name Tomasz.

Yang Shih-chien
is a Taiwanese politician. Yang earned a masters of electrical engineering and a doctorate from Northwestern University.

Jasjeet Sekhon
is the Robson Professor of Political Science and Statistics at the University of California, Berkeley. In 1999 Jasjeet Sekhon received his PhD from Cornell University.

Tomal
is a Polish-language surname. It is a patronymic surname derived from the given name Tomasz.

Tred
is an online app that is used to sell motor vehicles. The company was founded in Seattle, Washington, and was cofounded by Grant Feek and John Wehr in 2012.

Runnymede
was a barque rigged sailing ship built in London in 1825, and wrecked in the Andaman Islands in 1844. It sailed from London on 20 December 1839 to Hobart, Tasmania with 200 male prisoners captained by W B Forward with surgeon Peter Fisher, and arrived in Hobart on 28 March 1840.

Charles E. Wheeler Wildlife Management Area
is a brackish tidal marsh, nature preserve and hunting area owned by the state of Connecticut located in Devon of the mouth of the Housatonic River.

Agbeli Kaklo
is a Ghanaian snack made from cassava and eaten by the locals, the snack originated from the southern part of the Volta Region. It is very crunchy and mostly eaten with hard coconut.

Olivier Cottagnoud
.

Mount Field
is a rural locality in the local government areas of Central Highlands and Derwent Valley in the Central and South-east regions of Tasmania. It is located about north-west of the town of New Norfolk.

JioChat
is an instant messaging VoIP app developed by the Indian-based mobile Internet company Jio, which is in turn owned by Reliance Industries Limited. JioChat is a video calling and Instant messaging VoIP app available on Android, iPhone and JioPhone.

Mahmoud Hekmatnia
is an Iranian legal scholar and professor of law at the Research Institute for Islamic Culture and Thought. He is known for his works on intellectual property.

Laki Niu
is a Tongan judge and former Member of the Legislative Assembly of Tonga. He is the first Tongan to sit on the Supreme Court of Tonga in over a hundred years.

Gyarvi Sharif
is a Sufi festival celebrated as the anniversary of union of Abdul Qadir Jilani with Allah. It is also called as Fatiha Yazdaham or Fatiha Do Azdaham.

Pulgaon Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the seats in Maharashtra Legislative Assembly in India. It was made defunct after constituency map of India was redrawn in 2008.

Gokulathil Seethai
is a 2019 Tamil family love soap opera starring Nandha, Aasha Gowda, and Nalini in the lead roles.. This show aired on Zee Tamil from 4th November 2019 at 8.00 PM.

Teh Chai Ann
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perlis State Executive Councillor.

Alla Ayodhya Rami Reddy
is an Indian politician.He was elected to the Rajya Sabha, upper house of the Parliament of India from Andhra Pradesh in the 2020 Rajyasabha elections as a member of the YSR Congress Party. Alla Ayodhya Rami Reddy hailed from Guntur district.

Guru Ram Rai Darbar Sahib
or Guru Ram Rai Gurudwara is a Sikh place of worship in Dehradun, India, dedicated to Guru Ram Rai, eldest son of Guru Har Rai, the seventh of the ten Sikh Gurus. Guru Ram Rai settled here with his followers in mid-17th century, after he was banished by the Sikh orthodoxy for mistranslating scripture in front of the Mughal emperor Aurangzeb, so as to not cause offence.

City
on Lock is the second studio album by American hip hop duo City Girls. The album leaked in its entirety on June 19, 2020, wherafter it was released on June 20 by Quality Control Music, Motown Records and Capitol Records.

Jonathan Freedman
is an American journalist, writer, and social activist who won the 1987 Pulitzer Prize for Editorial Writing. Freedman was born in Rochester, Minnesota, where his father finished his residency at Mayo Clinic.

Neslihan Damla Akdemir
, better known as Danla Bilic, is a Turkish Internet personality and beauty YouTuber. Akdemir first drew attention to herself by a series of incidents on Twitter.

Park Lane
by CMP is a shopping center located West District, Taichung, Taiwan. The shopping center is jointly operated by the CMP Group and Eslite Bookstore.

Arvind Lele
was among the veteran Jana Sangh and BJP leaders from Maharashtra state in India. He was associated with RSS from early age, and made a name for himself as a Jana Sangh leader in Pune area in 1960s.

Daria Bujnicka
is a Polish para badminton player who competes in international level events. She trains alongside Oliwia Szmigiel and they compete together in doubles events, they won a bronze medal at the 2019 BWF Para-Badminton World Championships in Basel, Switzerland.

Catherine Bonnet
is a French former professional tennis player. Bonnet competed on the professional tour during the 1980s and had a career best ranking of 192 in the world.

Argulica
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 315 inhabitants.

Crvulevo
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 51 inhabitants.

Kalakkral
, is an industrial area in Manali, North of Chennai, a metropolitan city in Tamil Nadu, India. In October 2011, the erstwhile Kadapakkam village panchayat is merged with Greater Chennai Corporation and it came under the jurisdiction of Greater Chennai Corporation.

Golem Gaber
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 32 inhabitants.

Gorni Balvan
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 57 inhabitants.

Sarfaraz Khan Safdar
was born in Mansehra to Nur Ahmad Khan ibn Gul Ahmad Khan. He got his early studies from Ghulam Ghaus Hazarvi in his hometown.

Dolni Balvan
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 358 inhabitants.

Guillermo Tapia
is a Mexican sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Junuzlija
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 35 inhabitants.

Kalauzlija
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 61 inhabitants.

Anant Namjoshi
was a politician in Maharashtra state in India, in 1960s and 1970s. He started his career with Congress Party, and was elected from Girgaon to the state assembly in 1962 and 1967.

Gerhard Panuschka
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Manfred Panuschka
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Kozjak
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 147 inhabitants.

James Cook
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Jamie Wilmot
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Carole Lucarelli
is a French former professional tennis player. Lucarelli played on the professional tour in the 1990s and reached a career high ranking of 175 in the world.

Tatsuya Wakinaga
is a Japanese sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Kurfalija
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 43 inhabitants.

Girgaon Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the seats in Maharashtra Legislative Assembly in India from 1962 to 1978. It was made defunct after constituency map of India was redrawn around 1975.

Natanapureesvarar Temple
is a Hindu temple dedicated to the deity Shiva, located at Thantanthottam in Thanjavur district, India. It is one of the shrines of the Vaippu Sthalams sung by Tamil Saivite Nayanar Sundarar.

Luke Carter
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

David James Mackay
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Macrerpeton
is a genus of edopoid temnospondyl within the family Cochleosauridae. It contains a single species, Macrerpeton huxleyi.

Prnalija
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 197 inhabitants.

Pazhayanaappaalayam
, is an residential area in Manali, North of Chennai, a metropolitan city in Tamil Nadu, India. In October 2011, the erstwhile Edayanchavadi village panchayat is merged with Greater Chennai Corporation and it came under the jurisdiction of Greater Chennai Corporation.

Radanje
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 471 inhabitants.

Pudhunaappaalayam
, is an residential area in Manali, North of Chennai, a metropolitan city in Tamil Nadu, India. In October 2011, the erstwhile Edayanchavadi village panchayat is merged with Greater Chennai Corporation and it came under the jurisdiction of Greater Chennai Corporation.

Tarinci
is a village in the municipality of Karbinci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 905 inhabitants.

Razman bin Zakaria
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perak State Executive Councillor.

Joscha Bach
is cognitive scientist focusing on cognitive architectures, models of mental representation, emotion, motivation and sociality. Achievements include research in novel data compression algorithm using concurrent entropy models; development of microPsi cognitive architecture for modeling emotion, motivation, mental representation.

Alappuzha Bypass
is a part of NH 66 that bypasses CBD of Alappuzha city in Kerala, India. The 6.8 km long bypass is the first of its kind elevated beach highway in the country starting at Kalarcode in the south to Kommady in the north and runs along the scenic beachside of Alappuzha city.

James Milo Alexander
was an African-American businessperson and politician in Phillips County, Arkansas. Alexander was a successful businessperson and the first African-American justice of the peace in Arkansas.

Imperial Productions
is a manufacturer of toy soldiers in Greytown, New Zealand. Operating since 1982, it produces 54 mm cast lead figurines which are painted by hand.

Sven Pagel
is a German professor for business informatics and media management. His research focuses on digital moving image communication in Internet media, UX and user research, and digital transformation.

Bahia Jawad Al Jishi
is a Bahraini civil servant, politician and diplomat. In 2000 she was appointed to the Consultative Council, becoming one of its first female members.

Bertrand Cardis
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Thierry Poirey
is a French sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Laurent Couraire-Delage
is a French sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics and the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Bengt Hagander
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Magnus Kjell
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1984 Summer Olympics.

Marcus Temke
is a Brazilian sailor. He competed at the 1984 Summer Olympics, the 1988 Summer Olympics, and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Mohd Akmal bin Kamaruddin
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perak State Executive Councillor.

Annie Isabella Cameron
was a Scottish historian. She was the daughter of Mary Sinclair, and James Cameron, a Glasgow engineer.

Khairul Shahril bin Mohamed
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perak State Executive Councillor.

Golden Horde
is an Irish-bred, British-trained Thoroughbred racehorse. As a two-year-old in 2019 he was one of the best colts of his generation in Europe, winning the Richmond Stakes, running second in the Middle Park Stakes and finishing third in the Prix Morny.

Magalie Lamarre
is a French former professional tennis player. A right-handed player, Lamarre reached a career high ranking of 169 in the world.

Chukuchuk
is a dish from cuisine of the Marshall Islands. It is a ball shaped made of calrose rice and meat shredded coconut.

Sylvester Jasper
is an English professional footballer who plays as a forward for Fulham.

Caio Jotta Collet
is a Brazilian racing driver and 2018 French F4 Championship champion. He is also a member of the Renault Sport Academy.

Ahmad Saidi bin Mohamad Daud
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perak State Executive Councillor.

Barbara Collet
is a French former professional tennis player. Collet reached a career best ranking of 286 in the world and won three ITF singles titles.

Mona Rashid Al-Zayani
is a Bahraini educator and politician. In 2000 she was appointed to the Consultative Council, becoming one of its first female members.

Casper Widell
is a Swedish footballer currently playing as a defender for Helsingborgs IF.

Amir Altoury
is an Israeli footballer who currently plays as a forward for Maccabi Petah Tikva.

Manasu Paddanu Kaani
is a 2000 Telugu drama film produced by Vinobha Goud and directed by K. Veeru. The film features Venu Thottempudi, Ramya Krishnan and Raasi in lead roles.

Darius-Dacian Ghindovean
is a Romanian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for MSV Duisburg. He made his professional debut for MSV Duisburg in the 3.

Brian Talma
is a Barbadian windsurfer. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Mohd Zolkafly bin Harun
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perak State Executive Councillor.

Herol Riiberg
is an Estonian professional footballer who plays as an attacking midfielder for Estonian Meistriliiga club Tulevik on loan from Flora.

Richard Paz
is a Filipino windsurfer. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Luke Baldauf
is a windsurfer who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Division II event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Karma Lhamo
is a Bhutanese educator and politician. She was elected to the National Assembly in 2008, becoming one of its first female members elected under universal suffrage.

David de Pury
, Baron de Pury was a Swiss banker, merchant, and philanthropist. His involvement in Triangular trade, particularly diamond and precious wood trading between Europe and South America, earned him a vast fortune.

Jiang Chen
is a Chinese windsurfer. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Magnus Torell
is a Swedish windsurfer. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Andrena
humilis is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

George Rebello
is a Brazilian windsurfer. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Isabelle Guyon
is a French-born researcher in machine learning known for her work on support-vector machines, artificial neural networks and bioinformatics. She is a Chair Professor at the University of Paris-Saclay.

Andrena
pilipes is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Iwo Kaczmarski
is a Polish footballer who plays as a midfielder for Korona Kielce.

Maria Theofili
is a Greek diplomat and ministerial official who was appointed Permanent Representative of Greece to the United Nations in September 2017. Following various postings in the Greek Ministry of Foreign Affairs, from 2013 to 2017 she served as the Greek Ambassador to France.

Francesco Intinacelli
is an Italian footballer who plays as a forward for Serie B side Ascoli.

Andrena
praecox is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Echankuzhi
, is an residential area in Manali Pudhunagar, North of Chennai, a metropolitan city in Tamil Nadu, India. In October 2011, the erstwhile Edayanchavadi village panchayat is merged with Greater Chennai Corporation and it came under the jurisdiction of Greater Chennai Corporation.

Unit
2 Games is a British video game developer based in Leamington Spa, England. It was founded in november 2017 by former Radiant Worlds co-founder and COO Richard Smithies, after Radiant Worlds was acquired by Rebellion Developments.

Gallery Media Group
is a is an American digital media holding company based in New York City. The company comprises media outlets PureWow, One37PM and podcasts Monday to Monday, Mom Brain, Your Best Life, The CMO Podcast, Royally Obsessed, and other media properties.

Uoma Beauty
is a beauty company based in the United States and founded by Nigerian-born Sharon Chuter. The company was first created to focus on inclusive beauty with fifty-one shades of foundation in six custom formulas available when it launched at ULTA Beauty.

Stuart Michael Childerley
is a British sailor. He competed in the 1988 and 1992 Summer Olympics.

Fred J. Haynes
is a Canadian politician. He is currently the mayor of Saanich, British Columbia.

Silvana Botti
is a full professor for Physics at the University of Jena. She is an expert in the development of first-principles methods for electronic excitations and methods for theoretical spectroscopy.

Alfred T
. B. Hunter was an African-American politician and farmer from South Carolina.

Erik Laubscher
was a South African artist. Born Erik Frederik Bester Howard Laubscher in Tulbagh, he grew up in Port Elizabeth.

Torben Rhein
is a German footballer who currently plays as a midfielder for Bayern Munich II.

Theo Ogbidi
is a German footballer who currently plays as a forward for 1. FC Magdeburg.

Eric Josef Arno Voufack
is a German footballer who currently plays as a right-back for Carl Zeiss Jena.

Tiago Melo Almeida
is a Portuguese professional footballer who plays as a right-back for Portuguese side Tondela.

Arabic College
, in the context of Kerala, southern India, are the equivalent of north Indian madrasas. A madrasa in Kerala is an institution where children receive basic Islamic education.

Camino Cielo
is a road and collection of hiking trails in Santa Barbara County, California located off California State Route 154 at the top of San Marcos Pass.

Gintaras Savukynas
is a professional Lithuanian handball player, who played in center back position. Savukynas with Lithuania National Handball team played in World and European championship, as well been Lithuania Handball team captain.

Dede Lovelace
is an American actress, skateboarder, visual artist, and DJ. Released in 2016, Lovelace made her acting debut in That One Day.

Ajani Russell
is an American skateboarder, actress, and model. Russell played Indigo in the 2018 film Skate Kitchen, and currently plays Indigo in the 2020 HBO T.V. series Betty.

Mamoon Sadiq
is a Pakistani sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Javed Rasool
is a Pakistani sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Valle Chico Hot Springs
is a subaerial thermal spring located at in the Sierra San Pedro Martir mountains of Baja California, Mexico. The springs are located Southwest of the town of San Felipe at an elevation of 2,041 feet.

Chan Joseph
is a Singaporean sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Richard Allen
.

Anne Nasimiyu Wasike
was the author of books and articles on education, ethics and the empowerment of the poor. Anne was also a well-known editor of several publications.

Princepal Singh
is an Indian basketball player for the NBA Global Academy in Canberra, Australia. Singh is a native of Dera Baba Nanak, Punjab, India and grew up playing volleyball.

Christian Binder
is an Austrian sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Romal Palmer
is an English professional footballer who plays for Barnsley.

Jodok Wicki
is a Swiss sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Tiger Lily Road
is a 2013 American comedy film written and directed by Michael Medeiros and starring Ilvi Dulack, Tom Pelphrey and Karen Chamberlain.

Lydia Eudoria Ashburne Evans
was an American physician. Ashburne was born around 1887.

Bulelani Mfaco
is a South African asylum seeker and activist in Ireland, and spokesperson for the Movement of Asylum Seekers in Ireland. While in South Africa, Mfaco was involved in protests calling for better housing, access to land with Abahlali baseMjondolo, healthcare and for improved policing.

Dmitry Aleksandrovich Dokuchaev
was an officer of the Russian FSB. In April 2019, he was sentenced to six years in prison for treason.

Andrena rosae
is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Bernardo Arndt
is a Brazilian sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics, the 1992 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Nigel Cochrane
is a Canadian sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Robert FitzPayne
, Lord of Fitzpaine, was an English noble. Robert was a son of Robert FitzPayne and Roberge.

Bogorodica
is a village located in the Gevgelija Municipality of North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 1001 inhabitants.

Kovanci
is a village located in the Gevgelija Municipality of North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 177 inhabitants.

Moin
is a village located in the Gevgelija Municipality of North Macedonia. It is located west of Geveglija, close to the Greek border.

Danny Roy Moore
was a conservative Democratic member of the Louisiana State Senate for one term, from 1964 until 1968. Moore served in World War II aboard a B-24 bomber making raids over Germany.

Van Wyk
played most of his provincial rugby in South Africa with and also played one season with . He made his test debut for the Springboks in 1970 against New Zealand at Loftus Versfeld in Pretoria and played in all four tests during the series against the touring All Blacks. In 1971 he played in the test series against France and Australia and in 1972, he was the hooker in the losing test against at Ellis Park.

Freizeitpark Plohn
is an amusement park in Lengenfeld, Saxony, Germany. It opened to the public in 1996.

Lerista
miopus is a species of skink found in Western Australia.

William Otim
also known as Bosmic Otim or Lucky Bosmic Otim is a Ugandan musician and politician, born and raised in Gulu. He believes that Music is a source of educational voice to the community in promoting peace.

Chernykhiv
of western Ukraine. They were born in the village

Bluebird Care
is a franchise and brand providing home care services to the United Kingdom and Ireland. The company has just over 200 franchises covrering areas in the United Kingdom and a further 26 in the Republic of Ireland.

San Antonio
is a village in Buenaventura Municipality, Valle del Cauca Department in Colombia. It is surrounded by a very dense tropical rainforest.

Andrena
semilaevis is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Curt Roggow
is an American politician who served in the Oklahoma House of Representatives from the 41st district from 1998 to 2006.

Andrena
stragulata is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Andrena
subopaca is a Palearctic species of mining bee.

Audrey Strauss
is an American attorney serving as the acting United States Attorney for the Southern District of New York. As deputy U.S. Attorney, Strauss assumed the acting position on June 20, 2020, after the previous U.S. attorney, Geoffrey Berman, stepped down amid pressure from Attorney General William Barr.

River Landscape
is a painting by the Italian artist Annibale Carracci which is part of the Samuel H. Kress Collection in the National Gallery of Art, Washington D.C. It was painted in Italy circa 1590 when Carracci and his brother and cousin were pioneering the creation of naturalistic landscape works in which the countryside was depicted for its own sake, rather than as a stylised backdrop to a religious or mythological subject.

Jo Budler
is a librarian from Kansas who served as the State Librarian of Kansas from 2010 to 2017, the sixteenth state librarian. Budler was an effective advocate for digital content in the state of Kansas, helping consolidate purchasing of digital items to save money for Kansas residents.

Ekow N. Yankah
is a Professor of Law at the Benjamin N. Cardozo School of Law, Yeshiva University. His research considers criminal law, election law and police brutality.

Novo Konjsko
is a village located in the Gevgelija Municipality of North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 136 inhabitants.

Hadrien David
, is a French racing driver. He is the youngest FIA Formula 4 Champion in history by winning the French F4 Championship in 2019, at the age of 15.

Nazirganj Dolphin Sanctuary
is a wildlife sanctuary located at Sujanagar Upazila under Pabna District of Bangladesh. It is one of the three river-based dolphin sanctuaries in Padma-Jamuna confluence, the others being the Shilanda-Nagdemra Dolphin Sanctuary and the Nagarbari-Mohanganj Dolphin Sanctuary.

Prdejci
is a village located in the Gevgelija Municipality of North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 514 inhabitants.

Shilanda-Nagdemra Dolphin Sanctuary
is a wildlife sanctuary located at Santhia Upazila under Pabna District of Bangladesh. It is one of the three river-based dolphin sanctuaries in Padma-Jamuna confluence, the others being the Nazirganj Dolphin Sanctuary and the Nagarbari-Mohanganj Dolphin Sanctuary.

Yukiko Yoshida
is a Japanese female handballer who plays as a left back for Omron Yamaga.

Nagarbari-Mohanganj Dolphin Sanctuary
is a dolphin sanctuary located at Bera Upazila under Pabna District of Bangladesh. It is one of the three river-based dolphin sanctuaries in Padma-Jamuna confluence, the others being the Nazirganj Dolphin Sanctuary and the Shilanda-Nagdemra Dolphin Sanctuary.

Juneteenth
, a celebration of emancipation of slavery, was introduced to Oregon in 1945 by Kaiser Shipyard worker Clara Peoples, was recognized by the city of Portland in 1972, and statewide in 2013. Peoples helped make Junteenth recognized by the City of Portland in 1972.

Ghar
Some in Namij area of Nam-e nik village, Iran. The natural cave is made of lime, which has expanded and expanded based on the flow of water through the limestone rocks.Sam Cave is the second deepest cave in Iran.

Russian Valley Hot Springs
is a group of hot mineral springs near a historic Russian settlement in Baja California. The springs are located fifty miles south of Tecate, near the town of Guadalupe in the Ensenada region at 1,500 feet elevation.

Isgender Handurdyevich Mulikov
is a Turkmen politician who was Minister of Internal Affairs from 2009 to 2019. He was born in the city of Ashgabat in 1975.

Harma Anna Cornelia van Kreij
is a Dutch female handballer for RK Krim.

Wen Hair Care
, stylized as WEN Hair Care, is an American hair care brand founded by Chaz Dean. Wen Hair Care was founded by celebrity hairstylist Chaz Dean.

Jean Smith Young
during the 1964 Freedom Summer.

Michal Cotler-Wunsch
is an Israeli politician. She currently serves as a member of the Knesset for the Blue and White alliance.

Polina Gorshkova
is a Russian handballer for CSKA Moscow and the Russian national team.

Phebalium
megaphyllum is a species of erect, rounded shrub that is endemic to Western Australia. It has glandular-warty branchlets, oblong to wedge-shaped leaves with a groove on the upper surface, and white flowers arranged in umbels of three to six on the ends of branchlets.

Debo Powers
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing District 3 in the Montana House of Representatives.

Alfred Bendiner
was an American architect and artist, perhaps best known for his caricatures and cartoons. He was born in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, the son of Hungarian immigrants Armin and Rachel Hartmann Bendiner.

Shah Abdullah Mahir
is the minister of state of Ministry of Health of Maldives. He was appointed as the head of the Maldives National Food and Drug Authority on 15 January 2019.

Marshallese
cuisine comprises the fare, foods, beverages and foodways of the Marshall Islands, including its food-related customs and traditions. Common indigenous and traditional foods include breadfruit, coconut, bananas, papaya, seafood, pandanus and bwiro.

Helena Roque Gameiro Leitao de Barros
was a Portuguese watercolourist and painter. Helena was the daughter of painter Alfredo Roque Gameiro and Maria da Assuncao de Carvalho Forte.

Einav Kabla
is an Israeli lawyer and politician. She currently serves as a member of the Knesset for the Blue and White alliance.

Kenneth Holmlund
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 38 in the Montana House of Representatives.

Gazette
is a British television series which first aired on ITV in 1968. It starred Gerald Harper as James Hadleigh, a millionaire who relocates from London to Yorkshire and buys a newspaper that had been founded by his father many years before.

Fujimi Pond
is located in the park, and like the ponds in Shakujii Park, Inokashira Park, and Zenpukuji Park, this pond is formed by spring water from the Musashino Terrace. It is possible to go boating on the pond.

Wan Norashikin binti Wan Noordin
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perak State Executive Councillor.

Tyson T. Runningwolf
is a Democrat representing District 16 in the Montana House of Representatives. Earlier in his life, Runningwolf worked as an outdoor guide.

TEPREL
is a family of rocket engines designed and built by Spanish company PLD Space. It uses liquid propellant rocket engine technology to be used on their launchers Miura 1 and Miura 5.

Slaughtneil
is an area or locality located above Maghera to the northwest the area consists of the townlands of Slaghtneill, Corlacky, Gortinure, Glebe Grillagh, Tirkane, Carrowmenagh, Tirnony, Tullykeeran, Half Gayne. The Clady River And The Grillagh River both originate from here.

Mohammad Ahmadzadeh
is an Iranian Beach Soccer player and Iran National Beach Soccer team captain. Beach Soccer Individual

Aquadro
is a 2013 Italian drama film directed by Stefano Lodovichi.

Finlaysonia
is a genus of flowering plants in the dogbane family Apocynaceae, found from Sri Lanka, India, through Southeast Asia, New Guinea, northern Australia, the Philippines, and Palau. They tend to be vines or climbers and prefer to live on limestone, alongside rivers, or in mangrove swamps.

Steinen
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Steinen, in the Swiss canton of Schwyz. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Gotthard line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Bill Jenkin
is an American politician and businessman serving as a member of the Washington House of Representatives from the 16th district, which includes portions of Benton, Columbia, Franklin, and Walla Walla counties. Jenkin was born and raised in San Diego, California.

Mary Hull Caballero
is an American politician who currently serves as the Portland City Auditor. The City Auditor is the only elected position not part of the Portland City Commission.

Kathmandu
is a 2012 Israeli television miniseries depicting the lives of a Chabad Hasidic Jewish family living in Kathmandu, Nepal. The series included 13 episodes and was produced by the Israeli company Reshet.

Hasanuzzaman Hasan Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Lalmonirhat-1 in February 1996.

Filetia
is a genus of flowering plants in the acanthus family. It is named for Dutch Army physician G.J.

Thomas Schmid
is a German sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Shahrul Zaman bin Yahya
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perak State Executive Councillor.

Lauri Fredrik Rechardt
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Tradescantia
cerinthoides, commonly called flowering inch plant, is a species of plant in the dayflower family that is native to south east Brazil to north east Argentina. Described in 1843 by the German botanist, Carl Sigismund Kunth.

Sam McIntyre
is an Australian professional rugby league footballer who plays as a for the Wests Tigers in the NRL. A Port Macquarie Sharks junior, McIntyre made his NRL Under-20s debut for the Newcastle Knights in March 2017.

Saleh Uddin Ahmed
is a Bangladesh Nationalist Party politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Lalmonirhat-2 in February 1996.

Mats Johan Ersson Caap
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Sylvia Montero
is a French former professional tennis player. A right-handed player from Yvelines, Montero won French national titles in junior tennis and was ranked as high as 38 in the world while competing on the ITF Junior Circuit.

National Park
is a rural locality in the local government areas of Central Highlands and Derwent Valley in the Central and South-east regions of Tasmania. It is located about north-west of the town of New Norfolk.

Halit Haluk Babacan
is a Turkish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Dan Bartel
is a Republican representing District 29 in the Montana House of Representatives. Bartel was first elected to represent District 29 in the Montana House of Representatives in 2016.

Heliconius
eratosignis, the eratosignis longwing, is a butterfly of the family Nymphalidae. It was described by James John Joicey and George Talbot in 1925.

Park Kil-chul
is a Korean sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Dream Hunting
in the Valley of the In-Between is the sixth studio album by American band Man Man. It was released on May 1, 2020 under Sub Pop.

Nolee Ashilin binti Mohammed Radzi
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perak State Executive Councillor.

Jelani Aliyu
appointed in 2017 by president Muhammadu Buhari. Aliyu was born in 1966 in Kaduna, Nigeria into the family of Alhaji Aliyu Haidar and Hajiya Sharifiyya Hauwa Aliyu, he was the fifth of the seven children in the family who were originally from Dogon-daji in Sokoto State, this was why young Aliyu was moved to Sokoto for his education.

Nicholas Bryan
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Colin Philp Jr
. is a Fijian sailor.

Ahlinkar Kyawswar
is an honorary award given to those who have excelled in literature and the arts. From 1949 to 1962, there were about 20 recipients of this award in Myanmar.

Eddy Sulistianto
is an Indonesian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Jade Elektra
, and stage performer originally from Tampa, Florida, based in Toronto, Ontario, Canada. Jade is openly living with HIV and through activism and outreach, has strived to make a positive impact for HIV-positive, queer people of colour, and LGBTQ communities in Toronto and around the world.

Nestor Soriano
is a Filipino sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Gregg Kennard
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing the 102nd district in the Georgia House of Representatives.

Alexandra Fusai
and Nathalie Tauziat were the defending champions from 1999. Neither player played the event in 2005.

Steve Hofbauer
is an American politician and former senior Fire Inspector from California. Hofbauer is the mayor of Palmdale, California.

Abdul Yunus bin Jamahri
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Perak State Executive Councillor.

Joyce Viola Hansen
is an American writer and retired schoolteacher. She has earned recognition for her books for children and youth, particularly her historical fiction and non-fiction works about African-American history.

Patricia Louise Meller Grambsch
is an American biostatistician known for her work on survival models including proportional hazards models. She is an associate professor emerita of biostatistics at the University of Minnesota.

Bhandup Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the seats in Maharashtra Legislative Assembly in India. It was made defunct after constituency map of India was redrawn in 2008.

Kobzarivka
of western Ukraine. Former name - Zaruddia.

Nosivtsi
of western Ukraine. The first written mention is in 1546.

Scott A
. McGregor is an American technology executive and philanthropist.

Poasi Mataele Tei
is a Tongan politician and Member of the Legislative Assembly of Tonga. Tei was educated at the University of the South Pacific in Suva, Fiji, graduating with a Bachelor of Arts and an MBA.

Pleskivtsi
of western Ukraine. The first written mention is in 1583.

Vertelka
of western Ukraine. The khutirs of Dubyna, Zaboloto and Zahrebellia belong to the village.

Lilia Pineda
is a Filipino politician who served as Vice Governor of Pampanga under her son Dennis Pineda since 2019. She previously served as Governor of the province from 2010 until 2019, and she served as Mayor of Lubao from 1992 until 2001.

Joe Polish
is an American entrepreneur, public speaker, author, podcaster, film producer and coach. Polish is known as the founder of Piranha Marketing, Genius Network, GeniusX, the non-profit organization Genius Recovery Foundation, and the co-founder of the podcasts 10x Talk, Genius Network and I Love Marketing.

Kherwadi Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the seats in Maharashtra Legislative Assembly in India. It was made defunct after constituency map of India was redrawn in 2008.

Tammaritu I
, son of Urtak, was briefly, ruled another.

Nainars
are Kerala Muslim community first settled in central Kerala. The community first arrived in Kerala from southern Tamil Nadu by entering into contract for certain works with the Hindu kings of Cochin.

Vandre Vidhan Sabha
seat, a.k.a Bandra, was one of the seats in Maharashtra Legislative Assembly in India. It was made defunct after constituency map of India was redrawn in 2008.

Verena Madner
is an Austrian legal scholar, university professor and constitutional judge. She has been Professor of Public Law at the Department of Socio-Economics at the Vienna University of Economics and Business since 2011.

Tinatin Kavlashvili
is a Georgian former professional tennis player. Kavlashvili, a right-handed player, reached a career high ranking of 479 in the world and won two ITF singles titles.

Sami Ali El Choum
is a Lebanese football manager and former player. A defensive midfielder for Lebanese Premier League side Ansar, El Choum remained at the Beirut-based club for over 10 years, winning multiple titles.

Amrou Al-Kadhi
is a British-Iraqi writer, drag performer, and filmmaker whose work focuses on queer identity, cultural representation and racial politics. Amrou Al-Kadhi was born on 23 June 1990 into a tight-knit conservative Iraqi Muslim family in London.

Sarah K. England
is a physiologist and biophysicist and the Alan A. and Edith L. Wolff Professor of Obstetrics and Gynaecology at Washington University in St. Louis, Missouri. England conducts research on cation channels in uterine smooth muscle to understand the biological correlates of preterm birth and is the Associate Program Director of the Prematurity Research Center at Washington University as well as the Vice Chair of Research for the Center for Reproductive Health Sciences.

Fagaropsis
is a genus of flowering plants in the rue family, native to Africa and Madagascar. Its inclusion in the subtribe Toddalioideae is controversial.

Shanita Namuyimba
alias Bad Black is a Ugandan Socialite, business lady and musician. She is known for her extravagant expenditures.

Riccardo Adami
is an Italian engineer working for Scuderia Ferrari, where he is the race engineer of four-time world champion Sebastian Vettel. Adami obtained a diploma in chassis area at the University of Brescia in 2001 and worked for Minardi since 2002.

Latium
is a 1669 work by the Jesuit scholar Athanasius Kircher. It was dedicated to Pope Clement X and a 1671 edition was published in Amsterdam by Johannes van Waesbergen.

Tauno Tekko
is an Estonian professional footballer who plays as a central midfielder for Estonian Meistriliiga club Tartu JK Tammeka.

Ezhumesvaramudayar Temple
is a Hindu temple dedicated to the deity Shiva, located at Koyirkkulam in Nagapattinam district, India. It is one of the shrines of the Vaippu Sthalams sung by Tamil Saivite Nayanar Appar.

Joseph Ceesay
is a Swedish football midfielder who plays for Helsingborgs IF.

Gudiyatham
east is a region within Gudiyatham, Vellore district in the Indian state of Tamil Nadu. The region is known for its caves and temples.

Leionema
obtusifolium, is a small shrub with yellow-white flowers in terminal clusters at the end of branches. It is endemic to Queensland.

Wick Court
, Arlingham, Gloucestershire, England is an country house constructed between the late 14th and the mid-17th centuries. Now a base for the charity Farms for City Children, it operates as a traditional livestock farm providing experience of country life for children from urban areas.

Christopher Grimley
is a Scottish badminton player who competes in international level events. His doubles partner is his twin brother Matthew Grimley.

Santa Cecilia
is a settlement in Pueblo Rico Municipality, Risaralda Department in Colombia. Santa Cecilia has a very wet tropical rainforest climate.

M. P. M. Ahammed Kurikkal
, popularly known as Bapu Kurikkal, was an Indian politician and social worker who served as the Minister for Local Self Governments in Kerala Government from 1967 to 1968. He conceived the creation of the Malappuram District in central Kerala in the late 1960s.

Balichapori
, also Bali Chapori and Bali Chapari, is a village in the Majuli district of Assam in India. The village covers an area of 202 hectares.

Murlidhar Dattatray Deoras
, popularly knows as Bhaurao Deoras, was an RSS pracharak who concentrated on North India region; he was younger brother of the third RSS chief Balasaheb Deoras. Bhaurao Deoras was born in Nagpur on 19 November 1917.

Alcalus
sariba, also known as Saribau eastern frog or Saribau dwarf mountain frog, is a species of frog in the subfamily Alcalinae, family Ceratobatrachidae. It is endemic to Sarawak, Malaysian Borneo, where it is known from a small number of locations, including the eponymous Mount Saribau.

Semisi Fakahau
is a Tongan politician and Member of the Legislative Assembly of Tonga. He is a member of the Democratic Party of the Friendly Islands.

William Henry Revis
was a British lace and hosiery manufacturer and benefactor of Nottingham University College. He was one of the founders of the Nottingham Reds, now the oldest football league team and known as Nottingham Forest F.C., and scored its first goal in league play.

NTV Uganda
is a Ugandan television station under the Nation Media Group, NMG, operating in East Africa. It was on air since 2006.

Horner Military School
was a military academy of North Carolina, United States. The school was founded by James H. Horner in 1851 in Oxford, North Carolina.

Shyam Sunder Mahapatra
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, the lower house of the Parliament of India as a member of the Indian National Congress.

Christian Hayner
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Jean-Claude Vuithier Jr
. is a Swiss sailor.

Marco Calderari
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Julio Labandeira
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Alberto Zanetti
is an Argentine sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Patrick de Barros
is a Portuguese sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Infrastructure Investment Facilitation Company
is a Bangladesh government company that acts as an advisory body under the Economic Relations Division of the Ministry of Finance. Fatima Yasmin is the chairperson and Md.

Michael Green
is a Barbadian sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics, representing Barbados and Saint Lucia respectively.

Muhammed Sanneh
is a Gambian professional footballer who plays as a right back for Estonian Meistriliiga club Paide Linnameeskond. Sanneh joined Paide Linnameeskond on a two-year loan with option to buy in January 2019.

FC Chernihiv
is an Ukrainian football club based in Chernihiv. The date of birth of the new Chernihiv football team of the USB can be considered June 18, 2003, when 11 people in black and yellow uniforms came out on the field of the stadium of the Chernihiv Military Lyceum.

Stephan Puxkandl
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Konstantinos Manthos
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Fritz Girr
is a German sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Gregory Torpy
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Chester Noe
is an American former basketball player. He was an all-city center while he played at Washington Preparatory High School in his hometown of Los Angeles, California.

Bruce MacDonald
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Kosher Love
is a 2017 Canadian documentary film of love as understood by Orthodox and Hasidic Jews. The documentary was directed by filmmaker Evan Beloff and aired on the CBC-TV television channel.

Kangiqhuk
, formerly West Arm, is a fiord on the southeast coast of Victoria Island. The fiord is short, about , and flows into Cambridge Bay and then to Dease Strait and Queen Maud Gulf.

Hugo Valentin Paul Genestet
is a French field hockey player who plays as a midfielder for Belgian club Waterloo Ducks and the French national team. Genestet played for Saint Germain in France before he joined Leuven in Belgium in 2014.

Bangladesh Infrastructure Finance Fund Limited
is a Bangladesh government owned non-bank financial institution with the purpose of encouraging investment in the infrastructure in Bangladesh. Bangladesh Infrastructure Finance Fund Limited and Infrastructure Development Company Limited are two government owned financial institutions responsible for financing infrastructure development in Bangladesh.

Mashood Olabisi Ajala
was a Nigerian globe-trotter, actor and writer who visited 87 countries in his scooter vespa motorcycle. He first covered a 2,280miles in 28days from chicago to the Los Angeles in 1952.

Diego Minguens
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Hans Reiter
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Gianmarco Vian
is an Italian rugby union player. His usual position is as a Flanker and he currently plays for Rovigo Delta in Top12.

Eddie Bardgett
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Glenn Astwood
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Raymond Cattin
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Park Byeong-gi
is a South Korean sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Sim Gyu-hae
is a South Korean sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Pete Melvin
is an American sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Oscar Mercado
is a Puerto Rican sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Karl Strandman
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Bradley Schafferius
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Roger Colman
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Kevin Smith
is a Canadian sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Jeremy Newman
is a British sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Yury Konovalov
is a Russian sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics, the 1992 Summer Olympics, and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Alex Thomas Johnson
is an African American diplomat and the first Black Chief of Staff of the U.S. Helsinki Commission since its establishment in 1976. He leads the team of its current chair U.S. Representative Alcee Hastings.

Christian Claus
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Lorenzo Maria Bruno
is an Italian rugby union player. His usual position is as a Wing and he currently plays for Lyons Piacenza in Top12.

Kim Ahlroos
is a Finnish retired professional ice hockey winger who played in Finland and throughout Europe. Ahlroos began his career with hometown club HIFK, coming through the junior ranks before making his SM-liiga debut during the 1990-91 season.

Osmia
aurulenta is a Palearctic species of mason bee.

Ricardo Denver Mackenzie
is a South African politician and current Member of the Western Cape Provincial Parliament for the Democratic Alliance. He became an MPP in May 2014 and was re-elected to a second term in May 2019.

Hendriktop
is a mountain in Suriname at . It is part of the Emma Range and is located in the Sipaliwini District. The mountain is named after Hendrik of the Netherlands.

Alexander Johansson
is a Swedish football forward who plays for Varbergs BoIS.

Jon Birkfeldt
is a Swedish football defender who plays for Varbergs BoIS.

Jesper Modig
is a Swedish football defender who plays for Varbergs BoIS.

Southern Force
is an Australian netball team that represents Netball South Australia in the Australian Netball League. In 2008 they were founder members of the ANL.

Seetha Vallabha
is an Indian Kannada language television drama that premiered on Colors Kannada on 18 June 2018. It came into the foray due some remarkable performances by the lead pair.

Albin Winbo
is a Swedish football midfielder who plays for Varbergs BoIS.

Biraha
is the ethnic folk song of Ahir Communities. Birha is a popular folk song genre of Uttar Pradesh and Bihar.

Alpine Star
is an Irish Thoroughbred racehorse. She showed very good form as a juvenile in 2019, winning two of her three races including the Debutante Stakes.

Palli Sanchay Bank
, Rural Savings Bank, is a state owned bank in Bangladesh. Mihir Kanti Majumder is the Chairman of the bank.

Alex Andrew Murray
is a Guyanese footballer who plays as a goalkeeper for Morvant Caledonia United and the Guyana national football team. Murray made his senior international debut on 21 February 2016, keeping a clean sheet in a 2-0 friendly victory over Suriname.

Roman Hauk
is a German footballer who plays as a centre-back for SV Sandhausen. Hauk made his professional debut for SV Sandhausen in the 2.

Roseveltpiek
is a mountain in Suriname at . It is part of the Oranje Mountains and is located in the Sipaliwini District. The mountain is named after .

Sidney Hill Cottage Homes
, whose official name is Sidney Hill Churchill Wesleyan Cottage Homes, is a Grade II listed Wesleyan almshouse in the village of Churchill in North Somerset. It was opened in December 1907 to provide furnished accommodation for people in need.

Andrea Barozzi
was a Venetian nobleman. He was hereditary lord of Santorini in the Cyclades, and served as official and military commander for the Venetian Republic.

Rasmus Cronvall
is a Swedish football forward who plays for Varbergs BoIS.

Pierre-Louis Chovet
is a French racing driver currently competing in the 2020 Formula Regional European Championship for Dutch team Van Amersfoort Racing. Chovet first appeared in single seaters as a guest driver at the tail end of the 2017 French F4 Championship at the age of 15.

Arken Imirbaki
is an Uyghur politician of China. Imirbaki is born September 1953 in Yengisar County, Kashgar Prefecture, Xinjiang.

Albert Yonathan Setyawan
and Kyoto Seika University.

Momina Iqbal
is a Pakistani television actress. She is best known for her leading roles in Daal Chawal and drama serials like Parlour Wali Larki , Ishq Mein Kaafir , Ajnabi Lage Zindagi and Ehd-e-Wafa.

Gustaf Norlin
(born 9 January 1997 is a Swedish football midfielder who plays for Varbergs BoIS. Norlin made his Allsvenskan debut on the 15th of June 2020 in a 3-0 win over Helsingborg, scoring the third and final goal in the 62nd minute.

Krishna
.

Durratun Nashihin Rosli
is a Malaysian rhythmic gymnast. She competed at the 2006 Commonwealth Games where she won silver medals in the team, individual, clubs and rope events.

Terry Rogers
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 10 in the Georgia House of Representatives.

Parlour Wali Larki
is a 2018 Pakistani drama serial which aired on BOL Entertainment. It was directed by Nadia Afgan.

Alexander Schroff
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Daniel Schroff
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Iacopo
or Jacopo was a Venetian nobleman and the first lord of Santorini in the Cyclades. He also served as Duke of Candia for the Venetian Republic.

O Jong-yeol
is a South Korean sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Kim Gi-han
is a South Korean sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Eric Lockeyear
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Timothy Parsons
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Marcela Pini
is a Uruguayan activist, psychologist and teacher. Pini is one of the first three transgender people to have earned a college degree in Uruguay.

Peter Eriksson
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Gahi Mammar
is a town in the Kahror Pakka, Lodhran District, Punjab, Pakistan. It is located at and an altitude of 130 meters..

Amir Gharebaghi
is an Iranian medical inventor. He proposed a medical hypothesis about potential use of taurine against pterygium formation.

David Connor
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Gary Smith
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Sergey Borodinov
is a Soviet sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Jesper Normann Daland
is a Norwegian football defender. He plays for Norwegian Eliteserien side Start.

Viktor Budantsev
is a Belarusian sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics, the 1992 Summer Olympics, and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Terry R. Ferrell
is a lieutenant general in the United States Army, who serves as the commanding general of United States Army Central. A native of Logan, West Virginia, Ferrell is a graduate of Marshall University and was commissioned in 1984.

Daniel Ferre
is a French sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Andrew Goldman
is an American sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Peter Kennedy
is an Irish sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

OK India
is a national satellite Hindi language news Television channel., owned by Dr. Jogender Singh It was lunched 15 April 2016. The channel live broadcast from Rohtak, Haryana.

Michael A. Smith II
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 41 in the Georgia House of Representatives.

Charles Dyer
is a playwright, actor and screenwriter british, born in Shrewsbury, in England. His first appearance was in 1948, at the Whitehall Theatre.

Ulf Lehmann
is a German sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Roger Yeoman
is a British sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1988 Summer Olympics.

Greg Knowles
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Institute of Laser Physics of the Siberian Branch of the RAS
is a research institute in Akademgorodok of Novosibirsk, Russia. It was founded in 1991.

Michael A. Minihan
is a lieutenant general in the United States Air Force, who serves as the deputy commanding general of United States Indo-Pacific Command, having previously served as its chief of staff from January 2019 to September 2019. He was commissioned in 1990 through ROTC at Auburn University in Alabama.

Thomas A. Bussiere
is a lieutenant general in the United States Air Force, who serves as the deputy commanding general of United States Strategic Command. He was commissioned in 1985 through ROTC at Norwich University.

Richard H. Smith
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 134 in the Georgia House of Representatives.

Ahmad
made 2 appearances for the national team in 2001.

David A. Krumm
is a lieutenant general in the United States Air Force, who serves as commander, Alaskan Command. He was commissioned in 1989 through ROTC at Auburn University.

Aisling Byrne-Bowman
is an Irish sailor. She competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Sweden
held a general election throughout September 1911, which was the first election with universal male suffrage. In this era, right after the dissolution of first past the post, many counties had multiple constituencies, hence the results are listed at county levels here, comparable with most latter constituencies.

Patrik Pasma
is a Finnish racing driver born in Oulu currently competing for KIC Motorsport in the Formula Regional European Championship. Pasma started his single seater career in an array of different Formula Ford categories, mostly in the UK but some in his home country Finland.

Yousif
made 2 appearances for the national team in 2002.

Debbie Jarvis
is a British sailor. She competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics and the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Sue Hay-Carr
is a British sailor. She competed at the 1988 Summer Olympics, the 1992 Summer Olympics, and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Christy Underwood Clark
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing District 98 in the North Carolina House of Representatives.

Pietje Feitsma
is a former Dutch female kortebaan speed skater. Feitsma was born according to the original register in Hijlaard, while a source also indicates Dronrijp.

Rucks Parker
was a Salvadoran pop rock duo originally from San Salvador, which was formed in 1992. The duo was made up of Gerardo Parker as composer and vocalist, and Daniel Rucks, as writer and vocalist.

Najeeb
made 1 appearance for the national team in 2002.

Oberstown Children Detention Campus
, Ireland. It houses both male and female offenders.

Beryl Radin
is an American public administration scholar and former editor of the Journal of Public Administration Research and Theory. She is an adjunct professor at the McCourt School of Public Policy at Georgetown University.

Iacopo
or Jacopo II Barozzi was a Venetian nobleman and the third lord of Santorini in the Cyclades. He also occupied several high-ranking colonial positions for the Venetian Republic.

Padiay
is a Barangay in the Municipality of Sibagat, a 1st Class Municipality in the province of Agusan del Sur, Caraga Region, Mindanao Islands, Philippines. The barangay is located at the northeastern tip of the town of Sibagat, and the northeastern portion of the province.

Angel Adams Parham
is an Associate Professor of Sociology at Loyola University-New Orleans. Her research addresses the intersection of identity, migration, race and national belonging.

Bidhan Parbat
is a mountain of the northern Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India.The elevation of Bidhan Parbat is and its prominence is . It is 84th highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand. Nanda Devi, is the highest mountain in this category.

Ateneo de El Salvador
is a cultural, literary and artistic institution, founded in 1912 and whose headquarters are located in San Salvador. It has become a benchmark of national culture and prominent intellectuals from El Salvador have passed through it.

Glenn Bosch
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 30 in the North Dakota House of Representatives.

Joe Bailey
was an Australian professional wrestler most notable for losing to Billy Meeske in a match to determine the Australian Heavyweight Championship in 1922. He was also an all-round sportsman competing in football, amateur wrestling, and competitive cycling.

Grant Heard
is an American football coach and former player who is currently the co-offensive coordinator and wide receivers coach at Indiana University. He played college football at the University of Mississippi.

Alcinda M. Honwana
is a Mozambican anthropologist who is the Strategic Director of the Firoz Lalji Centre for Africa at the London School of Economics. Her research considers young people and leadership.

Bartine Hot Springs
are geothermal hot springs located in the Nevada high desert West of the town of Eureka. The general physiographic area is in the intermontane plateaus of the Basin and Range Province of the Great Basin Desert.

Rob Wiederstein
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 11 in the Kentucky House of Representatives.

Katrine Svane
is a Danish football player who plays as a goalkeeper for VSK Aarhus in Denmark top-division Elitedivisionen and for the Danish national under-23 team. She has also represent the Danish youth and junior teams, several times.

American
composer, pianist and painter Ann Wyeth McCoy was the youngest daughter of artist-illustrator N.C. Wyeth and the fourth of his five children.

Jerry T. Miller
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 36 in the Kentucky House of Representatives.

Johannes Theodorus Viljoen
is a former South African rugby union player. Viljoen represented in the South African provincial competitions and made his debut for the union in 1965.

Hillside
is an unincorporated community in Derry Township, Westmoreland County, Pennsylvania, United States. The community is located along Pennsylvania Route 217 northwest of Derry.

Josie Raymond
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing District 31 in the Kentucky House of Representatives.

Nebula
is a global, independent video-on-demand streaming service. Nebula was started by founder Dave Wiskus and around 75 creators who were part of the Standard creator community.

Ellie Kisyombe
is a Malawian activist and former asylum seeker living in Ireland. She is the co-founder of Our Table.

Hereward the Wake
was a British television series which was produced by the BBC in 1965, and was broadcast weekly on BBC1. It was based on the 1866 novel by Charles Kingsley.

Larry Elkins
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 5 in the Kentucky House of Representatives.

Voltzberg
is a mountain in Suriname at . It is part of the Emma Range and is located in the Sipaliwini District. It is named after the German geologist Friedrich Voltz.

Mireia Casas Albiach
is a Spanish windsurfer. She competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and 1996 Summer Olympics.

Tina Bojanowski
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing District 32 in the Kentucky House of Representatives.

Lisa Neuburger
is an American sailor. She competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and 1996 Summer Olympics.

Sedona Hotel
is a high end hotel in Yangon, Myanmar. The hotel consists of two buildings named Garden Wing and Inya Wing.

Mount Fernow
is a mountain summit located northeast of Skykomish, in eastern King County of Washington state. Mount Fernow is part of the Cascade Range, and is situated west of Stevens Pass in the Wild Sky Wilderness, on land managed by Mount Baker-Snoqualmie National Forest.

Fish Lake Hot Well
, also known as Fish Lake Hot Spring is a geothermal hot spring. The spring is located in the Fish Lake Valley near the town of Dyer, Nevada.

Pekin Noodle Parlor
is the oldest known continuously operating Chinese restaurant in the United States, located in Butte, Montana. The restaurant was founded in its current location in 1911 by Hum Yow and Tam Kwong Yee.

Eleni Daniilidou
was the two-time defending champion, but was defeated in the first round by Mara Santangelo. Katarina Srebotnik won the title, defeating Shinobu Asagoe in the final.

Sherrie Conley
is an American politician. She is a Republican representing District 20 in the Oklahoma House of Representatives.

Van Stockumberg
is a mountain in Suriname at . It is part of the Emma Range and is located in the Sipaliwini District. It is named after the Dutch explorer A.

Hungary
competed at the 2019 Summer Universiade in Naples, Italy held from 3 to 14 July 2019. The country won one gold medal and two bronze medals.

Fatoe Switie Mountains
is a mountain range in the Sipaliwini District of Suriname. The highest peak is about 375 metres.

Sergey Dmitrievich Boytsov
is a Russian model, sportsman, bodybuilder and public figure. Master of Sports of Russia in bodybuilding.

Jeff Pittman
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 41 in the Kansas House of Representatives.

Lyon Woodstock
victory over Reece Smith at the York Hall in London.

Tebutop
is a mountain in Suriname at . It is located in the Sipaliwini District. The mountain was explored during both the 1904 Tapanahony expedition and the 1907 Tumuk Humak expedition.

Marian Matthews
is an American politician, educator, and attorney serving as a member of the New Mexico House of Representatives from the 27th district, which includes a portion of Bernalillo County, New Mexico. Matthews earned a Bachelor of Arts degree from Missouri State University and a Juris Doctor from the University of New Mexico School of Law.

Project Dignity
is a Puerto Rican political party founded in 2019. It is running in the 2020 elections on a social conservative and anti-corruption platform.

Polwhele House
School is a day and boarding prep school at Polwhele House, near Truro, Cornwall. It follows the thirteen-plus Common Entrance Examination syllabus.

Eva Kreienkamp
is a German manager and businesswoman. Since 2015, Kreienkamp has held the position of Co-Managing Director of the Mainzer Verkehrsgesellschaft.

Tyson Bull
is an Australian artistic gymnast. He competed at both the 2018 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships and 2019 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships.

Kota Kawano
born 12 August 2003 is a Japanese professional footballer who plays as a forward for Renofa Yamaguchi.

Sun Village
is a non-governmental organization that operates a series of orphanages set up for children who have parents convicted in the Chinese criminal justice system and who have no other family or guardians available to care for them. It is headquartered in Shunyi District, Beijing.

Abdul Sawer Chowdhury
is a politician from the Rangpur District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Rangpur-2. Chowdhury was elected to parliament from Rangpur-2 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Miriam Ausman Forman
is an American astrophysicist known for her work on solar cosmic rays, turbulence and energy cascades in magnetohydrodynamics, and the solar wind. Forman entered graduate study at Stony Brook University in 1968, completed her Ph.D. there in 1972, and remained affiliated with Stony Brook as an adjunct faculty member, supported by grants from NASA, until 1985.

Alpnachstad PB
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Alpnach, in the Swiss canton of Obwalden. It is the base station of the Pilatus Railway rack railway that ascends near the summit of Pilatus.

Samuel Sereth Lieberman
was a judge in Edmonton, Alberta, Canada. Lieberman was the first Jewish judge in the province of Alberta.

St. Patrick Catholic Church
is a Catholic church in Silverton, Colorado. Located at 1005 Reese street, the church was built in 1905.

Krista Kruuv
is a Estonian sailor. She competed in the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Jessica A. Scoffield
is an American microbiologist and an Assistant Professor in the Department of Microbiology at the University of Alabama at Birmingham School of Medicine. Scoffield studies the mechanisms by which oral commensal bacteria interfere with pathogenic bacterial growth in order to inform the development of active therapeutic tools to prevent drug resistant pathogen infection.

Ali Al-Hamadi
is an Iraqi professional footballer who plays as a forward for Swansea City in the EFL Championship. Ali was born in Maysan, Iraq on March 1, 2002.

Arianna Bogatec
is an Italian sailor. She competed in the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Chita Charlotta Maria Smedberg
is a Finnish sailor. She competed in the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Gaol Break
is a 1936 British crime film directed by Ralph Ince and starring Ince, Basil Gill and Raymond Lovell. It was made as a quota quickie at Teddington Studios by the British subsidiary of Warner Brothers.

Dianna Fuemana
is a New Zealand Pacific writer, director and performer. She writes for theatre and screen.

Arthurs Lake
is a rural locality in the local government area of Central Highlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north of the town of Hamilton.

Busse
was born in Berlin, Germany on December 7, 1868. He received his Ph.D. from the University of Freiburg in 1892.

Anthony Gargiulo
. He played college football at Dartmouth.

Ektee Bari Ektee Khamar
project is a Bangladesh government social welfare program designed to promote farming and welfare in rural Bangladesh and reduce rural poverty in Bangladesh through small loans. Akber Hossain is the project director in charge.

Flintstone
is a small rural residential locality in the local government area of Central Highlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north of the town of Hamilton.

William Russell
was a Scottish footballer who played as a right half for Chelsea and Heart of Midlothian. His son Billy was also a footballer.

Surinsar Lake
is situated from Jammu city by road, surrounded by hills and dense forests, and has some mythological importance. Surinsar and Mansar Lakes are considered as twin lakes, as Mansar is located away from it.

The Valley Dale Ballroom
is a historic building in Columbus, Ohio. Constructed in 1925, it became a nationally-known ballroom during the Big Band era of the 1930s and 1940s.

Ella Atherton
was a Scottish born actress. She was also known as Ella Devi Rajpipla; Maharani Ella Devi of Rajpipla or H.H.

Rachel Cargle
is a Black American author, academic, speaker, and activist known for her involvement in anti-racism work. Cargle founded the Loveland Foundation.

Tevita Lavemaau
is a Tongan politician and Member of the Legislative Assembly of Tonga. Lavemaau was first elected at the 2014 Tongan general election and appointed Minister of Revenue and Customs.

Totara Vale
is an Auckland suburb, which is under the local governance of Auckland Council. The suburb contains Rewi Alley Reserve, which has a memorial to Rewi Alley, a New Zealander who lived most of his life in China.

Wilburville
is a small rural residential locality in the local government area of Central Highlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north of the town of Hamilton.

Jamahl Mosley
. Mosley played college basketball for the Colorado Buffaloes and was a third-team All-Big 12 selection in 2000.

Desmond John Tobin
is an Irish academic, researcher and author. He is a Full Professor of Dermatological Science at University College Dublin and the Director of Charles Institute of Dermatology.

Suno Mahabharata Devdutt Pattanaik
ke Saath is an exclusive presentation by Audible Originals. It was launched on 21 April 2020 on Audible Suno application.

Ananda Chakrapani
is an Indian actor who works in Telugu-language films. He was born and grew up in a village near Miryalaguda.

Lola Lennox
is a British singer, songwriter, and model. She is the sister of British fashion model Tali Lennox, and daughter of Scottish singer Annie Lennox and Israeli film producer Uri Fruchtmann.

Anaphalis
acutifolia is a species of flowering plants within the family Asteraceae. It is found in South Tibet.

Jeffrey Cagnes
is a French pastry chef. He is the executive pastry chef of Stohrer bakery, located Rue Montorgueil in Paris.

Cornelia Van Cortlandt Schuyler
, was the wife of Johannes Schuyler, Jr. She was the grandmother of Angelica Schuyler Church, Elizabeth Schuyler Hamilton, who was married to Founding Father Alexander Hamilton and several influential people in colonial and post-colonial America.

Frank Maile
is an American football coach who is currently the co-defensive coordinator and defensive line coach at Utah State University. He served as the interim head coach for the Aggies for their bowl game against North Texas in 2018.

Fritzschia
is a genus of flowering plants in the family Melastomataceae, native to the Atlantic coastal forest of Brazil. They are sprawling or erect shrubs, with their branchlets and their hypanthia coated with either glandular or villose trichomes.

Floatr
is the third studio album by English alternative rock band Happyness. It was released on 1 May 2020 under Infinit Suds.

Bihawana Seminary
is a Catholic seminary created by the Bihawana mission and located in Bihawana village in Tanzania. The seminary is attached to the Catholic Church and also runs a secondary school Bihawana Secondary School.

Planet Earth
is a 1979 made-for-TV movie and drama film directed by John Newland. The film stars Angie Dickinson, Gordon Pinsent, Zohra Lampert, Todd Lookinland, Peter Donat, Lane Davies, Don Marshall, and Majel Barrett.

Joan Stuart
and Just Ask, Inc.

Anaphalis
alpicola is a species of flowering plants within the family Asteraceae. It is found in Japan.

Anaphalis
arfakensis is a species of flowering plants within the family Asteraceae. It is an endemic species found in New Guinea.

Kyla Anne Leibel
is a Canadian swimmer. Leibel competed at the 2018 Youth Olympics and at the 2018 Pan Pacific Swimming Championships which was the first competition where she represented Canada at a senior level.

Vivienne Joyce Thom
is an Australian former public servant and current independent consultant and intelligence specialist. From 2010 to 2015, Thom was the Inspector-General of Intelligence and Security with oversight over the six agencies of the Australian intelligence community.

Palazzo Orio Semitecolo Benzon
is a Gothic palace in Venice, Italy, built in the 14th century. The palazzo is located in the Dorsoduro district and overlooks the Grand Canal between Casa Santomaso and Casa Salviati.

S. R. Bommai
ministry was the Council of Ministers in Karnataka, a state in South India headed by S. R. Bommai of the BJP. The ministry had multiple ministers including the Chief Minister.

Canal Orbe
21 is a television station on channel 21.2 in Buenos Aires, Argentina. It is the television station of the Archdiocese of Buenos Aires.

Todd Alan Reed
, known as The Forest Park Killer, is an American serial killer and sex offender who raped and strangled three homeless women in Portland, Oregon between April and June 1999, later dumping their bodies in the Forest Park reserve. He was convicted of these deaths and received three terms of life imprisonment, and remains the sole suspect in two similar murders that occured in nearby Gresham, in 1987.

Bangladesh Blade Factory Limited
is a Bangladesh government owned company, under the Bangladesh Steel and Engineering Corporation, that manufactures razor blades. Saidur Rahman is the Managing Director of Bangladesh Blade Factory Limited.

Arithmologia
, sive De Abditis Numerorum Mysteriis is a 1665 work by the Jesuit scholar Athanasius Kircher. It was published by Varese, the main printing house for the Jesuit order in Rome in the mid-17th century.

Uguccione Ranieri Bourbon del Monte di Sorbello
, better known as Uguccione Ranieri di Sorbello, or simply Uguccione Ranieri, was an Italian scholar, journalist and writer; he was also a war hero and a Public Administration official and director at the Ministry of Popular Culture, Tourism and Entertainment based at the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. He was a member of the noble Ranieri Bourbon di Sorbello family, with the title of marquis of Sorbello and count of Civitella.

Palazzo Surian Bellotto
is a Baroque palace in Venice, Italy. The palazzo is located in the Cannaregio district and overlooks the Cannaregio Canal.

Dharmapureesvarar Temple
is a Hindu temple dedicated to the deity Shiva, located at Vadakandam in Tiruvarur district, India. It is one of the shrines of the Vaippu Sthalams sung by Tamil Saivite Nayanar Appar.

Hussain Fariyaaz
is a Maldivian journalist and the recipient of the prestigious presidential award for Journalism in 2019 with citation for his contribution for development of sports journalism in the Maldives. Fariyaaz started his career as a reporter in one of oldest printed news outlets in the Maldives, and later served as the editor of Aafathis.

Jane Geddes
is a British art historian and academic, specialising in Scottish architecture, British Medieval Manuscripts, Pictish sculpture and Medieval decorative ironwork. She is Emeritus Professor of Art History, University of Aberdeen.

Mohamed Naim
, is a Maldivian professional footballer who plays as a forward, attacking midfielder or winger for Club Eagles and Maldives national team. Naim played in the Minivan Championship for his island team K.

Sarah MacMaster
is a former Canadian badminton player who competed in international level events. She is a bronze medal at the 2007 Pan American Games and a bronze medalist at the 2007 Pan Am Badminton Championships.

Ashvin Balaruban
is a Swiss professional footballer who plays as a left-back for Swiss club Luzern.

Constantino Saragoza
is a windsurfer who represented the Netherlands Antilles. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Jonas Sterner
is a German footballer who currently plays as a midfielder for Holstein Kiel.

Kutlu Torunlar
is a Turkish windsurfer. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Char Kolmi
is a union territory of Char Fasson Upazila in Bhola district in Bangladesh. The area of Char Kolmi Union is 8,443 acres.

Salomo Sachs
was a German architect, astronomer, Prussian building official, mathematician, drawing teacher for architecture, teacher for machine drawings, building economist, writer, author of non-fiction and textbooks and universal scholar. He attained the rank of a royal building inspector and with his cousin Major Meno Burg they were the only men in the Prussian civil service who had not renounced their Jewish faith.

Wells Fargo
were a psychedelic rock band based in Bulawayo, Zimbabwe. Guitarist Josi Ndlovu and drummer Ebba Chitambo first met in 1969 when Ndlovu spotted Chitambo playing for a local band called Springfields.

Harry Neal Limited
was a UK-based housebuilder and contractor. The company began building houses in outer London in 1896 becoming an estate developer and a builder of large expensive houses.

Magdalen Livingstone
was a Scottish courtier. She was a daughter of Alexander Livingston, 5th Lord Livingston and Agnes Douglas, daughter of John Douglas, 2nd Earl of Morton.

Happy Sardar
is a 2019 Indian Malayalam-language comedy film co-written and directed by married couple Sudip Joshy and Geethika Sudip. This is the first malayalam movie directed by a couple.

Cindy Perros
is a French kickboxer and the current ISKA World super lightweight and light welterweight Freestyle kickboxing champion, as well as the former European light welterweight Freestyle champion. During Explosion Fight Night 8 Perros won the ISKA European light welterweight Freestyle title against Johanna Kruse.

Michel Goma
is a French fashion designer, and was the creative director of Balenciaga from 1987 to 1992, after the label was relaunched following a 19-year closure. Goma was born in 1932 in Moncrabeau, Lot-et-Garonne, France.

Freddy Vachha
is a British politician who has served as leader of the UK Independence Party since June 2020. Freddy Vachha was born in 1958 or 1959.

Pangti
is a Lotha Naga village located 156 km north of Kohima, the capital of Nagaland, India. It is famous for its Amur Falcon roosting site.

Palazzo Vitturi
is a palace in Venice, Italy located in the Castello district, on the north-eastern side of Campo Santa Maria Formosa, of which the palazzo is the oldest building. The palace is mentioned in the works of Sansovino.

Christian Henking
is a Swiss composer, conductor and Choir leader. Henking was born in Basel in 1961.

Ezhuvathiruthy
is a village at Ponnani taluk, Malappuram district, Kerala, India.

Loris Frasca
is a French artistic gymnast. He competed at both the 2018 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships and 2019 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships.

Rajgadhi
in Naurangia village is a place of archaeological importance with ancient ruins. This place is located in the West Champaran district of the Indian state of Bihar, India.

Christian Li
is a Chinese-Australian violinist. In 2018, at age 10, he became the youngest performer to win the Yehudi Menuhin International Competition for Young Violinists in the Junior Category.

Lakhuti
is a Lotha Naga village located 127 km north of Kohima, the capital of Nagaland. Lakhuti is located in Aitepyong Circle of Wokha District, Nagaland with total 1077 families residing.

David Earle Bailey
is bishop of the Episcopal Church in Navajoland, a mission area of the Episcopal Church. He was consecrated bishop on August 7, 2010.

Richard Basset
, 1st Baron Basset, Lord of Weldon, was an English noble. Richard was a son of Ralph Basset and Eleanor de la Wade.

Carolina Horta
is a Brazilian beach volleyball player. Horta won bronze medals at the Pan American Games in 2015, alongside Liliane Maestrini, and 2019, alongside Angela Lavalle.

Abdul Rahim bin Muda
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Pahang State Executive Councillor.

PKMM Higher Secondary School Edarikode
, or locally known as Edarikode School, is a higher secondary school in Edarikode, Malappuram district of Kerala state in India. It is the school in Kerala, where the maximum number of students appear for the Secondary School Leaving Certificate.

Riham Abdul Ghanee
, known as Boby is a Maldivian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Club Green Streets and Maldives national team. Riham started his career with Maldivian third division side Da Grande Sports Club in 2015, helping his side to win the championship and gain promotion to Second Division.

Nepal Academy of Fine Arts
is arts institution established by Mahendra in 1961. It was formerly known as Royal Nepal Academy and it is owned by Nepal Art Council.

Viasat World
is a London-based entertainment company that broadcasts around the World and provides Television services. According to its website, the company operates thirty Pay TV and on-demand channels.

Sweden
held a general election in March 1914 to finish off the original Riksdag term before the regular election later that year. After the dissolution of first-past-the-post, there were usually several consituencies per county as a remnant.

Tandi Gloria Mpambo-Sibhukwana
was a South African educator and legislator. She served as a Delegate of the National Council of Provinces from 2014 to 2019 and a Member of the National Assembly of South Africa from 2019 until her death in 2020.

Patrik Hrdina
is a Czech windsurfer. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Morten Egeblad Christoffersen
is a Danish windsurfer. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Bontang City F.C.
is an Indonesian football club based in the Bontang, East Kalimantan, Indonesia. This team currently competes in Liga 3.

Hunter Gatherer
is the eighth studio album by Swedish metal band Avatar, to be released on August 7, 2020. The band recorded their eighth studio album at Spinroad Studios in Lindome, Sweden.

Nazri bin Ngah
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Pahang State Executive Councillor.

Samuel Animashaun Perry
also known as Broda Shaggi is a Nigerian actor and comedian. Broda Shaggi is a graduate of Creative Arts from the University of Lagos.

Riccardo Giordano
is an Italian windsurfer. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics, the 2000 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Mohd
. Fakhruddin bin Mohd Ariff is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Pahang State Executive Councillor.

Katherine Olukemi Bankole-Medina
is a professor of history and chair of the Department of History, Geography and Global Studies at Coppin State University. Bankole-Medina joined Coppin State University as professor and chair of the Department of History, Geography and Global Studies in 2008.

Mimardaris
sela, the sela skipper, is a Neotropical species of firetip butterfly in the family Hesperiidae. The species was first described by William Chapman Hewitson in 1866.

Chaman Bahaar
is a 2020 Indian Hindi-language drama film written and directed by Apurva Dhar Badgaiyann. The film is produced by Yoodlee Films, a production venture of Saregama India.

Becky Lucas
is an Australian comedian, writer, and presenter. She is best known as a stand-up comedian and for her roles in Australian television series.

Scholastinae
is a subfamily of flies, which currently includes 14 genera. The Platystomatidae were comprehensively divided into five subfamilies, but more recent reviews of morphology suggest that some aspects of this classification are unsatisfactory.

Jordan Floyd
is an American professional basketball player for Orlandina of the Serie A2 Basket. He played college basketball for the King Tornado and the Albany State Golden Rams.

Joycelyn Ko
is a former Canadian badminton player who competed in singles and doubles events at international level events. Her highest achievement is winning silver and bronze medals at the 2011 Pan American Games.

Hennie Sietsema
also written as Henny Sietsema was a Dutch kortebaanschaatsen speed skater who lived in Uithuizen. Sietsema became 1939 national kortebaan champion, held on 24 December 1938.

CenterspreadGrey
is an Integrated Marketing Communications firm in Nigeria founded in 1982 by Kolawole Ayanwale. It was known as Centrespread Group until 2017.

Zhang Boli
.

Jan Cornelis Maria van Hest
is a Dutch scientist of organic chemistry, best known for his research regarding polymersomes and nanoreactors. He currently holds the position of professor of bioorganic chemistry at Eindhoven University of Technology and is scientific director at the Institute of Complex Molecular Systems.

Sarah Lynne Reed
was a British prisoner waiting for psychiatric reports before a possible trial. A woman with a history of mental health problems, and a victim of police brutality a few years earlier, Reed died while on remand in Holloway prison.

Jodi
J. L. Rowley is an Australian herpetologist and conservationist.

GK Investment Holding Group SA
is a Lugano-based private equity and investment firm whose primary focus is in the healthcare Real Estate, Private Equity and Consultancy sector. The principal areas of investment interest are in Africa, Europe, and the Middle East.

Matthew Prince
is the co-founder and CEO of CloudFlare, a U.S. company that provides content delivery network services, DDoS mitigation, Internet security and distributed domain name server services. Prince earned a B.A. in English Literature and Computer Science from Trinity College in Hartford in 1996.

Otto Cribb
, born Alfred Otto Simpson, was a New Zealand boxer notable for being inducted into the Australian National Boxing Hall of Fame as a pioneer of the sport in 2014. He only boxed for three years but became the most popular boxer in the colonies due to his grit and determination during his short career.

Trapherinae
is a subfamily of flies, which currently includes 11 genera. The Platystomatidae were comprehensively divided into five subfamilies, but more recent reviews of morphology suggest that some aspects of this classification are unsatisfactory.

Aghios Nectarios
was a Hansa A Type cargo ship which was built as Kalliope in 1944 by NV Koninklijk Maatschappij de Schelde, Vlissingen, Netherlands for Neptun Line, Bremen, Germany. She was seized as a prize of war in 1945, passing to the Ministry of War Transport and renamed Empire Garrison.

Alexander Etkind
is a historian and cultural scientist. He is a professor of history and the Chair of Russia-Europe relations at the European University Institute.

Hogar de HGTV
is an upcoming American Spanish-language cable network owned by Discovery, Inc. Scheduled to launch on June 30, 2020, the network will primarily carry lifestyle programming drawn from the Food Network and HGTV brands.

Nick Klessing
is a German artistic gymnast. He competed at both the 2018 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships and 2019 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships.

Franklyn Braithwaite
is an Antigua and Barbudasailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Evesham Road Crossing Halt
railway station served the town of Stratford-upon-Avon, Warwickshire, England from 1904 to 1916 on the Gloucestershire Warwickshire Railway. The station opened as Evesham Road Crossing Halte on 17 October 1904 by the Great Western Railway.

Harleston
is a town from Norwich, in the civil parish of Redenhall with Harleston, in the South Norfolk district, in the county of Norfolk, England. In 2018 it had an estimated population of 5067.

Mark Swanson
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Finn event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Michael Palin
in North Korea is a travel documentary presented by Michael Palin and first aired in the UK on Channel 5 on 20 September 2018.

Anne Fernandez de Corres Del Rio
is a Spanish rugby player. She played with the Spanish national team.

Karlo Kuret
is a Croatian sailor. He competed at the 1992, 1996, 2000, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Glenn Bourke
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Peter Aldag
is a German sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Emanuele Vaccari
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Rohan Solomon
is an Indian singer-songwriter, composer and audio engineer. He is the vocalist of Delhi-based Alt-Rock band Cyanide.

Dan Zhang
is a Chinese-American operations researcher. He is professor of operations management in the Leeds School of Business of the University of Colorado Boulder.

Marmara University
Prof. Dr. Asaf Ataseven Hospital is a public hospital in Maltepe district of Istanbul, Turkey. It was opened in June 2020.

Pebworth Halt
railway station served the village of Pebworth, Worcestershire, England from 1937 to 1966 on the Gloucestershire Warwickshire Railway. The station opened on 6 September 1937 by the Great Western Railway.

Southern European
people are a pan-ethnic group, or multi-ethnic regional grouping, and the inhabitants of Southern Europe. South or Southern Europeans can usually trace back full or partial heritage to Greece, Italy, Spain, Portugal, as well as nations bordering with, or ethnoculturally related to, the region.

Nicklas Timfjord
is a former professional tennis player from Sweden. As a junior, Timfjord reached a singles high of no.

Alexander Joseph William Rackow
is an English former first-class cricketer. Rackow was born at Wandsworth in December 1996.

Ballagh
is a townland in the civil parish of Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located in the north-east of Mullingar town, a large junction between the N4 and the N52 roads stands at the centre of the townland.

Roger Poole
, including during the disputes of the 1978-9 Winter of Discontent.

Gaybrook Demesne
more commonly known as Gaybrook is a townland in the civil parish of Enniscoffey in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located to the south of Mullingar, to the north of Rochfortbridge and Milltownpass, and to the east of Lough Ennell.

Broad Marston Halt
railway station served the village of Pebworth, Worcestershire, England from 1904 to 1916 on the Gloucestershire Warwickshire Railway. The station opened as Broad Marston Halte on 17 October 1904 by the Great Western Railway.

FlyPersia
is an Iranian airline based in Shiraz that operates scheduled domestic flights. Fly Persia, after registering with the Companies Registration Office in 2018, started its activity to receive the flight operations certificate from the National Aviation Organization, and after receiving this certificate in 2019 by making the first passenger flight from The origin of Shiraz to the holy city of Mashhad began its activities.

Andrew Gooding
is a Jamaican sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics, the 1996 Summer Olympics, and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Nikolas Epifaniou
is a Cypriot sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Petros Elton
is a Cypriot sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Yevgeny Burmatnov
is a Russian sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Dmitry Berezkin
is a Russian sailor. He competed at the 1992, 1996, 2000, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Jeong Seong-an
is a South Korean sailor. He competed at the 1992, 1996, 2000, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Marek Chocian
is a Polish sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Aciura
coryli is a species of tephritid or fruit fly in the family Tephritidae. The larvae of this species live in flowers of Phlomis and Ballota.

Thanasis Pakhoumas
is a Greek sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Anna Corbella
i Jordi is a Catalan sailor. In 2011, she became the first Catalan-Spanish sailor to finish the Barcelona World Race . In 2011, she was awarded the Royal Order of Sports Merit.

Rukh-Shana Namuyimba
is a Ugandan Communications Specialist. She is a news anchor, and co-fouder Xfinity Communications Ltd.

Robert J. Devlin Jr.
is a Judge of the Connecticut Appellate Court and a former Judge of the Connecticut Superior Court. He was nominated to the Appellate court by Governor Ned Lamont and began his term on May 15, 2019.

Stirling Village
is a settlement in the Buchan area of Aberdeenshire, Scotland, located on the A90 road immediately to the west of Boddam and south of Peterhead. The settlement was known for many years known simply as Stirling, until in 2004 it was renamed Stirling Village to avoid confusion with the newly granted city of Stirling.

Longhaven
is a village in Aberdeenshire, Scotland, located two miles southwest of Boddam. Longhaven railway station closed in 1948.

Flint
, formerly De Flint, is a theatre in the centre of Amersfoort, Netherlands built in 1977. It was designed by Onno Greiner.

Kalabaland Dhura
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. It situated at the head of Kalabaland Glacier.

William Hugh Robinson
is an American engineer who is Professor of Electrical Engineering and Vice Provost for Academic at Vanderbilt University. His research considers sophisticated computer systems for consumer and industrial use.

Downiehills
is a settlement in Aberdeenshire, Scotland, located about three miles west of Peterhead.

Kirktown
of St Fergus, often just called Kirktown is an area of the village of St Fergus in Buchan, Aberdeenshire, Scotland. It should not be confused with an area of Peterhead.

David Francis Russell
is an English former first-class cricketer. Russell was born at Hackney in October 1936.

Aglaostigma
aucupariae is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Pirttilampi
is a medium-sized lake in Finland. It is located in Central Finland, to the north of Multia.

Charles Monteith
was a British literary editor. He was born in Lisburn, County Antrim, and won a scholarship to Magdalen College, Oxford where he earned a Double First.

Karen Lynn Portch
is an Antiguan and Barbudan sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Piotr Henryk Sawczuk
is a Polish Roman Catholic bishop, being the bishop of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Drohiczyn since 2019. He was previously the auxiliary bishop of Roman Catholic Diocese of Siedlce and titular bishop of Ottana from 2013 to 2019.

Amauronematus
lateralis is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

James Lawson
, Lord Lawson was a 16th-century Scottish lawyer and politician. He was both a Senator of the College of Justice from 1532 and Provost of Edinburgh in 1532.

Nasc
is an Irish independent, non-governmental migrant rights centre in Ireland, based in Cork. Nasc was founded in 2000 in Cork by Sisters of Mercy, the Society of African Missions and a group of activists, in response to the creation of the Direct Provision system.

Max Thompson
is an English professional footballer who plays as a forward for Burnley. Thompson spent time with Manchester United and Everton before signing an 18-month contract with Burnley in December 2019.

Mark John Russell
is an English former first-class cricketer. Russell was born at Lincoln in December 1970.

George Washington
is a statue of the first president of the United States by the same name located in Baltimore, Maryland. Erected in 1857 in, the sculpture is located at the main entrance of Druid Hill Park.

Robert Anthony Rydon
is an English former first-class cricketer. Rydon was born in November 1964 at Greatham, Sussex.

Gibberula
pascuana is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk, in the family Cystiscidae.

Pedro-Juan Vazquez Bragan
, known professionally as PJ Sin Suela, is a Puerto Rican rapper and physician. Born in Ponce, Puerto Rico, he graduated from medical school in 2015 before pursuing a musical career.

Oliver Jack Wright Rogers
is an English former first-class cricketer. Rogers was born at Richmond in August 1998.

Luis Zamora
is an Argentinian lawyer and politician. He is the leader of the Self-determination and Freedom party and served as National Deputy between 1989 and 1993 and again in 2001 and 2005.

Shiao Yu-jan
is a Taiwanese artistic gymnast. In 2018, he represented Chinese Taipei at the 2018 Asian Games held in Jakarta, Indonesia without winning a medal.

Hulchul
is a 2019 Indian Telugu-language suspense-comedy film starring newcomer Rudraksh Utkam and Dhanya Balakrishna. The film premiered on 13 December 2019.

Emma Schlangenhausen
was an Austrian painter and graphic artist. Schlangenhausen was born on March 9, 1947 in Tyrol, Austria.

Tim Reed
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing the 7th district in the South Dakota House of Representatives.

The Banker
is a 1989 American horror thriller film directed by William Webb and starring Robert Forster.

Preeti Nigam
is an Indian actress who is known for her negative roles in Telugu-language television serials. Her career began when a Telugu short filmmaker noticed her while she was giving a dance performance.

Doug Post
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing the 7th district in the South Dakota House of Representatives.

Marissa Maurin Gausset
is a Chilean sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Dennis Mojen
is a German actor. His parents are active in the film industry.

Zhang Shunfang
is a Chinese sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Rosalie Marie Ashton-Washington
, known as Lady Tambourine, is a gospel musician from Louisiana, famous for her skill at the tambourine. Washington enjoys impromptu tambourine performances with gospel and zydeco groups, seeking out collaborations and invitations at live shows to join whoever is on stage.

Karin Derry
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing the 39th district in the Iowa House of Representatives.

Paula Lewin
is a Bermudian sailor. She competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics, 1996 Summer Olympics, and 2004 Summer Olympics.

Jackson Walls
is an Australian racing driver currently racing in the Formula Renault Eurocup for Arden Motorsport. In 2018 Walls jumped into a single seater car for the first time competitively with the Patrizicorse team in the Australian F4 Championship.

Gisela Williams Camet Bekker
is an Argentine sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Romani Jews
, Jewish Roma, or Jewish Romani, are ethnic Romani that have adopted Judaism. These Romani adopted Judaism while they migrated from Northwest India.

Tracy Ehlert
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing the 70th district in the Iowa House of Representatives.

Nicole Meylan-Levecque
is a Swiss sailor. She competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and 1996 Summer Olympics.

Suryapura
, also spelled Surajpura, is a village and corresponding community development block in Rohtas district of Bihar, India. As of 2011, the village of Suryapura had a population of 6,347, in 900 households, while Suryapura block had a population of 57,529, in 8,728 households.

Shona Moss
is a Canadian sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Sam Kwabena Safo Junior
, better known as Showbezzy or Showboy, is an award-winning rapper and musician from Ghana and a controversial figure in the Ghanaian Music Industry. He is popularly known as one of the co-founders of AMG Record Label which produced Ghanaian sensational rapper Medikal.

Evghenia Ablovatchi
is a Moldovan former professional tennis player. Born in 1981, Ablovatchi trained as a junior in the Netherlands and played on the professional tour for three years, reaching a career high singles ranking of 552 in the world.

Craig Keola Stutzmann
is an American football coach and former player who is currently the co-offensive coordinator and quarterbacks coach at Washington State University. He played college football at the University of Hawaii.

Young India
is an Indian Telugu-language drama film directed by Dasari Narayana Rao and starring newcomers Pradyumna, Arvind Krishna, Abhinay, Anurag Parvathaneni and Sowmya. A group of youngsters attempt suicide, but luckily they are saved by Keethi, who listens to their stories.

Phebalium
tuberculosum is a species of erect shrub that is endemic to Western Australia. It has glandular-warty and scaly branchlets and leaves and white flowers arranged in umbels of three or four with rust-coloured scales on the back of the petals.

Ruthild Winkler-Oswatitsch
is an Austrian biochemist associated with the Max Planck Institute for Biophysical Chemistry in Germany, and known for two books she coauthored with Nobel prize winner Manfred Eigen. Her research has concerned fast biochemical reactions, game-theoretic models for molecular evolution, and the use of sequence analysis of DNA and RNA in studying the early history of biological evolution.

Denise Lyttle
is an Irish sailor. She competed in the 1992 Summer Olympics and 1996 Summer Olympics.

Jennifer Konfrst
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing the 43rd district in the Iowa House of Representatives.

Irina Kornienko
is a Russian former professional tennis player. Kornienko, a right-handed player, reached her career high singles ranking of 452 in 1998.

Sofi de la Torre
is a singer and songwriter from the Canary Islands, whose music combines elements from chillwave and rhythm and blues. After high school, where she discovered a talent for music, she moved to Los Angeles, but then went to London to go to school, studying media and communications.

Randy Armstrong
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 28A in the Idaho House of Representatives.

Ransom Hunter
was born a slave on March 14 1825 in Charleston, SC. He was the first freed slave to own property in Gaston County, NC.

David Byrne
was an Irish criminal associated with the crime gang run by Christy Kinahan. He was from Raleigh Square in Crumlin.

Ranjit Kumar Dass
is an academician and principal of Nath Valley School, Aurangabad, who was awarded National Teachers Award in 2014. Ranjit was born in the year 1957.

Beebe Lake
is a reservoir within Fall Creek in Ithaca, New York, located on the campus of Cornell University. The lake was formed when Ezra Cornell constructed a dam above Triphammer Falls to provide power to the mills owned by Jeremiah S. Beebe, building a tunnel 200 feet long and 15 feet high to channel the water.

Triphammer Falls
is a waterfall on Fall Creek in Ithaca, New York, located within the campus of Cornell University. The waterfall existed naturally but was altered substantially in order to construct a dam in the 19th century, leading to the formation of Beebe Lake.

Karin Orth
is a German historian, known for her research into the Nazi concentration camps.

Paradigm Mall
is a shopping mall located in Petaling Jaya, Selangor, Malaysia. Own by WCT Group, started operations in 2012.

Kadira Divyaraja
is an upcoming Sri Lankan Sinhala language fantasy film written and directed by professor Sunil Ariyaratne. This mythological film depicts the romantic relationship between Hindu god Kartikeya and the aboriginal princess Valli.

Butlers Gorge
is a rural locality in the local government area of Central Highlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north-west of the town of Hamilton.

Annabelle Nicole Morozov
is a Russian ice dancer. With her skating partner, Andrei Bagin, she is the 2019 CS Golden Spin of Zagreb silver medalist.

Little Big Chief Mountain
is a mountain summit located immediately southwest of Dutch Miller Gap, on the common border separating King County and Kittitas County in Washington state. It is situated within the Alpine Lakes Wilderness, on land managed by Mount Baker-Snoqualmie National Forest.

Caragana
acanthophylla is a species of flowering plants within the family Fabaceae. It is found in a number of countries across Asia including China, India, Kazakhstan, Kyrgizstan, Nepal, Pakistan and Tajikistan.

Hollow Tree
is a rural locality in the local government area of Central Highlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of Hamilton.

Sheritta A. Strong
is an American adult psychiatrist and an Assistant Professor in the Department of Psychiatry at the University of Nebraska Medical Center. Strong is a leader in education and advocacy at UNMC, and is the co-Director of Medical Student Education in the Department of Psychiatry as well as the Interim Director for Inclusion at UNMC.

Terrence K. Williams
is an African-American comedian, commentator, and YouTuber.

Madanmohan Dutta
was an Indian politician. He was elected to the Odisha Legislative Assembly from Balasore constituency in the 2019 Odisha Legislative Assembly election as a member of the Bharatiya Janata Party.

Markowicz Fine Art
is an American contemporary art gallery owned by the French art dealer Bernard Markowicz. It has two gallery spaces, one in the Miami Design District and one in Dallas, Texas.

Henry Resurreccion Villarica
or Atorni Henry, is a Filipino attorney and politician who served as the member of the Philippine House of Representatives from the 4th District of Bulacan since 2019. Previously, he served as City Mayor of Meycauayan from 2016 until 2019.

Abdul Aziz
bin Mat Kiram is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Pahang State Executive Councillor.

Nexavir
is an injection composed of peptides and amino acids derived from pig liver. It has been used to treat skin conditions such as acne, inflammation, and edema.

Amarchinta
is a Panchayat and Mandal headquarters located in Wanaparthy district in the Telangana state of India. Jurala Project is a dam on the Krishna River situated about 12 km from Amarchinta.

Godo Holo
is a group of villages in the Tapanahony resort of the Sipaliwini District of Suriname. The villages are inhabited by Maroons of the Ndyuka people.

Thomas L. Ackerman
is an American former basketball player and coach. He played college basketball as a guard for the West Liberty State Hilltoppers and was a three-time All-West Virginia Intercollegiate Athletic Conference selection.

Mohd
. Johari bin Hussain is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Pahang State Executive Councillor.

Maria Pavlidou
is a Greek former professional tennis player. A right-handed player from Thessaloniki, Pavlidou spent much of her early career playing college tennis in the United States for the University of Arkansas.

SS Massilia
was an ocean liner of the Compagnie de Navigation Sud-Atlantique. It was launched in 1914 and first sailed in 1920.

Nazar
, is an Manchester-based Angolain electronic musician. He is known for his distinct mixture of the angola genre kuduro and Electronic music.

Li Na
won the first edition of this tournament.

Brian John Macpherson Partridge
is a Scottish former first-class cricketer. Partridge was born in January 1956 at Haddington.

Cavendish Golf Club
in Buxton, Derbyshire opened in 1925 and the course was designed by Alister MacKenzie. The course is long with a par of 68.

Dasymaschalon
is an Asian genus of bushy plants in the subfamily Annonoideae and tribe Uvarieae. Its native range is from southern China, Indo-China to Malesia.

Petri Leskinen
is a Finnish sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics, the 1996 Summer Olympics, and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Toby Henry Somerville Pettman
is an English first-class cricketer. Pettman was born at Kingston upon Thames in May 1998.

Tegne
- og Kunstindustriskolen for Kvinder was a private Danish educational establishment in Copenhagen. From 1875, it aimed to provide better facilities for women to develop competence in visual arts and handicrafts at a time when they were unable to enter the Royal Danish Academy of Fine Arts.

Phebalium
woombye, commonly known as wallum phebalium, is a species of shrub that is endemic to eastern Australia. It has branchlets covered with scales and star-shaped hairs, elliptical leaves, and white to pink flowers arranged in umbels of up four to ten flowers.

Norolazali bin Sulaiman
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Pahang State Executive Councillor.

Ashiqur Rahman
is a former Bangladeshi cricketer and coach who has featured in 15 first-class matches and 18 List A matches. He is currently serving as the BCB Development coach.

Miss Malaysia Universe
1975 is the 11th edition of the Miss Universe Malaysia pageant which was held at the Merlin Hotel, Kuala Lumpur where the reigning winner Lily Chong of Johore crowned her successor Alice Cheong from Perak at the end of the event. Alice then represented Malaysia at the Miss Universe 1975 pageant but was unplaced.

Andreas Bienz
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Syed Ibrahim bin Syed Ahmad
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Pahang State Executive Councillor.

Beat Stegmeier
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Byron Marsh
is a Caymanian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Paola Vittoria
is an Antigua and Barbuda sailor. She competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Harry van der Molen
.

Louisa Ma
is an Australian badminton player who competes in international level events.

Carlo Falcone
is an Antigua and Barbuda sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Carlos Gabutti
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Ferenc Nagy
is a Hungarian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Anne Kuik
.

Dillibe Onyeama
is a Nigerian author and publisher. In 1969, he became the first black person to finish their studies at Eton College.

Tibor Tenke
is a Hungarian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Friedrich Gruber
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Paul Fisher
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Jacoba Antonia Maria Joanna
.

Billy Holowesko
is a Bahamian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Tom McWilliam
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Phil Lawrence
is a British sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Guram Biganishvili
is a Georgian sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Shahaniza binti Shamsuddin
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Pahang State Executive Councillor.

Suzann Victor
is a Singaporean contemporary artist based in Australia whose practice spans installation, painting, and performance art. Victor is most known for her public artworks and installations that examine ideas of disembodiment, the postcolonial, and the environmental in response to space, context and architecture.

Vladimer Gruzdevi
is a Georgian sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Maurits von Martels
.

Evagelia Roussi
is a Greek former professional tennis player. Roussi featured in a total of nine Fed Cup ties for Greece between 1999 and 2001, winning three singles and one doubles rubber.

Marina Koltsova
is a former Soviet long track speed skater, who was active between 1975 and 1986. Koltsova represented her nation at the World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women in 1982, finishing 16th overall.

Fernando Bello
is a Portuguese sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Fredd Atkins
, born June 19, 1952, is the first African-American mayor of Sarasota, Florida. He has served on the Sarasota City Commission for 18 years and has run for Sarasota County Commissioner.

Lorikayan
is the most famous folklore of Bhojpuri. Its protagonist is Lorik.

Francisco de Mello
is a Portuguese sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Fernando Rita
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Dalton Smith
is an English professional boxer. As an amateur he won a silver medal at the 2014 European Youth Championships and bronze at the 2015 Commonwealth Youth Games, both in the lightweight division, and won the 2018 ABA Championships at light-welterweight.

Jaime Piris
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Odo de Novelles
was one of the leaders of the Catalan Company in Medieval Greece, after the death of Roger de Flor.

Iakovos Kiseoglou
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Dimitrios Boukis
is a Greek sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics, the 1996 Summer Olympics, and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

KVWC
is a Full Service formatted broadcast radio station. The station is licensed to Vernon, Texas and serves Wilbarger County, Wichita Falls, and Childress in Texas and Altus in Oklahoma.

Guro Jabulisile Sibeko
is a Norwegian novelist, non-fiction writer and activist. She was born to a Norwegian mother and South African father, a refugee from apartheid regime who had also fallen out with the ANC.

Alejalil Hospital
is a general hospital and the only hospital in Aq Qala, Iran, founded in 2005 by Haj Aghi Alejalil, an Iranian philanthropist.

David Tidboald
was a British-born South African conductor. Born in Plymouth, Tidboald was conscripted at the age of 18 but saw no action.

Gianmarco Cangiano
is an Italian footballer who plays as a forward for Serie A side Bologna.

Linabelle Ruth R. Villarica
is a Filipino politician who currently served as mayor of Meycauayan since 2019. Previously, she served as the member of the House of Representatives from the 4th District from 2010 until 2019.

Aglaostigma
fulvipes is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Sri Sri Sarvamangala Kali Mata Temple
is a Hindu Temple, located in Asanpur area of Jirat, India. The temple is considered as one of the most oldest temple of Jirat, India.

Markus Bryner
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Chamrao Parbat
II is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. It is situated in the Zaskar Range.

Charlie Shipway
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Eric Cook
is a South African sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Geoff Stevens
is a South African sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Jay Kempe
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Reid Kempe
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Kalevi Kostiainen
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Markku Kuismin
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Randy Mattingly
is a former gridiron football quarterback who played in the Canadian Football League. He played college football at Evansville.

Rochelle Goldberg
is a contemporary artist who lives and works in New York City and Berlin. Goldberg is best known for her sculptural works that challenge the fixity of the art object.

Stefan Rahm
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Lars Hendriksen
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Minerva Football Academy
is an Indian professional football club based in Mohali, Punjab. It competes in I-League, under license from All India Football Federation.

Anette Ree Andersen
is a Danish sailor. She competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Tuscarora
is a hamlet and census-designated place in the town of Mount Morris, Livingston County, New York, United States. Its population was 74 as of the 2010 census.

Tri-Mountain National Scenic Area
, which are all named after mountains, hence the name.

Carlos Santacreu
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Runshito Lims
is a Naga poet and drama writer. Runshito Lims was born on 26 January 1998 in Kohima, Nagaland to a Yimchunger Naga father from Pungrunger, Kiphire District and a Southern Angami mother from Kidima, Kohima District.

Ian Rhodes
is a British sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

David Williams
is a British sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Norna Robertson
is a lead scientist at LIGO at California Institute of Technology, and professor of experimental physics at the University of Glasgow. Her career has focused on experimental research into suspension systems and instrumentation to achieve the detection of gravitational waves.

Brian Jones
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Li Mei-jhen
, also known as Jane Lee, is a Taiwanese politician. Li was born on 21 March 1979.

JetUML
is a UML tool developed as a pure-Java desktop application for educational and professional use. The project was launched in January 2015 with a focus on minimalist design.

Elana Herzog
is an American installation artist and sculptor based in New York City. She is most known for abstract, tactile works in which she disassembles, reconfigures and embeds second-hand textiles in walls, modular panels and architectural spaces with industrial-grade metal staples.

Rhenopyrgus
viviani is an extinct species of echinoderms from the Silurian period. It lived for about 435 million years ago and is described as looking unusual.

I Corps Artillery
was a United States Army division-level command active during World War I, World War II, the Korean War and the Cold War. Today the 65th Field Artillery Brigade continues the lineage of I Corps Artillery.

Megan
is a proof of concept film that pays homage to the Cloverfield franchise, it was released on YouTube on July 31, 2018 and immediately went viral. When a young Scientist becomes entangled in a military mission to deliver the only antidote that will save mankind, she finds herself not only fighting for survival but also being confronted by demons from her past.

Karyn Cecilia Velez
was a Filipino-American badminton who competed in international level events. Velez died of serious injuries in a head-on car crash aged 23 years old, the van driver who struck her vehicle pleaded guilty for homicide after he was charged for reckless driving.

Hila Shai-Vazan
is an Israeli journalist and politician. She currently serves as a member of the Knesset for the Blue and White alliance.

Nero
, or The Fall of Rome is a 1909 Italian short silent Epic film directed by Luigi Maggi and Arturo Ambrosio, based on the eponymous 1872 drama by Pietro Cossa. This is one of the oldest surviving Italian epic films about Ancient Rome.

Sheila Ford Hamp
is the principal owner and chairperson of the Detroit Lions and had been the vice chairperson since 2014. She succeeded her mother Martha Firestone Ford on June 23 2020.

Richard Crosse
was an English priest in the first half of the 18th century. Crosse was born in and educated at Trinity College, Oxford.

Ysfeilion
was a kingdom dependent on the Kingdom of Gwynedd. Formed in the 5th century, it covered the territory of the island of Anglesey and the opposite coast of the Menai Strait.

Athalia
circularis is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Gudur Narayan Reddy
is an Indian National Congress leader from Telangana, he is All Indian Congress Committee member and also treasurer of Telangana Pradesh congress committee. He contested in 2019 Telangana MLA quota MLC elections.

George Nardone
is an American politician and a Republican member of the Rhode Island House of Representatives representing District 28 beginning in 2019. He serves on the House Committees on Corporations, Small Business, Municipal Government, and Special Legislation.

Nepal Motion Picture Association
is an association that promotes Nepali language films.

Kuukua Eshun
is a Ghanaian-American creative who lives in Ohio and Ghana. She is inspired by emotions and femininity, Kuukua raises awareness about social issues and mental health through her writing and film.

Vladica Grujic
is a Serbian football manager and former player and also holds Austrian citizenship. He is the current assistant coach of Japanese club Machida Zelvia.

Poovaiyar
is an Indian gaana singer and actor who works in Tamil-language films. Poovaiyar participated and became the second runner up of Super Singer Junior 6.

Ceyenne Doroshow
is an author, activist, and the founder and executive director of G.L.I.T.S., an organization dedicated to creating sustainable housing and healthcare for Black transgender people. In June 2019, Doroshow co-organized the historic Liberation March, a Black Trans Lives Matter silent march in Brooklyn, NY, along with activist Raquel Willis, artist and activist West Dakota, the family of Iyanna Dior, and several black and transgender community organizations including the Marsha P. Johnson Institute, The Okra Project and Black Trans Femmes in the Arts.

Bhaskar Rao
is an Indian police officer who is currently serving as the Commissioner of Bangalore City Police, from 2 August 2019. Rao comes from Bangalore and was previously Additional Director General of Police in the Karnataka State Reserve Police.

Richard Curwen
, D.D. was an English Anglican priest in the 16th century. Curwen was a Fellow of Corpus Christi College, Oxford.

Irene Aurelia Tarimo
is an environmental scientist, and the Head of Department of Environmental Studies at the Open University of Tanzania.

Liz Gunner
is an academic who specializes in South African literature and culture, and particularly radio. She is a visiting research professor at the University of Johannesburg and a professorial research associate at the School of Oriental and African Studies of the University of London.

Athalia
cordata is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Kurt Martens
is a Belgian professor and canon lawyer. Martens studied as a secondary school student at the Sint-Jozefscollege in Tielt.

FAAN Awards
is an award ceremony for Nepali movies organised by Film Artistes Association of Nepal.

Praveen Gedam
is an Indian Administrative Service officer. He currently is a director for the National Health Authority.

Athalia
lugens is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Samuel Wilkins
II was an accuser in the Salem witch trials. He was the son of Henry Wilkins, and thus the grandson of Bray Wilkins and nephew of John Wilkins, two other accusers.

LG Film Awards
is an award ceremony for Nepali movies organised by Cine Circle Nepal.

John Smith
, DCL was a Welsh Anglican priest in the 16th century. HSmith was educated at the University of Oxford.

Athalia
scutellariae is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

SAARC Film Festival
is an annual film festival in South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation.

Simon Smith
was an Anglican priest in the Sixteenth Century. Smith was educated at Trinity Hall, Cambridge.

Polymorphodon
is an extinct genus of archosauriform reptile from the Middle Triassic of Germany. The only known species is Polymorphodon adorfi, discovered in Lower Keuper deposits at a quarry in Eschenau, Germany.

Alfredo Sirica
is an Italian composer, pianist and orchestrator. Best known for his activity as soundtrack composer, he has written and produced music for cinema, videogames and TV series.

Vermont Experimental Cold Hardy Cactus Garden
is a small botanical garden less than 100 square feet specialized in cactus and succulents, in Middlebury, Vermont, United States. It is located in a private residence in a bioclimatic zone in far north in New England.

Winston Churchill
was first elected to the UK Parliament at the 1900 general election as one of two Conservative Party members representing the Oldham constituency. He took his seat in the House of Commons in February 1901 but soon became critical of the Conservative government on a number of issues.

Blockley
railway station served the village of Blockley, Gloucestershire, England from 1853 to 1966 on the Oxford, Worcester and Wolverhampton Railway. The station opened on 4 June 1853 by the Oxford, Worcester and Wolverhampton Railway.

Mariya Ilyichina Tolstova
was a flight commander in the 175th Guards Attack Aviation Regiment, and one of the few women to fly the Il-2. Tolstova was orphaned at a young age, resulting in her attending a boarding school for much of her youth.

Ilse Essers
, was a German engineer who established essential foundations in the field of aeronautical engineering. Ilse Essers was born Ilse Kober in 1898.

John Damian Bernard
is a British businessman and start-up advisor. Since 2017, he has been a trustee of The Chartered Institute of Marketing and has served in roles with LG Mobile, Siemens, Sony Ericsson and Mozilla.

Jan Eckert
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Balleagny
is a townland in the civil parish of Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located to the west of Mullingar town, on the banks of the Royal Canal.

Piet Eckert
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Thomas Somaster
, DD was a 16th century English priest. Somaster was born at Painsford, Ashprington He was a Fellow of All Souls College, Oxford.

Bojan Grego
is a Croatian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Flavio Grassi
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Dave Hudson
is a South African sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Kaalicharan
is a 2013 Indian Telugu-language political drama film that stars Chaitanya Krishna, Chandini Tamilarasan and Pankaj Kesari. The film marks the Telugu debut of Tamilarasan and Kesari.

David Kitchen
is a South African sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Simon Ellis
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Sven Merkel
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Markus Schneeberger
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Stephan Schurich
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Mitja Kosmina
is a Slovenian sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Inlet
is the fifth studio album by the Champaign, Illinois band Hum. It was surprise-released digitally to Bandcamp on June 23, 2020.

Pankaj Kesari
is an Indian actor who works in Bhojpuri and Telugu-language films. Pankaj worked as a theatre artist in Patna before foraying into films.

Thierry Berger
is a French sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Vincent Berger
is a French sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Cladius
pectinicornis is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Johan Lindell
is a Swedish sailor. He competed in the Flying Dutchman event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Dcine Awards
is an award ceremony for Nepali movies organised by Chhayan Chhabi Creation.

Haj Aghi Alejalil
was an Iranian philanthropist. He was chosen as the best philanthropist in Iran in the Khatami era.

Kevin Davis
is a Canadian politician who has served as the Mayor of Brantford since 2018. Prior to that, he was a lawyer and a Brantford City Councillor from 1985 to 1991.

Abbey Abimbola
, popularly known as Crackydon is a Nigerian actor, director, Stuntman based in Malaysia. Abbey Abimbola was born 2, November 1980 in Iwo,Osun state and grew up in Mushin Lagos.

Gintaras Zelvys
was a criminal born in Lithuania who was shot dead in Rathcoole, 2013. He was a father of one.

Troy E. Nehls
is an American law enforcement officer. He is the sheriff for Fort Bend County, Texas.

Ishan Parbat
is a mountain of the Kumaon Himalaya in Uttarakhand India also called Adi Kailash II. The elevation of Ishan Parbat is and its prominence is . It is joint 154th highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand.

WBS Television
known as Wavah Broadcasting Service is a Ugandan based television station owned by city billionaire Gordon Wavamunno. On December 14, 2016, it ceased to operate as a public broadcaster after it was put under receivership over Shs7.2b tax arrears by URA.

Penny Way
is a British windsurfer. She competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Dorcas Ewokolo Idowu
was a Cameroonian politician. She was the first woman to sit in the Southern Cameroons House of Assembly, and the first female parliamentarian in what is now Cameroon.

Catenella
caespitosa is a small red marine alga. This small alga grows to 20 mm high from a discoid holdfast and dark brown in colour.

Mary Hardway Walker
was purportedly one of the last surviving American former-slaves when she died in 1969. She was purportedly born in Union Springs, Alabama in 1848 and married and had her first child by age 20.

Dolerus
aeneus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Gerry Brown
is an American jazz drummer. Brown was born in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania.

Dolerus
bajulus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Monte Cacciarello
is a hill that rises in Rome, on the right side of the Tiber; together with Monte San Valentino, it forms the Monti Parioli. It is located in the north-west area of the town, within the Municipio II.

Uriel Buso
is an Israeli politician who serves as a member of the Knesset for Shas. Burso was born the ninth of ten children in Ramla.

Lucky Khambule
is a South African former asylum seeker and activist in Ireland, and co-founder of the Movement of Asylum Seekers in Ireland. Khambule has been living in Direct Provision since his arrival in Ireland in 2013.

Kentucky Route 737
is a state highway in northwestern Grayson and southern Breckinridge counties in west central Kentucky. The route runs from KY 259 in northern Leitchfield to the same route southeast of McDaniels via Lilac and Fisher.

Dolerus
picipes is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Olivia Holdt
is a Danish football player who plays as a midfielder for VSK Aarhus in Denmark top-division Elitedivisionen and for the Danish national under-23 team. She has appeared for the Danish national youth team and Danish national junior team, several times.

Marcus Collins
is an English historian of contemporary Britain. He was educated at the University of Cambridge, Harvard University and Columbia University and currently teaches at Loughborough University.

Barnton
railway station served the village of Barnton, Edinburgh, Scotland from 1894 to 1951 on the Barnton Branch. The station opened as Cramond Brig on 1 March 1894 by the Caledonian Railway.

Dark Hearts
is the upcoming third studio album by Norwegian singer Annie. It is scheduled to be released on October 16, 2020.

Diva
by Cindy is an African-American and Woman owned brand of all natural hair care products. The company is based in Baltimore, Maryland, and is known for producing conditioners, lotions, shampoos, and hairgels.

Ibrahim Balarabe-Abdullahi
is a Nigerian politician who is currently serving as the speaker of the Nasarawa State House of Assembly. He was first elected speaker of the 5 Nasarawa State house of Assembly in 2015 and was unanimously re-elected for a second term as speaker of the 6 Assembly in 2019.

George Mitchell
, nicknamed The Penguin, is an Irish criminal originally from Ballyfermot. He had an older brother Patrick, who died in January 2020.

Uche Agba
is a Nigerian professional footballer who plays as a forward for Malaysia Super League club Melaka United.

Meadow Hot Springs
are a system of geothermal springs South of Provo, Utah, near the town of Meadow. Three large soaking pools with ledges for sitting have been formed by travertine deposits.

Suleiman Dikko
is a Nigerian who is the current Chief Judge of Nasarawa State. In 2019, Diko threatened to sack judges who arrive late in court for case hearing and warned the Nigerian Police that he would stop signing arrest warrants to the police for delayed prosecution of crime suspects already remanded in prison.

Strychnos
camptoneura is a species of plant in the Loganiaceae family. It is native to Camaroon, the Central African Republic, the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Gabon, Ivory Coast, Liberia, Nigeria, the Republic of the Congo and Zaire.

Eschenbach
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Eschenbach, in the Swiss canton of Lucerne. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Ballwil
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Ballwil, in the Swiss canton of Lucerne. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Gustavo Almeida dos Santos
simply known as Gustavo is a Brazilian footballer who plays for UiTM in Malaysia Super League.

Anna Elvira Bliss
was an American teacher in South Africa. She grew up in Amherst, Massachusetts and taught in local schools before answering a request from Andrew Murray for teachers in South Africa.

Hochdorf
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Hochdorf, in the Swiss canton of Lucerne. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Baldegg Kloster
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Hochdorf, in the Swiss canton of Lucerne. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Baldegg
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Hochdorf, in the Swiss canton of Lucerne. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Ayanda Precious Bans
is a South African politician serving as a Member of the Western Cape Provincial Parliament since May 2019. She is a member of the African National Congress and represents the Central Karoo constituency.

Gelfingen
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Hitzkirch, in the Swiss canton of Lucerne. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Hitzkirch
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Hitzkirch, in the Swiss canton of Lucerne. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Vista Memorial Gardens
is a cemetery in Miami Lakes, Florida.

Ermensee
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Ermensee, in the Swiss canton of Lucerne. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Peterhead Golf Club
, in Peterhead, Aberdeenshire, Scotland, was founded in 1841, making it, by its own claim, the 18th-oldest golf club in the world. Located on the River Ugie near its mouth at the North Sea, it began in its current Craigewan Links home, which is just over a mile northwest of Peterhead town centre, as a nine-hole course in 1892, designed by dual winner of The Open Championship Willie Park, Jr.

Mosen
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Hitzkirch, in the Swiss canton of Lucerne. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Lynnae C. Quick
is a planetary geophysicist and Ocean Worlds Planetary Scientist at NASA Goddard Space Flight Center. Her research centers on theoretical modeling of cryovolcanic processes on the icy moons and dwarf planets in our solar system as well as modeling volcanic activity on Venus and the Moon.

Beinwil am See
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Beinwil am See, in the Swiss canton of Aargau. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Li Ting
and Sun Tiantian won the first edition of this tournament in an all-Chinese final.

Birrwil
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Birrwil, in the Swiss canton of Aargau. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Sarah Child
was a British banker. She was daughter of Gilbert Jodrell of Ankerwyke, Buckinghamshire.

Whiting Street Reservoir
, often shortened as Whiting Reservoir a Class I hazard reservoir, is an auxiliary drinking supply for the city of Holyoke, Massachusetts. The reservoir has an impound capacity of more than 479 million gallons of water and a safe yield of 1.5 million gallons of water per day.

Boniswil
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Boniswil, in the Swiss canton of Aargau. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Hallwil
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Hallwil, in the Swiss canton of Aargau. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Sarju Prasad Misra
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, the lower house of the Parliament of India from the Deoria constituency of Uttar Pradesh as a member of the Indian National Congress.

Seon
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Seon, in the Swiss canton of Aargau. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Seetal line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Shaarey Zedek Cemetery
is a Conservative Jewish burial ground in the North End of Winnipeg, Manitoba, Canada. Operated by the Shaarey Zedek Synagogue, it is the largest Jewish cemetery in the Canadian Prairies, with more than 8,000 graves as of 1996.

Andrea Carboni
is an Italian professional footballer who plays for Cagliari as a defender. Carboni joined the youth academy of Cagliari at the age of 10.

Therese Krupp
was a German industrialist. She was married to Friedrich Krupp, and took over the Krupp company after his death in 1826.

Amalie Hohenester
was a German healer and cunning woman. She was active as a healer from the 1850s onward, and managed her own practice, the famous spa of Mariabrunn, from 1862 onward.

Juan Carlos Pastor
is a Spanish handball coach for SC Pick Szeged.

Ally Love
is the host of the Brooklyn Nets, a Peloton fitness instructor, and the founder and CEO of Love Squad, a fitness and lifestyle website. Ally Love was raised in Miami, Florida.

Dawid Nilsson
is a retired Polish handball player and current coach of Stal Mielec.

Lady Godiva
is a 1911 American silent historical drama film directed by J. Stuart Blackton and produced by Vitagraph Studios in Brooklyn, New York. Its scenario is based on a legendary incident in the life of Godiva, Countess of Mercia, who lived in England during the mid-11th century.

Red Dot United
is a political party in Singapore founded on 26 May 2020. On 26 May 2020, former Progress Singapore Party members Ravi Philemon and Michelle Lee, together with other former members of other political parties submitted an application to form the Red Dot United to the Registry of Societies.

Christine Neuman
is an American former professional tennis player. Neuman, who was raised in Chicago, played college tennis for Duke University in the early 1990s, twice earning All-American honors.

Mohammad Harij Uddin Sarker
is a politician from the Rangpur District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Rangpur-5. Chowdhury was elected to parliament from Rangpur-5 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Mofazzal Hossain
is a politician from the Rangpur District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Rangpur-3. Mofazzal was elected to parliament from Rangpur-3 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Mokhtar Ahmad
is a politician from the Chittagong District of Bangladesh and an elected a member of parliament from Chittagong-12. He was the organizer of the Liberation War of Bangladesh.

Noimot Salako-Oyedele
, also known as Engr. Noimot Salako-Oyedele is a Nigerian politician and real estate professional.

Lisa Keller
is an Australian former professional tennis player. While competing on the professional tour she reached a career high singles ranking of 468.

Katherine Muterspaugh Steele
is the Albert S. Kobayashi Endowed Professor of Mechanical Engineering at the University of Washington. Steele was born to two engineers in Colorado.

Ferdinand Crisologo Ravena III
is a Filipino basketball player for the San-en NeoPhoenix of the Japanese B.League. Thirdy Ravena was born on December 17, 1996 in Iloilo City, Philippines.

Deeann Hansel
is an American former professional tennis player. A native of Atlanta, Georgia, Hansel competed on the professional tour during the 1980s, reaching a career high singles ranking of 152 in the world.

Julia Robinson
is a South Australian artist and arts educator. She lectures at Adelaide Central School of Art and her work has been included in the Adelaide Biennial of Australian Art in 2016 and 2020 and The National in 2019.

Will Weaver
is an American professional basketball coach. He is currently the head coach of the Sydney Kings of the National Basketball League and an assistant coach of the Australian national basketball team.

Mount Howard
is a prominent mountain summit located west of Lake Wenatchee in Chelan County of Washington state. Mount Howard is the highest point of Nason Ridge, and is northeast of Rock Mountain, which is second-highest.

Bus Simulator
16 is a bus simulator game developed by Stillalive Studios and published by Astragon Entertainment for Microsoft Windows and macOS. It is powered by Unreal Engine 4 and was available on 3 March 2016 worldwide.

Martin de Porres Bartel
is an American Benedictine monk and Catholic priest, elected in 2020 to serve as the twelfth Archabbot of Saint Vincent Archabbey in Latrobe, Pennsylvania. Born on November 14, 1955 in Barberton, Ohio, Bartel made his simple profession of vows as a monk of Saint Vincent Archabbey on July 10, 1980, solemn profession of vows on July 11, 1983 and was ordained a priest on May 25, 1985.

Rock Mountain
is a mountain summit located northeast of Stevens Pass in Chelan County of Washington state. This peak is situated north of U.S. Highway 2, approximately midway between Stevens Pass and Lake Wenatchee, on land managed by Okanogan-Wenatchee National Forest.

Emily Marie Rentz
is a clinical researcher who has led research efforts most notably in Zika Virus and Coronavirus as founder of Xera Med Research in Boca Raton, FL. Emily Rentz was born on May 27, 1988 and was adopted from foster care in Boston, Massachusetts and of Hopi Native American Indian descent.

Strickland
is a rural locality in the local government area of Central Highlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north-west of the town of Hamilton.

Frank Walusimbi
is a Ugandan male television personality, news anchor, television presenter and journalist currently working with NTV Uganda. Walusimbi was born in 29th August 1989, in Kilembe Mines Hospital, Kasese.

Iowa Highway 412
in southwestern Waterloo and traveled to the east and northeast approximately to US 218 in southeastern Waterloo.

White Fang
is a 2018 French computer-animated film directed by Alexandre Espigares. The film premiered at Sundance Film Festival.

Andrea M. Farley
.

Tameka A. Clemons
is an American biochemist and Assistant Professor of Biochemistry at Meharry Medical College in Nashville, Tennessee. Clemons holds the title of Assistant Professor of Professional and Medical Education in the Division of Integrated Didactics at Meharry.

Turkey-PKK
targeted assassinations are one of the front by which PKK and Turkey are attacking each others.

Penny Tinditina
also known as Penny Jakana was the former Uganda Television news anchor, Radio one news anchor and presenter and BBC journalist in the in the early 2000s. She died at the age of 39.

Linda Wright Hartgen
is an American politician from Idaho. Hartgen is a Republican member of Idaho House of Representatives for District 24, seat B.

Kari.Rajendra
, popularly known as Rajendra Bharadwaj, is an Indian screenwriter and story dialogue writer who works in the Telugu, Bhojpuri and Odia film industries. He became popular with the Kathanam, Ee Varsham Sakshiga, Kothaga Maa Prayanam movies.

Joan Velasco Alarilla
is a Filipino politician who served as Mayor of Meycauayan from 2007 until 2016. Alarilla ran for the congressional seat for the 4th District in the 2016 elections, but she lost to Linabelle Villarica.

Hanoi
is a city with a diverse system of high schools, also known as high schools, including public, private, private schools, specialized schools and schools with foreign elements. There are currently 9 specialized high schools in Hanoi.

Tom DeVesto
is a prominent American audio designer, manufacturer and innovator who founded Cambridge SoundWorks, Tivoli Audio and Como Audio. DeVesto has been working in the CE industry for 40 years and is a member of the Hall of Fame.

Ein
heet cave is a natural cave which is located 30 kilo meters from the southeast of Riyadh city near Alkharj. The cave contains numerous sinkholes.

Sakett Saawhney
is an Indian film producer and television producer who hails from Mumbai, Maharashtra. Saawhney started off his career with Vivek Agnihotri as an assistant director on Saturday Suspense, Love Story and X Zone Episodic series.

Caragana
bicolor is a species of flowering plants within the family Fabaceae. It is an endemic species in found in China.

Baby Aline Vargas-Alfonso
was a Filipino Politician. She was the youngest daughter of former Congressman and Governor Florencio Vargas.Vargas-Alfonso was elected as Vice Mayor of Abulug, Cagayan in 2007.

Mohd
. Soffi bin Abd.

Devistan
II is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. Devistan means land of Goddess.

Greg Ebrill
is an Australian former professional rugby league footballer who played in the 1990s and 2000s. He played for the Manly Warringah Sea Eagles, Northern Eagles, and Salford City Reds he primarily played forward.

Helena Brodin
is a Swedish sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1992 Summer Olympics.

Stanislav Rabotov
is a Bulgarian professional footballer who plays as a defender for Botev Plovdiv.

Anastasia Myskina
was the defending champion, and also won the title in 2004. The top four seeds received a bye into the second round.

Raman
spectroelectrochemistry is a technique that studies the inelastic scattering or Raman scattering of monochromatic light related to chemical compounds involved in an electrode process. This technique provides information about vibrational energy transitions of molecules, using a monochromatic light source, usually from a laser that belongs to the UV, Vis or NIR region.

Matthews
is a 2017 American and British documentary film directed by Ryan Scott Warren, produced by Joe Pierce, and written by J. David Everhart. It is about the life and legacy of British footballer Sir Stanley Matthews.

Teacher Training College
, Gaya also known by TTC, Gaya is a unit of Buddha Group of Institutions, is a Bachelor of Education college situated in Gaya, Bihar, India. It was established in 2008.

Sato
competed as a junior at the 1982 World Junior Speed Skating Championships. A year later she represented Japan at the World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women in 1983, finishing 22nd overall.

NBS Television
is a Ugandan TV station commonly known as the Political Command Centre. The station is licensed by Uganda Communications Commission, UCC for 360 broadcast .The station prides on carrying live broadcasts especially of all political events.The station is owned by Kin Kariisa and operated by Next Media Services, with its headquarters at Media Plaza in Kamwokya, a Kampala Suburb.

Susanne Ward
is a Danish sailor. She competed at the 1992, 1996, 2000, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Kelly Smith
is an English rugby union player. Smith began playing rugby at age 10.

Ratgal
is a village in Thanesar tehsil of Kurukshetra district in Haryana State, India. It belongs to Ambala Division.

Miriam Heruth
is a former West German long track speed skater, who was active in the 1980s. Heruth participated as a junior rider at the 1981 World Junior Speed Skating Championships.

Rene Mentz
is a South African former professional tennis player. Mentz, a junior Wimbledon quarter-finalist who was raised in Pretoria, played on the professional tour in the 1980s and early 1990s.

Alina Boz
is a Turkish actress. Alina Boz was born on 14 June 1998 in Moscow, Russia.

Peninnah Gathoni Muchomba
popularly know as Gathoni Wa Mucomba is Kenyan entrepreneur and politician. She is the Kiambu County Women representative in the bicameral Kenyan parliament and a member of the ruling political party, Jubilee party of Kenya.

Oskar Allmann
was a German trade unionist. Allmann worked as a baker, and joined the Central Union of Bakers.

Milind Anna Kamble
is an Indian politician and member of the Nationalist Congress Party. Kamble won the Kurla in 2009 Maharashtra Legislative Assembly election.

Banzhang Mountain
is a mountain that rises up 300 meters above sea level. The geographical feature separates Ningxi of New Xiangzhou from Gongbei, both inside the city of Zhuhai, China.

Pedro Jarque Krebs
is a Peruvian wildlife photographer, best known for his darkly ambianced, studio- quality close-up portraits of beasts, large birds, and other wild animals. He has won photography awards including Sony World Photography Awards, SipaContest, IPA, and Px3.Jarque was born in Lima.

Emilie Machut
is a French kickboxer. She is the current ISKA World Full Contact Atomweight champion.

Amit Madhusoodhan Upadhyay
is an Indian academic and former first-class cricketer. Upadhyay was born at Bombay in September 1978.

Mohd
. Nurkhuzaini bin Ab.

Church of Epiphany
or Epiphany Church is a Church of North India Gothic Revival style church in Lucknow, India, that was built in 1877 to address the needs of the growing Anglican community in the region. Before the construction of this church, there were two Anglican churches in the city.

Douglas Lwanga
is a Ugandan TV personality, journalist, graphics designer and events organiser. He is the co host of NBS After 5 with Mc Kats.

Ballintlevy
is a townland in the civil parish of Enniscoffey in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located to the south of Mullingar, to the north of Rochfortbridge and Milltownpass, and to the east of Lough Ennell.

Wan Sukairi bin Wan Abdullah
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Aisha Sematiko
popularly known as Hajati Aisha Sematiko was the veteran news anchor at CBS radio. She was also the first Ugandan lady to read Luganda News on Radio which helped her to encourage many women to join the field.

Darren Philip Taylor
is an English former first-class cricketer. Lawrence was born at Burnley in February 1965.

Penny Stamper-Davis
is a Canadian sailor. She competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics and the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Tamishi
is a village in the Ochamchira District in Abkhazia, Georgia. It is located on the Black Sea coast, at the right side of Dghamshi river.

Hilda Crozzoli
was one of the first female architects and civil engineers in Austria. Hilda Johana Crozzoli was born on 16 August 1900 in Salzburg, Austria.

Hanafiah bin Mat
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Khudhor
played for Iraq between 1978 and 1981.

Mary Angeline Yson Halili
or Sweet Halili is a Filipino politician who currently served as mayor of Tanauan since 2019. She is the daughter of former mayor Antonio Halili, who died as a result of assassination on July 2, 2018.

Ariffin bin Deraman
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Torfyanovka
is a border crossing point between Russia and Finland. It is located in Leningrad Oblast.

Randall A. Ogden
is a major general in the United States Air Force who currently commands the Fourth Air Force.

Johanna Kruse
is a German boxer and kickboxer. She is the current ISKA World K-1 Light Welterweight champion.

Tengku Hassan bin Tengku Omar
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Antonio Bokanovic
is an Austrian footballer currently playing as a defender for Dornbirn.

Radul
is an urban-type settlement in Ripky Raion, Chernihiv Oblast, Ukraine. It is located on the left bank of the Dnieper, which here also makes the border between Ukraine and Belarus.

Wilson Tumwine
is a Ugandan Politician and businessman. He is the former Mbarara City Mayor, and the owner of Pelikan Hotel.

Peter Bruce Copley
is an ecologist based in South Australia. He has worked in threatened species and ecological community recovery planning since the 1990s.

Lola Odelola
is a software engineer and campaigner recognised for her work to promote diversity in technology. She is the founder of Blackgirl.tech, a non-profit organisation that promotes diversity within the tech industry by creating a safe space for Black girls, non-binary people and women to learn and explore technology.

Azman bin Ibrahim
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Monks Bridge
is a road bridge across the River Dove between Stretton, Staffordshire, and Egginton, Derbyshire. A bridge has existed here since the early 13th century, though much of the current structure dates to the 15th century.

Douglas Mayanja
also known as Weasel Manizo is a Ugandan musician, who performs under a Goodlyfe Crew band. He was the partner of Late Mowzey Radio as Radio and Weasel.

Dimitrios Lappas
is a Cypriot windsurfer. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Montoso Gardens
is a farm and plant nursery dedicated to growing plants for local consumption and export. It incorprates a privately ownedbotanical garden and nature reserve of about . It is located in the region of Maricao, in Puerto Rico.

Vladimir Moiseyev
is a Russian windsurfer. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics, the 2000 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Stevie Anderson
is a former American football wide receiver who played in the National Football League. Anderson played college football at Grambling State for four seasons.

Paul Stoeken
is a windsurfer who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Arun Homraruen
is a Thai windsurfer. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics, the 2000 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Jorge Maciel
is a Spanish windsurfer. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Homeland Party
is a center-right political party in Armenia. It was founded on 20 May 2020 by Artur Vanetsyan.

Puteri Indonesia Lingkungan
is one of the beauty pageant title by Puteri Indonesia Org., the winners of Puteri Indonesia Lingkungan will represent Indonesia in one of the oldest Big Four international beauty pageants, Miss International. Indonesia start its debut in pageantry on 1960.

Ted Huang
is a Taiwanese windsurfer. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Thomas John Miles
is an American legal scholar who is currently the Dean and Clifton R. Musser Professor of Law and Economics at the University of Chicago Law School. He writes in the areas of law and economics, criminal law and judicial behavior.

Ursula Sax
is a German visual artist and sculptress. Ursula Sax was born in Backnang, a lively small town near Stuttgart.

Helen Hills
is a British art historian and academic. She was appointed Professor of History of Art at the University of York in 2008.

Alexios Polychronakos
under the supervision of John Preskill.

Matthew John Fuchter
is a British chemist who is a Professor of Chemistry at Imperial College London. His research focuses on the development and application of novel functional molecular systems to a broad range of areas; from materials to medicine.

Ludwig Schmugge
is a German historian. Born in Berlin, Schmugge completed his dissertation on John of Jandun in 1964 in Paris with the help of a six-month scholarship from the Commission for the Study of the History of Franco-German Relations.

Wish Stream
is a small, steep English river, which is a tributary of the River Blackwater. For much of its length it forms the boundary between the counties of Berkshire and Surrey.

Charles JG Church
was an English businessman who co-founded the British upmarket housebuilder Charles Church Developments and was a Spitfire enthusiast. With his wife Susanna he founded the upmarket southern England housebuilder Charles Church Developments in 1965, building one property in Camberley, Surrey.

Ghotak Eisa Khel
, also Ghotak Isa Khel, Ghotak Issa Khel or simply Ghotak, is the main place of the Eisa khel or Isa khel, the capital and largest village of the Upper Orakzai, now part of the Khyber Pakhtunkhwa, Pakistan. From 1930 to 2006 the village was the capital of Orakzai Agency in the Federally Administered Tribal Areas.

Unicorn Ridge
is a mountain in Hong Kong at in height. It is one of the Eight Mountains of the Kowloon Ridge and falls within Lion Rock Country Park.

Serge Berdugo
is a Moroccan lawyer and politician who served Minister of Tourism for both Prime Ministers Mohammed Karim Lamrani and Abdellatif Filali between 1993 and 1995. Berdugo is a leader within the Moroccan Jewish community, serving as Secretary-General of the Israelite Community Council of Morocco and President of the Israelite Community of Casablanca.

Chandler Sprague
and World War II.

Rockville Centre Union Free
School District is a school district headquartered in the William H. Johnson Administration Building on the campus of South Side High School in Rockville Centre, New York. William H. Johnson began working for the district circa 1980, and he began his term as superintendent circa 1986.

Empria
liturata is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Joseph Ndunguru
is a Molecular Plant Virologist, working for the Ministry of Agriculture, Livestock and Fisheries in Tanzania at Mikocheni Agricultural Research Institute, as the Officer in Charge from 2012 to date. He is also is the National Biotechnology Research Coordinator in Tanzania.

Nirav Shah
is an Indian politician who is current deputy mayor of Surat Municipal Corporation. He hails from Bhartiya Janta Party.

Lalchamliana
is a Mizo National Front politician from Mizoram. He is the current home minister of Mizoram.

Gowtam Tinnanuri
is an Indian film director and screen writer who works predominantly in Telugu films. He has directed 3 films.

Geoffrey Taylor
is a Fijian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Yap Yee Guan
is a former badminton player from Malaysia and coach. He is the twin brother of Yap Yee Hup.

Yap Yee Hup
is a former badminton player from Malaysia and coach. He is the twin brother of Yap Yee Guan.

Emma McViker
was the second state superientendent of education for the state of Utah. She served in this postion from the death of John R. Park until A.

Farkas Litkey
is a Hungarian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Gurpreet Kaur Bhangu
is an Indian film and television actress who is active in Indian Punjabi and Hindi cinema. She is known for her work in Nikka Zaildar 2, a Punjabi film.

John Driscoll
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Andrew C. Nelson
was an educator in Utah and for 16 years state superintendent of education. He was also a committed member of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints.

Joseph Thomas Hillman
and was a member of their 1987 NCAA championship team.

Will Martin
is an American sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Vasco Batista
is a Portuguese sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Michael Fellmann
is a German sailor. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics, the 2000 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

James Phillip Roers
or Jim Roers is an American politician. He is a member of the North Dakota State Senate from the 46th District, serving by appointment in 2012, and elected in 2016.

Terra Nova Church
is a church in Visby, on the Swedish island Gotland. The church is designed by Hans Wieland and was inaugurated in 1983.

Caroline Esinam Adzogble
is a Ghanaian education entrepreneur and philanthropist. She is the founder and CEO of Caroline Group, an educational services business from Ghana, West Africa, with expanding business operations in several countries in Africa, Europe and North America.

Yuriy Tokovy
is a Ukrainian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Richard Stenhouse
is a British sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Autry Pruitt
is a conservative activist. In 2016, he served as a Trump campaign surrogate, and is an outspoken critic of President Obama and the Democratic Party.

Paul McKenzie
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Kristin Roers
is an American politician. She is a member of the North Dakota State Senate from the 27th District, elected in 2018.

Catriona Margaret Steele
is a Canadian clinician-scientist. She is a Full professor in the department of speech-language pathology at the University of Toronto and a senior scientist at the Toronto Rehabilitation Institute in the University Health Network.

Ankush Raja
is an Indian bhojpuri musical duo from Sasaram, Bihar. The band was formed in 2009 by Ankush and Raja.

Nematinus
acuminatus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Jacqueline Asiimwe
is a Ugandan lawyer, philanthropy advisor. She is the CEO of CivSource Africa, and the Chairperson; International Centre for Research on Women Uganda.

Nematus
myosotidis is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Feth Nour Aliouat
is an Algerian footballer who plays for USM Blida in the Algerian Ligue Professionnelle 1 as a forward.

Left-Right Coalition Movement or Left-Right Coalition Committee
is a movement to promote bond under the cooperation between the Left and Right of Joseon to establish a government in 1946 after the period of Japanese occupation of Korea. This movement was proceeded by the centrists.

Manoolal Dwivedi
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, the lower house of the Parliament of India from Hamirpur as a member of the Indian National Congress.

Nannie Louise Wright
was an American composer, pianist, and teacher born in Fayette, Missouri. She graduated from Howard Payne College in Fayette and the Columbia School of Music in Chicago, Illinois.

Olga I. Larkina
with honors.

Adjarasport
is a Georgian sports platform, which was founded by adjara.com in 2013. Adjarasport includes two television channels adjarasport1 and adjarasport2, also News Agency, that covers important events in Georgian and World sport.

Keanu John Apperley
is an English born Italian rugby union player. His usual position is as a Fullback or Fly-half and he currently plays for Viadana in Top12.

Columbus Public Health
is the health department of Columbus, Ohio. The department is accredited by the Public Health Accreditation Board.

Pachynematus
clitellatus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

David Hall Smeltz
, is an American reggae singer, songwriter and guitar player. He co-founded the first American reggae band in Cleveland, Ohio, I-Tal.

Thapelo Matsheka
is a Motswana politician and economist serving as the Minister of Finance and Economic Development since November 2019 and a Member of the National Assembly for Lobatse since October 2019. He is a member of the Botswana Democratic Party.

Tarakote
or Tarakote State was a princely state in Korai, Odisha which was established under the Mughal Empire and was later reduced to a Zamindari state during the subsequent Maratha and the British rule. Its capital was at Barundei-Tarakot, in the western part of the present day Korai block.

Matteo Ferro
is an Italian rugby union player. His usual position is as a Flanker and he currently plays for Rovigo Delta in Top12 with the role of Captain.

Rajesh Rathod
is an Indian politician belonging to the Indian National Congress. He is member of Maharashtra Legislative Council and also served as member of Zilla Parishad.

Madhavi Krishnan
is a British chemist who is an Associate Professor of Physical Chemistry at the University of Oxford. Krishnan invented an electrostatic fluidic trap which permits the spatial control and manipulation of nanoscale materials.

Parveen Ashraf
is a British food writer and TV chef of Indian cuisine. Ashraf was born in Bradford, West Yorkshire, England, and attended Carlton Bolling College.

Wim van Sinderen
is a Dutch art curator, photographer and journalist at the Fotomuseum Den Haag. Van Sinderen was raised in Friesland, and finishing school in Dokkum.

Kathleen Lynch
is an Irish sociologist, activist and professor emeritus of equality studies at University College Dublin. Lynch began her career as a social worker, working in North Dublin city.

Mary Mugyenyi
is a Ugandan politician and a representative in the parliament of East African Legislative Assembly. She is the former member of parliament of Nyabushozi County in Kiruhura District.

Edoardo Ruffolo
is an Italian rugby union player. His usual position is as a Flanker and he currently plays for Valorugby Emilia in Top12.

Gopichand Padalkar
is an Indian politician belonging to the Bharatiya Janata Party. He is member of Maharashtra Legislative Council.

Naome Kibaaju
political party.

Dhamhar
is a village in Ayodhya district in the Uttar Pradesh state of India. Dhamhar is almost 50 km from Ayodhya.

Martin Julius Bram
was an American prelate of the Episcopal Church, who served as Suffragan Bishop of South Florida from 1951 till 1956. Bram was born in New York City on September 25, 1897, the son of Martin Samuel Bram and Ellen Chambers.

Academy of the Sacred Heart
was a Catholic school in Hoboken, New Jersey. Before its closure it was a high school for girls; it had circa 160 students in 2003.

Khankah Markaz
, Egyptian administrative center. It is located in Qalyubia Governorate, within the Greater Cairo Region in the Arab Republic of Egypt.

Roberta Lepper
is a Fijian sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Hans Christian Heg
is a 1925 statue of former Union soldier and abolitionist Hans Christian Heg by Paul Fjelde. It is installed at the Wisconsin State Capitol building in Madison, Wisconsin, United States.

CeeLo Green
Is Thomas Callaway is the sixth solo studio album by American recording artist CeeLo Green. It was released on June 26, 2020 via Easy Eye Sound and produced entirely by Dan Auerbach.

William Francis Moses
was an American prelate of the Episcopal Church, who served as Suffragan Bishop of South Florida from 1956 till 1961. Moses was born on February 6, 1898 in Atlanta, Georgia, the son of Frank Hamilton Moses and Cora Mina Thibadeau.

Shuijiahu
railway station is a railway station in Changfeng County, Hefei, Anhui, China. The station was built in 1944.

Limoges Hand
87, is a team handball club from Limoges, France. The club was formed in 2005 being called Handball Club de Limoges.

Andrej Jakimovski
is a Macedonian basketball player who is committed to play for Washington State. Jakimovski played for Basket Torino of the Italian Serie A2 Basket during the 2019-20 season.

Goniolimon
, sometimes called the statices, are a genus of flowering plants in the leadwort and plumbago family Plumbaginaceae, native to northern Africa, southern Europe, western and central Asia, Siberia, Mongolia and China. Low-lying perennial shrubs, some species are cultivated as ground covers.

Marisa Hamamoto
is a Japanese-American professional dancer and social entrepreneur based in California, United States. She is the Founder and Artistic Director of Infinite Flow, a Los Angeles-based nonprofit and professional dance company composed of dancers with and without disabilities.

Mohd
. Nor bin Hamzah is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Big Creek Lake
is a lake situated in the Big Creek State Park in Polk County, Iowa. The lake is situated two miles to the north of Polk City, spreads across 814 acres and is 51 meters deep.

Domenico Marzi
is an Italian politician and lawyer. He is current member of the Democratic Party party.

Mohammad Arab-Salehi
is an Iranian philosopher and associate professor of religion at the Research Institute for Islamic Culture and Thought. He is also the head of Hikmat and Religious Studies Faculty of the Institute.

Stephen Kresovich
is a plant geneticist and Coker Endowed Chair of Genetics at Clemson University. In 1995 he was elected a fellow of the American Association for the Advancement of Science.

Liubelia
or Lyubelya of Austria-Hungary.

Trump
v. NAACP, No. 18-588 was a United States Supreme Court case.

Paul J. Ray
is an American attorney and government official serving as the Administrator of the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs. Ray took office in January 2020.

Alias bin Razak
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

LUL
also known as Omegalul is a Twitch emote featuring a picture of video game reviewer John Bain, better known by his online handle TotalBiscuit. The emote is typically used to indicate laughter in a similar vein to typing abbreviation LOL.

Melissa Provenzano
is an American politician who has served in the Oklahoma House of Representatives from the 79th district since 2018.

Terrence Patrick
. He played college football at Mercyhurst.

AMSA Amin
is a retired Major General of the Bangladesh Army, a politician from Kurigram district and Former ambassador. Amin is the chairman of the Center for Security and Development Studies, a non-governmental organization.

Keith Leaphart
is an American entrepreneur, philanthropist and physician. Leaphart is the Chair of the Lenfest Foundation, CEO of Replica Creative and founder of Philanthropi, a fintech company.

Regina Stanback Stroud
.

Satiful Bahri bin Mamat
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Fittingia
is a genus of flowering plants in the primrose family Primulaceae, with all species native to New Guinea. They are shrubs or small trees typically found in the understory.

Carlo Mazzone
guided Bologna to the semi-finals of both the UEFA Cup and Coppa Italia, and ensured European qualification again after victory over Inter Milan in the play-offs. He then left for Perugia.

Maliaman bin Kassim
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Victoria Valley
is a rural locality in the local government area of Central Highlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north-west of the town of Hamilton.

Jordan Griffin
is an American mixed martial artist currently competing as a featherweight in the Ultimate Fighting Championship. A professional competitor since 2011, he has also competed for Legacy Fighting Alliance and King of the Cage.

Shawn Foltz-Emmons
is an American former professional tennis player. A right-handed player from Indianapolis, Foltz was a rising star in junior tennis who was unable to fulfil her promise on the professional tour, in a career which was curtailed by serious wrist injuries.

Krishna
and His Leela is a 2020 Indian Telugu-language romantic film, directed by Ravikanth Perepu and produced by Suresh Productions, Viacom18 Motion Pictures and Sanjay Reddy. It features Siddu Jonnalagadda, Shraddha Srinath, Seerat Kapoor and Shalini Vadnikatti in the lead roles.

Royal Heights
is an Auckland suburb, which is under the local governance of Auckland Council. Moire Park is a large park in Royal Heights, which has both sports grounds and areas of bush with walking tracks.

Saiful Azmi bin Suhaili
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Hishamuddin bin Abdul Karim
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Geoffrey Waddington
was a Canadian conductor and violinist. Waddington was raised in Lethbridge, Alberta, where he began playing violin as a child; he was conducting by the time he was twelve years old.

Ahmad Shah bin Muhamed
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Wellwood
is an upcoming science fiction film directed by Eliza Hooper. The film centers around a married couple Laura and Nick.

Derrick Alston Jr
. is an American college basketball player for the Boise State Broncos of the Mountain West Conference.

Muhammad Khalil bin Abdul Hadi
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor. Muhammad Khalil Abdul Hadi was born on March 20, 1977 in Marang, Terengganu.

Wan Hapandi bin Wan Nik
is a Malaysian politician who currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Ridzuan bin Hashim
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Charfashion
Govt. T. Baret Secondary School is an academic institution located at Char Fasson Upazila under of Bhola District in Bangladesh.

Stacey Murphy
is an American politician from California. Murphy is a former mayor of Burbank, California.

Amy E. Aldrich Worth
was an American composer, choir director, and organist who was born in St. Joseph, Missouri. She studied music with Jessie Gaynor, Frederick Beale, Mary Lyon and Arthur Garbett, and married Harry Worth on July 1, 1915.

Karen Shin
is an American former professional tennis player. Shin won the CIF Southern Section singles championship as a Chaminade College senior in 1985, then played college tennis at UC Berkeley, where she was a four-time All-American.

Great Northern Railway Class BT
were a class of 13 tank locomotives introduced by the GNR from 1885. While fit for purpose when built, increasing train weights particularly with bogie carriages a factor meant by the 1920s they were underpowered for all available work and were withdrawn by 1921.

Hilmi bin Harun
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Charanpreet Singh
is an Indian film actor, based in Mumbai. He started off his acting career with Shah Rukh Khan-starrer Ra.One and went on to do films like Zanjeer, Saheb Biwi Aur Gangster Returns, Ungli, Sarbjit and Haseena Parkar.

Bulls
Tooth is a multi-peak mountain located in Chelan County of Washington state. Bulls Tooth is situated southeast of Stevens Pass, and within the Alpine Lakes Wilderness, on land managed by Okanogan-Wenatchee National Forest.

Mahbubul A Khalid
is a Bangladeshi poet, lyricist and music composer. He was born in 1967 at Tangail district.

Adesmia
aconcaguensis is an endemic perennial herb found in Argentina.

Alias bin Harun
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Wayatinah
is a rural locality in the local government area of Central Highlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north-west of the town of Hamilton.

Sulaiman bin Sulong
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Naughty Boys
is a 1986 Hong Kong martial arts crime comedy film directed by Wellson Chin, produced by Jackie Chan, and starring Kara Hui, Carina Lau, and Mars. The film was released in Hong Kong on 25 July 1986.

Ab Razak bin Ibrahim
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Deputy of Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Hudson Place One
is a high-rise condominium building in Victoria, British Columbia. At tall, it currently stands as the tallest building in Victoria and on Vancouver Island.

Lord Fairfax
is a 65 lbs turtle found near a residential water source in Fairfax County, Virginia. He is an alligator snapping turtle, a species not native to the region where he was found, and is the largest of his kind ever found in a urban environment.

Joan Reynolds
was born in Crindau, Newport, Wales in 1925. She served in the Royal Artillery regiment during World War II and trained in heavy anti-aircraft command post instruments and served on gun sites around Britain.

Mumbai Central
Lok Sabha constituency was one of the Lok Sabha constituencies in Maharashtra. It became defunct in 1977 when constituency boundaries were redrawn.

Ayana Jordan
is an American addiction psychiatrist. She is an assistant professor of psychiatry and the director of the Global Mental Health Program at Yale School of Medicine.

Roslee bin Daud
is a Malaysian politician and served as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Panguil Bay Bridge
is a proposed bridge which will connect Tangub, Misamis Occidental and Tubod, Lanao del Norte. The bridge when completed will become the longest water-spanning bridge surpassing the San Juanico Bridge.

Zeylanidium
are a genus of flowering plants in the riverweed family Podostemaceae, native to Sri Lanka, India, Myanmar and Thailand. They have caducous leaves and either crustose or ribbonshaped thalli.

Burrell Foley Fischer
is an award-winning architectural practice specialising in public buildings, especially performing arts. It was founded by John Burrell and Mark Foley 1982, with Stefanie Fischer becoming a Partner in 1985.

SS Lutetia
was an ocean liner of the Compagnie de Navigation Sud-Atlantique. It was launched in 1913.

Joshua Baitwa Mugyenyi
was Ugandan political scientist and lecturer at Makerere University of Uganda. He worked as the Executive Director for Bank of Uganda.

Tong Yan San Tsuen
is a village in the Ping Shan area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong. Fung Chi Tsuen is one of the 37 villages represented within the Ping Shan Rural Committee.

R Lalzirliana
is a Mizo National Front politician from Mizoram. He is the current power and electricity , art and culture, land resources, soil and water conservation and district council affairs departments of Mizoram.

Amol Mitkari
is an Indian politician belonging to the Nationalist Congress Party. He is member of Maharashtra Legislative Council and also served as member of Zilla Parishad.

Satya Prasad Majumder
is a Bangladeshi academic. He is the current and the 14th Vice-chancellor of Bangladesh University of Engineering and Technology.

Shri Krishna Mandir,request
by ibrar shah supporter of Imran khan still under construction, is the first Hindu temple to be granted permission to be built in Islamabad, capital of Pakistan, on a site in the H-9 area of Islamabad Capital Territory. It will be a place of worship for the 3,000 Hindus living in Islamabad.

Hon
. Rose Emily Paterson was a British business executive, fundraiser, and the chairman of Aintree Racecourse.

Jim Hill Mountain
is a prominent mountain summit located in Chelan County of Washington state. Jim Hill Mountain is situated east of Stevens Pass, on the boundary of Alpine Lakes Wilderness, on land managed by Okanogan-Wenatchee National Forest.

Rowena Cole
is a British middle-distance runner who specialises in the 800 metres and competes in international level events. Her highest achievement in winning is a silver medal won at the 2011 European Athletics Junior Championships in Tallinn.

Russell Bernard Thomson
is a South Africa former first-class cricketer. Thomson was born at Johannesburg in August 1969.

Holshe Khrie-o
is a Naga professional Sepak Takraw player who also serves as the Nagaland State Sepak Takraw coach. Holshe Khrie-o was born in Viswema, Nagaland.

Asterolasia
beckersii, commonly known as Dungowan starbush, is a species of erect shrub in the family Rutaceae and is endemic to a restricted area of New South Wales. It has woolly, star-shaped hairs on its branchlets, egg-shaped to lance-shaped leaves with the narrower end towards the base and covered with star-shaped hairs, and white flowers arranged singly in leaf axils, the back of the petals covered with star-like hairs.

Neil Powney Thompson
is a Sri Lankan-born English former first-class cricketer. Thompson was born at Colombo in October 1938.

Monique Cilione
is an Australian javelin thrower who competes in international level events. Her highest achievement is winning a bronze medal at the 2011 World Youth Championships in Athletics in Lille.

Rozi bin Mamat
is a Malaysian politician and served as Terengganu State Executive Councillor.

Pascal Praud
, born Sep 9th 1964 in Nantes, is a French journalist specialising on sport, radio columnist, radio hosting and also a TV entertainer and producer. After twenty years with TF1, he became one of the managers of FC Nantes in 2008 and for two years.

Microcharmus
is a genus of scorpions endemic to Madagascar, in the family Microcharmidae, superfamily Buthoidea. It had been merged, but has been recreated by in 2019.

Springfield Barracks
is a former military installation in east side of South Road in Lancaster, England. It is a Grade II listed building.

Tonya Gonnella Frichner
was an American activist and lawyer, known for her Indigenous international work, particularly for her contributions to the United Nations Declaration on the Rights of Indigenous Peoples. Tonya Gonnella Frichner was born in Syracuse, New York, on Sept. 19, 1947.

Geprek Bensu
is an Indonesia-based fast food restaurant chain primarily serving ayam geprek. As of December 2018, the chain has a total of 110 franchises all over Indonesia, employing an estimated 3.500 people.

Venkata Sriram
is a Telugu television serial artist,anchor, character artist in films, and producer. He performed in many Telugu TV shows like Luck kick, Bhale chanchule, Bumper offer, WOW, Bangaru kodi petta, Nari nari naduma murari. etc.

ALTV
is a Thai educational television channel operated by ThaiPBS. ALTV strives to promote learning and the integration of teaching between home and school.

Chris Rast
is a Swiss-American sailor. He represented Switzerland at the 1996 Summer Olympics and the 2004 Summer Olympics, and the United States at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Poul-Erik Thygesen
is a Danish former professional footballer who played as a forward.

Ballina
is a townland in the civil parish of Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located to the west of Mullingar town, the village of Ballinea stands on the townland, and the Royal Canal cuts through the centre of the area.

Ballinea
is a village in County Westmeath, Ireland. It is located on the R390 road, to the west of Mullingar.

Shandonagh
is a village in County Westmeath, Ireland. It is located on the R392 road, to the west of Mullingar.

Sangeetha Thanapal
is a Singaporean social critic and political activist. Thanapal has written prolifically on race relations in Singapore.

Marie Claire Barikukiye
is a Burundian Politician who is representative in the East African Legislative Assembly.

Sekhala
tehsil is a tehsil in Jodhpur District of Rajasthan state in western India. Headquarters for the tehsil is the village of Sekhala.

Kausala
is a village and administrative center in Iitti municipality in Kymenlaakso, Finland. Kausala has a population of 3,775, which makes it the largest village of the municipality in terms of population.

Simon Nicholas Warley
is an English solicitor and former first-class cricketer. Warley was born at Sittingbourne in January 1972.

Billy Graham Talagi
is a Niuean politician and former Member of the Niue Assembly. He is the brother of former Premier of Niue Toke Talagi.

Nsavyimana Sophie
is a Burundian Politician and a representative in the East African Legislative Assembly.

Padauk Ka Tae Gita
, also Padauk Musical, is a 2020 Burmese romantic-musical film starring Sai Sai Kham Leng, Poe Mamhe Thar and Aye Myat Thu. The film produced and distributed by Franzo Production premiered in Myanmar on March 5, 2020 and became one of the highest-grossing films.

Hefei Beicheng
railway station is a railway station in Changfeng County, Hefei, Anhui, China. The station is sited north of the city.

Jamaica Hospital Medical Center
is a full service medical hospital and Emergency Facility located in Jamaica, Queens on the service road of the Van Wyck Expressway at Jamaica Ave. In 1883, Jamaica village was still was serviced by the Stagecoach, which had been rolling in operation since 1837.

Pavlo Isenko
is a professional Ukrainian football goalkeeper who plays for Vorskla Poltava in the Ukrainian Premier League. Isenko is a product of FC Vorskla Youth Sportive School from his native Poltava.

Katherine Stewart Flippin
was a special educator in San Francisco and only daughter of lawyer McCants Stewart. In Portland, Oregon, Katherine Flippin was born Mary Katherine Stewart to parents McCants Stewart and Mary Weir Stewart.

Robert Israel
is an acclaimed film score composer who works primarily on silent films. He is an organist and pianist, and Israel has been described as following in the footsteps of other great film scorers, Arthur Kleiner and Gaylord Carter.

Morgan M. Watson
is an American engineer and Professor of Engineering at Southern University in Baton Rouge, Louisiana. In 1963, he became part of the first cohort of African American engineers to work at NASA in the Deep South, working on the Apollo 11 mission that sent the first man to the moon.

Chikara Tanaka
is a Japanese basketball player who attended IMG Academy in Bradenton, Florida. Tanaka was born in Aomori Prefecture to an American father and a Japanese mother.

Jannis Turtschan
is a German footballer who currently plays as a midfielder for SpVgg Unterhaching.

Hawaiian Birds
is a Color Classics cartoon short released on August 28, 1936. A beautiful bird from Hawaii follows a band of orioles to the Big City.

Tony Darden
is a former American football defensive back who played National Football League. He played college football at Texas Tech.

Little Whitefish Lake
Water Aerodrome, , is located north of MacTier , Ontario, Canada.

Bangla Olympiad
is an olympiad competition organized by an International Hope School Bangladesh with a view to promote proficiency in Bengali language among English medium students The 7th Bangla Olympiad was divided into six categories including essay writing, poem recitation, music, extempore speech, group dance and drawing Bangla Olympiad was first started in on 21 February 2011 as a commemoration to International Mother Language Day. Bangla Olympiad aims to commemorate an International Mother Language Day and shares an objective to make aware the students about culture and heritage of Bangladesh Approximately 2000 national and international students participate in an olympiad every year Bangla Olympiad of 2020 seems to serve as a medium to improve bilateral relationship between Bangladesh and United States as the Organisation will be sending 3 students to United States to promote bilateral cultural relationship between the two nations

Goody
Bag is the debut extended play by Israeli singer Netta. It was released on 25 June 2020 through Tedy Productions and BMG Rights Management.

David Zima
is a professional Czech football defender currently playing for Slavia Prague in the Fortuna Liga, on loan from Sigma Olomouc. On 1 February 2020, Zima joined Slavia Prague on loan from Sigma Olomouc for the remainder of the season, with an option to make the move permanent.

Stanley Goagoseb
is a Namibian former footballer who played as a defender or midfielder. He played internationally with Namibia and appeared at the 1998 Africa Cup of Nations.

Joel Habener
is a Professor of Medicine at Harvard Medical School who has done fundamental studies on elucidating the role of incretin hormones such as Glucagon-like peptide-1. For his discoveries, he was awarded the 2020 Warren Alpert Foundation Prize along with Daniel Drucker and Jens Juul Holst.

Juan Alejandro Saucedo Ortiz
is a Mexican-born American professional boxer who challenged for the WBO light welterweight title in 2018. At regional level he held the WBO-NABO and WBO International light welterweight titles between 2017 and 2018.

Jonathan Yhome
is a Naga singer-songwriter. Jonathan Yhome was born in Kohima, Nagaland to an Angami Naga family.

Gladys Atieno Nyasuna Wanga
is a Kenyan Politician. She is the current women representative for the Homa Bay County having clinched the seat back in 2017 during the last general elections in Kenya.

Kim Dae-yeong
is a South Korean sailor. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics, the 2000 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Annette Aiello
is an American zoologist, botanical entomologist, and professor. She develops academic activities at the Smithsonian Tropical Research Institute.

Cyrus Paul Kahl
was an American football player. He played college football as the fullback for the North Dakota Flickertails and led the team to consecutive conference championships in 1928 and 1929.

Al-eetisam
is a media organization of the Islamic State, established in January 2014. The Foundation issues visual material issued in Arabic and sometimes translated into English.

Ajmal Khan Wazir
is a Pakistani politician and current advisor to CM on information and Public Relations, Khyber Pakhtunkhwa. He belongs to Pakistan Tehreek-e-Insaf.

Al-Furqan
is an Islamic State media organization, established in November 2006. The Foundation issues audio and visual materials in Arabic and English.

J. Robert Carrier
was an American politician from Maine. Carrier, a Democrat from Westbrook, served eight terms in the Maine House of Representatives between 1967 and 1986.

Yevgeniya Dmitrievna Timofeeva
was a pilot in the Soviet Air Force and the first woman to fly the Pe-2. As a member of the 587th Bomber Aviation Regiment, later redesignated as the 125th Guards Bomber Aviation Regiment named after Marina Raskova, she initially served as a squadron commander but was later promoted to deputy regimental commander during the war.

Gerhard Mans
is a former Namibian rugby union player. Born in Karasburg, a small town in southern Namibia, Mans attended school in Gobabis and after school moved to Bloemfontein, South Africa for tertiary studies at the University of the Free State.

Maxime Chevalier
is a French cyclist, who currently rides for UCI ProTeam .

Mitja Margon
is a Slovenian sailor. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Giannis Sourdis
is a Greek professional footballer who plays as a goalkeeper for Serie D club Cjarlins Muzane, on loan from Udinese.

Madawaska Lake
Water Aerodrome, , is located southwest of Whitney , Ontario, Canada.

John P. Howard III
is a Washington, D.C. lawyer who is a nominee to be a Judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals. Howard earned his Bachelor of Arts from Howard University and his Juris Doctor from Georgetown University Law Center.

Tawnluia
is a Mizo National Front politician from Mizoram. He is the current Deputy Chief Minister and holds the public health engineering, urban development and poverty alleviation portfolio among others.

Wo Mei
is a village in the Hebe Haven area of Sai Kung District, Hong Kong. Wo Mei had a population of 66 in 1911, 30 male and 36 female.

Laura Snowden
is a British-French classical guitarist and composer. She is widely regarded as one of the leading classical guitarists of her generation since being handpicked by Julian Bream to continue his legacy of performing new commissions by leading contemporary composers, including Julian Anderson and Olli Mustonen . Snowden was educated at the Yehudi Menuhin School where she studied guitar with Richard Wright, she was the first guitarist to graduate from the Menuhin School.

Nam Wai
is a village in the Hebe Haven area of Sai Kung District, Hong Kong.

Strombocerus
delicatulus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Mario Farnbacher
is a German racecar driver who currently competes in the WeatherTech SportsCar Championship. In 2019, Farnbacher won the WeatherTech SportsCar Championship GTD class championship with co-driver Trent Hindman.

Javid Nikpour
is an Iranian photojournalist, sports photographer and chief photographer of Iran National Olympic Committee. In 2014, he succeeded in correcting the honorary doctorate of art from the Ministry of Culture and Islamic Guidance.

Rabbi Eliyahu Hasid
is an Israeli politician who currently serves as a member of the Knesset for the United Torah Judaism alliance. Hasid was placed ninth on the United Torah Judaism list for the April 2019 elections, but UTJ won only eight seats.

Glenda Anna Sluga
, is an Australian historian who has contributed significantly to the history of internationalism, nationalism, diplomacy, immigration, and gender, in Europe, Britain, France, Italy, Yugoslavia, and Australia. She is a Professor of International History and Capitalism at the European University Institute where she is Director of the European Research Council Project ECOINT and Joint Chair of the Department of History and Civilization and the Robert Schumann Centre for Advanced Studies.

Castle Creek Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area in the Prescott National Forest in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1984, the Wilderness lies within the southern end of the rugged Bradshaw Mountains.

Elza van den Heever
is a South African soprano in opera and concert, who began her career as a mezzo-soprano. She has appeared in leading roles at major houses and concert halls of the world.

Bernard Hodgson
was an Oxford college head in the 18th-century. Hodgson was educated at Westminster School and Christ Church, Oxford..

Jason Bordoff
is an American energy policy expert and former Obama White House advisor. Bordoff joined the Obama administration in 2009 as the Associate Director for Climate Change at the Council on Environmental Quality, and then worked as the Senior Director for Energy and Climate Change on the staff of the National Security Council until 2013.

William Sharpe
was an Oxford college head in the 18th-century. Sharpe was educated at Westminster School.

Husharu
is a 2018 Indian Telugu-language comedy drama film directed by Sree Harsha Konuganti and starring Tejus Kancherla, Tej Kurapati, Abhinav, Dinesh Tej, Priya Vadlamani, Hema Ingle, Rahul Ramakrishna, Ramya Pasupileti and Daksha Nagarkar. The songs were composed by Sunny M.R., Radhan, and Varikuppala Yadagiri.

Kate Lushington
is a Canadian theatre artist and teacher. From 1988 to 1993, Lushington was the artistic director of Nightwood Theatre.

Mary Evelyn Parker
was a teacher, editor, and state treasurer of Louisiana. She was the first woman to serve in the office.

Bob Israel
is a Hollywood film producer, story writer, Broadway theater producer, and philanthropist. His story was turned into the 1984 film Bachelor Party, starring Tom Hanks, and he was a co-producer of the film , starring Jim Carrey.

Covenant University Library
, also known as Centre for Learning Resources, stands as the academic hub of the University. It is a magnificent glass edifice with a seating capacity of 3,500.

McCall-Donnelly Joint
School District is a school district headquartered in McCall, Idaho. its enrollment count is about 1,300.

Tenthredo
brevicornis is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Taofeek Kunle Owonikoko
is an American physician who is Professor and Vice-Chair for Faculty Development, Department of Haematology and Medical Oncology at the Winship Cancer Institute. His research considers small cell lung cancer.

Sapna Ravi Kudchadkar
is an American critical care physician and anesthesiologist. She is an Associate professor of anesthesiology and critical care medicine, pediatrics and physical medicine and rehabilitation at the Johns Hopkins School of Medicine.

Erik Harutyunyan
is an American football safety for the California Golden Bears. Harutyunyan attended Burbank High School in Burbank, California.

Gibraltar Mountain Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area on the western edge of the Buckskin Mountains in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1990 under the Arizona Desert Wilderness Act the area is managed by the Bureau of Land Management.

Touchstone Lofts
is a British company founded by Paul Johal in 1989. Established in 1989, they have been converting lofts all over England and the South East, including London, Essex, Surrey, Kent, Sussex, Hertfordshire, Berkshire, Bedfordshire, Buckinghamshire, Hampshire, Oxfordshire, the West Midlands, Warwickshire, Staffordshire, Leicestershire, and Northamptonshire.

Maidenhair
is a 1974 painting by the American artist Andrew Wyeth. It depicts a young bride-to-be sitting alone in the Old German Meeting House in Waldoboro, Maine.

Toby Tobias Jr
. is a former American stock car racing driver.

Dale Shaw
is a former American stock car racing driver. Shaw competed in 45 NASCAR Xfinity Series races between 1987 and 1999, achieving 9 top ten finishes.

Adesmia
acuta is an endemic perennial shrub found in Argentina.

Adesmia
adrianii is an endemic perennial shrub found in Argentina.

Eva Mary Louisa Ollivierre-Sylvester
was a Grenadian politician. She was elected to the Legislative Council in 1952, becoming its first female member.

Eightmile Mountain
is a mountain summit located in Chelan County of Washington state. Eightmile Mountain is situated within the Alpine Lakes Wilderness, on land managed by Okanogan-Wenatchee National Forest.

Dean Carlson
is a former American football quarterback who played in the National Football League. He played college football at Iowa State.

Dave Kaplan
is an American music industry executive, entrepreneur, producer, and philanthropist. The founder of Surfdog Records and Dave Kaplan Management, he has worked with artists including UB40, Brian Setzer, Eric Clapton, Sublime, Dave Stewart of the Eurythmics, the Stray Cats, and Glen Campbell, among others.

Asterolasia buckinghamii
is a species of slender, erect shrub in the family Rutaceae and is endemic to eastern New South Wales. It has star-shaped hairs on its young branches, broadly egg-shaped, hairy leaves and yellow flowers with rust-coloured, star-shaped hairs on the back of the petals.

Messager des
sciences historiques, published in Ghent from 1839 to 1896, was the most important Belgian history journal of the 19th century. Most of the contents related to the history of the medieval Low Countries.

Carlos Alberto Decotelli da Silva
is a Brazilian economist and professor. Decotelli is Bachelor in Economic Sciences by Rio de Janeiro State University, Master in Administration by Getulio Vargas Foundation.

Riccas Corner
is a census-designated place in Sonoma County, California.

Francesco Rucco
is an Italian politician and lawyer. He is member of the Independent politician party.

Minami Yoda
is an American mechanical engineer and a professor of mechanical engineering at Georgia Tech. Her research concerns experimental fluid dynamics, with applications ranging from fusion power to nanofluidics, and including the measurement of fluid flows using the evanescent field.

Baden
is a rural locality in the local government area of Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south-east of the town of Oatlands.

Asterolasia
buxifolia is a species of spindly shrub in the family Rutaceae and is endemic to a restricted area of eastern New South Wales. It has star-shaped hairs on its stems, leathery leaves and yellow flowers arranged singly in leaf axils with star-shaped hairs on the back of the petals.

Dhruvva
is an Indian actor who works in Tamil-language films. A former architect who completed his education in the United States came back to India for his interest in acting.

Alexandra Haeseker
is a Dutch-born Canadian painter, print maker, and installation artist, based in Calgary, Alberta. She is a professor emerita at Alberta University of the Arts.

Moosa Zameer
was the Minister of Tourism of Maldives from 28 October 2015 to 25th March 2019. He served as the chairman of the Social Council of Maldives from 28th October 2015.

Masoyein Monastery
, also known as Masoeyein Monastery, is a Buddhist monastery in Mandalay, Myanmar.

Belltown
is a neighbourhood in the Britannia area of Bay Ward, in the west end of Ottawa. It is bounded on the east by Britannia Park, on the north by the Ottawa River, on the west by Andrew Haydon Park and the south by Carling Avenue.

The Park Glacier
is a glacier located on the northern part of the Bear Peninsula of Marie Byrd Land in Antarctica. It flows to the sea along the west side of the Gurnon Peninsula.

Leeya Rose Jackson
is an illustrator, art director, and podcast host living in Minneapolis, Minnesota. Originally from Detroit, Jackson received her Bachelor of Fine Arts degree with a double major in painting and printmaking from Illinois Wesleyan University in 2013.

Angela Stanton-King
is a Republican political candidate from Atlanta, Georgia. She spent two years in prison and was later pardoned by Donald Trump.

Tony Hunt
is an Irish lawyer who is currently a Judge of the High Court and is the senior presiding judge of the Special Criminal Court. He was previously a barrister and a Judge of the Circuit Court between 2007 and 2014.

Robert Gleed
, Sr. was a state senator in Mississippi during the Reconstruction era. After several of his fellow African Americans were killed before an election in 1875 he relocated to Paris, Texas.

Sime (Sam) Sarin
was a Croatian fisherman and businessperson instrumental in the development of the Southern bluefin tuna ranching industry and property development in the town of Port Lincoln in South Australia. Sarin was born in Kali, Croatia and emigrated to Australia in the 1950s where he first worked as a fruit picker and cane cutter.

Jamiat Ulema-e-Islam Bangladesh
is a Bangladeshi Islamist Party registered with Bangladesh Election Commission. Jamiat Ulema-e-Islam Bangladesh was a member of the Islamist 20-Party alliance.

Ibidunni Ighodalo
is a former beauty queen, an event management expert, a philanthropist, and a co-pastor of Trinity House Church, in Lagos Nigeria. She is the founder of Elizabeth R, a public relation and Events Company; and Ibidunni Ighodalo Foundation, a non-profit organization that is focused on supporting families with infertility challenges.

Mario Fioretti
is an Italian professional basketball coach, who is currently an assistant coach of Olimpia Milano of the LBA and the EuroLeague. After graduating, he traveled to America wherein he became an assistant coach to Bobby Knight, the head coach of the Indiana Hoosiers.

Hsieh Yu-shu
is a Taiwanese professional golfer. Though he only won two prominent events, the 1988 Indonesia Open and the 1993 Mercuries Taiwan Masters, he was a consistent contender on the Asia Golf Circuit and Asian PGA Tour in the 1980s and 1990s.

J. Rogers Pope
is an American politician from the state of Louisiana. A Republican, Pope has represented the 13th district of the Louisiana State Senate, covering parts of Livingston Parish, since 2020.

Asterolasia
correifolia is a species of erect shrub that is endemic to eastern Australia. It has white to brown star-shaped hairs on its stems, lance-shaped to elliptical leaves densely covered with white star-shaped hairs on the lower surface, and white to cream-coloured or yellow flowers arranged in umbels of four to ten or more in leaf axils, the back of the petals densely covered with white hairs.

Saiful Alam Saja Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Gaibandha-2 in February 1996.

Grand Wash Cliffs Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area in the Grand Canyon-Parashant National Monument in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1984 under the Arizona Wilderness Act the area is managed by the Bureau of Land Management.

Crayola Scoot
is a sports video game developed by Climax Studios and published by Outright Games. It is based on the Crayola brand, and was released on October 16, 2018 in North America and October 23, 2018 in Europe for Microsoft Windows, Nintendo Switch, PlayStation 4, and Xbox One.

Mount Seymour
is a rural locality in the local government area of Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south-east of the town of Oatlands.

Woolsey Peak Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area centered around its namesake Woolsey Peak, rising 2,500 feet to a summit at 3270 feet in the Gila Bend Mountains in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1990 under the Arizona Desert Wilderness Act the area is managed by the Bureau of Land Management.

Adesmia
aegiceras is a perennial shrub found in Argentina and Chile.

Adolf Hugo Magnusson
was a Swedish naturalist who specialized in lichenology. He was a school teacher in Gothenburg from 1909 to 1948, but spent his spare time on the study of lichens.

Adesmia
ameghinoi is an endemic perennial shrub found in Argentina.

Adesmia
aphanantha is a perennial herb found in South America.

Matthew Dennis Hunt
was a New Zealand Police constable whose killing in Auckland on 19 June 2020 drew significant national media coverage. A 24-year-old man has been charged with his murder while a 30-year-old woman has been charged as an accessory to his murder.

Adesmia
aphylla is an endemic perennial shrub found in Chile.

Adesmia
arachnipes is an endemic perennial herb found in Chile.

Adesmia
araucana is an endemic perennial herb found in Chile.

Adesmia
araujoi is an endemic perennial species found in Brazil.

Abdul Bari Sarkar
is a politician from Kurigram district of Bangladesh and a former Member of Parliament for Kurigram-4 constituency. Sarkar is the president of Chilmari Upazila BNP.

Rokanuddaula Mandal
Politician of Kurigram district of Bangladesh and Former Member of Parliament for Kurigram-4 constituency in 1988 by-election. Mandal is a politician of Jatiya Party.

Mohammad Sadaqat Hossain
who is also known as Chhakku Mia. Politician of Kurigram district of Bangladesh, Freedom fighter and Former Member of Parliament for Undivided Rangpur-17 constituency in 1973.

Mohammad Sirajul Haque
Politician of Kurigram district of Bangladesh and former member of Parliament for Undivided Rangpur-16 constituency in 1979. Haque was a professor at Kurigram College and principal of Roumari Degree College.

Vankalai Sanctuary
is located North-West of Sri Lanka in the District of Mannar. This site covers an area of 4,839 ha and consists of several ecosystems which range from arid-zone thorn scrubland, arid-zone pastures and maritime grasslands, sand dunes, mangroves, salt marshes, lagoons, tidal flats, sea-grass beds and shallow marine areas.

Amy Elizabeth Murrell Taylor
is an American historian. She is the T.

Stonor
is a rural locality in the local government area of Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south of the town of Oatlands.

Enrico Cardile
is an Italian aerodynamicist working for Scuderia Ferrari, where he takes charge of the Aerodynamics apartment and works as the vehicle project manager. Cardile obtained a degree in aerospace engineering at the University of Pisa in 2002.

Froriepia
are a genus of flowering plants in the umbellifer family Apiaceae, native to the Caucasus region, including Russia, Georgia, Armenia, Azerbaijan, Turkey and Iran. They prefer to live in scrubby areas, in meadows, and on forest edges.

Ralf Becker
is a German former footballer and coach who currently works as the Director of Sports of Dynamo Dresden. Becker spent a significant portion of his time as a youth player with VfB Stuttgart, as well as with their smaller, regional rival Stuttgarter Kickers.

Debra Auguste
is an American chemical engineer and professor at Northeastern University in the Department of Chemical Engineering. Auguste is dedicated to developing treatments for triple negative breast cancer, one of the most aggressive and fatal cancers that disproportionately affects African American women.

Guangzhou Huangpu Tram Line
1 is a tram line serving the Huangpu District of Guangzhou. The 7.7 km initial section opened on 1 July 2020.

Horah Al-Horah Reserve
is a nature reserve area in Saudi Arabia managed by the Saudi Wildlife Authority and is one of the first reserves established by the authority in 1987. The reserve occupies approximately 13,775 km and its surface consists of a volcanic plateau rich in black basaltic rocks and includes a range of low volcanic mountains with heights between 800 and 1,150 meters above sea level Horah Al-Horah Reserve is characterised by diverse vegetation, consisting of perennial and annual plants scattered in the torrent streams and its sides.

Alexander Capo Carrillo
, better known as Alex Trujillo and A.K.A. Alex is a Puerto Rican former drug dealer.

Michael N. Pearson
is an historian and academic known for his studies on the Indian Ocean. He currently serves as Emeritus Professor at University of New South Wales, Sydney.

Hem Heath Woods
is a nature reserve of the Staffordshire Wildlife Trust. It is on the southern fringe of Stoke-on-Trent, England.

Conrad Fehr
was a German-Danish painter and sculptor. Conrad Heinrich Franz Fehr was born in the Danish village of Toftlund in 1854, ten years before it became a part of German Prussia after the Second Schleswig War.

Prince Mohammad Bin Salman Nature Reserve
located between NEOM Project and Red Sea Project northwest Saudi Arabia. It is one of the six royal reserves which were established by royal order in June 2018.

Roosebeck
is a hamlet in South Lakeland, Cumbria, England, on the north west coast of Morecambe Bay. It is in the civil parish of Aldingham.

Zaitoon Bano
, also spelled Zaitun Banu, is a Pakistani feminist writer, poet, and the former broadcaster. She primarily wrote in Pashto and Urdu languages.

Bryan John Leighton
is an English former first-class cricketer. Leighton was born at Hereford.

David Walker
is an New Zealander and diplomat. Walker is a chartered accountant.

LIBSYS
is an Integrated Library System first released in 1988 and since then it has been implemented in a large number of libraries. The LIBSYS software was designed and developed to manage small and large library operations.

Asterolasia
drummondii, commonly known as Gairdner Range starbush, is a species of small shrub that is endemic to a restricted area of the southwest of Western Australia. It has egg-shaped leaves and white flowers arranged in umbels of five to ten flowers with rust-coloured, star-shaped hairs on the back of the petals.

Rokfin
is a content distribution network that uses a cryptocurrency pool to share subscriber revenue with producers. In 2020, it is known for supporting MMA and college wrestling based content, and numerous progressive political opinion shows.

Tabith Awal
is a Bangladeshi Footballer and politician. He has been formerly footballer of Feni SC.He also stood for mayor in 2015 Dhaka North City Corporation election and 2020 Dhaka North City Corporation election,both time he came second.

Narasimha Nagar
is a neighborhood situated on the Visakhapatnam City, India. this area is lay down besides Simhachalam hill range and Akkayyapalem.The area, which falls under the local administrative limits of Greater Visakhapatnam Municipal Corporation.

Nicole Leach
is a former American track and field athlete who competes in the 400 metre hurdles and 4x400 metre relay events at international level events. Her highest achievement is winning two medals at the 2006 World Junior Championships in Athletics in Beijing.

Orumuri News
paper is a Ugandan newspaper which publishes in Runyankole language. It is the main newspaper that acts as a reliable source of local and international news for the locals, especially people from Western Region, Uganda.

Jonathon Andrew Lodwick
is an English barrister and former first-class cricketer. Lodwick was born at Reading in October 1989.

Ihara
served as Ambassador Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary of the Permanent Mission of Japan to the International Organizations in Geneva from November 2015 until his appointment in December 2019 to serve as the Ambassador Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary of Japan to France.

Washington Geraldo Dias Alves
is a Brazilian former footballer who played as a central defender. After he ended his playing career, he worked as a manager in the Portuguese lower leagues.

Peter Daniel Lunn
is an English former first-class cricketer. Lunn was born at Oxford in April 1970.

Adesmia
arenicola is an endemic perennial shrub found in Argentina.

Kelly Mullen
is an American former long track speed skater, who was active in the 1980s. Mullen represented her nation twice at the World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women.

Adesmia argenta
is an endemic perennial shrub found in Peru.

Biosphere Corporation
is a Ukrainian manufacturer and distributor of household and hygiene products, founded in 1997 by Andriy Zdesenko. The production facilities are represented by 4 plants.

Tiko Crofoot
is a Fijian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Luca Belluzzi
is a Sammarinese sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Constantino Scarpetta
is a Paraguayan sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Rodney Reader
is a Barbadian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Robert Dunkley
is a Bahamian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Yang Fung
is a Hong Kong sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Brett Chivers
is a Guamanian sailor. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Karl James
is an Antigua and Barbuda sailor. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Malcolm Smith
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

John Tabone
is a Maltese sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Alp Alpagut
is a Turkish sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

John van Batenburg Stafford
is a Caymanian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Roman Romanovych Abramovsky
is a Ukrainian civil servant and politician. On 19 June 2020, he was appointed as the Minister of Environmental Protection and Natural Resources.

Ben Tan
is a Singaporean sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Paul Dielemans
is a Dutch Antillean sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Antonio Goeters
is a Mexican sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Dimitrios Theodorakis
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Rod Davies
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Gianfranco de Taddeo
is a Swiss former footballer who played in the 1950s. He played as goalkeeper.

Aleksandr Zelenovsky
is a Belarusian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Ernst Klauser
is a Swiss former footballer who played in the 1950s. He played as a Striker.

Asha Mwilu
is a Kenyan journalist and a documentary filmmaker. She is a Chevening Scholar from the University for the Creative Arts, Farnham.

Luis Echenique
is a Chilean sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Glenn Delaney
is a New Zealand professional rugby union football coach. He is currently the head coach of the Scarlets team that plays in the Pro14 competition.

Jens Eckardt
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Taina Salmia
.

Dave Hibberd
is a South African sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Franz Urlesberger
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Mark Lyttle
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Vasco Serpa
is a Portuguese sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Walter Felber
is a Swiss former footballer who played in the 1950s. He played as midfielder.

Stefan Warkalla
is a German sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Benedikt Frey
is a Swiss former footballer who played in the 1950s. He played as midfielder.

Adesmia
argyrophylla is an endemic perennial shrub found in North and Central Chile.

Romano Zolin
is an Italian former footballer who played in the 1950s. He played as Striker.

Adesmia
aromatica is an endemic perennial shrub found in Chile.

Mukhlesur Rahman Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Gaibandha-3 in February 1996.

Richard William Heneker
is a Canadian businessman of Irish descent. Following his immigration to Canada in 1855, he settled in Sherbrooke, in Quebec.

Anne Mawathe
is a Kenyan journalist. In 2014, she was shortlisted among the 28 finalists for the CNN Multichoice African Journalists Award.

Matt Sherratt
is a English professional rugby union coach. He is currently the backs coach of Worcester Warriors who play in the Premiership Rugby competition.

Suswagatam Khushamadeed
is the upcoming Bollywood film Directed by Dhiraj Kumar. The Movie stars starring Pulkit Samrat in the lead role.

Kohara
graduated from ESP College of Entertainment, a vocational school that specializes in electric guitar and basses. According to her friend in high school, Kohara switched from vocals to guitar when her guitarist band mate asked to switch their position.

Abraham Nova
is a Puerto Rican-born American professional boxer who has held the WBA-NABA super featherweight title since 2018. Abraham Nova was born on January 14, 1994 in Carolina, Puerto Rico, to Dominican parents.

Roozbeh Hospital
is a most oldest psychiatric hospital in Iran, which is a subset of Tehran University of Medical Sciences.

Max
and Mona is a 2004 South African-Swedish drama film Teddy Mattera and starring Mpho Lovinga and Jerry Mofokeng.

Aaronsohnia factorovskyi
is a member of the daisy family and is found from central Israel to Iraq and Arabian Peninsula.

Aaronsohnia
pubescens is a member of the daisy family and is found across North Africa and the Arabian Peninsula including Algeria, Libya, Morocco, Saudi Arabia, Tunisia and Western Sahara.

International Society For Interpersonal Acceptance-Rejection
is a not-for-profit professional organization for researchers and practitioners working on interpersonal relationships, and the largest international psychological organization focusing on interpersonal acceptance-rejection issues . The purpose of ISIPAR is to promote multidisciplinary research on issues of interpersonal acceptance-rejection and to foster exchange of information and encourage application of research findings in policy making, clinical practice, and academic research. The society hosts a biennial international meeting and publishes a tri-annual online newsletter.

Falls Township Community Park
is a municipal park located in and operated by Falls Township, Bucks County, Pennsylvania. It is situated in two sections divided by a creek.

Abrotanella
caespitosa is a member of the daisy family and is an endemic species of the South Island of New Zealand.

Rose Wangui
is a Kenyan reporter who bagged the Knight International Journalism Award, which was presented to her at the International Centre for Journalists 35th Annual Awards Dinner in 2019.

Jane Godia
is a Kenyan journalist, editor and trainer. She is the Acting Executive Director of African Gender and Media Initiative Trust and Project Manager for WIN Programme in East and Central Africa.

Karina Yaniv
is an Israeli scientist who is best known for her contributions to the field of vascular development. She is a Professor of Vascular Disease in the Department of Biological Regulation at the Weizman Institute of science, Rehovot, Israel.

Hajiya Jamila Babayo Musa
is a female Nigerian writer. She writes novels in Hausa that focus on girl child abuse and human trafficking.

Iseult Lynch
is an Irish chemist and Professor of Enivornmental Nanoscience at the School of Geography, Earth and Environmental Sciences at the University of Birmingham. Her research focuses on the safety of nanoparticles in the environment and their interactions with biological entities.

Lynette Armstrong
is a Botswana accountant and corporate executive, who was appointed as the Acting Chief Executive Officer of Debswana Diamond Company Limited, the largest diamond-mining company in the world, by value. She was appointed to that position in August 2019.

Leik Pyar Naung Kyo
is a Burmese horror drama television series. It was banned from watching series under the age of 13.

Upper Greenhill
railway station served the village of Greenhill, Falkirk, Scotland from 1848 to 1865 on the Edinburgh and Glasgow Railway. The station opened as Scottish Central Junction in July 1848 by the North British Railway.

Ronnie Johns
is an American politician from the state of Louisiana. A Republican, Pope has represented the 27th district of the Louisiana State Senate, based in Lake Charles, since 2012.

Tao Dong
is a Chinese immunologist who is Professor of Immunology at Oxford University. Her work focuses on the study of T-cells which respond to viral infections and viral associated cancer.

Tabitha Rotich
, is a Kenyan journalist. She was conferred with the Presidential Order of Service, Uzalendo Award in 2020, for her commendable service in addressing the COVID-19 pandemic.

Petra Moolhuizen
is a Dutch former long track speed skater, who was active from 1980 until 1989. Moolhuizen had 1 ISU Speed Skating World Cup victory in the 3000m event in Calgary in January 1987, furthermore she won 3 silver and 4 bronze medals at World Cup events.

Salihu Yakubu-Danladi
is a Nigerian engineer and politician elected speaker of the 9th Kwara State House of Assembly in 2019. Yakubu-Danladi is a first-time member of the state assembly elected on the platform of the All Progressives Congress to represent Ilesha-Gwanara in Baruten state constituency.

Suzerain Legends
is the latest installment in the Suzerain universe, a tabletop RPG setting created by Savage Mojo. The universe is a 2010 ENnie Award winner, and a 2007 Origins award nominee.

Mercy Kandie Tonui
is a Kenyan journalist, former Senior Reporter with the Citizen Television Media House and a Broadcast Journalist at British Broadcasting Corporation. Mercy grew up in Uasin Gishu County fomerly Rift Valley Province of Kenya.

Sulyman Durosylorun Kawu
is a Nigerian judge who is currently serving as the Chief Judge of Kwara State since 2014. He was appointed by Governor Abdulfatah Ahmed on the recommendation of the Kwara State Judicial Service Commission.

Deo Damla
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. It is situated in the eastern rim of Nanda Devi Sanctuary on the watershed of Milam Glacier and Nanda Devi basin.

Alan Stewart
is an British cinematographer, known for his collaboration with Guy Ritchie.

Abubakar Y Suleiman
is a Nigerian politician who was elected speaker of the 9 Bauchi State House of Assembly in 2019. Suleiman, a member of the APC representing Ningi State constituency was controversially elected speaker of the house by 11 of the 31 members of the assembly.

Sarah Martins da Silva
is a British gynaecologist and researcher specialising in male infertility. Da Silva is a senior lecturer in reproductive medicine at the University of Dundee.

Haliya
is a village in Nalgonda district, Telangana, India. It is located in Anumula mandal of Miryalaguda division.

Amar Manikya
was the Maharaja of Tripura from 1577 to 1586. Born Amardeva, he was a son of Maharaja Deva Manikya, but was only a prince as another family had taken over the throne.

Sheila Kawamara-Mishambi
is a Ugandan journalist and Executive Director of the Eastern African Sub-Regional Support Initiative for the Advancement of Women. She is the only female Ugandan journalist that boldly covered the Rwandan Genocide in 1994.

Solange Ayanone
is a Rwandan journalist and trainer. She was the former programs director for Isango Star and trainer for Syfia International.

Alfred Hartmann
is a Swiss former footballer who played in the 1950s. He played mainly as Striker, but also as midfielder.

Vincent L. Soriano
Chairman and ex-officio Municipal Councilor, Vice Mayor, and Provincial Board Member of Laguna.

Pennsylvania State Game Lands
Number 51 are Pennsylvania State Game Lands in Fayette County, Pennsylvania

LeRoy Davis White
was a member of the Utah House of Representatives and mayor of Perry, Utah. White was born in Perry, Utah where he lived most of his life.

Sayad Shirazi Hospital
is a public hospital located in Gorgan, Iran and currently has a capacity of 300 beds.

Edward Collett
May was an English music educator. He was born in Greenwich, where his father was a shipbuilder.

Vladimir Zuyev
is a Belarusian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

West Coast Boogaloo
is the debut album by the San Diego acid-soul-jazz band The Greyboy Allstars, featuring Fred Wesley on trombone on three tracks. The album was recorded in one day, live with the band, with Karl Denson and DJ Greyboy taking the reins as producers.

Sergey Khoretsky
is a Belarusian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Alice Feeney
is a British novelist of the 21st century, writing in the mystery and thriller genres. Before becoming a published writer, Feeney was a producer and journalist at the BBC for fifteen or sixteen years.

Vishakha Bokil
is an Indian sound designer and production sound mixer based in Mumbai who works in Hollywood, Hindi, Tamil and Malayalam films. She started her career as an associate production sound mixer with the Academy Award winning sound designer Resul Pookutty.

Beach
handball was one of the invitational sports at the 2001 World Games in Akita and was played between 23 and 25 August. Athletes from 9 nations participated in the tournament.

Donald McLean
is a Caymanian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Mordechai
is the third studio album by American musical trio Khruangbin. It was released June 26, 2020 under Dead Oceans and Night Time Stories.

Guillermo Calegari Jr
. is an Argentine sailor.

Kate Veale
is an Irish racewalker who competes in international level events. She was 2011 World Youth champion in the 5 kilometre race walk.

Mauro Maiola
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Sha Kok Mei
is a village in Sai Kung Peninsula, Hong Kong.

Diogo Cayolla
is a Portuguese sailor. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics, the 2000 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Ville Kurki
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Mark Holowesko
is a Bahamian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Myles Pritchard
is a Bahamian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Princilla Violet Smart Evans Morris
Fellows Program.

Csaba Haranghy
is a Hungarian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Signal Mountain Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area centered around its namesake Signal Mountain, rising to a summit at in the Gila Bend Mountains in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1990 under the Arizona Desert Wilderness Act, the area is managed by the Bureau of Land Management.

Ellease Ebele N. Oseye
is an African-American poet and author who received the Gwendolyn Brooks Award for Poetry.

Anatoly Mikhaylin
is a Russian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Lee White
is a Bermudian sailor. He competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics, the 2000 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

George Skuodas
is a British sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Jinaan Hussain
is a Pakistani actress and model. She is one of the very well known actress in the industry.

Vanderhoof
Water Aerodrome, , iss located adjacent to Vanderhoof, British Columbia, Canada.

Walter Ziegler
is a German historian Born in Liberec, Ziegler has been lining in Bavaria since 1946. He attended Gymnasium in Munich.

Martin Hejlsberg
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Javier Hermida
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Voyageur Channel Water Aerodrome
, , is located east southeast Killarney, Ontario, Canada.

Wabayuma Peak Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area centered around its namesake Wabayuma Peak, rising to 7,601 feet in the Hualapai Mountains in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1990 under the Arizona Desert Wilderness Act the area is managed by the Bureau of Land Management.

Mowalola Ogunlesi
is a Nigerian-born fashion designer working and living in London. She is known for working with a wide variety of textiles such as leather and PVC to produce non-traditional silhouettes inspired by Nigerian and London youth culture.

Joseph A. Favazza
is an American religious scholar and academic administrator serving as the 11th President of Saint Anselm College. Favazza is a native of Memphis, Tennessee.

Apethymus
serotinus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Jeff Forret
is an American historian. He is a professor of history and a Distinguished Faculty Research Fellow at Lamar University.

Kathleen Openda-Mvati
is a Kenyan journalist and former television host with the Kenya Television Network. She has received many accolades including the Eisenhower Fellowship and the Chevening Scholar.

Shahid Dastgheib Hospital
is a public hospital located in Shiraz, Iran and currently has a capacity of 130 beds.

The Film Company of Ireland
was the first film production company established in Ireland. It operated from 1916 to 1922.

Kim Joong-goo
, also known by stage name R. Tee, is a South Korean DJ, Songwriter, and record producer of The Black Label.

Azam Nazir Tarar
is a Lahore based Pakistani criminal Lawyer, Bar Leader and Vice Chairman Pakistan Bar Council. He hails from powerful and famous Tarar Family which introduced many Politicians, Bureaucrats and lawyers.

Tawkeel
is a British-bred, French-trained Thoroughbred racehorse. She was unraced as a two-year-old in 2019, but in the following season she won her first four races culminating with a victory in the Group 1 Prix Saint-Alary.

Whit Babcock
is the current athletics director at Virginia Tech, a position he has held since 2014. Previously, he was the athletics director at the University of Cincinnati from 2011 to 2014.

Jacopo Dondulo
was a Venetian sailor, military commander, and politician in the 13th century. Jacopo Dondulo is the only well-known member of his family, which resided in the parish of the Santi Apostoli, and which died out in the first half of the 14th century.

Shiri Eisner
is a Mizrahi writer and activist based in Tel Aviv. Eisner works towards erasing stereotypes attached to bisexuality and other queer orientations.

Kanoon
is a 1994 Indian Hindi-language film directed by Sushma Shiromani and starring Ajay Devgn and Urmila Matondkar.

United States
gubernatorial elections were held in 1900, in 34 states, concurrent with the House, Senate elections and presidential election, on November 6, 1900. In Alabama, the gubernatorial election was held in August for the last time, and in Rhode Island it was held in April for the last time.

Lankapatuna Samudragiri Viharaya
is a Buddhist temple situated in the Trincomalee District, Eastern province of Sri Lanka. This temple which is situated near the ocean near the historic Port of Lankapatuna where Prince Dantha and Princess Hemamala set foot in Sri Lanka bringing the Sacred Tooth Relic of the Buddha.

Sumo
was one of the invitational sports at the 2001 World Games in Akita and was played between 25 and 26 August. 66 athletes, from 14 nations, participated in the tournament.

Arge
ustulata is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Tsietsi Daniel Motijoane
was born in Lesotho and grew up in Sharpville, in what is known as the Vaal Triangle. He started singing at an early age and had formed a band by the time he was in high school.

Elizabeth McDermott
is a Professor of Health Inequality at Lancaster University. Her research considers mental health inequality, with a focus on gender, social class and young people.

Coastal Elites
is an upcoming American comedy television film directed by Jay Roach, from a screenplay by Paul Rudnick. The film stars Bette Midler, Sarah Paulson, Kaitlyn Dever, Dan Levy and Issa Rae as five people, living in either New York City or Los Angeles, navigating the COVID-19 pandemic.

Calameuta
pallipes is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Akinre Terry
also known as Terri also Starboyterri is a Nigerian musician, singer and songwriter, signed to StarBoy Records. Akinre Terry was born in Lagos State and was raised in Edo State, Nigeria.

Paola Massidda
is an Italian politician and lawyer. She is current member of the Five Star Movement party.

Davidovo
is a village in the municipality of Gevgelija, North Macedonia. It used to be part of the former municipality Miravci.

Miletkovo
is a village in the municipality of Gevgelija, North Macedonia. It used to be part of the former municipality Miravci.

Petrovo
is a village in the municipality of Gevgelija, North Macedonia. It used to be part of the former municipality Miravci.

Jonathan Peter Pearce
is an English former first-class cricketer. Pearce was born at Newcastle upon Tyne in April 1957.

Smokvica
is a village in the municipality of Gevgelija, North Macedonia. It used to be part of the former municipality Miravci.

Daniel Charles Pascoe
is an Australian academic and former first-class cricketer. Pascoe was born at Canberra in May 1983.

Garcia Live
Volume 14 is an album by Jerry Garcia and John Kahn. It contains the complete concert recorded at The Ritz in Manhattan on January 27, 1986.

Claire Loftus
is an Irish solicitor and civil servant who has been the Director of Public Prosecutions since 2011. Loftus was born in 1967 and is from South Dublin.

Kenneth Paul Rosenberg
, MD is an American psychiatrist known for his clinical work in addiction and psychotherapy and for his popular films and books. Rosenberg was born in 1956, was raised in Philadelphia, studied medicine in New York City, and completed his residency and addiction psychiatry fellowship at the Cornell University Medical Center, where he remains on faculty.

Beatrice Batty
was an English writer and author of ten novels. She was born in London, and was the eldest daughter of Henry Stebbing, an English cleric and literary editor.

Roxanna Carrillo
is a Peruvian activist and feminist. Carrillo has worked for the United Nations for around twenty years.

Viljami Aittokoski
is a Finnish footballer who plays as a midfielder for Finnish club Kuopion Palloseura.

Strada statale
38 dello Stelvio, to continue in Etschtal until it reaches Bolzano.

Grindstone Mountain
is a mountain summit located in the Icicle Creek Valley in Chelan County of Washington state. Grindstone Mountain is situated west of Leavenworth, within the Alpine Lakes Wilderness, on land managed by Okanogan-Wenatchee National Forest.

Elsie S. Kanza
is a Tanzanian Economist. She has served in various positions in the Ministry of Finance and Central Bank of Tanzania, including becoming a Personal Assistant to His Excellency Jakaya Mrisho Kikwete of the United Republic of Tanzania and also his Economic Advisor.

Henry J. Klosak
was an American politician who served as a Republican member of the Illinois House of Representatives and the Village President of Cicero, Illinois. Klosak was born November 7, 1925.

Aleksi Honka-Halilla
is a Finnish goalkeeper who plays for Kuopion Palloseura and for SC KuFu 98 as a goalkeeper. On 18 September 2018, he made his debut for the Finnish under-18 team in a game against Belarus.

Mark Heslin
is an Irish lawyer who has been a Judge of the High Court since December 2019. He was formerly a litigation solicitor at a commercial law firm.

Gerasimos Mitoglou
is a Greek professional footballer who plays as a centre-back for Volos. His father Dimitris is a former professional footballer, while his brothet is the international basketball player Dinos Mitoglou.

Carlos Eduardo Romero Millaqueo
is a Chilean freestyle wrestler. A late starter, Romero started competing internationally when he was 18 years old in 2015.

Morgan Stilma
is a Dutch-Spanish basketball player for Heroes Den Bosch and the . Standing at , he plays as center. Stilma was born in Marbella, Spain to a Dutch father and Italian mother.

Trisha Abe
is a Canadian painter and muralist based in Kitchener, Ontario. Abe was born and raised in Mississauga, Ontario.

Crystal Simorgh
for Best Film is an award presented annually by the Fajr International Film Festival held in Iran.

Fred Walker
was an English footballer who played as a defender. Walker began his career with Metro Shaft, before moving to Wednesbury.

GMA Affordabox
is a Philippine ISDB-T digital terrestrial television provider owned and operated by GMA New Media, a subsidiary of GMA Network, Inc.. The service distributes digital set-top boxes with free-to-view digital TV channels, Multimedia Player, Personal Video Recorder, Broadcast Markup Language, Emergency Warning Broadcast system, Functional Auto-on Alert, Digital Display, and Info Display services to select areas in the Philippines.

Greencoat Renewables PLC
is an Irish investment company investing in primarily Irish and Euro denominated European wind farms and renewable energy infrastructure. Established in 2017, it is listed on the London Stock Exchange and Irish Stock Exchange and is a constituent member of the ISEQ 20.

Asterolasia
grandiflora is a species of weak, open shrub or sub-shrub that is endemic to the southwest of Western Australia. It has oblong, elliptical or egg-shaped leaves and pink to mauve flowers arranged in umbels of about three flowers with a thick covering of star-shaped hairs on the back of the petals.

Tunnack
is a rural locality in the local government area of Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south-east of the town of Oatlands.

Garrett Simons
is an Irish lawyer who has been a Judge of the High Court since November 2018. He formerly practised as a barrister, specialising in environmental and planning law.

KFC Pakistan
is the Pakistani subsidiary of the international fast food chain, KFC. In Pakistan, first outlet of KFC was opened in Gulshan-e-Iqbal, Karachi, in 1997.

Adrienne W. Kolb
is an American historian of science who worked for many years as the archivist and historian at Fermilab. Kolb studied history at the University of New Orleans, graduating in 1972.

Melisa Teo
is a Singaporean photographer living in Paris. For many years, she focused her camera on religious subjects but has been increasingly drawn to nature which is currently the central theme of her photography.

Robin Liddell
is a Scottish racing driver who currently competes in the Michelin Pilot Challenge. Liddell has two series championships to his name, winning the GT class of the 2001 European Le Mans Series and the GS class of the 2015 Continental Tire Sports Car Challenge.

Dexter MacBride
, before appearing on the professional circuit in the late 1980s.

CPC F.C.
is a professional football club from Kaohsiung, participating in Taiwan Football Second Division League CPC FC was founded in June 2020.

Sarah Elizabeth Igo
is an American historian and author. She is the Andrew Jackson Chair in American History at Vanderbilt University.

Chris Kennedy
is an American former professional tennis player. Kennedy, who was raised in Cary, North Carolina, was a state champion in junior tennis and a two-time All-American at Trinity University in Texas.

Doug Ricks
is an American former businessman, University staff, and politician from Idaho. Ricks is a Republican member of the Idaho House of Representatives for District 34, seat A.

Andy Avalos
is an American football coach. He is currently the Defensive Coordinator at the University of Oregon.

Samson Kassumba
is a Ugandan Pastor, News anchor and Show host.He works with NBS Television especially live at 9. He studied and completed his primary education from Kireka SD primary school, Kyambogo College School for his Uganda Certificate of Education and Kololo high school for his Uganda Advanced Certificate of Education,which he failed.

Amanda Van Annan
, is a British actress, model, and businesswoman. She is also known for appearing in the 2006 film Rag Tag, and for founding Great Light Entertainment.

Heather Matson
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing District 38 in the Iowa House of Representatives.

Michael Freilich
is a Belgian journalist and politician for the Flemish nationalist and conservative New Flemish Alliance party. He was elected to the Belgian Chamber of Representatives in 2019.

Sydney
station is a disused railway station building in Sydney, Nova Scotia, Canada. The building was originally owned by Canadian National Railway and later used by Via Rail Canada until the discontinuance of passenger train service to Sydney in 2990.

Serhiy Mykolayovych Shkarlet
is a Ukrainian economist and politician. On 25 June 2020, he was appointed as the Acting Minister of Education and Science.

Josiah Sobowale Sowande
also known as Sobo Arobiodu was a Yoruba poet from Abeokuta, Ogun State who was a pioneer writer of Ewi, a Yoruba language style of poetry. His works were influenced by his Egba upbringing, the activities of the Christian Missionary Society in Egbaland and popular Egba chants, his works majorly focused the Egba Christian converts as primary audience.

Alpine Learning Group
is a state approved, private special education school in Paramus, New Jersey, United States. Established in 1989, the school serves students aged 3 to 21 with autism spectrum disorder, and it is known to be a prestigious educational and research facility utilizing intensive applied behavior analysis services.

Abrotanella
emarginata is a member of the daisy family and is found in southern Argentina, southern Chile, Falkland Island and New Guinea.

Abrotanella
fertis is a member of the daisy family and is an endemic species of New Zealand.

Sumpia
is Indonesian traditional lumpia spring roll with much drier and smaller shape. Its diameter is about the same as human finger.

Sahir Ali Bagga
is a Pakistani singer, music director and composer from Lahore. This is his discography.

Laitham Vandermeer
. He was recruited by the Western Bulldogs with the 37th draft pick in the 2018 AFL draft.

Coreoperca
kawamebari, commonly known as the Japanese perch, redfin perch, Japanese river perch or in Anglophone parts of Japan, simply the perch, is a predatory species of the freshwater perch native to Japan and southern Korea.

Whitefoord
is a rural locality in the local government area of Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south-east of the town of Oatlands.

Provincial Road 213
of Springfield, with the westernmost part forming part of the boundary between the RMs of Springfield and East St. Paul.

Washington Improv Theater
is an improvisational comedy theater company in Washington, D.C., specializing in long-form improv. It was founded in 1986 by Carole Douglis.

Saurav Lokesh
also known as Bhajarangi Loki is an Indian film Actor. Who, predominantly works in Kannada Film industry.

Shakeela Bano Bhopali
was film Actress and first women Qawwal of India. She was born in 1942 in Bhopal, Capital of Madhya Pradesh.

Kathryn Mary Olesko
is an American historian of science. She is an associate professor at Georgetown University, where she is affiliated with the Science, Technology and International Affairs program in the School of Foreign Service, the Department of History, and the Department of German.

Hayes Hill
is a small scoria cone in Donnybrook, approximately 30 km north of Melbourne, Victoria, Australia. It is on the eastern edge of the Newer Volcanics Province.

Pasquale Cozzolino
is an italian chef based in New York, specialized in Neapolitan cuisine. Cozzolino started learning cooking at the age of 15.

Corey Wittenberg Sr.
is an American-born Australian former professional tennis player. Wittenberg played college tennis for Texas Christian University and earned All-American honors for doubles in 1983.

Olha Anatoliyivna Buslavets
is a Ukrainian power engineer and civil servant. On 16 April 2020, she was appointed as the Acting Minister of Energy and Environmental Protection.

Ataur Rahman
Politician of Gaibandha district of Bangladesh and former member of Parliament for Gaibandha-4 constituency in 1988. Rahman was elected to parliament from Gaibandha-4 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Matiar Rahman Tuku Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Gaibandha-5 in February 1996.

Abdul Mannan Mandal
Bangladesh Nationalist Party politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Gaibandha-4 in February 1996.

Ernest Nnaemeka Azudialu-Obiejesi
of Nestoil and the founder of the Obijackson Foundation.

Abrotanella
forsteroides is a member of the daisy family and is an endemic species of Tasmania, Australia.

Michel Camp
is the base of the First Battalion of Infantry of the Ghana Army. It is located at Tema in the Greater Accra Region of Ghana.

Tingika Elikana
is a Cook Islands politician and member of the Cook Islands Parliament. He is a member of the Cook Islands Party.

Patrick Desmond Rowley
is an Australian agricultural leader. He was chairman of the Australian Dairy Farmers Federation from 1977 until 2006, during which time he assisted in initiating significant industry changes.

Beranci
is a village in the municipality of Mogila, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 445 inhabitants.

Pavlo Andriyovych Kukhta
is a Ukrainian economist and politician. On 4 March 2020, he was appointed as the Acting Minister of Economic Development, Trade and Agriculture.

Shayne Brodie
is a Fijian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Angus Pattie
is a Fijian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Alun Davies
is a Caymanian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Michael Joseph
is a Caymanian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Serhiy Priymak
is a Ukrainian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Yevhen Chelombitko
is a Ukrainian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Sergey Myasnikov
is a Russian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Joe Meyers
is an American former professional tennis player. Meyers, who grew up in Fremont, California, received a full tennis scholarship to San Jose State College.

Marc Peers
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Roy Janse
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Ivanjevci
is a village in the municipality of Mogila, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 615 inhabitants.

Patrick Thorens
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Gang Moor
is a house on Whitestone Lane in Hampstead in the London Borough of Camden. It is listed Grade II on the National Heritage List for England.

Novoselani
is a small village in the municipality of Mogila, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 50 inhabitants.

Franck Citeau
is a French sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Podino
is a village in the municipality of Mogila, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 51 inhabitants.

Florian Schneeberger
is an Austrian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Radobor
is a village in the municipality of Mogila, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 145 inhabitants.

Sveto Todori
is a village in the municipality of Mogila, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 210 inhabitants.

Ahmed Al-Saie
is a Bahraini sailor. He competed in the Soling event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Peter De Roover
is a Belgian politician and journalist. He is a member of the Belgian Chamber of Representatives.

Boro
surname is used by Boro people. Boro means great people.

Sargodha Astroturf Hockey Stadium
is a hockey stadium located in Sargodha, Punjab, Pakistan. It is primarily used for hockey matches.

Andreas Hedwig
is a German archivist and since 2014 the head of the Hessian State Archive. Born in Leverkusen, Hedwig completed a and completed this in 1986 with a second Staatsexamen.

Thomas Drax
, DD was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. He was Rector of Lincoln College, Oxford from 1503 to 1518; and Vice-Chancellor of the University of Oxford from 1511 to 1512.

Redcliffe Road Methodist Church
was a Methodist church on Redcliffe Road, Nottingham from 1884 until 1969. The church began on Mars Hill, Mansfield Road, then it moved to rooms in Sherwood Street before then moving to an iron chapel on Woodborough Road.

Aliya Ali
is a Pakistani actress and model. She is known for roles in dramas, Khalish, Gul-o-Gulzar and Yeh Hai Zindagi, Bandhan.

Blackbird Books
is a South African publishing company. The company was founded by Thabiso Mahlape.

Mahbub Jamil
is a Bangladeshi businessman and former special assistant to the Chief Advisor of the Caretaker government with the rank of a cabinet minister. On 22 January 2008, Jamil was appointed Special Assistant to Chief Advisor of the Caretaker government, Fakhruddin Ahmed, with the rank of a Minister.

Thomas Bank
, STP was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. He was Rector of Lincoln College, Oxford from 1493 to 1503; and Vice-Chancellor of the University of Oxford from 1501 to 1502.

Stockholm Cricket Club
is the oldest cricket club in Sweden and is based in Stockholm, Sweden. Formed by staff from various British and Commonwealth embassies in 1948, matches were initially played against visiting navy ships and tours to the continent then later to local opposition as cricket in Sweden grew.

Colebrook
is a rural locality and town in the local government area of Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about south of the town of Oatlands.

Aadhav Kannadasan
is an Indian actor who works predominantly in Tamil-language films. Aadhav Kannadasan began his career in the film industry by working as an assistant director in G.

Christopher Hargreaves
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Hargreaves was Proctor in 1554; and Rector of Lincoln College, Oxford from 155 until his death on 15 October 1558.

Lymnaeoidea
, common name the pond snails, is a taxonomic superfamily of small to large air-breathing freshwater snails, aquatic pulmonate gastropod mollusks, that belong to the superorder Hygrophila.

Henry Henshaw
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Henshaw graduated BA in 1543, MA in 1546 and BD in 1557.

Elyas Ali Akbari
is an Iranian Kurash player and gold medalist in various international tournaments. The -81kg athlete won a gold medal at the 2018 Asian Games in Jakarta, Indonesia as well as two gold medals at the Asian Championships in Pune, India and VII International Kurash Tournament in Shahrisabz, Uzbekistan.

Joyce Bagala
is a Ugandan journalist and the news manager at Next Media, NBS television. She is one of the most formidable Luganda news anchors She is a Muganda by tribe.

John Tatham
was an Oxford college head in the 16th-century. Tatham was a Fellow of Merton College, Oxford from 1563 to 1576.

John Tatham
, DD was an Oxford college head in the 18th-century. He graduated BA from Pembroke College, Oxford in 1689.

Stephen R Palmquist
is a Kantian philosopher in the Department of Religion and Philosophy at Hong Kong Baptist University. His over 200 publications, that include works translated into at least twelve different languages, include over 110 refereed articles and book chapters Palmquist did his PhD in Philosophical Theology at Oxford University under the supervision of John Macquarrie and W.H. Walsh in August 1987.

Charles Mortimer
, DD was an Oxford college head in the 18th-century. Mortimer graduated BA from University College, Oxford in 1748.

Kharchi Vidhan Sabha
seat was one of the seats in Rajasthan Legislative Assembly in India. It used to be a segment of Pali Lok Sabha seat.

Hamid Shabbir Azar
( is a Lahore based lawyer, was born on October 28, 1960 in Lahore. He is senior advocate Supreme Court of Pakistan and visiting professor for business law.

Gregory Charles Bennet
is an Australian priest of the Catholic Church. He is the bishop-elect of the Diocese of Sale, having been appointed to the position in 2020.

Sandgrounder Radio
is an Independent Local Radio Station serving Southport, the Liverpool City Region, the North West, and West Lancashire. The station broadcasts on DAB and Online.

Ethiopia
competed in the 2003 All-Africa Games held at the National Stadium in the city of Abuja, Nigeria. The team wielded a very strong athletic contingent, which brought back a total of five gold, six silver and four bronze medals.

Tracey Tan
is a Singaporean sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Anastasiya Podobed
is a Belarusian sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Anti-Bangladesh
sentiment is a sentiment against Bangladesh. Anti-Bangladesh sentiments are high in Assam.

Mohammad Tamim
is a Bangladeshi academic and Pro-Vice Chancellor of BRAC University. Tamim completed his undergraduate from Bangladesh University of Engineering and Technology.

Maria Mylona
is a Greek sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1996 Summer Olympics, where she ranked 22nd out of 28 competitors.

Ingrid Bellemans
is a Belgian sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Weronika Glinkiewicz
is a Polish sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

Helen Montilla
is a Spanish sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

John Radford
, DD was an Oxford college head in the 19th-century. He graduated BA from Lincoln College, Oxford in 1804, MA in 1807 and BD in 1815.

Tine Moberg-Parker
is a Canadian sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 1996 Summer Olympics.

James Thompson
, DD was an Oxford college head in the 19th-century. He graduated BA from Lincoln College, Oxford in 1823, MA in 1826 and BD in 1833.

Joseph Ruby
, where he is the current CZW World Heavyweight Champion in his third reign.

Sebastes
cheni, the Japanese white seaperch, is a species of fish in the rockfish family found in the Northwest Pacific.

Paula Reinoso
is an Argentine sailor. She competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics, the 2000 Summer Olympics, and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

William Bethome
, STP was an Oxford college head in the 15th-century. Bethome was educated at Eton College.

Janja Orel
is a Slovenian sailor. She competed at the 1996 Summer Olympics and the 2000 Summer Olympics.

George Strangways
, STB was an Oxford college head in the 15th-century. Strangways was Rector of Lincoln College, Oxford from 1479 to 1488.

John Tristropp
was an Oxford college head in the 15th-century. Tristropp was Rector of Lincoln College, Oxford from 1479 to 1488.

John Beke
, STB was an Oxford college head in the 15th-century. Beke was appointed Rector of Lincoln College, Oxford in 1635.

Central Sericultural Research and Training Institute
, established in 1943, is a research institute located at Berhampore, Murshidabad, West Bengal. It is a constituent unit of Indian Silk Board, Ministry of Textiles, Government of India.

William Chamberleyn
was an Oxford college head in the 15th-century. Chamberleyn was the inaugural Rector of Lincoln College, Oxford.

Zlatko Sofroniev Zhivkov
, mayor of the Municipality of Montana from October 1999 to November 2023, former history teacher at Yordan Radichkov High School Montana 1985-1993, Director of Yordan Radichkov High School Montana 1993-1997, and head of the Education Inspectorate of the Ministry of Education and Science in Montana 1997-1999. Zhivkov was elected mayor of Montana in 1999 and re-elected in 2003, 2007, 2011, 2015, and 2019 Zhivkov was born on November 5, 1959 in Boychinovtsi, in the family of a seamstress and factory worker.

Jimmy Reeves
was an American boxer from Cleveland, Ohio. He won the 1939 light heavyweight championship.

Othem Church
is a medieval church in on Gotland, Sweden. It was built in the 13th century and contains several medieval murals.

Anne Bishop
is a Canadian lesbian activist, educator, grassroots organizer and LGBT rights advocate. Anne Charlotte Bishop is an activist, author, educator, food security advocate, labour organizer, and community development worker.

Varzo
railway station is a railway station in the comune of Varzo, in the Italian region of Piedmont. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Simplon line of Rete Ferroviaria Italiana.

Michi Kobi
, born Machiko Kobinata Okamoto, was an American actress. Kobi was born 02 November 1924 in Sacramento, California as Machiko Kobinata Okamoto.

Scalinata di Santa Maria del Monte
is a set of world-famous steps in Caltagirone, Sicily, Italy. It was built in 1606 in order to connect the ancient part of Caltagirone to the new city built in the upper part.

Preglia
railway station is a railway station in the comune of Crevoladossola, in the Italian region of Piedmont. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Simplon line of Rete Ferroviaria Italiana.

Bythinellidae
is a family of small freshwater snails with an operculum, aquatic gastropod molluscs in the order Littorinimorpha. Their minute shell is often colored.

Steak House
is a Saudi Arabian casual service restaurant chain specializing in steak. Steak House opened its first branch in Riyadh in 1992 and currently is operating in 5 cities in Saudi Arabia with 19 branches.

Hamra Church
is a medieval church in Hamra, Gotland, Sweden. Hamra Church was initially planned as a basilica, three bays wide, but only the chancel, the transept and the tower above the crossing were built.

Jazmin Chaudhary
is a Bangladesh-born American adult film actress. She the first pornographic actor of Bangladesh.

Carrington Baptist Church
was a Baptist church on Sherbrooke Road, Carrington, Nottingham which was opened in 1883. The congregation was formed by three friends from the Stoney Street Baptist Church in 1846.

Elise Rasoamampionona
was a Malagasy politician. In 1964 she was elected to the National Assembly, becoming its first female member.

Mithuna Raashi
is an Indian Kannada language television drama that premiered on Colors Kannada on 28 January 2019. It came into the foray due some remarkable performances by the lead pair.Telecast of serial began in Colors Kannada channel and remains the same till date.

Neukum
is an impact crater on Mars. The crater was named after German planetary scientist Gerhard Neukum, by the IAU in 2017.

Viklau Church
is a medieval church on Gotland, Sweden. It is a well-preserved Romanesque church in which several medieval items have been preserved.

Dolerus
madidus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Circassians
in Jordan refers to Jordanians of Circassian origin whose ancestors were ethnically cleansed from their homeland in act of genocide in the 19th century. Circassians began entering the Ottoman Empire en masse during the expansion of the Tsarist Russian Empire into their Caucasian homeland during the 1850s.

Casey B. Mulligan
is an American economist and author. He is a Professor in Economics at the University of Chicago.

Luca Finn Horn
is a German footballer who plays as a midfielder for VfL Wolfsburg.

Mykhailo Vilkhovyi
is a Ukrainian football manager. Positively about Vilkhovyi talked another Ukrainian coach from Kharkiv Valentyn Khodukin whom Vilkhovyi convinced to become a coach and became the first head coach of revived FC Skala Stryi at the end of 1991.

Dennis Borkowski
is a German footballer who plays as a forward for RB Leipzig.

Lucile L. Adams-Campbell
is an American epidemiologist. She serves as the Professor of Oncology at Lombardi Comprehensive Cancer Center and Associate Director for Minority Health at the Georgetown University Medical Center.

Dolerus
aericeps is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Richard Champion
is an American politician and businessman from the state of Colorado. A Republican, Champion has represented the 38th district of the Colorado House of Representatives, based in western Arapahoe County, since 2020.

Nico Diago Gordon
is an English professional footballer who plays as a defender or midfielder for club Birmingham City. Gordon was born in Birmingham and attended St Thomas Aquinas Catholic School in the Kings Norton district.

Dolerus germanicus
is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Gesellius
, Lindgren, Saarinen was a Finnish architecture firm, founded in Helsinki in 1896 by architects Herman Gesellius, Armas Lindgren and Eliel Saarinen. They achieved international recognition with their design for the Finnish pavilion at the Paris World Expo in 1900, designed in the then prevailing Art Nouveau style.

Pedro Reszka Moreau
was a Chilean painter. He won the National Prize of Art of Chile in 1947.

Don Collier
is an American former actor. Collier was born in Santa Monica, California He worked as a geologist, a logging hand, a ranch hand, and a surveyor and served in both the Navy and the Merchant Marine.

Addisyn Merrick
is an American soccer player who plays as a defender for North Carolina Courage. Merrick made her professional debut for the North Carolina Courage on June 27, 2020, in the 2020 NWSL Challenge Cup against Portland Thorns FC.

Jan Fabricius
was a Dutch playwright and journalist. He was the father of Johan Fabricius, a writer.

Percy
is an upcoming American-Canadian-Indian drama film, directed by Clark Johnson from a screenplay by Garfield Lindsay Miller and Hilary Pryor. It stars Christopher Walken, Christina Ricci, Zach Braff, Luke Kirby, Adam Beach, Martin Donovan, Roberta Maxwell and Peter Stebbings.

Isaiah McKinnon
was a police officer in Detroit police from 1965 to 1984 and the chief of Detroit police from 1993 to 1998. He was one of the first African Americans officers at Detroit police.

Moquegua Basin
is a is a sedimentary basin in southernmost Peru. Sedimentary rocks of the basin, including those of Moquegua Group, crop out in the Central Depression makes up part of the sedimenty fill of the basin.

Maharani Devaki
was the mother of Bharatpur King Maharaja Suraj Mal.

Tom Whatley
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 27 in the Alabama State Senate.

Samuel Jones
, was an English bowls international who competed at the British Empire Games. He represented England in the 1938 British Empire Games at Sydney, in the pairs event and finished in fourth place with Ronald Weeks.

Demery
as a surname originates from the Duchy of Normandy, in France, where the Demery family was established.

Sami Dia Said
is a lieutenant general in the United States Air Force, who serves as Inspector General of the Air Force. He attended the University of Alabama at Birmingham.

Faribault
is a railway point in Chibougamau, Quebec, Canada, located where the Canadian National Railway line is intersected by Quebec Route 113. It is marked by a CN signpost.

Dolerus
nitens is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Kyle J. Mullins
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 112 in the Pennsylvania House of Representatives.

Lipinia
albodorsalis is a species of skink found in Papua New Guinea.

Karim Hadi
is a former Iraqi football forward. He competed in the 1985 Pan Arab Games.

Bryce Robert Meredith
is an American freestyle wrestler and graduated folkstyle wrestler. He is a three-time NCAA Division I All-American and a Big 12 Conference champion.

Chiyoda
covers the grounds of the Imperial Palace, and nothing else. It does not have any subdivisions, and no chome.

Gandhinagar
, Jaipur Vidhan Sabha seat was one of the constituencies of Rajasthan Legislative Assembly, in India, just once, to wit, in 1972. The seat was abolished in the delimitation exercise around 1976.

Nemaska Lithium Inc.
is a Canadian mining company that seeks to develop a lithium mine, the Whabouchi property, in northern Quebec. The company filed for creditor protection in December 2019 following cost overruns and lower prices for lithium.

Yulia Vladimirovna Tsvetkova
is a Russian artist and activist from Komsomolsk-on-Amur. On the 11th of February, 2020, she was recognized as a political prisoner.

Motokazu Kenjo
is a Japanese windsurfer. He competed at the 2000 Summer Olympics and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Dolerus
vestigialis is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Peter Theurer
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Astrit Selmani
is a Swedish footballer who plays for Varbergs BoIS as a forward.

Ben Beer
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Finn event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Lipinia
infralineolata is a species of skink found in Indonesia.

Borisovo
is a village in the municipality of Novo Selo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 409 inhabitants.

Yevgeny Chernov
is a Russian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Clifton Webb
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 2000 Summer Olympics, and later became a sailing coach.

Simran Upadhyay
is a Bengali actress, who now worked in Ke Apon Ke Por, a Bengali soap opera which is broadcast on Star Jalsha, a Bengali-language cable television channel in India and Bangladesh.

Russ Silvestri
is an American sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Gabrovo
is a village in the municipality of Novo Selo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 399 inhabitants.

Boubacar Toure
is a Senegalese professional basketball player for Chorale Roanne Basket of the LNB Pro A. He played college basketball for the Grand Canyon Antelopes and Eastern Michigan Eagles. Toure was born and grew up in Dakar.

Heaton Park Congregational Church
is a former church in Prestwich in Greater Manchester. It has been listed Grade II on the National Heritage List for England since April 1986.

Richard Mark Royal
is a professional British swimmer who swam from Sealand to Felixstowe Suffolk. He swam 7.5 miles in just under 3.5 hours.He spent two years planning his swim and despite multiple other people seeking to do a similar swim, he was the only one to be accepted by Sealand to do the swim.

Morgan Victoria Weaver
is an American soccer player who plays as a forward for Portland Thorns FC. Weaver played in college for Washington State.

Mokrievo
is a village in the municipality of Novo Selo, North Macedonia. It is located close to the Greek and Bulgarian borders.

Mokrino
is a village in the municipality of Novo Selo, North Macedonia. It is located close to the Greek and Bulgarian borders.

Novo Konjarevo
is a village in the municipality of Novo Selo, North Macedonia. It is located close to the Bulgarian border.

Sayyid Jawad Kadhim Nasrallah
was an Iraqi nobleman that served as the 43rd custodian of the Imam Husayn shrine from 1802 until 1808. Nasrallah was born c.

Nosipho Makamba-Botya
is a South African politician serving as a Member of the Western Cape Provincial Parliament for the Economic Freedom Fighters. She became an MPP in May 2019 and serves the chief whip of the party in the legislature.

Gareth Patrick Reynolds
is an American stand-up comedian, writer, and podcaster. Reynolds was born in Brown Deer, Wisconsin.

Little Glory
is a 2011 English-language Belgian drama film directed by Vincent Lannoo and starring Cameron Bright, Hannah Murray and Isabella Blake-Thomas. The film premiered at the 2011 Rome Film Festival.

Madonna
and Child in Glory over the City of Bologna is a c.1593 oil on canvas painting by Annibale Carracci, also known as The Virgin and Child in the Clouds or the Madonna of Bologna. It is now in Christ Church Picture Gallery in Oxford.

Lukas Erni
is a Swiss sailor. He competed at the 2000 Summer Olympics and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Origbaajo Ismaila
is a Nigerian footballer currently playing as a forward for Fukushima United of J3 League.

Tomasz Jakubiak
is a Polish sailor. He competed at the 2000 Summer Olympics and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Dominik Bacher
is a German footballer who currently plays as a forward for SpVgg Unterhaching.

MsQuic
is a free and open source implementation of the IETF QUIC protocol written in C that is available on both Windows and Linux platforms. The library is designed to be a cross-platform general purpose QUIC library and optimized for client and server applications, for maximal throughput and minimal latency.

Alain-Guillaume Bunyoni
is a Burundian politician who has been Prime Minister of Burundi since 23 June 2020. Before that, from 2015 until 2020, he served as Minister of Internal Security in the Cabinet of Burundi.

Andrea Ghezzi
is an Italian footballer who plays as a forward for Serie A side Brescia. On 16 June 2020 he signed his first contract for Brescia.

Mikhail Krutikov
is a Russian sailor. He competed at the 2000 Summer Olympics and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Robert A. Westbrooks
is an American attorney, Certified Public Accountant, auditor, and government watchdog serving as Executive Director of the Pandemic Response Accountability Committee. Westbrooks earned a Bachelor of Arts degree in justice from American University and a Juris Doctor from the University of Maryland Francis King Carey School of Law.

Samoilovo
is a village in the municipality of Novo Selo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 348 inhabitants.

Concours de Dressage International
is the competition rating for international dressage events. The rating is given by the equestrian governing body FEI.

Smolari
is a village in the municipality of Novo Selo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 659 inhabitants.

Felix Kerber
is an Austrian footballer currently playing as a forward for WSG Swarovski Tirol.

Giuseppe Casti
is an Italian politician. He is member of the Democratic Party party.

Zubovo
is a village in the municipality of Novo Selo, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 648 inhabitants.

Jesse Chism
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 85 in the Tennessee House of Representatives.

Dolerus
varispinus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Jamil Abiad
is an ex-professional basketball player. He currently is a global basketball trainer, Canadian basketball coach, and a motivational speaker.

Radhabhai
is an Indian actress who works in Tamil and Telugu-language films as a comedienne and character artiste. Actress Kutty Padmini is her daughter.

Dorothy Claire
is an American former singer on Broadway and with big bands. The daughter of Mr. and Mrs. Nelson Wright, Claire was born in La Porte, Indiana.

MLA Thangaraj
ian Indian actor who works in Tamil-language films in villain and character roles. He has acted in over 300 films.

Rick Eldridge
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 10 in the Tennessee House of Representatives.

Koivunoro
began his professional career with Helsinki-based club Karhu-Kissat of the I-Divisioona in 1990. In 1992 he moved to his hometown club JoKP also of the I-Divisioona, helping the team win the league.

Euura
pavida is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Bishop Horden Hall
, also known as Bishop Horden Memorial School and Horden Hall, was a residential school that operated from 1906 until 1976 on Moose Factory Island, at the southern end of James Bay, at the bottom of Hudson Bay, in northern Ontario. During its 70 years, Horden Hall was known by nine names and operated out of several different buildings.

Charlotte Stagg
is a British neurophysiologist who is a Professor at the University of Oxford. She leads the Physiological Neuroimaging Group.

Camel Creek Adventure Park
is an adventure park located in Wadebridge in Cornwall, England. Terry Sandling bought Trelow Farm in Tredinnick and opened the property to the public in 1989 as The Shire Horse Centre.

Julian Marryshow
, from Grenada, was a fighter pilot during World War II. Later, as a tourism advisor in Barbados, he was credited with having reintroduced the traditional Crop Over festival, which had a considerable influence on tourism to that country.

Mary Seery Kearney
is an Irish Fine Gael politician who has served as a Senator since June 2020 as a nominee of the Taoiseach She previously served as a member of South Dublin County Council from 2019 to 2020.

Dwayne Thompson
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 96 in the Tennessee House of Representatives.

Gorno Aglarci
is a village in the municipality of Novaci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 185 inhabitants.

Dalbegovci
is a village in the municipality of Novaci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 178 inhabitants.

Dobromiri
is a village in the municipality of Novaci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 345 inhabitants.

Dolno Aglarci
is a village in the municipality of Novaci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 167 inhabitants.

Mary Young
is an American politician, psychologist, and special education teacher from the state of Colorado. A Democrat, Young has represented the 50th district of the Colorado House of Representatives, based in Greeley, since 2019.

Harris
was born on February 22, 1930 in Anderson, South Carolina, the son of Wilmot Louis Harris and Sarah Elizabeth Sanders. He studied at the University of the South, from where he earned a Bachelor of Arts in 1952, a Master of Divinity in 1957 and an honorary Doctor of Divinity in 1986.

Ribarci
is a village in the municipality of Novaci, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 130 inhabitants.

Vumile Msweli
is a South African businesswoman, career coach and speaker. She currently serves as the CEO of Hesed Consulting.

Paul Sherrell
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 43 in the Tennessee House of Representatives.

Elliott Jerome Brown Jr.
is a queer black American Artist and Photographer. Brown has been commissioned by reputable media outlets, fashion designer and others such as New York Magazine, Gay Letter Magazine, The New Yorker, Vice, Teen Vogue, Dazed, W Magazine, Telfar Clemens In 2019 they received a Emerging Visual Arts Grant by The Rema Hort Mann Foundation.

Lin Linn
is a Burmese make-up artist turned actress after her two decades-long experience in make-up industry. She rose to popularity after working with actress Moe Hay Ko.

Acario Cotapos Baeza
was a Chilean composer. He won the National Prize of Art of Chile in 1960.

Lorig Charkoudian
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing District 20 in the Maryland House of Delegates.

Irfan ur Rahman Khan
also known as Irfanur Rahman Abdul Rahman Khan is an Indian politician of Indian National Congress from Parbhani, Maharashtra, he was Secretary of Maharashtra Pradesh Congress Committee, he also served as Vice President of Maharashtra Pradesh Youth Congress Committee from 1989 to 2004. Irfan ur Rahman Khan born in a Khan family on 09 February 1960 to Abdul Rahman Khan and Rasheeda Rahman in Parbhani, Maharashtra, India.

Loud Dam
is a hydro-electric dam on the Au Sable River in Michigan and is located along the National Register of Historic Places River Road Scenic Byway in Northern Michigan. Loud Dam is also part of the River Road Scenic Byway and listed in the National Scenic Byways Program.

Hebrew Sick Benefit Cemetery
is a Jewish cemetery in Winnipeg, Canada. Founded in 1911, it contained approximately 3,500 graves as of 1996.

Abrotanella
inconspicua is a member of the daisy family and is found on Stewart Island and South Island of New Zealand.

Domingo Santa Cruz Wilson
was a Chilean lawyer, composer and music educator. He won the National Prize of Art of Chile in 1951.

Troy Williamson
is an English professional boxer who has held the IBF European junior-middleweight title since 2019. As an amateur he won the 2015 ABA Championships in the middleweight division.

Pedro de la Barra
was a Chilean theatre director. He won the National Prize of Art of Chile in 1952.

Pamela Jean Andrews
is a retired New Zealand judge and lawyer. She served on the High Court of New Zealand from 2006 to 2015.

Ean Cochrane Macinnes Begg
was a Jungian analyst, writer, translator and broadcaster. After obtaining a Modern Languages degree from Oxford University, and a spell as an officer in the British army, followed by an assortment of occupations, such as a wine merchant, headmaster and Dominican friar, Begg developed interests in comparative religion, Gnosis and Norse mythology.

Yevgeni Aleksandrovich Cherkes
is a Russian football player who plays for FC Rostov. He made his debut in the Russian Premier League for FC Rostov on 27 June 2020 in a game against FC Arsenal Tula, replacing Baktiyar Zaynutdinov in the 88th minute.

Lewis County Schools
is the operating school district for Lewis County, Kentucky. The district is governed by the Lewis County Board of Education, of which the current Superintendent is Jamie Weddington.

Elizabeth Nance
, PhD, is an American chemical engineer and currently an Assistant Professor, holding the Clare Boothe Luce Assistant Professorship at the University of Washington, a position she has held since September 2015. Her primary research interests are disease-directed engineering, nanomedicine-based and nanometabolic-based platform development, systems thinking to assess and model therapeutic barriers in treating disease, and biological transport phenomena.

York Plains
is a rural locality and town in the local government area of Southern Midlands in the Central region of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of Oatlands.

Abdulmuminu Yakubu Maishanu
is a Nigeria entrepreneur who specialized in oil and gas trading, he formerly works with AA Rano, he is the CEO and chairman of AYM Shafa Limited Group is and is among the CBN financial institute body. Yakubu Maishanu is founder and owner of AYM Shafa Group and Nanman Nigeria oil.

Saint Margaret
of Antioch is a 1599 oil on canvas painting by Annibale Carracci, showing Margaret of Antioch. It hangs in Santa Caterina dei Funari church in Rome.

Ronald L. Watson
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 23B in the Maryland House of Delegates.

Emma Wooge
was a German composer and singer born in Hamburg. She studied with Eduard Behm and Richard J. Eichberg.

Christ
Appearing to Saint Anthony Abbot or The Temptation of Saint Anthony is a 1598-1600 oil on copper painting of Anthony the Great by Annibale Carracci. It was acquired in the 19th century by an English collector and bought in 1846 by the National Gallery, London, where it still hangs.

Phoebe Roaf
is bishop of the Episcopal Diocese of West Tennessee. She was consecrated bishop on May 4, 2019, at Hope Church in Memphis.

Yandin Wind Farm
is an under construction wind power station in Dandaragan, Western Australia. Construction commenced in July 2019.

Brian A. Chisholm
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 31B in the Maryland House of Delegates.

Il Cartaginese
was a newspaper published in the British protectorate of Malta between 1804 and 1805. At the time of its issue, it was the only periodical publication in Malta.

Brendan Cody Allen
is an American mixed martial artist currently competing in the middleweight division of the Ultimate Fighting Championship. A professional since 2015, he has also competed for the Legacy Fighting Alliance where he is the former Middleweight Champion.

Louis Butler
. He was recruited by the Western Bulldogs with the 53rd draft pick in the 2019 AFL draft.

Shukri Yahye-Abdi
drowned in the River Irwell, England, on 27 June 2019. Aged 12, she was a refugee from Somalia who had lived in a refugee camp in Kenya until moving to England in 2017.

Ned McHenry
is an Australian rules footballer who plays for the Adelaide Crows in the Australian Football League. He was recruited by the Adelaide Crows with the 16th draft pick in the 2018 AFL draft.

Mary Agnes Sullivan
was pioneering policewoman in New York City for 35 years. She was the first woman homicide detective in the New York City Police Department.

Sean Fredricks
is an American filmmaker, writer, director and actor. Sean Fredricks was born in New York City to opera singer Richard Fredricks and actress Sandra Holley.

Outland
is the seventh studio album by English Electronic musician Ital Tek. It was released on 1 May 2020 under Planet Mu.

Mount David
is a prominent mountain summit located in Chelan County of Washington state. The mountain is situated in the Glacier Peak Wilderness, on land managed by the Okanogan-Wenatchee National Forest.

Hambantota Lighthouse
is an onshore lighthouse, located on a rocky promontory in Hambantota, Sri Lanka. The lighthouse is a round masonry tower, high, with a lantern and a gallery, constructed in 1913.

Karima Bennoune
is the Homer G. Angelo and Ann Berryhill Endowed Chair and Martin Luther King Jr. Professor of Law at the UC Davis School of Law and a former United Nations Special Rapporteur in the field of cultural rights.

Lewis County High School
is a public grade 9-12 high school located in Vanceburg, Kentucky. The school is operated by Lewis County Schools and is the sole public high school for Lewis County, Kentucky with a population of 13,870.

Neil Wiley
is an American military veteran, and Intelligence Officer, serving as Principal Deputy Director of National Intelligence in the Office of the Director of National Intelligence. Wiley has over 35 years of experience in the national security arena both as a naval officer and as a civilian intelligence professional.

Wan Roslan bin Wan Hamat
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kelantan State Executive Councillor.

Bahraini Gulf Arabic
is a Gulf Arabic dialect spoken in Bahrain. It is spoken by Sunni Bahraini and is a dialect which is most similar to urban dialect spoken in Qatar.

Broadmarsh
is a rural locality and town in the local government areas of Southern Midlands and Derwent Valley in the Central and South-east regions of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of New Norfolk.

Bill Kinkade
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing the 52nd district in the Mississippi House of Representatives.

Trevor Dodds
is a Scottish curler. At the international level, he was a participant at the . At the national level, he is a 1978 Scottish junior champion curler.

Marvin R. Weatherwax Jr.
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 15 in the Montana House of Representatives.

Waipapakauri
is a small settlement in the Far North District of New Zealand. It is located on State Highway 1 at the isthmus of the Aupouri Peninsula.

Matthew Mitchell Jr
. is an American college basketball player for the San Diego State Aztecs of the Mountain West Conference.

Izani bin Husin
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kelantan State Executive Councillor.

Jesse Love Jr
. is an American professional stock car racing driver.

Wendy Jane Abraham
is a judge of the Federal Court of Australia, sitting in Sydney. She was appointed on for a term to end . Abraham took silk in 1998 and is a member of the bars of South Australia.

Perelman College
is the future seventh residential college at Princeton University. It is scheduled to be opened before September of 2022.

Pran Roy
is a Bangladeshi playwright and painter. He usually performs on stage and television.

Jannelle Flaws
is an American soccer player who plays as a forward for BV Cloppenburg. Flaws was drafted by Chicago Red Stars in the 2016 NWSL College Draft.

Prashant Tripathi
is an Indian Advaita teacher and author. Acharya Prashant has published more than 25 books in Hindi and English.

Boyish
is a 5-piece indie rock band that got its start in Boston before relocating to New York City in 2019. The group currently consists of lead vocalist India Shore, vocalist and guitar player Claire Altendahl, background vocalist Sylvie Chiang, drummer Aleksi Godard, and bass player Jules Chappert.

Tereapii Maki-Kavana
is a Cook Islands politician and member of the Cook Islands Parliament. He is a member of the Cook Islands Party.

Erika Smith
is an American film actress and celebrity impersonator. Erika is an American actress, best known for her work in low budget erotic and horror films and her Marilyn Monroe impersonation . She starred in her first indie film in 2004 and has since appeared in over 45 productions both big and small.

Sybelle Silverphoenix
is an American film actress, producer, and model. Sybelle is an American actress of Hispanic and Hungarian ethnicity, best known for her various portrayals of vampire characters, most recently as Elizabeth Bathory in the award winning series Dawn.

Tuakeu Tangatapoto
is a Cook Islands politician and member of the Cook Islands Parliament. He is a member of the Cook Islands Party.

Vincent P. Martin
is an Irish member of the Green Party, and a Senator since June 2020 after being nominated by the Taoiseach. Previously he has been a local county councillor in both Kildare and his native Monaghan.

Tribun News
is an Indonesian news website and part of Tribun Network, owned by Kompas Gramedia Group. It was cited by Andalas University in 2018 as the most popular nationally-hosted website in Indonesia, with 183.2 million visits per month.

Miami Swim Week
is an annual fashion week held in Miami Beach, Florida, United States. Focus on swimwear and beachwear, it takes place every year during the summer, usually in the middle of July.

Dan Duane Angel
is a former member of the Michigan House of Representatives and college administrator. Angel was born on December 23, 1939 in Detroit, Michigan.

Jill Marie Montaquila DeMatteis
is an American statistician specializing in survey methodology. She has worked as a statistician in the US Bureau of Labor Statistics, and is a research associate professor at the University of Maryland, College Park and a vice president in the Statistics and Evaluation Sciences Group of Westat.

Japan Socialist Party
was the first legal socialist party in the Empire of Japan. One year after its foundation on February 24, 1906, the party was banned by the Japanese government on February 26, 1907.

Sultan Awad Deria
was a Somali ruler and the tribal chief of the Habr Yunis during the late nineteenth-century. Awad was among the youngest sons of Sultan Diiriye who had a total of eighteen sons from five wives.

Tuan Saripuddin bin Tuan Ismail
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kelantan State Executive Councillor.

Mumtaz
binti Md. Nawi is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kelantan State Executive Councillor.

Malcolm Allen
is an American former professional tennis player. Born in Los Angeles, Allen played college tennis for San Jose State University and as a senior in 1988 won the PCAA singles championship.

James F. Garland
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

Lilburn H. Snodgrass
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

Jozef Maynard Borja Erece
is an Australian solicitor and commercial litigator who is the youngest law graduate in Australian history.He graduated from the University of Southern Queensland with a Bachelor of Laws in 2015 at 18 years old. On the same year, he completed his Graduate Diploma in Legal Practice from the Queensland University of Technology that allowed him to gain admission to the roll of barristers and solicitors and at 18 years old became the youngest-ever solicitor in the southern hemisphere in 2015.

Benapole Land Port
, is the largest land port of Bangladesh located in Benapole town of Sharsha Upazila in the Jessore District. This port is used to export-import good with India through Benapole-Petrapole border.

Amphetamine Reptile Records
is an American record label founded in 1986 by US Marine Tom Hazelmyer in Washington state.

James Taylor Stratton
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

Samuel A. Spencer
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

Knox Thompson
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

William Gaines Farish
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

Charles Bendheim
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

Leionema
oldfieldii is a small shrub that is endemic to mountainous locations in Tasmania, Australia. It has dark green leaves, compact pale pink to white flowers from November to January.

Karnafuli Fertiliser Company
or KAFCO is a joint venture multinational company in located in Chittagong, Bangladesh that produces urea fertiliser from Natural Gas. It is located in Anwara upazila of Chittagong district by the side of the Karnafuli river occupying an area of 100.03 acres.

Sorceress
is the fourth studio album by American singer-songwriter Jess Williamson. It was released on May 15, 2020 under Mexican Summer.

Asterolasia
muricata, commonly known as lemon star-bush, is a species of small, slender, erect shrub that is endemic to South Australia. It has leathery leaves covered with rough points and with the edges rolled under, and yellow flowers arranged singly or in groups of up to three, with woolly star-shaped hairs on the back of the petals.

FC Meliorator Zhitkovichi
is a Belarusian football club based in Zhitkovichi, Gomel Oblast. The team plays in the Belarusian Second League.

Mount Hermann
is a Skagit Range summit located northwest of Mount Shuksan and northeast of Mount Baker, in the North Cascades of Washington state. It is situated in the Mount Baker Wilderness, on land managed by Mount Baker-Snoqualmie National Forest.

Aimilios Oikonomidis
is a Cypriot sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Cor van Aanholt
is a sailor who represented the Netherlands Antilles. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

NASCAR Thunder
was a retail chain of NASCAR collectables. The chain was owned and operated by the MTV Networks subsidiary of Viacom and had 11 stores throughout the Southeastern and Southwestern United States.

Luis Alberto Olcese
is a Peruvian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Gwambina
Football Club is an association football club from Misungwi, Misungwi District, Mwanza Region in Tanzania. The club was founded when Arusha United was purchased and rebranded by the Manyara Regional Commissioner, Alexander Mnyeti in May 2019.

Paul Fortune
was a British-American, L.A. based interior designer. Paul Stephen Fortune Fearon was born in a suburb of Liverpool in 1950.

Mohibbul Hasan
was an Indian historian . He wrote books about history of pre-independent India. After his early education at Lucknow, he went to London University for higher study.

Akselos
is a Swiss company which provides an engineering simulation platform based on reduced-basis finite-element analysis. The platform is used to create digital twins of energy infrastructures, in order to improve their design, maintenance, reliability and lifetime.

Aleksandr Mumyga
is a Belarusian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Sabeena Syed
is an actress, model and former author. Syed started her acting career with television serials.

Veerasit Puangnak
is a Thai sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Adolfo Carrau
is a Uruguayan sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Rosalia Tarnavska
was an Ukrainian poet. Tarnavska died on 3 June 2020, aged 87.

Marty Essig
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Larissa Keat
is a Swiss-American actress, director and performer. Larissa Keat was born in Lenzburg as the elder of two daughters with an American father and a Swiss mother.

Peter Fox
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Vladimir Krutskikh
is a Russian sailor. He competed at the 2000 Summer Olympics and the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Antonios Bougiouris
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

John Myrdal
is an American sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Melanie Plimmer
is a British barrister and Diversity and Community Relations Judge. She was formerly a member of Kings Chambers.

Sandra Fleckenstein
is a German film and theatre actress. Fleckenstein was exposed to the world of acting and film from a young age.

Renato Marazzi
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Mariano Lucca
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Kai Bjorn
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Shag Bay
is an inlet on the River Derwent near Geilston Bay, Tasmania, and is within the East Risdon State Reserve . The area around Shag Bay contains a number of Aboriginal Tasmanian shell middens. A bone meal fertiliser factory was established in Shag Bay in the early 1900s.

Queen Mary Higher Secondary School
is a private school in Mokokchung, Nagaland providing both High school and Higher secondary school education. Queen Mary Higher Secondary School was established in 1979 and is located in Mokokchung Village, Mokokchung District of Nagaland.

Gao Tianyu
is a Chinese footballer currently playing as a forward for Iwate Grulla Morioka.

Lumpia
goreng is an Indonesian simple fried spring rolls filled with vegetables; the spring roll wrappers are filled with chopped carrots cut into matchstick size, shredded cabbage, and sometimes mushrooms. Although usually filled only with vegetables, the fried spring rolls might be enrichen with minced beef, chicken, or prawns.

Asterolasia nivea
, commonly known as Bindoon starbush, is a species of weak sub-shrub that is endemic to the southwest of Western Australia. It has leathery oblong to narrow elliptical leaves and white flowers arranged in groups of about three flowers with thick-centred, shield like, star-shaped hairs on the back of the petals.

Tea Tree
is a rural locality and town in the local government areas of Southern Midlands and Brighton in the Central and Hobart regions of Tasmania. It is located about north-east of the town of Brighton.

Gabriella Bosco
is an Italian engineer and a Professor at the Department of Electronics and Telecommunications at the Polytechnic University of Turin. She is the current Editor-in-Chief of the Journal of Lightwave Technology, and a Fellow of the Optical Society of America and the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers.

Kim Ho-yeong
is a South Korean footballer currently playing as a defender for Kamatamare Sanuki.

Narasimharaja
is one of the 224 constituencies in the Karnataka Legislative Assembly of Karnataka a south state of India. It is a segment of Mysore Lok Sabha constituency.

Dreamee
, is the debut studio album by Vietnamese singer Amee. It was released June 28, 2020 by St.319 Entertainment.

Svitlana Valeriyivna Fomenko
is a Ukrainian civil servant and politician. On 10 March 2020, she was appointed as the Acting Minister of Culture and Information Policy.

Orman
is a village in the municipality of Ohrid, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 104 inhabitants.

Wongpakorn Jareontaveesuk
is a Thai professional footballer who plays as an Forward for Thai League 1 club Police Tero.

Claude Maurer
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Kang Ki-doong
is a South Korean actor.

Ramne
is a village in the municipality of Ohrid, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 632 inhabitants.

Holman Prize
has been awarded to adventurous and can do-Spirit blind and low vision people around the world by LightHouse for the Blind and Visually Impaired, USA

Matepani Gumba
located in Kundahar area of Pokhara, Kaski District of the Gandaki Zone in western Nepal. It was established in 1960 A.D.by Nyeshang people who migrated to Pokhara from Manang.

Natasha Ali
is a Pakistani actress, model and host. She is known for her roles in Talafi, Khaas and Malaal e Yaar.

Sveti Stefan
is a village in the municipality of Ohrid, North Macedonia. It is a beachside town along Lake Ohrid, located south of the city of Ohrid.

Dolno Konjsko
is a village in the municipality of Ohrid, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 551 inhabitants.

Gabriele Bruni
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Janapriya Multiple Campus(JMC
) is a multi-discilipinary institue located in Nagdhunga, Pokhara Metropolitan City of Kaski district and is affiliated to the Tribhuwan University . The campus was established in 1991.

Jonatan Persson
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Daniel Phillips
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Santiago
is an Irish Thoroughbred racehorse. He showed some promise as a two-year-old in 2019, running second on his first two starts before taking a maiden race on his final appearance of the year.

Javier de la Plaza
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Ninja
is a song by French rapper Soprano, it was released on March 4, 2020 on YouTube.

Monica S. Webb Hooper
is an American behavioral scientist and clinical psychologist serving as deputy director of the National Institute on Minority Health and Health Disparities. She was a professor at Case Western Reserve University and associate director for cancer disparities research and director of the Office of Cancer Disparities Research in the Case Comprehensive Cancer Center.

Pierre Pennec
is a French sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Eastern Morocco Arabic
, Eastern Moroccan Arabic or Oujda Arabic is a dialectal continuum of Hilalian Arabic, mainly spoken in Oujda area and in a part of Oriental region of Morocco..

Yann Guichard
is a French sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Konstantin Yemelyanov
is a Russian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Aleksandr Yanin
is a Russian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Lorenzo Giacomo Bodini
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Marco Bruno Bodini
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

George Denton Park
is approximately of native bush given to Wellington City in 1951 by William Denton in memory of his parents, George and Eliza Denton. Now a part of Wellington Town Belt it is sandwiched between Zealandia and Polhill Gully on a high ridge far behind where the Dentons once lived.

Tomaso Montanari
is an Italian art historian, academic and essayist. He was born in Florence and there attended the liceo classico Dante, before graduating from the University of Pisa and studying alongside Paola Barocchi at the Scuola Normale Superiore di Pisa.

Jay Parkash Yadav
is an Indian biologist and professor of genetics best known for his research on genetics. He was awarded Prof. R.P.

Tarq Hoekstra
was a Dutch archaeologist. Tarq was the first archaeologists of the city Utrecht where he was appointed in 1972.

Stig Raagaard Hansen
is a Danish sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Helene Hansen
is a Danish sailor. She competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Wellington Cabral Costa
, commonly known as Foguete, is a Brazilian footballer who plays for Kagoshima United.

Mariano Parada
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Sean Levey
to an Irish father, jockey and trainer Mick Levey, and a Swazi mother, Tini.

Hugh Styles
is a British sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Richard Lawley
of the Parliament of England for Much Wenlock in 1545 and 1547.

Adam May
is a British sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Glen Sowry
is a New Zealand sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Thomas Lawley
of the Parliament of England for Much Wenlock in 1547 and March 1553.

Khatiwas
is a village in Jhajjar District of Haryana, India. It is one among 264 villages and five tehsils.

Sharon Bar-li
was the Israeli ambassador to Ghana and Liberia from 2011 until 2015. While serving in Ghana, she was responsible for opening the Israeli embassy for the first time in 38 years., She was later appointed deputy ambassador to London.

Perry Will
is an American politician and wildlife officer from the state of Colorado. A Republican, Will has represented the 57th district of the Colorado House of Representatives, based in the northwestern corner of the state, since 2019.

Western Algeria Arabic
is a dialectal continuum of Hilalian Arabic, mainly spoken in Oran, Algeria. It the western regional dialect of Algerian Arabic, belongs to the Maghrebi Arabic family, and marked by a Berber and Spanish substrates.

Jeffrey Roberts
.

Luca Mack
is a German footballer who plays as a midfielder for VfB Stuttgart.

Carl O. Sherman Sr.
is an American politician. He is a Democrat who represents District 109 in the Texas House of Representatives.

Hopwell Hall
country house near Ockbrook, Derbyshire was built in 1720. It was owned by five generations of the Pares family from 1786 to 1921.

Makaroni
schotel or sometimes known as makaroni schaal is an Indonesian macaroni casserole dish made up of pasta, sausage, tuna, eggs, onion, mushrooms and sometimes potato. The origin of the dish is Indonesia.

Jerotich Seii
is a Kenyan social justice campaigner, humanitarian and development consultant in sub-Saharan Africa who raises funds to provide palliatives to support poor families affected by the Covid-19 pandemic in Kenya. She launches various social media campaign to raise funds and to hold government accountable.

Saifur Rahman Bhandari
Politician of Bogra District of Bangladesh and former member of Parliament for Bogra-6 constituency in 1988. Bhandari is a businessman.

Gil F. Isbell
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 28 in the Alabama House of Representatives.

Thomas Longman
, was the head of the London publishing house Longman, while in charge he oversaw the publication of a sumptuous art book containing images of many of the great masters. Longman also published works by the Whig historian Lord Macaulay, works by the philosopher John Stuart Mill and novels by Benjamin Disraeli who was a prominent Victorian politician who became Prime Minister, Longman eldest son of Thomas Norton Longman, was born in 1804.

Robert Gambrell Jones
, known as Bob Jones, is a former Louisiana politician who served in the Louisiana House of Representatives from 1968 to 1972 and in the State Senate from 1972 to 1976. Entering politics as a Democrat, Jones became a Republican in 1978.

Sudanese Women in Science Organization
Fields.

Bob Lane
is a former gridiron football quarterback who played in the United States Football League. He played college football at Northeast Louisiana.

SM Shafiul Azam
was a Pakistani and Bangladeshi civil servant. Azam graduated with a degree in Law and English from the University of Dhaka.

Nasi
kari is Indonesian rice dish from Acehnese, Minangkabau and Malay cuisine as well as Javanese cuisine. This rice dish popular in Sumatra and Java, Indonesia.

Neil Poznansky
is a retired Canadian thoroughbred racing jockey who in 1996 was the National Champion Apprentice Jockey in the United States as well as the National Champion Apprentice Jockey in Canada. The Eclipse Award was established in 1971 and the Sovereign Award in 1975.

Richard Holtorf
is an American politician and rancher from the state of Colorado. A Republican, Holtorf has represented the 64th district of the Colorado House of Representatives, based in the southeastern corner of the state, since 2019.

Nematus
lucidus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Maria Vlakhou
is a Greek sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Tomeaka McTaggart
is a Caymanian sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Sara Wright
is a Bermudian sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Denise Cesky
is an Austrian sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Grosvenor Vale
is a football stadium in Ruislip, Greater London, England. It is the home of Wealdstone F.C., who moved into the ground in 2008 after 17 years of ground sharing with other clubs after leaving Lower Mead.

Beth Calkin
is a Canadian sailor. She competed in the Europe event at the 2000 Summer Olympics.

Mesoneura
opaca is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

David Shimer
is an American historian, and foreign policy analyst. He graduated from Yale University.

Selandria
serva is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Japan Kumar
is an Indian choreographer and actor who works in Tamil-language films. Japan Kumar worked as an assistant to Prabhu Deva and Raju Sundaram and for a brief period, he garnered fan clubs.

San Wai
or San Wai Tsuen is a village in the San Tin area of Yuen Long District, Hong Kong.

Lower Mead
was a football stadium in Harrow, north west London. It was the home ground of Wealdstone football club for nearly 70 years.

Cerebral Hemispheres
is a studio album by Larry Heard, released under the Mr. Fingers moniker. It was released on Alleviated Records on April 13, 2018.

Joseph McCusker
was an American ice hockey defenseman who played for Boston College after World War II. McCusker began playing ice hockey at Boston College in 1946, joining the team just as head coach John Kelley returned from his time serving in the war.

Amzabegovo
is a village in the municipality of Sveti Nikole, North Macedonia. It is home of a barely excavated archaeological site.

Araniella
opisthographa is a species of orb weaver in the spider family Araneidae. It is found widely throughout central Europe, including into Russia, as well as parts of Central Asia including Iran.

Umbrella Waterfall
is a waterfall located in the Sajikot area of Abbottabad District. It has recently emerged as a new tourist attraction in the KPK province of Pakistan.

Lipinia
nitens is a species of skink found in Malaysia.

Walter Atherton
was an architect and draftsman born in Stoughton, Massachusetts, United States. He studied at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology in Cambridge.

Lipinia
nototaenia is a species of skink found in Papua New Guinea.

Lipinia
occidentalis is a species of skink found in Papua New Guinea.

Lipinia
pulchra is a species of skink found in Papua New Guinea.

Gorobinci
is a village in the municipality of Sveti Nikole, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 820 inhabitants.

Hoplocampa
pectoralis is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Dolno Gjugjance
is a village in the municipality of Sveti Nikole, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 174 inhabitants.

Amanda Brown
is an American immunologist and microbiologist as well as an Associate Professor of neurology and neuroscience at Johns Hopkins University School of Medicine in Baltimore, Maryland. Brown is notable for cloning one of the first recombinant HIV viruses and developing a novel method to visualize HIV infected cells using GFP fluorescence.

Kadrifakovo
is a village in the municipality of Sveti Nikole, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 163 inhabitants.

Tim Hodge
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 72 in the Kansas House of Representatives.

Fenella
nigrita is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Mustafino
is a village in the municipality of Sveti Nikole, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 517 inhabitants.

Nemanjica
is a village in the municipality of Sveti Nikole, North Macedonia. According to the 2002 census, the village had a total of 201 inhabitants.

Rusty Black
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing the 7th district in the Missouri House of Representatives.

Kandla-Gorakhpur
LPG pipeline is a under construction project. The project cost estimation is Rs.

Meteor Lake
is an upcoming series of CPUs from Intel. The series will most likely use the 7nm process, and will likely be launched in the 2022 window.

Nazmul Haque Bappy
is a Bangladeshi director, screenwriter and painter. He has received several awards, including Berger Paints Award UNAIDS Grand Award, China Bangladesh Friendship Award, Grand Award in International Korean Art Festival, Award in Art Are-China Exhibition.

Mendrisio San Martino
railway station is a railway station in the municipality of Mendrisio, in the Swiss canton of Ticino. It is an intermediate stop on the standard gauge Gotthard line of Swiss Federal Railways.

Vlad-Cristian Jianu
. Jianu is the Romanian champion in 2006.

Sandra Vivanco
was a Peruvian-born architect, educator, writer, and professor at the California College of the Arts. She practiced architecture in Japan, Portugal, Peru, Italy, Mexico and Brazil.

Urania
was a private genderqueer feminist journal, published between 1916 and 1940. Editors included Eva Gore-Booth, Esther Roper, Irene Clyde, Dorothy Cornish, and Jessey Wade.

Jason Probst
is an American politician. He is Democrat representing District 102 in the Kansas House of Representatives.

Hermine Heller-Ostersetzer
was an Austrian painter and graphic artist. Heller-Ostersetzer was born on July 23, 1874 in Vienna, Austria.

Pio Del Gaudio
is an Italian politician and chartered accountant. He is current member of the Forza Italia party.

Peggy McGaugh
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 39 in the Missouri House of Representatives.

Poulson C. Reed
is bishop coadjutor of the Episcopal Diocese of Oklahoma. At the end of 2020, he will succeed the Rt.

Bluemont
is a suburban neighborhood in Arlington, Virginia. As of 2020, the population is 7,049 people.

Asterolasia
pallida is a species of woody, perennial herb that is endemic to the southwest of Western Australia. It has elliptical leaves and white flowers arranged in umbels of three to six with star-shaped hairs on the back of the petals and fifteen to twenty-five stamens.

Kim Clijsters
was the defending champion, but did not compete in 2004. Mary Pierce won the title in 2004.

Marek Jakubiak
is a Polish politician and brewer. He was a member of the Sejm from 2015 to 2019 and a candidate for President in 2020.

Matt Eidson
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 43 in the North Dakota House of Representatives.

Kevin Kouassivi-Benissan
is a Finnish footballer who plays as a midfielder for FC Inter Turku on loan from HJK.

Giorgi
.

Charles William Alderson
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

Mount Saul
is a prominent mountain summit located in Chelan County of Washington state. The mountain is situated in the Glacier Peak Wilderness, on land managed by the Okanogan-Wenatchee National Forest.

Jan Heinonen
is a Finland footballer who plays as a midfielder for FC Inter Turku.

Maria Bruna-Estrach
is a Spanish applied mathematician whose interests include stochastic modelling of multiscale phenomena with applications in mathematical biology and industry. She is affiliated with the University of Cambridge, where she is a University Lecturer and Royal Society University Research Fellow in the Department of Applied Mathematics and Theoretical Physics, and a Fellow of Churchill College, Cambridge.

John Bolaris
is an American television meteorologist and realtor. He has worked as the Chief Meteorologist for Weekend Today, NBC 10, WCBS and Fox 29.

George William Brown
was a British trade unionist and politician. Born in Kingston-upon-Hull, Brown became a train driver and relocated to Bristol.

Norman Seabrook
is the former head of the New York City Department of Correction Union, COBA. Norman became a corrections officer in 1995.

Davao ACF Bus Lines Incorporated
is a bus company based in Davao City, Philippines. It operates bus transport services between Davao City, Davao del Sur and Davao Occidental.

River City Ferries
is a ferry company that will commence operating services in Brisbane on 4 November 2020 taking over from Transdev Brisbane Ferries. It is a subsidiary of the SeaLink Travel Group.

William Swymmer
was a Bristol sugar merchant, involved in the slave trade. In 1667, he became a member of the Society of Merchant Venturers.

Emil Aslan
is a Czech political scientist and university lecturer, since 2018 research director at the Institute of International Relations in Prague. Emil Aslan was born in Yerevan.

Mary E. Holland
was an American detective who became an early advocate for fingerprint identification in criminal investigations. She was one of the expert witnesses in the first case in which a criminal was convicted by fingerprint evidence in the United States.

AC Sparta Prague
will play in Czech First League and Czech Cup. They have qualified for Second qualifying round of UEFA Europa League after 3rd place in previous season.

Mayra Soledad Mendoza
is an Argentine politician who served as National Deputy from 2011 to 2019 and is currently Mayor of Quilmes for Frente de Todos party. She was born in a radical family.

Asterolasia
phebalioides, commonly known as downy starbush, is a species of shrub in the family Rutaceae and is endemic to south-eastern continental Australia. It has densely crowded heart-shaped to wedge-shaped leaves densely covered with star-shaped hairs, and single yellow flowers borne on the ends of branchlets with star-shaped hairs on the back of the petals.

New Tradiciones
is the debut solo studio album by American singer Adrienne Bailon under her married name Adrienne Houghton. It was released on November 17, 2017, through the Bridge Music label.

Corey Colehour
is a former gridiron football quarterback who played in the Canadian Football League. He played college football at North Dakota.

James S. Jones
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

Paul Kelly
is an Australian public health physician, epidemiologist and public servant who has served as the Acting Chief Medical Officer of Australia since 29 June 2020. He succeeded Brendan Murphy, who became the Secretary of the Department of Health.

Sato
started his mma career fighting in various promotions in Japan. Sato then fought for Pancrase and Deep promotions in Japan.

Pryzm Brighton
is a chain nightclub located within the Kingswest Centre on West St in Brighton, England. The venue opened in October 1965 as a part of the nationwide chain Top Rank Suite.

Andrew N. Peery
was an American politician who served in the Virginia House of Delegates.

Thierry Declercq
, is a Belgian professional basketball coach He is currently an assistant coach of the Belgian Basketball team, B.C. Oostende, since 2000. Declercq started as an head coach for AJAX Basketball Youth Program in 1999.

Bheri Babai Diversion Multipurpose Project
is a multi-basin irrigation cum hydropower project lying in Banke and Bardiya District of western Nepal. The water is diverted from the Bheri river and discharged to Babai river.

Alexander L. Stevas
was the 17th Clerk of the Supreme Court of the United States, a position he held from 1981 to 1985.

Ferulopsis
is a genus of flowering plants in the umbellifer family Apiaceae, native to the Altai, Mongolia and Siberia. They form cushions which are ecologically important in the cold areas in which they live.

Deborah K
. W. Modrak is a classicist who focuses on Aristotle and who is professor of philosophy at the University of Rochester.

Kai-man Kwan
is a Chinese Christian philosopher at Hong Kong Baptist University. He is the current Director of the Centre for Sino-Christian Studies.

Shane Andrew Patton
is an Australian police officer and, , the Chief Commissioner of Victoria Police. Patton grew up in regional Victoria and joined Victoria Police in 1978.

Charles H. Kahn
is a classicist, professor emeritus of philosophy at the University of Pennsylvania. His work is focused on early Greek philosophy, up to the times of Plato.

William Hayman
, was a merchant, slave trader and Mayor of Bristol in the 17th Century. Hayman was Mayor of Bristol in 1684.

Doug Coby
is an American professional racing driver. He currently competes full-time in the NASCAR Whelen Modified Tour, driving the No. 10 Chevrolet for Doug Coby Racing.

Virginia Cuppaidge
is an Australian contemporary abstract expressionist painter. She lived and worked in New York for almost five decades, before returning to Australia.

Asterolasia
rupestris is a species of erect shrub that is endemic to New South Wales. It has heart-shaped to triangular leaves with the narrower end towards the base, and densely covered with star-shaped hairs.

Karl Paul Themistokles von Eckenbrecher
was a German landscape and marine painter, in the late Romantic atyle. His father was a Prussian military officer, who had originally studied philosophy and medicine.

Korea
has not preferred individualism because it has long preferred group culture. However, as times have changed, the culture of taking care of individual life rather than group life has gradually begun to emerge.

Teresa Martin-Pelegrina
is a field and indoor hockey player from Germany, who plays as a forward. In the German Bundesliga, Martin-Pelegrina plays for UHC Hamburg.

Smelowskia
, sometimes called false candytufts, is a genus of flowering plants in the crucifer family Brassicaceae, native to mountains and arctic regions of Asia and western North America. They may or may not be of Beringian origin.

Franz Brendle
is a German historian and scholar teacher. Born in Ellwangen, Brendle attended the from 1974 to 1983, which he completed with the Abitur in 1983.

Vincent Letsa Kobla Djokoto
is a Ghanaian media practitioner, political activist, historian and lawyer. He is a member of the Tenge-Dzokoto Royal Family of Anyako.

Mangraon
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. It is situated in the eastern rim of Nanda Devi Sanctuary on the watershed of Milam Glacier and Nanda Devi basin.

Aitkul B. Samakova
is a Kazakhstani politician, former member of parliament, and political scientist. She has been a representative to the Mazhilis and the Senate of Kazakhstan, and the First Deputy to the Kazakhstan Minister of Trade.

Vidago Palace
is a 2017 Portuguese mini-series, which originally aired on RTP1 and TVG. The show is a historical drama set in 1936; the series was both set and filmed in the Vidago Palace Hotel in Vidago.

Daniil Shapko
is a Belarusian professional footballer. As of 2020, he plays for Dinamo Minsk.

Artsyom Zakharaw
is a Belarusian professional footballer. As of 2020, he plays for Gorodeya.

Nicodemo Petteruti
is an Italian politician and engineer. He is current member of the Democratic Party.

Klimentiy Gavrilov
is a Belarusian professional footballer. As of 2020, he plays for Isloch Minsk Raion.

Government Medical College and Hospital Nandurbar
is a proposed government Medical College in the state of Maharashtra which is said to be started by an academic session 2020-2021. Official website states that 200 beaded Hospital is accompanied by the college.

Mahmud Ahmad Hamdi al-Falaki
was an Egyptian engineer, mathematician and scientist. He was born in al-Hissa, Gharbia Governorate.

Straw Island Lighthouse
is an active aid to navigation on an islet of the same name in Killeany Bay, northeast of Inishmore in County Galway, Ireland. Completed in 1878, it was the last of four lighthouses built in the 19th century on the Aran Islands.

Dmitry Sibilev
is a Belarusian professional footballer. As of 2020, he plays for Rukh Brest.

Hilton Cairo Heliopolis
, previously known as Fairmont Heliopolis, is a hotel in Cairo, Egypt and it is owned by Hilton Hotels. The hotel opened in 2018 and is close to Cairo International Airport.

Twinzz
is a UK based fashion brand that specialises in headwear, premium apparel and active wear. Twinnz have also have announced a line of outdoor clothing that has been designed in collaboration with former British soldier, Ant Middleton.

Abner Maurice Aust Jr
. was an American flying ace in the 506th Fighter Group during World War II, and a career fighter pilot in the United States Air Force.

Lhatu Dhura
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand, India. It is situated in the eastern rim of the Nanda Devi Sanctuary, on the watershed of the Milam Glacier and the Nanda Devi basin.

Chabab Riadhi de Belouizdad
is an Algerian professional football club based in Belouizdad, Algiers Province. The club was formed in Belcourt in 1962 as Chabab Riadhi de Belcourt, The club was renamed Chabab Riadhi de Belouizdad in 1994.

Valeriia Shabalina
or Valeriya Shabalina is a Russian Paralympic swimmer who competes in international level events. She has won multiple medals in both World Para Swimming Championships and INAS Global Games.

Rafa Escobar
, is a Spanish professional football manager who currently work as the manager of Gibraltar National League club Europa. Escobar started his coaching career with Linense in 2004 and also managed UD Los Barrios in 2009and he managed these two clubs many times and also managed in Arcos.

Asterolasia
squamuligera, commonly known as yellow starbush, is a species of erect, woody, slender perennial shrub that is endemic to the southwest of Western Australia. It has leathery, egg-shaped leaves with the narrower end towards the base and yellow flowers arranged in umbels of five to ten with a fringe of scales on the back of the petals, and about ten stamens.

Emmanuel Church
in Grant Road, Mumbai, India is affiliated to the Church of North India and was built in 1869. The building, constructed in Gothic Revival style, is a Grade II heritage structure and was made using Porbandar stone.

Annamie Paul
is a Canadian civic engagement activist and human rights lawyer who has worked on increasing diversity in government roles and supporting social innovation. She was a candidate in the 2019 Canadian federal election and is running to be the leader of the Green Party of Canada.

Jabbar
played for Iraq between 1983 and 1988.

Abdul-Kadhim
played for Iraq between 1987 and 1988.

David Lanre Messan
who were both of Nigerian and Togolese ancestry.

Netley Cottage
at 10 Lower Terrace is a house in Hampstead in the London Borough of Camden. It is listed Grade II on the National Heritage List for England.

Michele Marchesini
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Alejandro Colla
is an Argentine sailor. He competed in the Finn event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Fabiana Zedeno
is an internationally acclaimed ballerina from Ecuador. She works for the Government of Ecuador as Director of the Classical Ballet Programs.

Orfila Bardesio
in Montevideo.

Ikenna Ihim
is a Nigerian-American doctor and philanthropist best known for his work on Nasogastric intubation. Since 2020, he has been working on the frontline of the COVID-19 pandemic.

Dominik Kirnbauer
is an Austrian footballer currently playing as a midfielder for TSV Hartberg.

Dardan Shabanhaxhaj
is a Kosovar footballer currently playing as a midfielder for SK Sturm Graz.

Jack Stanley
is an English rugby union player who plays for Gloucester in the Premiership Rugby. Stanley joined Edinburgh on trial at the beginning of the 2018-19 campaign having previously been enrolled in the Exeter Chiefs Academy.

Cent Langidrik
was a Marshallese educator, Education Secretary and Public Service Commission Chairman and a member of the RMI Customary Law and Language Commission.

Lohar Deo
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. It is situated in the eastern rim of Nanda Devi Sanctuary on the watershed of Milam Glacier and Nanda Devi basin.

Nicolas Vouilloz
is a Swiss professional footballer who plays as a defender for Swiss club Servette.

Kpaleis
a village located in the Ho West District of the Volta Region of Ghana. It is one of the towns of the Kpalime Traditional Area.

Sukoon
is the annual cultural festival of University of Hyderabad an amalgamation of art, activities and attractions. Sukoon fest happens every in the year in the month of March.

Pablo Arrarte
is a Spanish sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Georgios Kontogouris
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Guido Vignar
is an Italian sailor. He competed in the Star event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Isak Jansson
is a Swedish footballer currently playing as a forward for Kalmar FF.

Robin Tihi
is a Swedish footballer currently playing as a defender for AIK.

Sami Kooheji
is a Bahraini sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Erion Sadiku
is a Swedish footballer currently playing as a midfielder for Varbergs BoIS.

Tim Pitts
is a sailor who represented the United States Virgin Islands. He competed in the Laser event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Augusto Nicolini
is a Peruvian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Joakim Persson
is a Swedish footballer currently playing as a forward for IK Sirius.

Yuriy Orlov
is a Ukrainian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Rory Fitzpatrick
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Mettuguda Metro Station
is located on the Blue Line of the Hyderabad Metro. It is part of Corridor III of the Hyderabad Metro starting from Nagole and towards Hi-Tech city and was opened to the public on 28 November 2017.

William E. Gleason
was a justice of the Dakota Territorial Supreme Court from 1865 to 1866, appointed by Abraham Lincoln on February 16, 1865 to succeed Joseph Lanier Williams. Gleason resigned June 30, 1866, and was replaced by John W. Boyle.

Bernard Luttmer
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Maksim Semerkhanov
is a Russian sailor. He competed in the Laser event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Naguib G. Sinarimbo
is a Filipino lawyer and politician who serves as the Local Government Minister of Bangsamoro. Sinarimbo was appointed as the first minister of the Ministry of the Interior and Local Government on February 26, 2019 by interim Bangsamoro Chief Minister Murad Ebrahim.

Lake Poway
is a dam and reservoir in Poway, San Diego County, California. The dam is owned by the City of Poway and was constructed between 1970 and 1972 with the purpose of storing and supplying water, and provide recreational facilities to the community.

Lipinia
septentrionalis is a species of skink found in Papua New Guinea and Indonesia.

Yair Dabush
is the creator of the YouTube channel YairDD. A popular gaming channel in Israel with over 43,000 subscribers and is considered one of the most popular gaming Youtubers in Israel.

Julia Kay Gaffney
is an American Paralympic swimmer who competes in international level events. She was born with proximal femoral focal deficiency and had her right leg with amputated above the knee and her left leg amputated below the knee due to fibular hemimelia when she was born.

Andrena cristata
is a species of miner bee in the family Andrenidae. It is found in North America.

Evergreen Group Station
is a record label that is serving the neighborhood of Evergreen in Memphis, Tennessee after an exclusive separation from PBG Productions. Evergreen Group Station is a record label - housing project studio that is serving the neighborhood of Evergreen in Memphis, Tennessee after PBG Productions.

Dan Farber
.

George Kwasi Afriyie
is a Ghanaian football administrator and businessman. He was appointed Vice President of the Ghana Football Association in November 2015.

Khit Thit Pyo
May is a popular Burmese live talk show broadcast on MRTV-4. The talk show follows the conversations of beautiful and talented women.

Hayes Gibbes Alleyne
was a physician and zoologist who practised in Australia and who is well known for his studies on the fishes of Australia. Alleyne was born on 14 October 1813 in Saint James on Barbados, his father was John Gay Alleyne, a plantation owner, and his mother was Johanna Bishop, a granddaughter of General Fitzroy Maclean.

Hlefi
is a village in the Ho West District of the Volta Region of Ghana. It is located on the eastern side of the Akwapim Togo mountain range.

Lorenco Vila
is an Albanian professional footballer who currently play as a centre-forward for Albanian club Teuta. His cousin is current Teuta and former Albania national team player Emiljano Vila.

Kimberly
Lucas is bishop of the Episcopal Church in Colorado. She was consecrated as the eleventh bishop of the Episcopal Church in Colorado on 18 May 2019, at the Cathedral of St. John in the Wilderness.

Al Najma Al Zarqaa Football Academy
is an Emirati football academy that was established by Navid Faridi previous manager of Esteghlal F.C. U-19 , in Dubai , United Arab Emirates.

Laxmikanta Mohapatra
was an Indian Odia poet , writer , performance artist and freedom fighter. More than 10 of his books have been published.

Salim Haj Yahya
is a Palestinian cardiologist and surgeon from Taibah, an experienced professor at the British University of Bristol, and a member of the Palestinian Higher Health Council. He served as the Dean of the College of Medicine and Health Sciences at An-Najah National University and also as the executive director of An-Najah National University Hospital.

Kristi Kote
is an Albanian professional footballer who currently play as a central midfielder for Albanian club Teuta.

Lipinia
trivittata is a species of skink found in Vietnam and Cambodia.

Lipinia
vassilievi is a species of skink found in Vietnam.

Upper Terrace House
is a house in Hampstead in the London Borough of Camden. It has been listed Grade II on the National Heritage List for England since March 1997.

Carl Wright
is the Bishop Suffragan for Armed Services and Federal Ministries in the Episcopal Church in the United States. He was elected by the house of bishops on September 20, 2016, on the second ballot.

Gerhard Neukum
was a German planetary scientist who worked on the chronology of solar system bodies. He obtained a Ph.D. in physics at the Heidelberg University.

Lipinia
zamboangensis, also known as the Zamboang lipinia or rusty tree skink, is a species of skink endemic to Mindanao, the Philippines.

Invento Robotics
is an India-based engineering and robotics company founded in November 2016 by Balaji Viswanathan. It is headquartered in Bengaluru, India and is related to the fields of robotics.

Khan Abul Kalam Azad
is a Bangladeshi physician and academic. He is an internist.

Southern Europeans
living in the United Kingdom have resided in the country for many centuries, with significant numbers arriving in the first two decades of the 21st-century. The group can usually trace back full or partial heritage to Italy, Greece, Spain, Portugal, and other countries georgraphically or ethnoculturally related to Southern Europe.

Vasileios Portosalte
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Malav Shroff
is an Indian sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Sumeet Patel
is an Indian sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Thein Daw Gyi Pagoda
is a Buddhist pagoda in Myeik, Tanintharyi Region, Myanmar. The pagoda is the largest pagoda in Myeik and is a popular tourist attraction.

Remote Sensing of Environment
is an academic journal published by Elsevier about remote sensing. Its editors-in-chief are Jing.

Krzysztof Kierkowski
is a Polish sailor. He competed at the 2004 Summer Olympics and the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Marcin Czajkowski
is a Polish sailor. He competed at the 2004 Summer Olympics and the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Tom Fitzpatrick
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Fraser Brown
is an Irish sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Bolama
is the closest of the Bissagos Islands to the mainland of Guinea-Bissau. The island has a population of 6,024.

Spies
played provincial rugby in South Africa for . He made his test debut for the Springboks in 1970 against the touring New Zealand team on 25 July 1970 at Loftus Versfeld in Pretoria. He played in all four test matches against the All Blacks.

Christian Steiger
is a Swiss sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Jukka Piirainen
is a Finnish sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Downtown Container Park
is an outdoor shopping mall and entertainment complex located in downtown Las Vegas, Nevada. The tenants are housed in metal cubes and shipping containers.

Crazy Racing Cartrider Professional Gamer
, an Internet broadcaster in South Korea. As of June 2020, he won a total of 19 awards in the regular league, of which he won 13 championships, 3 runner-ups, and 3rd place.

Gary Boyd
is an Australian sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Robert Moody Laughlin
was an American anthropologist and linguist, and a curator at the Smithsonian Institution. His research focused on the indigenous Maya peoples of Chiapas, Mexico and the Tzotzil language.

Pete Spaulding
is an American sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Vasant Kumar Pandit
was an Indian politician belonging to Bharatiya Jana Sangh, from Mumbai. Later he was part of Janata Party and Bharatiya Janata Party as the original Jana Sangh went through that phase.

Tim Wadlow
is an American sailor. He competed at the 2004 Summer Olympics and the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Christopher C. Davis
was a Black man who lived near Albany, Ohio with his wife and two children. He worked as a farm laborer.

Frank Sargent
is Professor of Microbial Biotechnology at Newcastle University, UK. He has specialised in bacterial bioenergetics, particularly protein transport and enzymes containing nickel and molybdenum, including biotechnology applications.

Fadumo Ahmed Dhimbiil
was a Djiboutian poet, singer, and songwriter. Fadumo Ahmed Dhimbiil was born in 1948 in Djibouti, French Somaliland.

Khristos Garefis
is a Greek sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

The Journal of the Indian Society of Remote Sensing
is an academic journal about remote sensing published by Springer on behalf of the Indian Society of Remote Sensing. Its editor-in-chief is George Joseph; its 2018 impact factor is 0.869.

John Curtis
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Gunnar Struckmann
is a German sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Valery Ushkov
is a Russian sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Sourav Chakraborty
, is an actor and film director, predominantly working in Bengali cinema. He started his acting career in Bengali group theatre, followed by television and films.

David Brian Pfaff
is a South African businessman and former first-class cricketer. Pfaff was born at Cape Town in June 1956.

Olivier Backes
is a French sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Laurent Voiron
is a French sailor. He competed in the Tornado event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Hermann Klebe
was a German trade unionist. Klebe became a naval engineer, and joined the Central Union of Machinists and Stokers.

Odette Ferreira
was a Portuguese Professor of Microbiology who played an important role in research on HIV. Maria Odette Santos Ferreira was born in Lisbon, Portugal on 4 June 1925.

Coolooloosh
is an Israeli band comines in its songs hip hop, funk, jazz and folk music. Coolooloosh formed in 2003 in Jerusalem.

Britt Raybould
is an American CFO and politician from Idaho. Raybould is a member of Idaho House of Representatives from District 34, seat B.

Muraltia
flanaganii is a plant species in the milkwort family. It is native to grasslands and moorlands with altitudes between in southern and eastern Africa.

Olowu Taiwo
, popularly known as Eltee Skhillz and formally known as L.T, is a Nigerian musician. He featured Harrysong in his latest single

Jen Provan
is a Canadian sailor. She competed at the 2004 Summer Olympics and the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Kidbug
is an American cuddlebug-sludge supergroup composed of musicians signed to Joyful Noise Recordings. The project was conceived of by Marina Tadic.

John Franklin Daniel III
was an American archaeologist, known for his work on deciphering the Cypro-Minoan script. Daniel was involved in the archaeological excavations at Kourion from 1934 to 1939, and also took part in the excavations at Tarsus led by Hetty Goldman.

Baranof Warm Springs
are a series of ten geothermal mineral springs located in the small community of Baranof Warm Springs in Sitka, Alaska. The springs were originally used by the Tlingit of Angoon; later people of western descent discovered the springs in 1891.

Arlington County
has 24 Elementary Schools across the county. As of 2020, the biggest Elementary School.

Uqbar Editores
is a Chilean independent publishing company founded in 2006. Since its founding it has been characterized by the versatility of its catalog, which encompasses publications including specialist knowledge such as wealth bailout, without putting aside publishing trends of the market.

Pajarita Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area managed by the Coronado National Forest in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1984 under the Arizona Wilderness Act, the array of canyons that make up the area sit at the western end of the Pajarito Mountains, and is a well known migration route for birds.

Fenusella
hortulana is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Ayatollah Mousavi Hospital
is a public hospital located in Zanjan and currently has a capacity of 320 beds.

Gillian Reid
is a British chemist who is Professor of Inorganic Chemistry and Head of the Department of Chemistry at the University of Southampton. Her research considers coordination chemistry, inorganic semiconductors and metal fluoride scaffolds.

Fenusella nana
is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Jason Fabok
is a Canadian comic-book artist. He has worked almost exclusively for DC Comics for the entirety of his career.

Halidamia
affinis is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Kim Yong-un
is a mathematician, philosopher, and critic of civilization in the Republic of Korea. He has been active in various fields of mathematics, philosophy, anthropology, and linguistics, and is considered to have established the history of mathematics in Korea.

Sanjana Jon
is a New York based Indian fashion designer, philanthropist and social activist. She is the sister of fashion designer Anand Jon..

Daniel Belizario Urresti Elera
is a Peruvian army general and politician who served as Minister of the Interior in the administration of President Ollanta Humala from 2014 to 2015. Born in northern region of Piura, Urresti enrolled in the Chorrillos Military School, specializing in psychological operations and defense mechanisms.

Joachim Krug
is a German football manager.

Ya Wai Aung
is a Burmese actor and model who was popular in the 1990s. Once he was one of the most successful actors in Myanmar.

Artur Vanetsyan
, and the founder and chairman of the center-right Homeland Party.

Azami bin Md
. Nor is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kelantan State Executive Councillor.

Ellen Broidy
is an American lesbian who co-organized the first gay liberation march. Broidy grew up in Greenwich Village in New York City.

Pauline Barrieu
is a French financial statistician, probability theorist, and expert on financial risk assessment, risk transfer, and uncertainty quantification. She is a professor of statistics in the London School of Economics.

Joseph Yi
is a holistic psychiatrist board-certified in addiction medicine based in the Philadelphia, Pennsylvania area. He received his Doctorate of Medicine at Rutgers Robert Wood Johnson Medical School and conducted his residency at Cooper University Hospital where he graduated as chief resident.

Abdullah K. Zilkha
Zilkha.

Michael Anthony Loh
is a major general in the United States Air Force, who serves as National Guard Assistant to the Commander of Air Combat Command, and Adjutant General of the Colorado National Guard. The son of Air Force general John M. Loh, he attended the United States Air Force Academy, class of 1984.

Margarete Koppers
is a German lawyer and currently Attorney General in Berlin. She is the first woman in this office.

Jasmin Moallem
is an Israeli singer, songwriter, rapper and record producer. Moallem raised in Portugal and studied in music school in London and Rimon School of Jazz and Contemporary Music in Israel.

Jennifer Brofer
is an American actress, producer, director, and journalist. After starting her career as a journalist for the U.

Chen Tung-jung
is a Taiwanese politician. Chen attended the Taipei University of Marine Technology.

Mohar Singh Gurjar
was a former dacoit, bandit turned a political leader. He was one of the most dreaded dacoits of the Chambal valley in the 1960s.

Praveen Parameswar
is the CEO of the Edtech firm Lifology. He is also an author and a TEDx speaker.

Chen Min-jen
is a Taiwanese engineer and politician. Chen studied nuclear engineering at National Tsing Hua University and completed a doctorate in the subject at Iowa State University in 1983.

Sisymbriopsis
is a genus of flowering plants in the crucifer family Brassicaceae, native to Central Asia and western China. They may have diversified due to mountain uplift.

Guandan
is a popular poker game that originated in Jiangsu province, China. The game uses two decks of cards, and is played with four players.

J.J
. Dossett is an American politician.

Wu Sung-pei
is a Taiwanese businessman and politician. Wu attended Pacific Western University in Hawaii.

Godavari
District is one of the of Madras Presidency. It has a glorious past.

Real Life
is the debut novel of Alabama-born American writer Brandon Taylor. Described as a campus novel and a coming of age novel, the partly autobiographical book tells of the experiences of a gay, Black doctoral student in a Midwestern Ph.D. program.

Prionoceras
is an extinct genus of ammonites. It lived during the Devonian period.

William Liscum Borden
was an American lawyer who was executive director of staff for the United States Congress Joint Committee on Atomic Energy from 1949 to 1953. In this role he became one of the most powerful people advocating for nuclear weapons development in the United States government.

Elizabeth Norton
is a former professional tennis player from the United States. A right-handed player from Connecticut, Norton was a national junior hardcourt champion and leading junior in the world, before competing professionally in the 1970s and 1980s.

Kenton Patzkowsky
is an American politician. He is a Republican who represents District 61 in the Oklahoma House of Representatives.

Twila Cassadore
is an Arizona-based forager, food educator, advocate for indigenous food sovereignty, and member of the San Carlos Apache Tribe who teaches indigenous food traditions throughout the Western Apache tribes. Through her work, Cassadore promotes the importance of foods consumed by Apaches prior to the forcible relocation of Native Americans to reservations and subsequent reliance on government rations.

Allen Dickerson
is an American lawyer from New York who is a nominee to be a Member of the Federal Election Commission. Dickerson received his undergraduate degree from Yale College and his Juris Doctor from New York University School of Law.

Neil Galbraith
is an Australian curler. At the international level, he is a two-time curler.

Marr Chang-chi
is a Taiwanese politician. Marr attended National Taiwan University, then obtained a doctorate in chemistry at the University of California, Berkeley.

Chandler Thornton
is an American politician currently serving as Chairman of the College Republican National Committee, the College wing of the Republican Party. Chandler attended American University, earning his Bachelor of Arts in Political Science and his Master of Public Administration.

Carpolobia goetzei
. It is endemic to forested areas, wooded steppes, and areas with alluvial soil with altitudes below in Tropical East Africa between South Sudan and Mozambique, as well as northern Madagascar.

Haputale Urban Council
is the local authority for the town of Haputale in the Badulla District, Uva Province, Sri Lanka. The HUC is responsible for providing a variety of local public services including roads, sanitation, drains, housing, libraries, public parks and recreational facilities.

Bhaktha Sabari
is a 1960 Indian, Tamil-language film directed by Ch. Narayanamoorthi.

Oliver Williams
is a former American football wide receiver who played in the National Football League. Williams began his collegiate career at Los Angeles Harbor College, where he played for two years before transferring to the University of Illinois.

Hsieh Wen-cheng
is a Taiwanese businessman, diplomat, and politician. Hsieh earned a degree from the Department of Diplomacy at National Chengchi University and a master of laws at the Victoria University of Wellington.

Zakrytoye Predpriyatiye
was a new wave band from Novosibirsk, Russia, that existed from 1986 to 1994. The group was founded in 1986.

Peter J. Kim
is an American food museum director and social entrepreneur. He served as the Founding Director of the Museum of Food and Drink, a nonprofit museum in Brooklyn, New York.

Gertrud Maria Elisa Thausing
was an Austrian Egyptologist, and the head of the Institute for Egyptology and African Studies at the University of Vienna from 1954 to 1977. Gertrud Maria Elisa Thausing was born on December 29, 1905, in Vienna.

Marble High School
is a school and historical site preserved by the National Register of Historic Places located in Marble, Colorado. It was built in 1910, and is the only surviving building in Marble that utilizes marble in its construction, despite the name of the town.

Putterlickia
, variously called spikethorns, false spike thorns, mock spike thorns and bastard spike thorns, are a genus of flowering plants in the staff vine and bittersweet family Celastraceae, native to South Africa, Eswatini and Mozambique. Endophytic bacteria in their roots produce maytansine.

Thomas Ferrall
is an American politician who currently serves as Vice-Chairman of the College Republican National Committee, the College wing of the Republican Party. Ferrall graduated from Kellenberg Memorial High School in New York.

Richard Raymond
is an British film director, producer and writer. He first started his career as a teenager at Pinewood Film Studios, working for filmmakers such as Lord Richard Attenborough and Neil Jordan.

Sandra F. Simmons
is an American clinical psychologist and gerontologist. She is the Joe C. Davis Endowed Chair in Biomedical Science at Vanderbilt University and the director of the Vanderbilt Center for Quality Aging.

MaveriX
is an Australian drama TV series aimed at children and young teenagers. The series follows the story of a group of junior motocross riders who are selected for the first ever MaveriX Academy in Alice Springs, the home of dirtbike racing in Australia.

Leionema
ralstonii, is a small shrub with angular, smooth branchlets and pale green flowers in winter. It is restricted to the south coast of New South Wales.

Upalco
is an unincorporated community in eastern Duchesne County, Utah, United States. The community is located in the Uinta Basin on the Uintah and Ouray Indian Reservation, about southeast of the town of Altamont and has an elevation of . Upalco uses the same ZIP code that is assigned to Bluebell, a census-designated place located about to the north.

Dewanchandrebhose Sharman
.

Abrotanella
linearifolia is a member of the daisy family and is found in Chile, South America.

NS Mohanakrishnan
is a Chennai-based artist, photographer, journalist and filmmaker. Born in 1962 he has served in advertising, corporate and marketing communications from 1985 onwards.

Shitalpur Multilateral High School
, Chittagong District, Bangladesh is an educational institution. The school was established in 1941.

Sam Philp
. He was recruited by the Carlton Football Club with the 20th draft pick in the 2019 AFL draft.

Mikko
, formally Mikko Nordic Fine Foods, is a restaurant and catering service in the Dupont Circle neighborhood of Washington, D.C., United States, specializing in Nordic cuisine. The restaurant was opened in 2018 by Mikko Kosonen, who was previously the executive chef for the Ambassador of Finland for more than 15 years.

George Steuart Travels Ltd
is a fully integrated travel company engaged in organising outbound and inbound holidays from and to Sri Lanka.It offers services such as ticketing, accommodation, transportation, visa, travel insurance, corporate tours, MICE, weddings and other services related to travel and destination management. It is a subsidiary of George Steuart Group, the oldest business house in Sri Lanka and one of the oldest mercantile establishments in the world.

Abdul Hai
Politician of Naogaon District of Bangladesh and former member of Parliament for Naogaon-5 constituency in 1988. Abdul Hai was elected to parliament from Naogaon-5 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Alinaqipalem
is a small village near Choragudi Panchayat present in Pamidimukkala mandal of Krishna district of Andhra Pradesh state, India. It is situated at 80.86 E 16.23 N and at an altitude of 09 ft above sea-level.

Barbara Christine Bramblett
is an American former professional tennis player. Bramblett, a right-handed player from Houston, was an Orange Bowl champion in 1980 and competed on the professional tour from 1982 to 1985.

Vincenzo Potenza
, is a Italian professional football manager who currently the manager of Maltese Premier League club Floriana. Potenza started his coaching career at italian lower division club and in 2018 he appointed as the manager of top division club Senglea Athletic.Vincenzo Potenza born in Naples, Italy, made a name for himself in Maltese Premier League as he led Southern Club, Senglea Athletic F.C to a remarkable turnaround in the Second Round by retaining the Premier League status for a second consecutive season.

Origami Polyhedra
Design is a book on origami designs for constructing polyhedra. It was written by origami artist and mathematician John Montroll, and published in 2009 by A K Peters.

Karin Peschel
was a German economist and university teacher at the University of Kiel. Peschel died on 19 June 2020, aged 84.

Arpita Mukherjee
is an Indian actress who has appeared predominantly in Bengali and Oriya films .. Arpita Mukherjee was born in Kolkata.

Madeleine Juneau
was a Canadian museologist and teacher. She was a member of the Congregation of Notre Dame of Montreal.

Disney India
launched UTV HD on 21 October 2018. It is owned by Star India, a wholly owned subsidiary of The Walt Disney Company India.

Phyllis Blackwell
is an American former professional tennis player. Blackwell was raised in Mobile, Alabama and played college tennis for the University of Tennessee at Chattanooga, where she is a member of the Hall of Fame.

Massimo Mastrorillo
he received the Fujifilm Euro Press Photo Award, in 2006 the World Press Photo and in 2007, both the Pilsner Urquell IPA Professional Photographer of the Year and the FNAC Prize Attenzione Talento Fotografico.

Makar Litskevich
is a Belarusian professional footballer. As of 2020, he plays for Shakhtyor Soligorsk.

Gulai
kambing.

Giasuddin Islamic Model College
is a college in Narayanganj, Bangladesh, founded in 2010. The college is located approximately 450 feet south of Muktiswarani Gate on the Dhaka-Chittagong Highway, approximately 800 feet west of Demra-Narayanganj Road, on the north side of Road No. 02 in Hirajhil area of Narayanganj District, Siddhirganj Police Station.

Brindabon Das
is one Actor, writer, playwright. He won the Bangladesh FilmAward in 2008 for the television drama Aynabaji.

United Bank for Africa Zambia Limited
, also UBA Zambia, is a commercial bank in Zambia. It is licensed by the Bank of Zambia, the central bank and national banking regulator.

Annie Goldmann
was a French cinema sociologist pioneer. She married Lucien Goldmann.

Hajjah Rohani Darus Danil
, S.H..

Joey Olivo
is an American former professional boxer of Mexican descent who competed from 1976 to 1989. He held the WBA light flyweight title in 1985 and challenged for the WBC light flyweight title in 1981.

Gauss
notation is a notation for mathematical knots. It is created by enumerating and classifying the crossings of an embedding of the knot in a plane.

Brennah Black
in an American actress, model, content creator, television host, and social media influencer. Brennah Black was born on October 9, 1995, in Missouri City, Texas.

Pradip Bhattarai
is Nepalese Film Director. He made his debut in Nepali Cinema Industry on 2016 with Jatra.

Ousmane Dieng
is a French basketball player for the Pole France Basketball team of the Centre Federal de Basketball league. Dieng is a point guard for the team and averaged 10 points in the 2019-20 season.

Tansener Tanpura
is a musical mystery Bengali web series that can tickle the senses of the music of any viewers. The series is about the notes and melodies of music through the traditional Indian Classical music.

Radhika Govindrajan
is an Indian-American anthropologist, researcher and university professor. She has done researches on animal studies especially about leopards, elephants.

Nanda Bhanar
is a mountain of the Kumaun Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. The elevation of Nanda Bhanar is and its prominence is . It is joint 134th highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand.

Abrotanella
linearis is a member of the daisy family and is found on Stewart Island and South Island of New Zealand.

Rory Hie
is an Indonesian professional golfer who plays on the Asian Tour and the PGA Tour China. Hie was born in Balikpapan, Indonesia.

Vitaliy Mykolayovych Shubin
is a Ukrainian lawyer and civil servant. On 10 March 2020, he was appointed as the Acting Minister of Energy and Environmental Protection.

Thotapalle
is a village in the East Godavari district of Andhra Pradesh. It is the Mansabdari estate with the same name which is resumed by Governement in 1881.

David Spriggs
is a Canadian-British installation artist known for his large-scale 3D ephemeral installations that layer transparent images, a technique he first began to use in 1999, to create the illusion of a three-dimensional landscape. David Spriggs was born in 1978 in Manchester, England, and immigrated to Canada in 1992.

Petre Purima
is a Romanian former footballer who played as a left defender. In 2003 Purima received the Honorary Citizen of Craiova title.

Bomanjee Hormarjee Wadia Clock Tower
is a Grade III heritage structure in Fort, Mumbai, India, that was erected in 1882 using public funds as a token of appreciation for Bomanjee Hormarjee Wadi, a Parsi philanthropist who had contributed to the cause of education in the city. He was a member of the Bombay Native Education Society and on the board of Elphinstone Institution.

Hannibal Mejbri
is a French professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for English club Manchester United. Mejbri was born in Ivry-sur-Seine, France, and joined Paris FC in 2009.

Beatrice Waithera Maina
is a Kenyan journalist and human advocate who participates in street demonstrations to fight for human rights She has also participated in protests about corrupt leaders in Kenya. In 2019 she was named a heroine by one of the Kenyan political leaders for leading demonstration to end corruption in public institutions in the country.

Abrotanella
muscosa is a member of the daisy family and is found on Stewart Island, New Zealand.

Anders Henricsson
is a former tennis player from Sweden. Henricsson competed on the professional tour in the 1980s and is the older brother of former touring professional, Per Henricsson.

Abrotanella
nivigena is a member of the daisy family and ranges from southeast New South Wales to eastern Victoria, Australia.

Emanuele Molin
, is an Italian professional basketball coach. He is currently an assistant coach of the Italian basketball team, Aquila Basket Trento, since 2017.

Vegayammapeta Estate
is an ancient zamindari estate which is permanently settled by the British Governemnt in 1802-03 with a revenue of 17,196 and a peskash 8,464. It comprises 10 villages . Vegayammapeta is the zamindari of the same name.

Robert Balson Dingle
.

Richard Mackenzie Williams
was a Welsh Anglican priest in the mid 20th century who rose to become Archdeacon of Wrexham. Williams was educated at Jesus College, Oxford.

Shanta Dutta
is an Indian microbiologist and currently the director of National Institute of Cholera and Enteric Diseases. She has over 23 years of research experience on Enteric disease.

Cecep Arif Rahman
is a teacher, athlete, martial arts teacher and Indonesian actor.

Graciela Pisonero
is a Spanish sailor. She competed at the 2004 Summer Olympics and the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Lisa Ross
is a Canadian sailor. She competed at the 2004 Summer Olympics and the 2008 Summer Olympics.

John Edward Davies
was a Welsh Anglican priest in the second half of the 20th century who rose to become Archdeacon of Wrexham. Davies was educated at the University of Wales.

Deirdre Crampton
is a Canadian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Peta Lewin
is a Bermudian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Christine Patton
is a Bermudian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Alessandra Marenzi
is an Italian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Nuzvid Zamindari
is one of the ancient Zamindari of the Madras Presidency. It comprises nearly about 288 villages or 18 paraganas.

Angela Baroni
is an Italian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Reggie Meredith-Fitiao
is an American Samoan artist and academic. Meredith-Fitiao is considered an expert in barkcloth textile art, also known as siapo or tapa cloth.

Katerina Giakoumidou
is a Greek sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Elena Dimitrakopoulou
is a Greek sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Liz Filter
is an American sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Nancy Haberland
is an American sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Nandakhani
is a mountain of the Kumaun Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. The elevation of Nandakhani is and its prominence is . It is 169th highest located entirely within the Uttrakhand.

Tatyana Lartseva
is a Russian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Diana Krutskikh
is a Russian sailor. She competed at the 2004 Summer Olympics and the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Royz
is a Japanese Visual kei rock band formed in 2009 in Osaka. Currently, Subaru is on vocals, Kuina is on guitar, Koudai is on bass and Tomoya is on drums and they are on the label B.P Records.

Kristin Wagner
is a German sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Theseis
was a third-person action-adventure video game developed by Greek indie development team Track7 Games. Development began in 2004, and the game was planned for release on the Xbox 360 and PC in early 2008.

Veronika Lochbrunner
is a German sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Elodie Lesaffre
is a French sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Anne le Helley
is a French sailor. She competed at the 2004 Summer Olympics and the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Marion Deplanque
is a French sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2004 Summer Olympics.

Tengenenge
is a community of artists and their families located in the Guruve District of Zimbabwe. It has achieved international recognition because of the large number of sculptors who have lived and worked there since 1966.

Jeff Gord
was a bondage artist and photographer. who specialized in the forniphilia subgenre, a form of objectifying sexual bondage which involves the subject being tightly bound and expected to stay immobile for a prolonged period.

Pithapuram Zamindari
is one of the largest and wealthy Zamindari in the East Godavari district, Madras Presidency. In 1802 Pithapuram was overshadowed by the much huge Peddapuram estate.

Vajrayudham
is a 1985 Indian Telugu action film directed by Kovelamudi Raghavendra Rao, produced and distributed by K. Linga Murthy under Lakshmi Films Division, written by Paruchuri Brothers starring Ghattamaneni Krishna and Sridevi Kapoor in the lead roles. The film had musical score by Chakravarthy.

Vitaliy Vasylyovych Fedoriv
is a Ukrainian civil servant and politician. He is the current Governor of Ivano-Frankivsk Oblast.

Lacaille
9352 c or GJ 887 c is a potentially habitable exoplanet announced in 2020 and located 10.74 light years away, in the constellation of Piscis Austrinus. It was detected using the radial velocity method from observations with HARPS in Chile and HIRES in Hawaii.

Lava Hot Springs
, are a system of geothermal mineral springs in the Lava Hot Springs, Idaho area. The springs were historically used by local Bannock and Shoshone Native Americans.

Oshosheni Hiveluah
was a Namibian writer, producer and director. The award winning film maker was listed among the Media Institute of Southern Africa 2015 top ten women to watch in media.

Srinivas BV
is an Indian politician based in the province of Karnataka. He is currently the President of the Indian Youth Congress.

Paul Okoye
, who is better known as Rudeboy, is a Nigerian singer, songwriter and record producer. .

Ampney Park
is a 16th century manor house at Ampney Crucis, Gloucestershire, England. It is a Grade II listed building.

Gloria Laker Aciro-Adiiki
is a Ugandan journalist; a war and peace reporter who has been in the media and reporting scene as far back as 2 decades ago when she contributed enormously to restoring peace in Northern Uganda through her peace reporting which caught the attention of international peace resolution organizations. Gloria is the founder and lead, Peace Journalism Foundation, a group of peace reporters with a mission on peace, development and electoral journalism reporting Gloria was raised in a typical African traditional setting in Acholi, the Northern region of Uganda.

Anabel Moro
is an Argentine Paralympic swimmer who competes in international level events. She is a multiple Parapan American medalist and has participated at the Summer Paralympics four times.

Idhayathai Thirudathey
is a Tamil language drama airing on Colors Tamil. It premiered on 14th February 2020.

Viktor Stanley Lockwood
is a French field hockey player who plays as a defender for the French national team. Lockwood started playing hockey when he was eight years old for Rochin.

Badia Skalli
is a Moroccan politician. Alongside Latifa Bennani-Smires, she became one of the first two women in the House of Representatives when she was elected to parliament in 1993.

Mikey Williams
is an American basketball player who attends San Ysidro High School in San Diego, California. He is a five-star recruit and one of the top players in the 2023 class.

Black Information Network
is a radio network and content brand owned by iHeartMedia. Launched on June 30, 2020, it is an all-news radio network targeting the African American community, carrying a mix of local and national content.

John Gibbon
was a Psychology professor at Columbia University. He was the son of John Heysham Gibbon.

Alexis Gouten
is a French entrepreneur. Descended from a watchmaking dynasty, the Gouten family, he founded several Swiss companies like the luxury leather brand Monarchy London, the Swiss start up Wobee, active in Workers benefits and the Swiss horological brand Manufacture Royale founded by Voltaire.

Latifa Bennani-Smires
is a Moroccan politician. Alongside Badia Skalli, she became one of the first two women in the House of Representatives when she was elected to parliament in 1993.

Zamindars
of Krishna district hold an important place in the history of Madras Presidency. Krishna district holds some huge Zamindari estates like Nuzvid Estate, Chintalapati Vantu, Devarakota, Repalle, Vallur etc which are both extensive and wealthy estates.

Julius Marvin Montgomery
was an American technical professional and politician. He was the first black student enrolled at Brevard Engineering College, now Florida Institute of Technology and the first black technical professional working for the RCA Development Lab at Cape Canaveral in 1956 during the early days of the space program.

Glasson Dock
railway station served the town of Glasson Dock, in Thurnham, with trains to nearby Conder Green and Lancaster along the Glasson Dock branch line. Glasson Dock was opened by the London and North Western Railway on the 9th July 1883.

Larry Achiampong
,, is a British artist, living and working in London. Achiampong is a multi-media artist who uses moving images, audio and visual archives, live performance and sound and often explores postcolonial themes.

Sukaina Khan
is a Pakistani actress and model. She is known for her main roles in dramas Haya Ke Daaman Main, Jaal and Choti Choti Batain.

Jane Chemutai Goin
is an award winning female Kenyan news journalist of Kalenjin origin in Nandi County. Currently she is a television reporter at Citizen TV Kenya . Her areas of interest include politics and current affairs.

Sarah Kimani
is a Kenyan female journalist based in Nairobi who is currently the East African Correspondent of the South African Broadcasting Corporation.In 2005 she won an award as a CNN African journalist of the year in environment category. Sarah was born in Karura, Kiambu County.

Patent and Trademark Office
v. Booking.com B.

Oneplus Nord
is an upcoming Android-based smartphones manufactured by OnePlus, to be unveiled on 10 July 2020

Thelma Adella Brown
was a Pitcairnese politician. In 1973 she and Carol Christian were elected to the Island Council, becoming its first female members.

Harold Takooshian
is an American academic and psychologist perhaps best known as an expert on the Kitty Genovese case, having spent many years studying the subject. Takooshian graduated from City University of New York in 1979 with a PhD.

Jon Pacheco Dozagarat
is a Spanish professional footballer who plays as a defender for Real Sociedad B. On 30 August 2019, Pacheco signed a professional contract with Real Sociedad. Pacheco made his senior debut with Real Sociedad in a 2-1 La Liga loss to Getafe CF on 29 June 2020.

Hari Sharma
is an Indian career civil servant who formerly served as Member of Union Public Service Commission and Secretary to Government of India in Ministry of Home Affairs during the terms of Home Ministers Gulzarilal Nanda, Indira Gandhi and Yashwantrao Chavan. He was a member of Imperial Secretariat Service and later Central Secretariat Service officer.

Dwight Beverly
was a professional American football running back who played in the National Football League. He played college football at Illinois.

Terminal Island
is a low snow-covered island off the north tip of Alexander Island, in the Bellingshausen Sea west of Palmer Land, Antarctic Peninsula. It was first mapped by the Falklands Islands Dependencies Survey, 1947-1948.

Timur Rudoselskiy
is a Kazakh-Israeli footballer.

Carol Grace Warren
is a Pitcairn Islander. In 1973 she and Thelma Brown were elected to the Island Council, becoming its first female members.

Thomas Houkyn
or Howkyn of the Parliament of England for Oxford in 1386.

Mount Nutt Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area in the central part of the Black Mountains in the U.S. state of Arizona. It was established in 1990 under the Arizona Desert Wilderness Act, and it is managed by the Bureau of Land Management.

Thomas Baret
of the Parliament of England for Oxford in September 1388.

La Irene Formation
is a Maastrichtian geologic formation in southern Patagonia, Argentina. The formation is thick and underlies the Chorrillo Formation and rests on top of the Cerro Fortaleza Formation.

Akira Ishibashi
is a Japanese sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

OrangeLoops Inc.
is an Uruguayan software development company focused on providing technology solutions for the enterprise sector. It was established in 2015 by the same founders of SouthLabs, who were responsible for the award-winning product SharePlus, an iOS client app for SharePoint.

Ben Remocker
is a Canadian sailor. He competed in the 49er event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Natalia Mehlman Petrzela
is an American historian, specializing in the politics and culture of the modern United States. She is a professor of history at The New School.

Salma Lakhani
is the designate Lieutenant Governor of Alberta. Her appointment as Lieutenant Governor was made by Governor General of Canada Julie Payette on the Constitutional advice of Prime Minister of Canada Justin Trudeau, effective June 30, 2020.

Carpolobia
is a genus of plants in the milkwort family that are native to Tropical Africa and Madagascar. It was first written about in 1831 by George Don, at which point 4 species were identified.

Maria Klemetz
is a Finnish sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Sumaiyya Bukhsh
is Pakistani actress and model. She is known for her roles in dramas such as Kam Zarf, Jalti Barish, Soya Mera Naseeb and Be Rehem.

Chiara Calligaris
is an Italian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Francesca Scognamillo
is an Italian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Hsiung-Zee Wong
is a composer, artist, and designer who was born in Hong Kong. She moved to the United States in 1966, where she worked as a freelance graphic designer and illustrator.

Giulia Pignolo
is an Italian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Ronti
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. It is situated on the western rim of Nanda Devi Santuary.

Martha Henderson
is a Canadian sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Winchburgh
railway station served the village of Winchburgh, West Lothian, Scotland from 1842 to 1930 on the Edinburgh and Glasgow Railway. The station opened on 21 February 1842 by the Edinburgh and Glasgow Railway.

Dominique Provoyeur
is a South African sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

An-Najah National University Hospital
is a non-profit, private hospital, and is one of the educational hospitals in Palestine. An-Najah National University Hospital was established in 2013 in partnership with the College of Medicine and Health Sciences at An-Najah National University.

Kim Rew
is a South African sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Susan
or Susanna Temple was an English courtier. She was a daughter of Alexander Temple of Etchingham and Mary Penistone, or Mary Sommer.

Padmanabha Dasgupta
is an Indian writer, actor and musician who made his debut as a writer with Neel Rajar Deshe.

Penny Alison
is a South African sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Carrie Howe
is an American sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Catherine Lepesant
is a French sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Julie Gerecht
is a French sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Geoffrey Stuart Seaton
is an English former first-class cricketer and British Army officer. Seaton was born at Kemp Town in Brighton in March 1926.

Julia Bleck
is a German sailor. She competed in the Yngling event at the 2008 Summer Olympics.

Mulagapudi
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Mualagapudi is located at , in the East Godavari District, Andhra Pradesh, India.

Srungavaram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Srungavaram is located at . Srungavaram Village has a population of 3,774, out of which 1886 are male and 1888 are female.Population of children below 6 years of age are 462.

Eram
, located in Okmulgee County, Oklahoma, is a Populated Place, meaning it is not census designated or an incorporated town. It is about five miles east of Morris, to the north of US Highway 62.

Namagiri Marendrapatnam
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Namagiri Narendrapatnam is located at . India census, Namagiri Narendrapatnam Village had a population of 3,107, out of which 1542 were male and 1565 were female.

Bharat Biotech Limited
or Bharat Biotech International Limited is a Pharmaceuticals company headquartered at Hyderabad, India engaged in manufacturing innovative vaccines and bio-therapeutics. Bharat Biotech has its manufacturing facility situated at Genome Valley, Hyderabad, India.

Latchireddipalem
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Latchireddipalem is located at . Latchireddipalem Village has a population of 3,078, out of which 1549 are male and 1529 are female.Population of children below 6 years of age are 424.

Karen Berg
was elected to the Kentucky Senate in a special election held on June 23, 2020, defeating Bill Ferk. She will succeed Senator Ernie Harris, who had resigned on April 15.

Gidajam
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Gidajam is located at . India census, Gidajam Village had a population of 2,853, out of which 1394 were male and 1459 were female.

Iotasperma
are a genus of flowering plants in the composite family Asteraceae, native to Australia. They are erect annual herbs.

Forte Antenne
is one of the 15 forts, built in Rome in the period between 1877 and 1891. It is located in the Q.

Gibberula
subbulbosa is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk, in the family Cystiscidae.

Srungadhara Agraharam
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Srungadhara Agraharam is located at . Srungadhara Agraharam Village has a population of 2,618, out of which 1358 are male and 1260 are female.Population of children below 6 years of age are 376.

Parupaka
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Parupaka is located at . India census, Parupaka had a population of 2,336, out of which 1175 were male and 1161 were female.

Samba Shiva Thadavarthi
also known as Shiva Naidu is a young Indian Telugu poet, author, novelist and short-story writer. Samba Shiva was born on 27 January 1993 in the village of Kunchanapalli in the Guntur District.

Balarampuram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Balarampuram is located at . India census, Balarampuram had a population of 2,050, out of which 1065 were male and 985 were female.

Emma Duffin
was a Northern Irish nurse, diarist and welfare worker. Emma Sylvia Duffin was born at 26 University Square, Belfast on 8 November 1883.

Shuguang Zhang
is an American biochemist. He is a Principal Research Scientist at the MIT Media Lab, Massachusetts Institute of Technology.

Meraka Chamavaram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Meraka Chamavaram is located at . India census, Meraka Chamavaram had a population of 1,675, out of which 826 were male and 849 were female.

Heterarthrus
nemoratus is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Pallapu Chamavaram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Pallapu Chamavaram is located at . India census, Pallapu Chamavaram had a population of 1,510, out of which 767 were male and 743 were female.

Gummaregula
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Gummaregula is located at . India census, Gummaregula had a population of 1435, out of which 740 were male and 695 were female.

Heterarthrus
vagans is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Raghavapatnam
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Raghavapatnam is located at . Raghavapatnam Village has a population of 1211, out of which 647 are male and 564 are female.Population of children below 6 years of age are 112.

Ranpak Holdings Corp
. manufactures machines and paper products used in protective paper-based packing for shipping goods and merchandise for e-commerce and industry.

Bai Lianzhen
was a Chinese politician. She was one of the first group of women elected to the Legislative Yuan in 1948.

Mason Piscitelli
is an American entrepreneur known for his numerous brands which he started at a young age. He was born in DuPage County, Illinois and went to Glenbard East High School and has lived there since.

Lin Rui-ching
is a Taiwanese politician. Affiliated with the Democratic Progressive Party, he was a member of the Legislative Yuan between 1993 and 1999.

Rosprirodnadzor
is the Federal Environmental, Industrial and Nuclear Supervision Service of Russia.

Hanifa bin Ahmad
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kelantan State Executive Councillor.

Frosina
is a 1952 Yugoslavian drama film directed by Vojislav Nanovic and starring Meri Boskova, Aco Jovanovski and Ljuba Arsova. Produced by the newly-established Vardar Film, it was the first Macedonian language film to be made.

Rhu Peninsula
is a small, remote and largely deserted peninsula, covering an area approximately in Lochaber Highland council area, on the west coast of Scotland. Arisaig is located at the northeast corner of the peninsula.

Jerry de Weerdt
is a Belgian professional stock car racing driver who last competed part-time in the NASCAR Whelen Euro Series Elite 2 division. de Weerdt made 54 Elite 2 division starts between 2014 and 2019, and made a total of 41 Elite 1 division starts between 2013 and 2018.

Gita Honwana Welch
is a freelance consultant in the field of international development aid and a former employee of the United Nations. On the basis of her varied national and international functions, she has been and is a participant and speaker at various conferences and working meetings.

Jelena Dokic
and Nadia Petrova were the two-time defending champions, but Dokic did not participate in the doubles event at this tournament. Petrova partnered Elena Likhovtseva, but the pair withdrew before their semifinal match against Marion Bartoli and Silvia Farina Elia.

Dianne Morales
is an American executive and politician. She is a non-profit CEO and has declared her candidacy for the 2021 New York City mayoral election.

Swansea Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area in the central portion of the Buckskin Mountains divided by a large gorge formed by the Bill Williams River in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1990 under the Arizona Desert Wilderness Act the area is managed by the Bureau of Land Management.

Baynes
soil series is an imperfectly drained soil which occurs on eastern Vancouver Island and the adjacent Gulf Islands. Its parent material is eolian, fluvial or marine sand.

Feidong
railway station is a railway station in Feidong County, Hefei, Anhui, China. The planned Hefei Metro line 2 eastern extension will interchange with this station.

Bosistoa
medicinalis, commonly known as the northern towra or Eumundi bosistoa, is a species of small to medium-sized rainforest tree that is endemic to Queensland. It has simple and pinnate leaves with two or three leaflets and panicles of small white flowers.

Marina Rollman
is a Swiss comedian. Rollman was born and raised in Geneva.

Takayuki Takayasu
born 25 September 2001 is a Japanese professional footballer who plays as a defender for Zweigen Kanazawa.

Annie Homer
was a biochemist at Newnham College, Cambridge, University of Toronto and the Lister Institute. She developed improved methods for large-scale production of antitoxin sera during World War I. Annie Homer was born at West Bromwich, London, UK on 3 December 1882.

Taiga Ishiura
born 22 November 2001 is a Japanese professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Tokyo Verdy.

Kimberly Zenz
was a senior threat analyst at iDefense. In 2019, a Moscow court reportedly accused her of passing along Russian state secrets to U.S. intelligence officials.

Muraltia
flanaganii is a plant species in the milkwort family that is endemic to rocky flats about above sea level in the southwestern part of Cape Province, South Africa. It is a perennial subshrub with a height between which branches mainly at its base.

Tres Alamos Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area centered around the southern portion of the Black Mountains and the range high point of Sawyer Peak in the U.S. state of Arizona. The namesake feature, Tres Alamos, is a prominent and colorful monolith in the mountains.

Tom Jacobson
is an American politician. He is a Democrat representing District 11 in the Montana State Senate.

Serena Connolly
is a scholar of Ancient Roman history, with a research focus on Roman Social History and Latin literature. Connolly received a B.A. from Cambridge University in 1998.

Nyai Gede Pinateh
was a Javanese merchant. She was born Muslim and an immigrant to Java, where she stablished herself as a merchant.

Septula Sebogodi
is a South African actor. He is the recipient of two SAFTA Awards.

Kimberly Phillips-Fein
.

Cynthia Bach
is an American jewelry designer based in Los Angeles, California. Her eponymous line is carried by Neiman Marcus and other retailers of fine jewelry around the world.

Nora Brambilla
is an Italian and German theoretical particle physicist known for her research on quarkonium, particles composed of two quarks instead of the more usual three. She is a professor of theoretical particle and nuclear physics at the Technical University of Munich.

Pat Flowers
is an American politician from Montana who has served a State Senator since 2019. He is a member of the Montana Democratic Party and represents District 32.

Jason Ellsworth
is an American politician from Montana who has served a State Senator since 2019. He is a member of the Montana Republican Party and represents District 43.

Akeena Bronson
, known professionally as DJ Keezy, is a DJ from Minneapolis, Minnesota. DJ Keezy was born and raised in North Minneapolis.

Tropical Depression Josie
was a weak tropical system that impacted the Philippine archipelago of Luzon, bringing widespread flooding. The tropical depression was classified in the South China Sea on July 20, and steadily moved eastward while gradually intensifying.

Francis Foster
is a British comedian and commentator. He has been performing comedy since 2012.

Karen Ashby Flack
is an American mechanical engineer specializing in experimental fluid dynamics. She is a professor of mechanical engineering at the United States Naval Academy.

Ana B. Quezada
is an American politician who has been a member of the Rhode Island Senate since 2017. She represents District 2 in Providence.

Kuol Deim Kuol
is a former SPLA general and the chief administrator of the Abyei Area since June 29, 2020. In 2012, Kuol was a lieutenant general in the SPLA, the army of South Sudan.

Julie Meira Weise
is an American historian. She is an associate professor of history at the University of Oregon.

Lauren Boebert
is an American politician, businesswoman, gun-rights activist, and conspiracy theorist from the state of Colorado. She owns Shooters Grill, a restaurant in Rifle, Colorado, where staff members are encouraged to openly carry firearms.

Joanna Marsh
is a British composer of choral and orchestral works, who has lived in Dubai since 2007. She studied composition with Richard Blackford and Judith Bingham, studying at the Royal Academy of Music and also as an organ scholar at Sidney Sussex College, Cambridge.

Mercury Capital
is an Australian investment firm that owns heathcare and media companies. In June 2020, Mercury Capital completed the purchased the Australian assets of Bauer Media Group.

David Gil Roca
, is a Spanish professional basketball coach. He is currently an assistant coach of the Italian basketball team, Saski Baskonia, since 2015.

Shyam Shrestha
is a Belgian politician, actor and producer. Shyam Shrestha was born in Bhojpur, Nepal and moved to Europe in early 2000.

Bhairabsthan Temple
is a Hindu temple of Bhairab or Bhairava located about 9 km north west from the city of Tansen, in Palpa district of Nepal at an elevation of about 1470 m msl. The temple was established by king Mukunda Sena of the Sena dynasty when Palpa used to be the capital.

Bertram Ivor Palipane
was a Ceylonese lawyer and member of the Senate of Ceylon. Having qualified as a proctor from the Ceylon Law College, Palipane established his legal practice in Kurunegala.

Kumara Kulothungan
is a 1939 Indian, Tamil-language film directed by I. Raja Rao The film featured T. R. Rajakumari in the lead role credited as T.

Dimorphos
is a small asteroid satellite that was discovered in 2003. It is the minor-planet moon of a synchronous binary system with 65803 Didymos as the primary asteroid.

Nadmidyn Bayartsaikhan
is a Mongolian social scientist, politician, and government minister. After teaching social science, he obtained a doctorate in economics and was elected to the State Great Khural four times.

Geoff Gibbons
is a South Australian artist, printmaker, and arts educator. He is a founder of Bittondi Printmakers Association and a lecturer at Adelaide Central School of Art.

Carpolobia
lutea is a plant species in the milkwort family. It is endemic to rainforests and the banks of streams with altitudes below in costal areas of West Africa.

Naruto Online
is a game for the Web browser, running in Adobe Flash player, developed by Namco Bandai Games, CyberConnect2, and Tencent Games and released in 2013. It was published in the English language for occidental markets by Oasis Games in 2016.

Micki Schillig Feldmann
.

Kirulapone Public Library
is the largest public library in Kirulapone, located in Colombo 06, Sri Lanka.

Aiba
played for J3 League club; Blaublitz Akita in 2020 season.

White Canyon Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area in the southeastern portion of the Mineral Mountains in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1990 under the Arizona Desert Wilderness Act the area is managed by the Bureau of Land Management.

Abrotanella
patearoa is a member of the daisy family and is endemic species of New Zealand.

Vinayak Nagar
is a locality and a ward in Neredmet neighbourhood of Hyderabad city. It falls under Malkajgiri mandal of Medchal-Malkajgiri district of Indian State of Telangana.

D. W. J. Perera
was a Ceylonese teacher and member of the Senate of Ceylon. Educated at Sri Sumangala College, Panadura, Perera became a mathematics master at Ananda College under Principal P. de S.

Frank Waller
was an American architect, Orientalist and landscape painter. His father was a drygoods merchant who died while Frank was still a boy.

M. D. Kitchilan
was a Ceylonese Malay politician. He appointed as member of Senate of Ceylon from 1965 to 1971.

Sabine Holtz
is a German historian who holds the position of Chair of Regional History at the University of Stuttgart. Since 2015, she has also been the head of the .

Sahasame Naa Oopiri
is a 1989 Indian Telugu satirical crime film based on the murder of the political leader Vangaveeti Mohana Ranga. The film directed by Vijaya Nirmala features Krishna alongside herself, Naresh, Vani Vishwanath and Gummadi in the lead roles.

Robert Penman
was a Scottish footballer who played as a full back for Motherwell, Albion Rovers and St Johnstone. He played in the 1920 Scottish Cup Final which Albion Rovers lost to Kilmarnock.

Abrotanella papuana
is a member of the daisy family and is endemic species of New Guinea.

Suraj Bhanu Solanki
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the lower House of Parliament the Lok Sabha from Dhar, Madhya Pradesh as a member of the Indian National Congress.

TCL
10 Pro is the 2020 smartphone from the TCL Corporation launched on 19 May, 2020. The TCL 10 Pro was officially announced on 6 April, 2020.

Puelmapu
is the traditional Mapuche territory located east of the Andes. It covers much of Patagonia and the Pampas.

Deeping Lakes Nature Reserve
, also known as Deeping Gravel Pits is a local nature reserve with an area of over located south-east of Deeping St James in Lincolnshire, England. It includes part of the Deeping Gravel Pits SSSI and is placed within a Higher Level Stewardship scheme.

Pratap Singh Bhagel
was an Indian politician. He was elected to the lower House of Parliament the Lok Sabha from Dhar, Madhya Pradesh as a member of the Indian National Congress.

Abrotanella
purpurea is a member of the daisy family and is endemic species of southern Chile.

Abrotanella
pusilla is a member of the daisy family and is endemic species of New Zealand.

Ilam Province
is divided into 11 counties, 28 districts, 52 rural districts.On Jan 4, 2020, Holeylan, having been a district of Chardavol county, became the 11th county of Ilam province. The following is the list of counties of Ilam province.

Abrotanella
scapigera is a member of the daisy family and is endemic species of northwest and south central Tasmania, Australia.

Elizabeth Maruma Mrema
is a Tanzanian biodiversity leader and lawyer, currently based out of Montreal, Canada, appointed executive secretary of the United Nations Convention on Biological Diversity in 2020. She is the first African woman to hold this role.

Liverpool Live
247 is an Independent Local Radio Station serving Merseyside, the Liverpool City Region, the North West,Cheshire and North Wales. The station broadcasts on DAB and Online and via Smart Speaker.

Rajavaram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Rajavaram is located at . India census, Rajavarama had a population of 1,199, out of which 596 were male and 603 were female.

Bapabhupalapatnam
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Bapabhupalapatnam is located at . India census, Bapabhupalapatnam had a population of 830, out of which 430 were male and 400 were female.

Saptharishishwarar Temple
is a Hindu temple dedicated to the deity Shiva, located at Lalgudi in Tiruchirapalli district, India. It is one of the shrines of the Vaippu Sthalams sung by Tamil Saivite Nayanar Appar.

Tirupatammapeta
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Tirupatammapeta is located at . India census, Tirupatammapeta had a population of 756, out of which 367 were male and 389 were female.

Conder Green
railway station served the hamlet of Conder Green, in Thurnham, Lancashire, with trains to nearby Glasson Dock and Lancaster along the Glasson Dock branch line. Conder was opened by the London and North Western Railway on the 9th July 1883.

Dhara Jagannadhapuram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Dhara Jagannadhapuram is located at . India census, Dhara Jagannadhapuram had a population of 740, out of which 389 were male and 1359 were female.

Diguva Sivada
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Diguva Sivada is located at . India census, Diguva Sivada had a population of 677, out of which 359 were male and 318 were female.

Uppampalem
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Uppampalem is located at . India census, Uppampalem had a population of 505, out of which 259 were male and 246 were female.

Ayam
pop is a fried chicken dish commonly found in Indonesia, consisting of chicken deep fried in oil. This dish is skinless pale fried chicken that boiled or steamed prior fried.

Ramakrishnapuram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Ramakrishnapuram is located at . India census, Ramakrishnapuram had a population of 489, out of which 248 were male and 241 were female.

Andrew Findlay
was a Scottish footballer who played as a right back, primarily for St Mirren; he was in the team which won the Scottish Cup in 1926. By 1929 he had lost his place to understudy Walter Hay, and moved on to Dundee United for a short spell.

Koduru
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Koduru is located at . India census, Koduru had a population of 479, out of which 234 were male and 245 were female.

Theda M. Daniels-Race
is an American engineer and Michael B. Voorhies Distinguished Professor in the Division of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Louisiana State University. Her research is in nanoelectronics, specialising in the growth and characterization of nanomaterials and hybrid electronic devices based on compound semiconductors.

R.Venkatapuram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. R.Venkatapuram is located at . India census, R.Venkatapuram had a population of 301, out of which 160 were male and 141 were female.

Kothuru
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Kothuru is located at . India census, Kothuru had a population of 271, out of which 127 were male and 144 were female.

Thomas Tayebwa
is a Ugandan lawyer and politician. Since 2016, he is the elected Member of Parliament for Ruhinda North Country in Mitooma District and a member of NRM, the ruling political party in Uganda.

Jaldam
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Jaldam is located at . India census, Jaldam had a population of 223, out of which 106 were male and 117 were female.

D.Pydipala
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. D.Pydipala is located at . India census, D.Pydipala had a population of 201, out of which 100 were male and 101 were female.

Aldo Bulzoni
is an Italian politician and professor. He is current member of the Independent Party.

Bettina Falckenberg
or Bettina Titt-Falckenberg was a German actress, pantomime and author. Falckenberg died on 20 June 2020, aged 93.

Dabbadi
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Dabbadi is located at . India census, Dabbadi had a population of 183, out of which 94 were male and 89 were female.

Oviya
is a Tamil language drama airing on Colors Tamil. It premiered on 26th November 2018.

JioMeet
is a video-communication service developed by the Indian-based mobile Internet company Jio, which is in turn owned by Reliance Industries Limited.

Sarlanka
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Sarlanka is located at . India census, Sarlanka had a population of 163, out of which 81 were male and 82 were female.

Pedduru
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Pedduru is located at . India census, Pedduru had a population of 156, out of which 77 were male and 79 were female.

Alfons Karl Zwicker
is a Swiss composer, pianist and painter. Born in St. Gallen, Zwicker began as a painter and designer.

Chakirevulapalem
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Chakirevulapalem is located at . India census, Chakirevulapalem had a population of 155, out of which 64 were male and 91 were female.

Heversham
railway station served the town of Heversham, near Carnforth, with trains to Kendal and Grange over Sands along the Hincaster branch line. Heversham was opened by the Lancaster and Carlisle railway in 1876, before being officially part of the London and North Western Railway 6 years later.

Ginnelaram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Ginnelaram is located at . India census, Ginnelaram had a population of 136, out of which 64 were male and 72 were female.

VeeRa
is an Enterprise Performance Management software which is used for planning, analytics and reporting in finance. Solution has been especially designed for budgeting and forecasting, and data consolidation.

Diguvadarapalle
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Diguvadarapalle is located at . India census,Diguvadarapalle had a population of 130, out of which 66 were male and 64 were female.

Ballinderry
is a townland in the civil parish of Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located in the south of Mullingar town.

Ballyglass
is a townland in the civil parish of Mullingar in County Westmeath, Ireland. The townland is located to the north of Mullingar town.

Turnhouse
railway station served the suburb of Turnhouse, Edinburgh, Scotland from 1897 to 1930 on the Edinburgh and Glasgow Railway. The station opened on 23 August 1897 by the North British Railway.

Circle Pass Enterprises Limited
is an information technology company incorporated in London in May 2020. It was founded by tech entrepreneur Adam Palmer and is based in London.

Venkatanagaram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Venkatanagaram is located at . India census, Venkatanagaram had a population of 124, out of which 67 were male and 57 were female.

Alireza Shojaian
is a Paris based Iranian painter and visual activist. Shojaian obtained his bachelor degree in fine arts and painting from the Islamic Azad University in 2014.

Satyavaram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Satyavaram is located at . India census, Satyavaram had a population of 103, out of which 54 were male and 49 were female.

Gerardo Chowell
is professor of mathematical epidemiology and chair of the Department of Population Health Sciences in the School of Public Health at Georgia State University. He grew up in Colima, Mexico, where he became interested in mathematics as a child.

Zest North West
is an Independent Local Radio station serving Liverpool, the North West and some parts of North Wales on DAB Online and on the Zest App. The station launched in April 2016 on online streaming but launched on DAB in 2017.

Challeru
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Challeru is located at . India census, Challeru had a population of 52, out of which 29 were male and 23 were female.

Billavaka
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Billavaka is located at . India census, Billavaka had a population of 50, out of which 34 were male and 16 were female.

Chimdum Johnny Mez
is an American soccer player who plays as a forward. Mez played four years of college soccer at California State University, Sacramento between 2010 and 2014, including a redshirted year in 2011.

Assam Gas
based power plant is Combined Cycle Gas Turbine Project joint venture of NTPC and NEEPCO located in the Dibrugarh District of Assam. Capacity of this power plant is 291 MWSteam Turbines.

Conrad Cummings
victory over Andrejs Loginovs at the York Hall in London.

Gangavaram
is a village in Rowthulapudi Mandal, East Godavari district in the state of Andhra Pradesh in India. Gangavaram is located at . India census, Gangavaram Village had a population of 1,253, out of which 624 were male and 629 were female.

Ahmed Shiaan
is the additional Secretary and Deputy Minister of Ministry of Foreign Affairs of Maldives. He was appointed when the new government cabinet took office in 26 March 2018.

Vera Thamm
is a retired German Paralympic swimmer who competed in international level events. She was born without her lower arms and lower leg.

Anerley Town Hall
is a municipal building in Anerley Road, Anerley, London. It is a locally listed building.

Pandit Kota Venkatachalam
was an Indian Sanskrit scholar and historian who combined the knowledge of Geography, Mathematics, Astronomy, Jyotisha Sastra and dedicated many years of his life to the re-construction of Indian chronology from primary sources. He has written over 23 books, each dealing with a specific topic.

Churuli
is an upcoming Indian Malayalam-language film directed and co-produced by Lijo Jose Pellissery and written by S. Hareesh, starring Chemban Vinod Jose, Vinay Forrt and Joju George in key roles. The film produced by Lijo Jose Pellissery and Chemban Vinod Jose under the banner of Movie Monastery and Chembosky Motion Pictures, have Jesto Varghese, O Thomas Panicker and Naushad Salahudin as co-producers.

David Leslie Smallman
was the Governor of Saint Helena, Ascension and Tristan da Cunha between 1995 and 1997. He obtained a promise from HM Government in 1995 to restore British Citizenship to the citizens of St Helena.

Alan Hoole
was the Governor of Saint Helena, Ascension and Tristan da Cunha between 1991 and 1995 and the Governor of Anguilla between 1995 and 1996. He was educated at Sheffield University and College of Law, London, and had previously worked as a solicitor.

Walter Nita
was a Dutch singer, drummer and componist from Hoensbroek. He performed individually and had some hits in the 1980s.

Lechlade Priory
was a house of Augustinian Canons Regular in Lechlade, Gloucestershire, England. The priory, also called the Lechlade hospital, was founded in the 13th century by Isabella de Mortimer, initially as a nunnery; in 1252 Richard, 1st Earl of Cornwall became its patron.

Viole Maribor
, or simply Viole, are an ultras group that supports NK Maribor. Their first organised support occured on August 2 1989, when NK Maribor played against Spartak Subotica.

Kumargram
is a village in the Kumargram CD block in the Alipurduar subdivision of the Alipurduar district in the state of West Bengal, India. Kumargram is located at . Kumagram police station has jurisdiction over a part of the Kumargram CD block.

Michael James Dahl Stallibrass
is an English businessman and former first-class cricketer. The son of the minor counties cricketer Jim Stallibrass, he was born in June 1951 at Poltimore, Devon.

Papuascincus
phaeodes is a species of skink found in Papua New Guinea and Indonesia.

AKM Fazlul Haque
Politician of Naogaon District of Bangladesh and former member of Parliament for Naogaon-1 constituency in 1988. Haque was elected to parliament from Naogaon-1 as a independent candidate in 1988.

SM Nuruzzaman
Politician of Naogaon District of Bangladesh and former member of Parliament for Naogaon-2 constituency in 1988. Nuruzzaman was elected to parliament from Naogaon-2 as a independent candidate in 1988.

Zhegao
railway station is a railway station in Chaohu City, Hefei, Anhui, China. This station has two platforms and two bypass tracks.

Carmel Stewart
is an Irish lawyer who has been a Judge of the High Court since 2014. She was previously a barrister and a Judge of the Circuit Court between 2012 and 2014.

Abdoulaye Sall
is a footballer who plays as a forward for Imolese.

VST Enterprises Ltd
is a cybertechnology company based in Manchester founded by Louis-James Davis. Davis was reappointed in June 2019.

Social Democratic Party
was the first socialist party in the Empire of Japan. The party was banned by the government of Japan only one day after its foundation.

James Stewart Souter
is a Scottish former first-class cricketer. The son of the Scottish colonial administrator Sir Edward Souter, he was born at Kanpur in British India.

Ypthima
watsoni, the looped three-ring, is a species of Satyrinae butterfly.

Giorgi Matiashvili
is a Georgian major general and the incumbent Chief of Georgian Defense Forces, appointed on 1 July 2020. Born in the town of Gardabani, Matiashvili graduated from the United Military Academy of the Ministry of Defense of Georgia in 1999.

Gerald Slater
was an American public TV executive, Emmy-nominated producer, and one of the four founding employees of PBS. As an executive at PBS and WETA in the 1970s and 1980s, Slater played a key role in the development of public television, expanding its coverage of public affairs and the arts.

Michael F. Neidorff
is an American business executive and CEO of Centene Corp. He became CEO in 1996 and led Centene through its IPO in 2001.

Phionah Atuhebwe
is a Ugandan vaccinologist and immunization expert. She is the current Vaccines Introduction Medical Officer, Africa at World Health Organization.

Wilmington Union Station
was a union station in Wilmington, North Carolina. Opened in 1913, it was designed by architect Joseph F. Leitner.

Nicole Nketo Bomele
is a Belgian politican who serves as a member of the Parliament of the Brussels-Capital Region. Nicole Nketo Bomele was born in Kinshasa, Congo on June 29, 1967.

Macrophya
duodecimpunctata is a Palearctic species of sawfly.

Lata Tapovan Hydro Electric Power Project
is Run of the River based project located Approx 25 Km from Joshimath in dist. Chamoli in Uttarakhand.

Glenmore Beach
is a seaside village in KwaZulu-Natal, South Africa. It is part of the Hibiscus Coast in the KwaZulu-Natal South Coast.

Richard George Smalley
is an English former first-class cricketer. The son of the minor counties cricketer Bill Smalley, he was born at Newcastle upon Tyne in March 1979.

Frieda Salvendy
was an Austrian painter and engraver. Salvendy was born on 4 January 1887 in Vienna, Austria.

Mulji Jetha Fountain
is a listed heritage structure in Fort, Mumbai that was erected in 1894, following a commission by Ruttonsee Mulji, a Parsi cotton merchant, who sought to commemorate the death of his only son, Dharamsi Mulji, who died aged 15 in 1889. The statue of a boy on top holding a book represents the son who loved reading.

Jonas Radvanas
- Renaissance era poet, evangelist and reformer of the Grand Duchy of Lithuania. It is believed that he was born and educated in Vilnius.

Series 50 of University Challenge
is set to begin on 13 July 2020 on BBC Two.

Saddle Mountain Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area managed by the Kaibab National Forest north of Grand Canyon National Park in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1984 under the Arizona Wilderness Act, the area on the Kaibab Plateau includes its namesake summit, a prominent ridge shaped like a saddle that reaches an elevation of 8,424 feet.

Jean-Paul Jauffret
is a French businessman, politician and tennis player, eldest son of a well-known French tennis family. Jauffret was several times world veteran team champion and French cadet champion in 1946.

Neil Vijay Salvi
is an Indian-born English educator and a former businessman and first-class cricketer. Salvi was born at Gwalior in May 1965.

Amalapuram Mandal
is one of the 64 mandals in East Godavari District of Andhra Pradesh. As per census 2011, there are 17 villages in this Mandal.

Brian Frisselle
is an American former racing driver. Frisselle competed full-time for eight years in the Rolex Sports Car Series, alongside a part-time season in 2012.

Emmanuel Adil Anthony
is a South Sudanese politician and the governor of Central Equatoria State since June 29, 2020. President Kiir appointed Adil as the governor of Yei River State on February 16, 2018, replacing David Lokonga Moses.

Luciano Rondinella
was an Italian singer and actor.

Ainavilli Mandal
is one of the 64 mandals in East Godavari District of Andhra Pradesh. As per census 2011,there are 17 villages in this Mandal.

Salman Haider Khan
is a Pakistani former first-class cricketer. Khan was born at Rawalpindi in June 1971.

Richard Akuoko Adiyiah
is a Ghanaian politician. He was a member of parliament of the 5th parliament of the 4th republic.

Allavaram Mandal
is one of the 64 mandals in East Godavari District of Andhra Pradesh. As per census 2011,there are 14 villages in this Mandal.

John Vergara
is a luthier from New York, United States or Puerto Rican descent. He specialises in the oud and the Puerto Rican cuatro.

Anton Kralj
is a Swedish footballer who plays for Sandefjord as a defender.

Atreyapuram Mandal
is one of the 64 mandals in East Godavari District of Andhra Pradesh. As per census 2011,there are 15 villages in this Mandal.

Pine Mountain Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area managed by the Prescott National Forest in the U.S. state of Arizona. Pine Mountain is the high point of the Verde River Rim at 6,814 feet and provides an excellent viewing to the northeast of the Wild and Scenic Verde while surrounded by ponderosa pine and Douglas fir.

Digital Bros
is a company that develops, publishes, and sells video games on international markets. The group is active worldwide with offices in Italy and abroad in United Kingdom, the United States, France, Spain, Germany, China and Hong Kong.

Alejandro Badia
is an internationally recognized American orthopedic surgeon, author, and entrepreneur. He was a founder of The Surgery Center at Doral, the Miami Anatomical Research Center, Badia Hand to Shoulder Center, and OrthoNOW, a chain of walk-in orthopedic centers.

Devipatnam Mandal
is one of the 64 mandals in East Godavari District of Andhra Pradesh. As per census 2011, there are 46 villages in this Mandal.

Abdul Malek Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politician. He was elected a member of parliament from Thakurgaon-3 in February 1996.

Marcus Quinn
. He played college football at LSU.

Triple Super Phosphate Complex Limited
or TSP Complex Limited is a government owned fertilizer company in Bangladesh. It is under supervision of Bangladesh Chemical Industries Corporation.

Wang Ching-feng
is a Taiwanese politician. Wang Ching-feng sat on the Hualien County Council and was its speaker.

Leandro da Silva Alves
is a Brazilian footballer who plays as a winger for Portuguese club Rio Ave. Silva made his professional debut with Rio Ave F.C. in a 0-0 Primeira Liga tie with Belenenses SAD on 29 February 2020.

Collabora Online
is an open source online office suite developed by Collabora Productivity, a division of Collabora. It is based on LibreOffice Online.

Shelagh Duffett
was a Canadian artist.

I.Polavaram Mandal
is one of the 64 mandals in East Godavari District of Andhra Pradesh. As per census 2011,there are 11 villages in this Mandal.

Tharkot
is a mountain of the Garhwal Himalaya in Uttarakhand India. It is situated near the southern rim of Nanda Devi Sanctuary.

Redfield Canyon Wilderness
is a protected wilderness area on the southern end of the Galiuro Mountains in the U.S. state of Arizona. Established in 1990 under the Arizona Desert Wilderness Act the area is managed by the Bureau of Land Management and south of the Coronado National Forest managed Galiuro Wilderness.

Carlos Bosch
was an Argentine photojournalist.

GCIRS 16SW
, also known as S97, is a contact binary star located in the Galactic Center. It is composed of two hot, bright and massive stars of equal size that orbit each other with a period of 19.5 days.

Dominic
or Dominica Dipio is Ugandan nun, a filmmaker, author and a professor of Literature and Film at Makerere University in Kampala, Uganda. As a nun, she belongs to the Institute of the Missionary Sisters of Mary Mother of the Church, MSMMC, a Ugandan founded religious congregation in Lira Catholic Diocese in Northern Uganda.

Jonathan Michael Spector
is Professor of Learning Technologies and Doctoral Program Coordinator at the University of North Texas He earned a Ph.D. in Philosophy from the University of Texas at Austin. His research focuses on intelligent support for instructional design, assessing learning in complex domains, and technology integration in education.

Hallsville High School
is a public secondary school in Hallsville, Missouri. It is operated by the Hallsville R-IV School District and serves a small part of northeast Boone County, Missouri.

Harrisburg High School
is a public secondary school in Harrisburg, Missouri. It is operated by the Harrisburg R-VIII School District and serves northwest Boone County, Missouri.

Xavier Moon
is an American professional basketball player for Wilki Morskie Szczecin of the Polish Basketball League. He played college basketball for Northwest Florida State and Morehead State.

Scottish Airways
was an airline serving most of Scotland, especially the Highlands and Islands. It was active from 1937 until 1947, when it was merged into British European Airways.

Joshua Christopher Jacquot
is a Canadian entrepreneur and cannabis rights activist from Windsor, Canada. Jacquot ran for a Councillor seat in the City of Windsor during the 2018 Ontario Municipal elections but was unsuccessful in winning it.

Katherine Whittaker Ferrara
is an American engineer who is a Professor of Radiology at Stanford University. Ferrara has been elected a Fellow of the American Association for the Advancement of Science, Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers and American Institute for Medical and Biological Engineering.

Filip Brattbakk
is a Norwegian footballer who plays as a winger for Rosenborg. Filip Brattbakk joined Rosenborg ahead of 2015 from local club Trond.

Connor Malley
is an English professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for club Middlesbrough. Born in Newcastle upon Tyne, Malley started his career in the youth academy of Sunderland before joining Middlesbrough.

Crystal Simorgh
for Best Screenplay is an award presented annually by the Fajr International Film Festival held in Iran. Crystal Simorgh for Best Adapted Screenplay is an award which established in 2006 but only awarded two times in 2010 and 2012.

Chuck Washington
is an American politician from California currently serving on the Riverside County Board of Supervisors in Riverside County, California.

Madonna
and Child with Saint Catherine of Alexandria is a c.1550 oil on panel painting by the studio of Titian, now in the Galleria degli Uffizi. It was restored around the end of the 18th century, when the present carved and gilded frame was probably added.

Osofo Dadzie
was the title of a television drama series which was very popular in Ghana in the 1970s and early 1980s. It was by the Osofo Dadzie group, a drama and concert group that were very popular in Ghana at the time the series run.

Sally J. Toone
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing District 26B in the Idaho House of Representatives.

Maxine Dexter
is an American physician and politician. She currently serves as a member of the Oregon House of Representatives, first appointed to that seat in June 2020 after the death of Mitch Greenlick.

Polonia
was a passenger steamship that was built in Scotland in 1910, originally named Kursk and was registered in the Russian Empire. She was an Allied troopship in the First World War, when she was briefly operated by Cunard Line.

Mohamed Fadzli bin Hassan
is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kelantan State Executive Councillor.

Brad Pollitt
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing the 52nd district in the Missouri House of Representatives.

Jeffrey D. Dunn
is an American broadcast executive who is the president and CEO of Sesame Workshop, the non-profit organization best known for making Sesame Street. He previously served as the President and CEO of the HiT Entertainment from 2008 until it was sold to Mattel in 2012.

William U. Saunders
represented Gadsden County, Florida in the Florida Legislature during the Reconstruction era. He was a delegate from Gadsden County to the 1868 Counstitutional Convention of Florida despite having been in the county only a few days in his life according to one account.

John Gazzam Butler
was an American army officer and inventor. He spent most of his career in the Ordnance Corps where he helped design and produce better ammunition for rifled guns.

Andreas Kalbitz
and since 2017 chairman of the faction of his party in the Landtag of Brandenburg, a state parliament. Kalbitz was born 1972 in Munich and became a soldier in the Bundeswehr, the german federal army for over 10 years.

Mary Robichaux
is an American politician. She is a Democrat representing District 48 in the Georgia House of Representatives.

Majid Gheidi
is an Iranian archer and a member of the Iranian national archery team. He is the wife of Parisa Baratchi, a shooter from Zanjan.

Volotea
is a Spanish low-cost airline that offers operates flights within Europe and North Africa. The large majority of their routes originate or end in the countries of France, Greece, Italy and Spain.

Mohd
. Nassuruddin bin Daud is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kelantan State Executive Councillor.

Polly Fordyce
is an Assistant Professor of Genetics and Bioengineering and fellow of the ChEM-H Institute at Stanford University, where her laboratory focuses on developing and applying new microfluidic platforms for quantitative, high-throughput biophysics and biochemistry and single-cell genomics. Fordyce was born and raised in Washington, DC.

Wyoming High
School Model United Nations is an annual Model United Nations conference run by Wyoming High School, a public school in Wyoming, Ohio. Founded in 2014, WYOMUN attracts delegates from the Greater Cincinnati Area and is usually held on a Saturday in late October.

Robert Dickey
is an American politician. He is a Republican representing District 140 in the Georgia House of Representatives.

Sara Silavi
, professionally known as DJ Sani, is an Iranian-born record producer and DJ based in Iran.She is known for leading the electronic dance music artist community in Iran. Sara Silavi, a genuine Ahvazi Arab by the artistic name of DJ Sani, was born in 2000 in Ahvaz.

Samuel Johnfiah
is a Ghanaian politician who served as a member of parliament for the Ahanta West constituency. He was born on 9 September, 1952.

Joseph Zephinat Amenowode
is a lecturer and a politician of the Republic of Ghana. he represents Hohoe South Constituency of Volta region of Ghana Joseph was born on 13th of August 1955 in Ve-Deme Volta Region of Ghana.

Dayanand Sahay
was an Indian politician. He was a member of the Rajya Sabha, the upper house of the Parliament of India.

Paul Aulagnier
, an organisation in full communion with the Pope which upholds the Tridentine Mass.

Daniel Elias Polsky
is an American health economist. He is the 40th Bloomberg Distinguished Professor of Health Policy and Economics at Johns Hopkins University.

Schleitheimia
, is an extinct genus of sauropodiform sauropodomorph dinosaur, from the Gruhalde Member of Klettgau Formation of Switzerland. The type species, Schleitheimia schutzi was formally described in 2020.

Zula Brown Toole
founded the Miller County Liberal in 1897, making her the first woman to establish and publish a newspaper in the U.S. state of Georgia. In 1996 she was inducted into the Georgia Newspaper Hall of Fame.

Haredi
cinema is a form of film production by ultra-Orthodox Jews in Israel from the late 20th century. Due to gender segregation in the ultra-Orthodox community, Haredi film production and viewing is segregated as well.

Tulani Bridgewater
is an American Record producer and Casting Director. Daughter of Grammy and Tony Award winner Dee Dee Bridgewater and renowned Jazz trumpeter Cecil Bridgewater.

Daniel McGee
is an American statistician and professor emeritus of statistics at Florida State University, where he formerly chaired the department of statistics. Before joining the faculty of Florida State in 2002, he worked for the United States Public Health Service and in academic medicine.

Gloria Bohanon
was an American visual artist and educator based in Los Angeles, California. She was born in Atlanta, Georgia.

Krapovickasia
is a genus of flowering plants in the mallow family Malvaceae, disjunctly distributed in Mexico, Brazil, Paraguay, Uruguay and Argentina. Perennial herbs, they have yellowish to peach or faded rose colored flowers.

Bijayapur Khola
is a tributary of Seti Gandaki River in Pokhara.

David H. Farrar
is a academic and university administrator, serving as the eighth and current President and Vice-Chancellor of McMaster University. Farrar served as professor of chemistry and an academic administrator at the University of Toronto from 1981 to 2007, and the University of British Columbia from 2007 to 2017.

Jack Danielle Animam
is a Filipina basketball player, who plays as a center or forward. A native of Malolos, Bulacan, Jack Animam was born to Ayo Jackson Animam and Erlinda Santo Tomas.

Atympanum
is a genus of insect in the Acrididae family. The scientific name of this species was first published in 1982 by Yin.

Sanix
is the first music album by electronic music artist Sani, released by avang in 2018.

Isoetes
muelleri is a species of quillwort, a type of lycophyte. This generally apomictic aquatic plant is native to Australia.

Bryce Hall
is an American social media personality know for his TikToks and Youtube channel. Bryce Hall was born . He was raised by his mother in Ellicott City, Maryland.

Western Regional Hospital
is the biggest public hospital in Gandaki Pradesh and is located in Ramghat, Ward 10 of Pokhara. The hospital was upgraded to an academy of health sciences in 2015 and now has a teaching hospital called Pokhara Academy of Health Sciences.

Barriopsis
is genus of fungus first described in 2008.

Bamtang Games
is a Peruvian video game developer based in Lima.

Ibrahim Ayagi
was a Nigerian administrator, economist and columnist who was chairperson of the National Economic Intelligence Committee during the administration of President Olusegun Obasanjo. After a brief stint as a lecturer at Ahmadu Bello University, he made a cabinet member of the Kano State Government in charge of economic development.

Hoover Hynniewta
is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Lok Sabha, the lower house of the Indian Parliament, from Autonomous District constituency in Assam as an Independent.

Samuktala
is a census town and a gram panchayat in the Alipurduar II CD block in the Alipurduar subdivision of the Alipurduar district in the state of West Bengal, India. Samuktala is located at . There is a police station at Samuktala.

Enrico Massi
was an Italian aviator. He is considered a pioneer of aviation in El Salvador.

Nik Mohd
. Amar bin Nik Abdullah is a Malaysian politician and currently serves as Kelantan State Executive Councillor.

Lisa Maria Ellram
is the James Evans Rees Distinguished Professor of Supply Chain at the Farmer School of Business. Ellram grew up in Minnesota and earned her BSB degree in accounting and MBA from the University of Minnesota.

Stray Sheep
is the fifth album by Kenshi Yonezu. It will be released on August 5, 2020.

John Agnaqluk Lincoln
is an American politician serving as a member of the Alaska House of Representatives since 2018 from the 40th district. John Agnaqluk Lincoln was born on December 17, 1981 in Kotzebue, Alaska.

Louis Kolitz
was a German painter who worked in a wide variety of genres, including history painting, military art, portraits, landscapes and vedute. For many years, he served as Director of the Kunsthochschule Kassel.

Carpolobia
alba is a plant species in the milkwort family that is endemic to rainforests, forest fringes, and savanna-park with altitudes below in Western Tropical Africa. It is a shrub or small tree which is tall.

Abrotanella
spathulata is a member of the daisy family and is endemic species of the Antipodean Islands.

Abrotanella
submarginata is a member of the daisy family and is endemic species found in Chile.

Shaun Sarrett
is an American football coach who is currently the offensive line coach for the Pittsburgh Steelers of the National Football League. He previously served as an assistant coach for Marshall and Duke before joining the Steelers as an offensive assistant in 2012.

Pokhara Industrial Estate
is a government established Industrial Estate in the city of Pokhara. Located about five kilometers East of from Prithvi Chowk along Prithvi Highway, it houses many small and large industries.

Latasha Harris
, better known as Tasha Steelz, is an American professional wrestler, currently signed with Impact Wrestling. She is also known for her time in National Wrestling Alliance.

Rajko Kapelan
is a Serbian politician. Kapelan is a professional economist based in the village of Klek in Zrenjanin.

Thirumanam
is a Tamil language drama airing on Colors Tamil. It premiered on 8th October 2018.